Author: Kurt Vonnegut
 
 CAT'S CRADLE
 by Kurt Vonnegut
 Copyright 1963 by Kurt Vonnegut, Jr.
 Published by DELL PUBLISHING CO., INC., 1 Dag Hammarskjold Plaza,
 New York, N.Y. 10017 All rights reserved.
 ISBN: 0-440-11149-8
  For Kenneth Littauer,
  a man of gallantry and taste.
  Nothing in this book is true.
  "Live by the foma* that makes you brave and kind and healthy
 and happy."
  --The Books of Bokonon. 1:5
  *Harmless untruths
 contents
  1. The Day the World Ended
  2. Nice, Nice, Very Nice
  3. Folly
  4. A Tentative Tangling of Tendrils
  5. Letter from a Pie-med
  6. Bug Fights
  7. The Illustrious Hoenikkers
  8. Newt's Thing with Zinka
  9. Vice-president in Charge of Volcanoes
  10. Secret Agent X-9
  11. Protein
  12. End of the World Delight
  13. The Jumping-off Place
  14. When Automobiles Had Cut-glass Vases
  15. Merry Christmas 
  16. Back to Kindergarten
  17. The Girl Pool
  18. The Most Valuable Commodity on Earth
  19. No More Mud
  20. Ice-nine
  21. The Marines March On
  22. Member of the Yellow Press
  23. The Last Batch of Brownies
  24. What a Wampeter Is
  25. The Main Thing About Dr. Hoenikker
  26. What God Is
  27. Men from Mars
  28. Mayonnaise
  29. Gone, but Not Forgotten
  30. Only Sleeping
  31. Another Breed
  32. Dynamite Money
  33. An Ungrateful Man
  34. Vin-dit
  35. Hobby Shop
  36. Meow
  37. A Modem Major General
  38. Barracuda Capital of the World
  39. Fata Morgana
  40. House of Hope and Mercy
  41. A Karass Built for Two
  42. Bicycles for Afghanistan
  43. The Demonstrator
  44. Communist Sympathizers
  45. Why Americans Are Hated
  46. The Bokononist Method for Handling Caesar
  47. Dynamic Tension
  48. Just Like Saint Augustine
  49. A Fish Pitched Up by an Angry Sea
  50. A Nice Midget
  51. O.K., Mom
  52. No Pain
  53. The President of Fabri-Tek
  54. Communists, Nazis, Royalists,
  Parachutists, and Draft Dodgers
  55. Never Index Your Own Book
  56. A Self-supporting Squirrel Cage
  57. The Queasy Dream
  58. Tyranny with a Difference
  59. Fasten Your Seat Belts
  60. An Underprivileged Nation
  61. What a Corporal Was Worth 
  62. Why Hazel Wasn't Scared
  63. Reverent and Free
  64. Peace and Plenty
  65. A Good Time to Come to San Lorenzo
  66. The Strongest Thing There Is
  67. Hy-u-o-ook-kuh!
  68. Hoon-yera Mora-toorz
  69. A Big Mosaic
  70. Tutored by Bokonon
  71. The Happiness of Being an American
  72. The Pissant Hilton
  73. Black Death
  74. Cat's Cradle
  75. Give My Regards to Albert Schweitzer
  76. Julian Castle Agrees with Newt
  that Everything Is Meaningless
  77. Aspirin and Boko-maru
  78. Ring of Steel
  79. Why McCabe's Soul Grew Coarse
  80. The Waterfall Strainers
  81. A White Bride for the Son of a Pullman Porter
  82. Zah-mah-ki-bo
  83. Dr. Schlichter von Koenigswald Approaches
  the Break-even Point
  84. Blackout
  85. A Pack of Foma
  86. Two Little Jugs
  87. The Cut of My Jib
  88. Why Frank Couldn't Be President
  89. Duffle
  90. Only One Catch
  91. Mona
  92. On the Poet's Celebration of his First Boko-maru
  93. How I Almost Lost My Mona
  94. The Highest Mountain
  95. I See the Hook
  96. Bell, Book, and Chicken in a Hatbox
  97. The Stinking Christian
  98. Last Rites
  99. Dyot meet mat
  100. Down the Oubliette Goes Frank
  101. Like My Predecessors, I Outlaw Bokonon
  102. Enemies of Freedom
  103. A Medical Opinion on the Effects of a Writers' Strike
  104. Sulfathiazole
  105. Pain-killer
  106. What Bokononists Say When They Commit Suicide 
  107. Feast Your Eyes!
  108. Frank Tells Us What to Do
  109. Frank Defends Himself
  110. The Fourteenth Book
  111. Time Out
  112. Newt's Mother's Reticule
  113. History
  114. When I Felt the Bullet Enter My Heart
  115. As It Happened
  116. The Grand Ah-whoom
  117. Sanctuary
  118. The Iron Maiden and the Oubliette
  119. Mona Thanks Me
  120. To Whom It May Concern
  121. I Am Slow to Answer
  122. The Swiss Family Robinson
  123. Of Mice and Men
  124. Frank's Ant Farm
  125. The Tasmanians
  126. Soft Pipes, Play On
  127. The End
 cat's cradle
 The Day the World Ended 1
  Call me Jonah. My parents did, or nearly did. They called me
 John.
  Jonah – John - if I had been a Sam, I would have been a Jonah
 still, not because I have been unlucky for others, but because
 somebody or something has compelled me to be certain places at
 certain times, without fail. Conveyances and motives, both
 conventional and bizarre, have been provided. And, according to
 plan, at each appointed second, at each appointed place this Jonah
 was there.
  Listen: 
  When I was a younger man--two wives ago, 250,000 cigarettes
 ago, 3,000 quarts of booze ago.
  When I was a much younger man, I began to collect material
 for a book to be called The Day the World Ended.
  The book was to be factual.
  The book was to be an account of what important Americans had
 done on the day when the first atomic bomb was dropped on
 Hiroshima, Japan.
  It was to be a Christian book. I was a Christian then.
  I am a Bokononist now.
  I would have been a Bokononist then, if there had been anyone
 to teach me the bittersweet lies of Bokonon. But Bokononism was
 unknown beyond the gravel beaches and coral knives that ring this
 little island in the Caribbean Sea, the Republic of San Lorenzo.
  We Bokononists believe that humanity is organized into teams,
 teams that do God's Will without ever discovering what they are
 doing. Such a team is called a karass by Bokonon, and the
 instrument, the kan-kan, that brought me into my own particular
 karass was the book I never finished, the book to be called The
 Day the World Ended.
 Nice, Nice, Very Nice 2
  "If you find your life tangled up with somebody else's life
 for no very logical reasons," writes Bokonon, "that person may be
 a member of your karass."
  At another point in The Books of Bokonon he tells us, "Man
 created the checkerboard; God created the karass." By that he
 means that a karass ignores national, institutional, occupational,
 familial, and class boundaries.
  It is as free-form as an amoeba.
  In his "Fifty-third Calypso," Bokonon invites us to sing
 along with him:
  Oh, a sleeping drunkard
  Up in Central Park,
  And a lion-hunter 
  In the jungle dark,
  And a Chinese dentist,
  And a British queen--
  All fit together
  In the same machine.
  Nice, nice, very nice;
  Nice, nice, very nice;
  Nice, nice, very nice--
  So many different people
  In the same device.
 Folly 3
  Nowhere does Bokonon warn against a person's trying to
 discover the limits of his karass and the nature of the work God
 Almighty has had it do. Bokonon simply observes that such
 investigations are bound to be incomplete.
  In the autobiographical section of The Books of Bokanon he
 writes a parable on the folly of pretending to discover, to
 understand:
  I once knew an Episcopalian lady in Newport, Rhode Island,
 who asked me to design and build a doghouse for her Great Dane.
 The lady claimed to understand God and His Ways of Working
 perfectly. She could not understand why anyone should be puzzled
 about what had been or about what was going to be.
  And yet, when I showed her a blueprint of the doghouse I
 proposed to build, she said to me, "I'm sorry, but I never could
 read one of those things."
  "Give it to your husband or your minister to pass on to God,"
 I said, "and, when God finds a minute, I'm sure he'll explain this
 doghouse of mine in a way that even you can understand."
  She fired me. I shall never forget her. She believed that God
 liked people in sailboats much better than He liked people in
 motorboats. She could not bear to look at a worm. When she saw a
 worm, she screamed. 
  She was a fool, and so am I, and so is anyone who thinks he
 sees what God is Doing, [writes Bokonon].
 A Tentative Tangling of Tendrils 4
  Be that as it may, I intend in this book to include as many
 members of my karass as possible, and I mean to examine all strong
 hints as to what on Earth we, collectively, have been up to.
  I do not intend that this book be a tract on behalf of
 Bokononism. I should like to offer a Bokononist warning about it,
 however. The first sentence in The Books of Bokonon is this:
  "All of the true things I am about to tell you are shameless
 lies."
  My Bokononist warning is this:
  Anyone unable to understand how a useful religion can be
 founded on lies will not understand this book either.
  So be it.
  About my karass, then.
  It surely includes the three children of Dr. Felix Hoenikker,
 one of the so-called "Fathers" of the first atomic bomb. Dr.
 Hoenikker himself was no doubt a member of my karass, though he
 was dead before my sinookas, the tendrils of my life, began to
 tangle with those of his children.
  The first of his heirs to be touched by my sinookas was
 Newton Hoenikker, the youngest of his three children, the younger
 of his two sons. I learned from the publication of my fraternity,
 The Delta Upsilon Quarterly, that Newton Hoenikker, son of the
 Nobel Prize physicist, Felix Hoenikker, had been pledged by my
 chapter, the Cornell Chapter.
  So I wrote this letter to Newt:
  "Dear Mr. Hoenikker:
  "Or should I say, Dear Brother Hoenikker?
  "I am a Cornell DU now making my living as a freelance
 writer. I am gathering material for a book relating to the first
 atomic bomb. Its contents will be limited to events that took 
 place on August 6, 1945, the day the bomb was dropped on
 Hiroshima.
  "Since your late father is generally recognized as having
 been one of the chief creators of the bomb, I would very much
 appreciate any anecdotes you might care to give me of life in your
 father's house on the day the bomb was dropped.
  "I am sorry to say that I don't know as much about your
 illustrious family as I should, and so don't know whether you have
 brothers and sisters. If you do have brothers and sisters, I
 should like very much to have their addresses so that I can send
 similar requests to them.
  "I realize that you were very young when the bomb was
 dropped, which is all to the good. My book is going to emphasize
 the human rather than the technical side of the bomb, so
 recollections of the day through the eyes of a 'baby,' if you'll
 pardon the expression, would fit in perfectly.
  "You don't have to worry about style and form. Leave all that
 to me. Just give me the bare bones of your story.
  "I will, of course, submit the final version to you for your
 approval prior to publication.
  "Fraternally yours."
 Letter from a Pre-med 5
  To which Newt replied:
  "I am sorry to be so long about answering your letter. That
 sounds like a very interesting book you are doing. I was so young
 when the bomb was dropped that I don't think I'm going to be much
 help. You should really ask my brother and sister, who are both
 older than I am. My sister is Mrs. Harrison C. Conners, 4918 North
 Meridian Street, Indianapolis, Indiana. That is my home address,
 too, now. I think she will be glad to help you. Nobody knows where
 my brother Frank is. He disappeared right after Father's funeral
 two years ago, and nobody has heard from him since. For all we
 know, he may be dead now.
  "I was only six years old when they dropped the atomic bomb
 on Hiroshima, so anything I remember about that day other people
 have helped me to remember. 
  "I remember I was playing on the living-room carpet outside
 my father's study door in Ilium, New York. The door was open, and
 I could see my father. He was wearing pajamas and a bathrobe. He
 was smoking a cigar. He was playing with a loop of string. Father
 was staying home from the laboratory in his pajamas all day that
 day. He stayed home whenever he wanted to.
  "Father, as you probably know, spent practically his whole
 professional life working for the Research Laboratory of the
 General Forge and Foundry Company in Ilium. When the Manhattan
 Project came along, the bomb project, Father wouldn't leave Ilium
 to work on it. He said he wouldn't work on it at all unless they
 let him work where he wanted to work. A lot of the time that meant
 at home. The only place he liked to go, outside of Ilium, was our
 cottage on Cape Cod. Cape Cod was where he died. He died on a
 Christmas Eve. You probably know that, too.
  "Anyway, I was playing on the carpet outside his study on the
 day of the bomb. My sister Angela tells me I used to play with
 little toy trucks for hours, making motor sounds, going 'burton,
 burton, burton' all the time. So I guess I was going 'burton,
 burton, burton,' on the day of the bomb; and Father was in his
 study, playing with a loop of string.
  "It so happens I know where the string he was playing with
 came from. Maybe you can use it somewhere in your book. Father
 took the string from around the manuscript of a novel that a man
 in prison had sent him. The novel was about the end of the world
 in the year 2000, and the name of the book was _2000 A.D._ It told
 about how mad scientists made a terrific bomb that wiped out the
 whole world. There was a big sex orgy when everybody knew that the
 world was going to end, and then Jesus Christ Himself appeared ten
 seconds before the bomb went off. The name of the author was
 Marvin Sharpe Holderness, and he told Father in a covering letter
 that he was in prison for killing his own brother. He sent the
 manuscript to Father because he couldn't figure out what kind of
 explosives to put in the bomb. He thought maybe Father could make
 suggestions.
  "I don't mean to tell you I read the book when I was six. We
 had it around the house for years. My brother Frank made it his
 personal property, on account of the dirty parts. Frank kept it
 hidden in what he called his 'wall safe' in his bedroom. Actually,
 it wasn't a safe but just an old stove flue with a tin lid. Frank
 and I must have read the orgy part a thousand times when we were
 kids. We had it for years, and then my sister Angela found it. She
 read it and said it was nothing but a piece of dirty rotten filth.
 She burned it up, and the string with it. She was a mother to
 Frank and me, because our real mother died when I was born.
  "My father never read the book, I'm pretty sure. I don't
 think he ever read a novel or even a short story in his whole 
 life, or at least not since he was a little boy. He didn't read
 his mail or magazines or newspapers, either. I suppose he read a
 lot of technical journals, but to tell you the truth, I can't
 remember my father reading anything.
  "As I say, all he wanted from that manuscript was the string.
 That was the way he was. Nobody could predict what he was going to
 be interested in next. On the day of the bomb it was string.
  "Have you ever read the speech he made when he accepted the
 Nobel Prize? This is the whole speech: 'Ladies and Gentlemen. I
 stand before you now because I never stopped dawdling like an
 eight-year-old on a spring morning on his way to school. Anything
 can make me stop and look and wonder, and sometimes learn. I am a
 very happy man. Thank you.'
  "Anyway, Father looked at that loop of string for a while,
 and then his fingers started playing with it. His fingers made the
 string figure called a 'cat's cradle.' I don't know where Father
 learned how to do that. From his father, maybe. His father was a
 tailor, you know, so there must have been thread and string around
 all the time when Father was a boy.
  "Making the cat's cradle was the closest I ever saw my father
 come to playing what anybody else would call a game. He had no use
 at all for tricks and games and rules that other people made up.
 In a scrapbook my sister Angela used to keep up, there was a
 clipping from _Time_ magazine where somebody asked Father what
 games he played for relaxation, and he said, 'Why should I bother
 with made-up games when there are so many real ones going on?'
  "He must have surprised himself when he made a cat's cradle
 out of the string, and maybe it reminded him of his own childhood.
 He all of a sudden came out of his study and did something he'd
 never done before. He tried to play with me. Not only had he never
 played with me before; he had hardly ever even spoken to me.
  "But he went down on his knees on the carpet next to me, and
 he showed me his teeth, and he waved that tangle of string in my
 face. 'See? See? See?' he asked. 'Cat's cradle. See the cat's
 cradle? See where the nice pussycat sleeps? Meow. Meow.'
  "His pores looked as big as craters on the moon. His ears and
 nostrils were stuffed with hair. Cigar smoke made him smell like
 the mouth of Hell. So close up, my father was the ugliest thing I
 had ever seen. I dream about it all the time.
  "And then he sang. 'Rockabye catsy, in the tree top'; he
 sang, 'when the wind blows, the cray-dull will rock. If the bough
 breaks, the cray-dull will fall. Down will come craydull, catsy
 and all.'
  "I burst into tears. I jumped up and I ran out of the house
 as fast as I could go. 
  "I have to sign off here. It's after two in the morning. My
 roommate just woke up and complained about the noise from the
 typewriter."
 Bug Fights 6
  Newt resumed his letter the next morning. He resumed it as
 follows:
  "Next morning. Here I go again, fresh as a daisy after eight
 hours of sleep. The fraternity house is very quiet now. Everybody
 is in class but me. I'm a very privileged character. I don't have
 to go to class any more. I was flunked out last week. I was a premed.
 They were right to flunk me out. I would have made a lousy
 doctor.
  "After I finish this letter, I think I'll go to a movie. Or
 if the sun comes out, maybe I'll go for a walk through one of the
 gorges. Aren't the gorges beautiful? This year, two girls jumped
 into one holding hands. They didn't get into the sorority they
 wanted. They wanted Tri-Delt.
  "But back to August 6, 1945. My sister Angela has told me
 many times that I really hurt my father that day when I wouldn't
 admire the cat's cradle, when I wouldn't stay there on the carpet
 with my father and listen to him sing. Maybe I did hurt him, but I
 don't think I could have hurt him much. He was one of the bestprotected
 human beings who ever lived. People couldn't get at him
 because he just wasn't interested in people. I remember one time,
 about a year before he died, I tried to get him to tell me
 something about my mother. He couldn't remember anything about
 her.
  "Did you ever hear the famous story about breakfast on the
 day Mother and Father were leaving for Sweden to accept the Nobel
 Prize? It was in The Saturday Evening Post one time. Mother cooked
 a big breakfast. And then, when she cleared off the table, she
 found a quarter and a dime and three pennies by Father's coffee
 cup. He'd tipped her.
  "After wounding my father so terribly, if that's what I did,
 I ran out into the yard. I didn't know where I was going until I
 found my brother Frank under a big spiraea bush. Frank was twelve 
 then, and I wasn't surprised to find him under there. He spent a
 lot of time under there on hot days. Just like a dog, he'd make a
 hollow in the cool earth all around the roots. And you never could
 tell what Frank would have under the bush with him. One time he
 had a dirty book. Another time he had a bottle of cooking sherry.
 On the day they dropped the bomb Frank had a tablespoon and a
 Mason jar. What he was doing was spooning different kinds of bugs
 into the jar and making them fight.
  "The bug fight was so interesting that I stopped crying right
 away--forgot all about the old man. I can't remember what all
 Frank had fighting in the jar that day, but I can remember other
 bug fights we staged later on: one stag beetle against a hundred
 red ants, one centipede against three spiders, red ants against
 black ants. They won't fight unless you keep shaking the jar. And
 that's what Frank was doing, shaking, shaking, the jar.
  "After a while Angela came looking for me. She lifted up one
 side of the bush and said, 'So there you are!' She asked Frank
 what he thought he was doing, and he said, 'Experimenting.' That's
 what Frank always used to say when people asked him what he
 thought he was doing. He always said, 'Experimenting.'
  "Angela was twenty-two then. She had been the real head of
 the family since she was sixteen, since Mother died, since I was
 born. She used to talk about how she had three children--me,
 Frank, and Father. She wasn't exaggerating, either. I can remember
 cold mornings when Frank, Father, and I would be all in a line in
 the front hail, and Angela would be bundling us up, treating us
 exactly the same. Only I was going to kindergarten; Frank was
 going to junior high; and Father.was going to work on the atom
 bomb. I remember one morning like that when the oil burner had
 quit, the pipes were frozen, and the car wouldn't start. We all
 sat there in the car while Angela kept pushing the starter until
 the battery was dead. And then Father spoke up. You know what he
 said? He said, 'I wonder about turtles.' 'What do you wonder about
 turtles? Angela asked him. 'When they pull in their heads,' he
 said, 'do their spines buckle or contract?'
  "Angela was one of the unsung heroines of the atom bomb,
 incidentally, and I don't think the story has ever been told.
 Maybe you can use it. After the turtle incident, Father got so
 interested in turtles that he stopped working on the atom bomb.
 Some people from the Manhattan Project finally came out to the
 house to ask Angela what to do. She told them to take away
 Father's turtles. So one night they went into his laboratory and
 stole the turtles and the aquarium. Father never said a word about
 the disappearance of the turtles. He just came to work the next
 day and looked for things to play with and think about, and
 everything there was to play with and think about had something to
 do with the bomb. 
  "When Angela got me out from under the bush, she asked me
 what had happened between Father and me. I just kept saying over
 and over again how ugly he was, how much I hated him. So she
 slapped me. 'How dare you say that about your father?' she said.
 'He's one of the greatest men who ever lived! He won the war
 today! Do you realize that? He won the war!' She slapped me again.
  "I don't blame Angela for slapping me. Father was all she
 had. She didn't have any boy friends. She didn't have any friends
 at all. She had only one hobby. She played the clarinet.
  "I told her again how much I hated my father; she slapped me
 again; and then Frank came out from under the bush and punched her
 in the stomach. It hurt her something awful. She fell down and she
 rolled around. When she got her wind back, she cried and she
 yelled for Father.
  "'He won't come,' Frank said, and he laughed at her. Frank
 was right. Father stuck his head out a window, and he looked at
 Angela and me rolling on the ground, bawling, and Frank standing
 over us, laughing. The old man pulled his head indoors again, and
 never asked later what all the fuss had been about. People weren't
 his specialty.
  "Will that do? Is that any help to your book? Of course,
 you've really tied me down, asking me to stick to the day of the
 bomb. There are lots of other good anecdotes about the bomb and
 Father, from other days. For instance, do you know the story about
 Father on the day they first tested a bomb out at Alamogordo?
 After the thing went off, after it was a sure thing that America
 could wipe out a city with just one bomb, a scientist turned to
 Father and said, 'Science has now known sin.' And do you know what
 Father said? He said, 'What is Sin?'
  "All the best,
  "Newton Hoenikker"
 The Illustrious Hoenikkers 7
  Newt added these three postscripts to his letter:
  "P.S. I can't sign myself 'Fraternally yours' because they
 won't let me be your brother on account of my grades. I was only a
 pledge, and now they are going to take even that away from me. 
  "P.P.S. You call our family 'illustrious,' and I think you
 would maybe be making a mistake if you called it that in your
 book. I am a midget, for instance--four feet tall. And the last we
 heard of my brother Frank, he was wanted by the Florida police,
 the F.B.I., and the Treasury Department for running stolen cars to
 Cuba on war-surplus L.S.T.'s. So I'm pretty sure 'illustrious'
 isn't quite the word you're after. 'Glamorous' is probably closer
 to the truth.
  "P.P.P.S. Twenty-four hours later. I have reread this letter
 and I can see where somebody might get the impression that I don't
 do anything but sit around and remember sad things and pity
 myself. Actually, I am a very lucky person and I know it. I am
 about to marry a wonderful little girl. There is love enough in
 this world for everybody, if people will just look. I am proof of
 that."
 Newt's Thing with Zinka 8
  Newt did not tell me who his girl friend was. But about two
 weeks after he wrote to me everybody in the country knew that her
 name was Zinka - plain Zinka. Apparently she didn't have a last
 name.
  Zinka was a Ukrainian midget, a dancer with the Borzoi Dance
 Company. As it happened, Newt saw a performance by that company in
 Indianapolis, before he went to Cornell. And then the company
 danced at Cornell. When the Cornell performance was over, little
 Newt was outside the stage door with a dozen long-stemmed American
 Beauty roses.
  The newspapers picked up the story when little Zinka asked
 for political asylum in the United States, and then she and little
 Newt disappeared.
  One week after that, little Zinka presented herself at the
 Russian Embassy. She said Americans were too materialistic. She
 said she wanted to go back home.
  Newt took shelter in his sister's house in Indianapolis. He
 gave one brief statement to the press. "It was a private matter,"
 he said. "It was an affair of the heart. I have no regrets. What
 happened is nobody's business but Zinka's and my own." 
  One enterprising American reporter in Moscow, making
 inquiries about Zinka among dance people there, made the unkind
 discovery that Zinka was not, as she claimed, only twenty-three
 years old.
  She was forty-two--old enough to be Newt's mother.
 Vice-president in Charge of Volcanoes 9
  I loafed on my book about the day of the bomb.
  About a year later, two days before Christmas, another story
 carried me through Ilium, New York, where Dr. Felix Hoenikker had
 done most of his work; where little Newt, Frank, and Angela had
 spent their formative years.
  I stopped off in Ilium to see what I could see.
  There were no live Hoenikkers left in Ilium, but there were
 plenty of people who claimed to have known well the old man and
 his three peculiar children.
  I made an appointment with Dr. Asa Breed, Vice-president in
 charge of the Research Laboratory of the General Forge and Foundry
 Company. I suppose Dr. Breed was a member of my _karass_, too,
 though he took a dislike to me almost immediately.
  "Likes and dislikes have nothing to do with it," says
 Bokonon--an easy warning to forget.
  "I understand you were Dr. Hoenikker's supervisor during most
 of his professional life," I said to Dr. Breed on the telephone.
  "On paper," he said.
  "I don't understand," I said.
  "If I actually supervised Felix," he said, "then I'm ready
 now to take charge of volcanoes, the tides, and the migrations of
 birds and lemmings. The man was a force of nature no mortal could
 possibly control." 
 Secret Agent X-9 10
  Dr. Breed made an appointment with me for early the next
 morning. He would pick me up at my hotel on his way to work, he
 said, thus simplifying my entry into the heavily-guarded Research
 Laboratory.
  So I had a night to kill in Ilium. I was already in the
 beginning and end of night life in Ilium, the Del Prado Hotel. Its
 bar, the Cape Cod Room, was a hangout for whores.
  As it happened--"as it was _meant_ to happen," Bokonon would
 say--the whore next to me at the bar and the bartender serving •me
 had both gone to high school with Franklin Hoenikker, the bug
 tormentor, the middle child, the missing son.
  The whore, who said her name was Sandra, offered me delights
 unobtainable outside of Place Pigalle and Port Said. I said I
 wasn't interested, and she was bright enough to say that she
 wasn't really interested either. As things turned out, we had both
 overestimated our apathies, but not by much.
  Before we took the measure of each other's passions, however,
 we talked about Frank Hoenikker, and we talked about the old man,
 and we talked a little about Asa Breed, and we talked about the
 General Forge and Foundry Company, and we talked about the Pope
 and birth control, about Hitler and the Jews. We talked about
 phonies. We talked about truth. We talked about gangsters; we
 talked about business. We talked about the nice poor people who
 went to the electric chair; and we talked about the rich bastards
 who didn't. We talked about religious people who had perversions.
 We talked about a lot of things.
  We got drunk.
  The bartender was very nice to Sandra. He liked her. He
 respected her. He told me that Sandra had been chairman of the
 Class Colors Committee at Ilium High. Every class, he explained,
 got to pick distinctive colors for itself in its junior year, and
 then it got to wear those colors with pride.
  "What colors did you pick?" I asked.
  "Orange and black."
  "Those are good colors."
  "I thought so."
  "Was Franklin Hoenikker on the Class Colors Committee, too?"
  "He wasn't on anything," said Sandra scornfully. "He never
 got on any committee, never played any game, never took any girl
 out. I don't think he ever even talked to a girl. We used to call
 him Secret Agent X-9."
  "X-9?" 
  "You know--he was always acting like he was on his way
 between two secret places; couldn't ever talk to anybody."
  "Maybe he really _did_ have a very rich secret life," I
 suggested.
  "Nah."
  "Nah," sneered the bartender. "He was just one of those kids
 who made model airplanes and jerked off all the time."
 Protein 11
  "He was suppose to be our commencement speaker," said Sandra.
  "Who was?" I asked.
  "Dr. Hoenikker--the old man."
  "What did he say?"
  "He didn't show up."
  "So you didn't get a commencement address?"
  "Oh, we got one. Dr. Breed, the one you're gonna see
 tomorrow, he showed up, all out of breath, and he gave some kind
 of talk."
  "What did he say?"
  "He said he hoped a lot of us would have careers in science,"
 she said. She didn't see anything funny in that. She was
 remembering a lesson that had impressed her. She was repeating it
 gropingly, dutifully. "He said, the trouble with the world was . .
 ." She had to stop and think.
  "The trouble with the world was," she continued hesitatingly,
 "that people were still superstitious instead of scientific. He
 said if everybody would study science more, there wouldn't be all
 the trouble there was."
  "He said science was going to discover the basic secret of
 life someday," the bartender put in. He scratched his head and
 frowned. "Didn't I read in the paper the other day where they'd
 finally found out what it was?"
  "I missed that," I murmured.
  "I saw that," said Sandra. "About two days ago."
  "That's right," said the bartender.
  "What _is_ the secret of life?" I asked.
  "I forget," said Sandra. 
  "Protein," the bartender declared. "They found out something
 about protein."
  "Yeah," said Sandra, "that's it."
 End of the World Delight 12
  An older bartender came over to join in our conversation in
 the Cape Cod Room of the Del Prado. When he heard that I was
 writing a book about the day of the bomb, he told me what the day
 had been like for him, what the day had been like in the very bar
 in which we sat. He had a W. C. Fields twang and a nose like a
 prize strawberry.
  "It wasn't the Cape Cod Room then," he said. "We didn't have
 all these fugging nets and seashells around. It was called the
 Navajo Tepee in those days. Had Indian blankets and cow skulls on
 the walls. Had little tom-toms on the tables. People were supposed
 to beat on the tom-toms when they wanted service. They tried to
 get me to wear a war bonnet, but I wouldn't do it. Real Navajo
 Indian came in here one day; told me Navajos didn't live in
 tepees. 'That's a fugging shame,' I told him. Before that it was
 the Pompeii Room, with busted plaster all over the place; but no
 matter what they call the room, they never change the fugging
 light fixtures. Never changed the fugging people who come in or
 the fugging town outside, either. The day they dropped Hoenikker's
 fugging bomb on the Japanese a bum came in and tried to scrounge a
 drink. He wanted me to give him a drink on account of the world
 was coming to an end. So I mixed him an 'End of the World
 Delight.' I gave him about a half-pint of creme de menthe in a
 hollowed-out pineapple, with whipped cream and a cherry on top.
 'There, you pitiful son of a bitch,' I said to him, 'don't ever
 say I never did anything for you.' Another guy came in, and he
 said he was quitting his job at the Research Laboratory; said
 anything a scientist worked on was sure to wind up as a weapon,
 one way or another. Said he didn't want to help politicians with
 their fugging wars anymore. Name was Breed. I asked him if he was
 any relation to the boss of the fugging Research Laboratory. He
 said he fugging well was. Said he was the boss of the Research
 Laboratory's fugging son." 
 The Jumping-off Place 13
  Ah, God, what an ugly city Ilium is!
  "Ah, God," says Bokonon, "what an ugly city every city is!"
  Sleet was falling through a motionless blanket of smog. It
 was early morning. I was riding in the Lincoln sedan of Dr. Asa
 Breed. I was vaguely ill, still a little drunk from the night
 before. Dr. Breed was driving. Tracks of a long-abandoned trolley
 system kept catching the wheels of his car.
  Breed was a pink old man, very prosperous, beautifully
 dressed. His manner was civilized, optimistic, capable, serene. I,
 by contrast, felt bristly, diseased, cynical. I had spent the
 night with Sandra.
  My soul seemed as foul as smoke from burning cat fur.
  I thought the worst of everyone, and I knew some pretty
 sordid things about Dr. Asa Breed, things Sandra had told me.
  Sandra told me everyone in Ilium was sure that Dr. Breed had
 been in love with Felix Hoenikker's wife. She told me that most
 people thought Breed was the father of all three Hoenikker
 children.
  "Do you know Ilium at all?" Dr. Breed suddenly asked me.
  "This is my first visit."
  "It's a family town."
  "Sir?"
  "There isn't much in the way of night life. Everybody's life
 pretty much centers around his family and his home."
  "That sounds very wholesome."
  "It is. We have very little juvenile delinquency."
  "Good."
  "Ilium has a very interesting history, you know."
  "That's very interesting."
  "It used to be the jumping-off place, you know."
  "Sir?"
  "For the Western migration."
  "Oh."
  "People used to get outfitted here."
  "That's very interesting." 
  "Just about where the Research Laboratory is now was the old
 stockade. That was where they held the public hangings, too, for
 the whole county."
  "I don't suppose crime paid any better then than it does
 now."
  "There was one man they hanged here in 1782 who had murdered
 twenty-six people. I've often thought somebody ought to do a book
 about him sometime. George Minor Moakely. He sang a song on the
 scaffold. He sang a song he'd composed for the occasion."
  "What was the song about?"
  "You can find the words over at the Historical Society, if
 you're really interested."
  "I just wondered about the general tone."
  "He wasn't sorry about anything."
  "Some people are like that."
  "Think of it!" said Dr. Breed. "Twenty-six people he had on
 his conscience!"
  "The mind reels," I said.
 When Automobiles Had Cut-glass Vases 14
  My sick head wobbled on my stiff neck. The trolley tracks had
 caught the wheels of Dr. Breed's glossy Lincoln again.
  I asked Dr. Breed how many people were trying to reach the
 General Forge and Foundry Company by eight o'clock, and he told me
 thirty thousand.
  Policemen in yellow raincapes were at every intersection,
 contradicting with their white-gloved hands what the stop-and-go
 signs said.
  The stop-and-go signs, garish ghosts in the sleet, went
 through their irrelevant tomfoolery again and again, telling the
 glacier of automobiles what to do. Green meant go. Red meant stop.
 Orange meant change and caution.
  Dr. Breed told me that Dr. Hoenikker, as a very young man,
 had simply abandoned his car in Ilium traffic one morning.
  "The police, trying to find out what was holding up traffic,"
 he said, "found Felix's car in the middle of everything, its motor 
 running, a cigar burning in the ash tray, fresh flowers in the
 vases . . ."
  "Vases?"
  "It was a Marmon, about the size of a switch engine. It had
 little cut-glass vases on the doorposts, and Felix's wife used to
 put fresh flowers in the vases every morning. And there that car
 was in the middle of traffic."
  "Like the _Marie Celeste_," I suggested.
  "The Police Department hauled it away. They knew whose car it
 was, and they called up Felix, and they told him very politely
 where his car could be picked up. Felix told them they could keep
 it, that he didn't want it any more."
  "Did they?"
  "No. They called up his wife, and she came and got the
 Marmon."
  "What was her name, by the way?"
  "Emily." Dr. Breed licked his lips, and he got a faraway
 look, and he said the name of the woman, of the woman so long
 dead, again. "Emily."
  "Do you think anybody would object if I used the story about
 the Marmon in my book?" I asked.
  "As long as you don't use the end of it."
  "The _end_ of it?"
  "Emily wasn't used to driving the Marmon. She got into a bad
 wreck on the way home. It did something to her pelvis . . ." The
 traffic wasn't moving just then. Dr. Breed closed his eyes and
 tightened his hands on the steering wheel.
  "And that was why she died when little Newt was born."
 Merry Christmas 15
  The Research Laboratory of the General Forge and Foundry
 Company was near the main gate of the company's Ilium works, about
 a city block from the executive parking lot where Dr. Breed put
 his car.
  I asked Dr. Breed how many people worked for the Research
 Laboratory. "Seven hundred," he said, "but less than a hundred are
 actually doing research. The other six hundred are all 
 housekeepers in one way or another, and I am the chiefest
 housekeeper of all."
  When we joined the mainstream of mankind in the company
 street, a woman behind us wished Dr. Breed a merry Christmas. Dr.
 Breed turned to peer benignly into the sea of pale pies, and
 identified the greeter as one Miss Francine Pefko. Miss Pefko was
 twenty, vacantly pretty, and healthy--a dull normal.
  In honor of the dulcitude of Christmastime, Dr. Breed invited
 Miss Pefko to join us. He introduced her as the secretary of Dr.
 Nilsak Horvath. He then told me who Horvath was. "The famous
 surface chemist," he said, "the one who's doing such wonderful
 things with films."
  "What's new in surface chemistry?" I asked Miss Pefko. "God,"
 she said, "don't ask me. I just type what he tells me to type."
 And then she apologized for having said "God."
  "Oh, I think you understand more than you let on," said Dr.
 Breed.
  "Not me." Miss Pefko wasn't used to chatting with someone as
 important as Dr. Breed and she was embarrassed. Her gait was
 affected, becoming stiff and chickenlike. Her smile was glassy,
 and she was ransacking her mind for something to say, finding
 nothing in it but used Kleenex and costume jewelry.
  "Well . . . ," rumbled Dr. Breed expansively, "how do you
 like us, now that you've been with us--how long? Almost a year?"
  "You scientists _think_ too much," blurted Miss Pefko. She
 laughed idiotically. Dr. Breed's friendliness had blown every fuse
 in her nervous system. She was no longer responsible. "You _all_
 think too much."
  A winded, defeated-looking fat woman in filthy coveralls
 trudged beside us, hearing what Miss Pefko said. She turned to
 examine Dr. Breed, looking at him with helpless reproach. She
 hated people who thought too much. At that moment, she struck me
 as an appropriate representative for almost all mankind.
  The fat woman's expression implied that she would go crazy on
 the spot if anybody did any more thinking.
  "I think you'll find," said Dr. Breed, "that everybody does
 about the same amount of thinking. Scientists simply think about
 things in one way, and other people think about things in others."
  "Ech," gurgled Miss Pefko emptily. "I take dictation from Dr.
 Horvath and it's just like a foreign language. I don't think I'd
 understand--even if I was to go to college. And here he's maybe
 talking about something that's going to turn everything upsidedown
 and inside-out like the atom bomb.
  "When I used to come home from school Mother used to ask me
 what happened that day, and I'd tell her," said Miss Pefko. "Now I
 come home from work and she asks me the same question, and all I 
 can say is--" Miss Pefko shook her head and let her crimson lips
 flap slackly-- "I dunno, I dunno, I dunno."
  "If there's something you don't understand," urged Dr. Breed,
 "ask Dr. Horvath to explain it. He's very good at explaining." He
 turned to me. "Dr. Hoenikker used to say that any scientist who
 couldn't explain to an eight-year-old what he was doing was a
 charlatan."
  "Then I'm dumber than an eight-year-old," Miss Pefko mourned.
 "I don't even know what a charlatan is."
 Back to Kindergarten 16
  We climbed the four granite steps before the Research
 Laboratory. The building itself was of unadorned brick and rose
 six stories. We passed between two heavily-armed guards at the
 entrance.
  Miss Pefko showed the guard on the left the pink
 _confidential_ badge at the tip of her left breast.
  Dr. Breed showed the guard on the right the black _topsecret_
 badge on his soft lapel. Ceremoniously, Dr. Breed put his
 arm around me without actually touching me, indicating to the
 guards that I was under his august protection and control.
  I smiled at one of the guards. He did not smile back. There
 was nothing funny about national security, nothing at all.
  Dr. Breed, Miss Pefko, and I moved thoughtfully through the
 Laboratory's grand foyer to the elevators.
  "Ask Dr. Horvath to explain something sometime," said Dr.
 Breed to Miss Pefko. "See if you don't get a nice, clear answer."
  "He'd have to start back in the first grade--or maybe even
 kindergarten," she said. "I missed a lot."
  "We _all_ missed a lot," Dr. Breed agreed. "We'd _all_ do
 well to start over again, preferably with kindergarten."
  We watched the Laboratory's receptionist turn on the many
 educational exhibits that lined the foyer's walls. The
 receptionist was a tall, thin girl--icy, pale. At her crisp touch,
 lights twinkled, wheels turned, flasks bubbled, bells rang.
  "Magic," declared Miss Pefko. 
  "I'm sorry to hear a member of the Laboratory family using
 that brackish, medieval word," said Dr. Breed. "Every one of those
 exhibits explains itself. They're designed so as _not_ to be
 mystifying. They're the very antithesis of magic."
  "The very what of magic?"
  "The exact opposite of magic."
  "You couldn't prove it by me."
  Dr. Breed looked just a little peeved. "Well," he said, "we
 don't _want_ to mystify. At least give us credit for that."
 The Girl Pool 17
  Dr. Breed's secretary was standing on her desk in his outer
 office tying an accordion-pleated Christmas bell to the ceiling
 fixture.
  "Look here, Naomi," cried Dr. Breed, "we've gone six months
 without a fatal accident! Don't you spoil it by falling off the
 desk!"
  Miss Naomi Faust was a merry, desiccated old lady. I suppose
 she had served Dr. Breed for almost all his life, and her life,
 too. She laughed. "I'm indestructible. And, even if I did fall,
 Christmas angels would catch me."
  "They've been known to miss."
  Two paper tendrils, also accordion-pleated, hung down from
 the clapper of the bell. Miss Faust pulled one. It unfolded
 stickily and became a long banner with a message written on it.
 "Here," said Miss Faust, handing the free end to Dr. Breed, "pull
 it the rest of the way and tack the end to the bulletin board."
  Dr. Breed obeyed, stepping back to read the banner's message.
 "Peace on Earth!" he read out loud heartily.
  Miss Faust stepped down from her desk with the other tendril,
 unfolding it. "Good Will Toward Men!" the other tendril said.
  "By golly," chuckled Dr. Breed, "they've dehydrated
 Christmas! The place looks festive, very festive."
  "And I remembered the chocolate bars for the Girl Pool, too,"
 she said. "Aren't you proud of me?"
  Dr. Breed touched his forehead, dismayed by his
 forgetfulness. "Thank God for that! It slipped my mind." 
  "We mustn't ever forget that," said Miss Faust. "It's
 tradition now--Dr. Breed and his chocolate bars for the Girl Pool
 at Christmas." She explained to me that the Girl Pool was the
 typing bureau in the Laboratory's basement. "The girls belong to
 anybody with access to a dictaphone."
  All year long, she said, the girls of the Girl Pool listened
 to the faceless voices of scientists on dictaphone records--
 records brought in by mail girls. Once a year the girls left their
 cloister of cement block to go a-caroling--to get their chocolate
 bars from Dr. Asa Breed.
  "They serve science, too," Dr. Breed testified, "even though
 they may not understand a word of it. God bless them, every one!"
 The Most Valuable Commodity on Earth 18
  When we got into Dr. Breed's inner office, I attempted to put
 my thoughts in order for a sensible interview. I found that my
 mental health had not improved. And, when I started to ask Dr.
 Breed questions about the day of the bomb, I found that the
 public-relations centers of my brain had been suffocated by booze
 and burning cat fur. Every question I asked implied that the
 creators of the atomic bomb had been criminal accessories to
 murder most foul.
  Dr. Breed was astonished, and then he got very sore. He drew
 back from me and he grumbled, "I gather you don't like scientists
 very much."
  "I wouldn't say that, sir."
  "All your questions seem aimed at getting me to admit that
 scientists are heartless, conscienceless, narrow boobies,
 indifferent to the fate of the rest of the human race, or maybe
 not really members of the human race at all."
  "That's putting it pretty strong."
  "No stronger that what you're going to put in your book,
 apparently. I thought that what you were after was a fair,
 objective biography of Felix Hoenikker--certainly as significant a
 task as a young writer could assign himself in this day and age.
 But no, you come here with preconceived notions, about mad 
 scientists. Where did you ever get such ideas? From the funny
 papers?"
  "From Dr. Hoenikker's son, to name one source."
  "Which son?"
  "Newton," I said. I had little Newt's letter with me, and I
 showed it to him. "How small is Newt, by the way?"
  "No bigger than an umbrella stand," said Dr. Breed, reading
 Newt's letter and frowning.
  "The other two children are normal?"
  "Of course! I hate to disappoint you, but scientists have
 children just like anybody else's children."
  I did my best to calm down Dr. Breed, to convince him that I
 was really interested in an accurate portrait of Dr. Hoenikker.
 "I've come here with no other purpose than to set down exactly
 what you tell me about Dr. Hoenikker. Newt's letter was just a
 beginning, and I'll balance off against it whatever you can tell
 me."
  "I'm sick of people misunderstanding what a scientist is,
 what a scientist does."
  "I'll do my best to clear up the misunderstanding."
  "In this country most people don't even understand what pure
 research is."
  "I'd appreciate it if you'd tell me what it is."
  "It isn't looking for a better cigarette filter or a softer
 face tissue or a longer-lasting house paint, God help us.
 Everybody talks about research and practically nobody in this
 country's doing it. We're one of the few companies that actually
 hires men to do pure research. When most other companies brag
 about their research, they're talking about industrial hack
 technicians who wear white coats, work out of cookbooks, and dream
 up an improved windshield wiper for next year's Oldsmobile."
  "But here . . . ?"
  "Here, and shockingly few other places in this country, men
 are paid to increase knowledge, to work toward no end but that."
  "That's very generous of General Forge and Foundry Company."
  "Nothing generous about it. New knowledge is the most
 valuable commodity on earth. The more truth we have to work with,
 the richer we become."
  Had I been a Bokononist then, that statement would have made
 me howl. 
 No More Mud 19
  "Do you mean," I said to Dr. Breed, "that nobody in this
 Laboratory is ever told what to work on? Nobody even _suggests_
 what they work on?"
  "People suggest things all the time, but it isn't in the
 nature of a pure-research man to pay any attention to suggestions.
 His head is full of projects of his own, and that's the way we
 want it."
  "Did anybody ever try to suggest projects to Dr. Hoenikker?"
  "Certainly. Admirals and generals in particular. They looked
 upon him as a sort of magician who could make America invincible
 with a wave of his wand. They brought all kinds of crackpot
 schemes up here--still do. The only thing wrong with the schemes
 is that, given our present state of knowledge, the schemes won't
 work. Scientists on the order of Dr. Hoenikker are supposed to
 fill the little gaps. I remember, shortly before Felix died, there
 was a Marine general who was hounding him to do something about
 mud."
  "Mud?"
  "The Marines, after almost two-hundred years of wallowing in
 mud, were sick of it," said Dr. Breed. "The general, as their
 spokesman, felt that one of the aspects of progress should be that
 Marines no longer had to fight in mud."
  "What did the general have in mind?"
  "The absence of mud. No more mud."
  "I suppose," I theorized, "it might be possible with
 mountains of some sort of chemical, or tons of some sort of
 machinery . . ."
  "What the general had in mind was a little pill or a little
 machine. Not only were the Marines sick of mud, they were sick of
 carrying cumbersome objects. They wanted something _little_ to
 carry for a change."
  "What did Dr. Hoenikker say?"
  "In his playful way, and _all_ his ways were playful, Felix
 suggested that there might be a single grain of something-- even a
 microscopic grain--that could make infinite expanses of muck,
 marsh, swamp, creeks, pools, quicksand, and mire as solid as this
 desk."
  Dr. Breed banged his speckled old fist on the desk. The desk
 was a kidney-shaped, sea green steel affair. "One Marine could
 carry more than enough of the stuff to free an armored division
 bogged down in the everglades. According to Felix, one Marine 
 could carry enough of the stuff to do that under the nail of his
 little finger."
  "That's impossible."
  "You would say so, I would say so--practically everybody
 would say so. To Felix, in his playful way, it was entirely
 possible. The miracle of Felix--and I sincerely hope you'll put
 this in your book somewhere--was that he always approached old
 puzzles as though they were brand new."
  "I feel like Francine Pefko now," I said, "and all the girls
 in the Girl Pool, too. Dr. Hoenikker could never have explained to
 me how something that could be carried under a fingernail could
 make a swamp as solid as your desk."
  "I told you what a good explainer Felix was . . ."
  "Even so . . ."
  "He was able to explain it to me," said Dr. Breed, "and I'm
 sure I can explain it to you. The puzzle is how to get Marines out
 of the mud--right?"
  "Right."
  "All right," said Dr. Breed, "listen carefully. Here we go."
 Ice-nine 20
  "There are several ways," Dr. Breed said to me, "in which
 certain liquids can crystallize--can freeze--several ways in which
 their atoms can stack and lock in an orderly, rigid way."
  That old man with spotted hands invited me to think of the
 several ways in which cannonballs might be stacked on a courthouse
 lawn, of the several ways in which oranges might be packed into a
 crate.
  "So it is with atoms in crystals, too; and two different
 crystals of the same substance can have quite different physical
 properties."
  He told me about a factory that had been growing big crystals
 of ethylene diamine tartrate. The crystals were useful in certain
 manufacturing operations, he said. But one day the factory
 discovered that the crystals it was growing no longer had the
 properties desired. The atoms had begun to stack and lock--to
 freeze--in different fashion. The liquid that was crystallizing 
 hadn't changed, but the crystals it was forming were, as far as
 industrial applications went, pure junk.
  How this had come about was a mystery. The theoretical
 villain, however, was what Dr. Breed called "a seed." He meant by
 that a tiny grain of the undesired crystal pattern. The seed,
 which had come from God-only-knows-where, taught the atoms the
 novel way in which to stack and lock, to crystallize, to freeze.
  "Now think about cannonballs on a courthouse lawn or about
 oranges in a crate again," he suggested. And he helped me to see
 that the pattern of the bottom layers of cannonballs or of oranges
 determined how each subsequent layer would stack and lock. "The
 bottom layer is the seed of how every cannonball or every orange
 that comes after is going to behave, even to an infinite number of
 cannonballs or oranges."
  "Now suppose," chortled Dr. Breed, enjoying himself, "that
 there were many possible .ways in which water could crystallize,
 could freeze. Suppose that the sort of ice we skate upon and put
 into highballs--what we might call _ice-one_--is only one of
 several types of ice. Suppose water always froze as _ice-one_ on
 Earth because it had never had a seed to teach it how to form
 _ice-two_, _ice-three_, _ice-four_ . . . ? And suppose," he rapped
 on his desk with his old hand again, "that there were one form,
 which we will call _ice-nine_--a crystal as hard as this desk--
 with a melting point of, let us say, one-hundred degrees
 Fahrenheit, or, better still, a melting point of one-hundred-andthirty
 degrees."
  "All right, I'm still with you," I said.
  Dr. Breed was interrupted by whispers in his outer office,
 whispers loud and portentous. They were the sounds of the Girl
 Pool.
  The girls were preparing to sing in the outer office.
  And they did sing, as Dr. Breed and I appeared in the
 doorway. Each of about a hundred girls had made herself into a
 choirgirl by putting on a collar of white bond paper, secured by a
 paper clip. They sang beautifully.
  I was surprised and mawkishly heartbroken. I am always moved
 by that seldom-used treasure, the sweetness with which most girls
 can sing.
  The girls sang "O Little Town of Bethlehem." I am not likely
 to forget very soon their interpretation of the line:
  "The hopes and fears of all the years are here with us
 tonight." 
 The Marines March On 21
  When old Dr. Breed, with the help of Miss Faust, had passed
 out the Christmas chocolate bars to the girls, we returned to his
 office.
  There, he said to me, "Where were we? Oh yes!" And that old
 man asked me to think of United States Marines in a Godforsaken
 swamp.
  "Their trucks and tanks and howitzers are wallowing," he
 complained, "sinking in stinking miasma and ooze."
  He raised a finger and winked at me. "But suppose, young man,
 that one Marine had with him a tiny capsule containing a seed of
 _ice-nine_, a new way for the atoms of water to stack and lock, to
 freeze. If that Marine threw that seed into the nearest puddle . .
 ."
  "The puddle would freeze?" I guessed.
  "And all the muck around the puddle?"
  "It would freeze?"
  "And all the puddles in the frozen muck?"
  "They would freeze?"
  "And the pools and the streams in the frozen muck?"
  "They would freeze?"
  "You _bet_ they would!" he cried. "And the United States
 Marines would rise from the swamp and march on!"
 Member of the Yellow Press 22
  "There _is_ such stuff?" I asked.
  "No, no, no, no," said Dr. Breed, losing patience with me
 again. "I only told you all this in order to give you some insight
 into the extraordinary novelty of the ways in which Felix was
 likely to approach an old problem. What I've just told you is what
 he told the Marine general who was hounding him about mud. 
  "Felix ate alone here in the cafeteria every day. It was a
 rule that no one was to sit with him, to interrupt his chain of
 thought. But the Marine general barged in, pulled up a chair, and
 started talking about mud. What I've told you was Felix's offhand
 reply."
  "There--there really _isn't_ such a thing?"
  "I just told you there wasn't!" cried Dr. Breed hotly. "Felix
 died shortly after that! And, if you'd been listening to what I've
 been trying to tell you about pure research men, you wouldn't ask
 such a question! Pure research men work on what fascinates them,
 not on what fascinates other people."
  "I keep thinking about that swamp . . ."
  "You can _stop_ thinking about it! I've made the only point I
 wanted to make with the swamp."
  "If the streams flowing through the swamp froze as _icenine_,
 what about the rivers and lakes the streams fed?"
  "They'd freeze. But there is no such thing as _ice-nine_."
  "And the oceans the frozen rivers fed?"
  "They'd freeze, of course," he snapped. "I suppose you're
 going to rush to market with a sensational story about _ice-nine_
 now. I tell you again, it does not exist!"
  "And the springs feeding the frozen lakes and streams, and
 all the water underground feeding the springs?"
  "They'd freeze, damn it!" he cried. "But if I had known that
 you were a member of the yellow press," he said grandly, rising to
 his feet, "I wouldn't have wasted a minute with you!"
  "And the rain?"
  "When it fell, it would freeze into hard little hobnails of
 _ice-nine_--and that would be the end of the world! And the end of
 the interview, too! Good-bye!"
 The Last Batch of Brownies 23
  Dr. Breed was mistaken about at least one thing: there was
 such a thing as _ice-nine_.
  And _ice-nine_ was on earth.
  _Ice-nine_ was the last gift Felix Hoenikker created for
 mankind before going to his just reward. 
  He did it without anyone's realizing what he was doing. He
 did it without leaving records of what he'd done.
  True, elaborate apparatus was necessary in the act of
 creation, but it already existed in the Research Laboratory. Dr.
 Hoenikker had only to go calling on Laboratory neighbors--
 borrowing this and that, making a winsome neighborhood nuisance of
 himself--until, so to speak, he had baked his last batch of
 brownies.
  He had made a chip of _ice-nine_. It was blue-white. It had a
 melting point of one-hundred-fourteen-point-four-degrees
 Fahrenheit.
  Felix Hoenikker had put the chip in a little bottle; and he
 put the bottle in his jacket. And he had gone to his cottage on
 Cape Cod with his three children, there intending to celebrate
 Christmas.
  Angela had been thirty-four. Frank had been twenty-four.
 Little Newt had been eighteen.
  The old man had died on Christmas Eve, having told only his
 children about _ice-nine_.
  His children had divided the _ice-nine_ among themselves.
 What a Wampeter Is 24
  Which brings me to the Bokononist concept of a _wampeter_.
  A _wampeter_ is the pivot of a _karass_. No _karass_ is
 without a _wampeter_, Bokonon tells us, just as no wheel is
 without a hub.
  Anything can be a _wampeter_: a tree, a rock, an animal, an
 idea, a book, a melody, the Holy Grail. Whatever it is, the
 members of its _karass_ revolve about it in the majestic chaos of
 a spiral nebula. The orbits of the members of a _karass_ about
 their common _wampeter_ are spiritual orbits, naturally. It is
 souls and not bodies that revolve. As Bokonon invites us to sing:
  Around and around and around we spin,
  With feet of lead and wings of tin. 
  And _wampeters_ come and _wampeters_ go, Bokonon tells us.
  At any given time a _karass_ actually has two _wampeters_--
 one waxing in importance, one waning.
  And I am almost certain that while I was talking to Dr. Breed
 in Ilium, the _wampeter_ of my _karass_ that was just coming into
 bloom was that crystalline form of water, that blue-white gem,
 that seed of doom called _ice-nine_.
  While I was talking to Dr. Breed in Ilium, Angela, Franklin,
 and Newton Hoenikker had in their possession seeds of _ice-nine_,
 seeds grown from their father's seed-- chips, in a manner of
 speaking, off the old block.
  What was to become of those three chips was, I am convinced,
 a principal concern of my _karass_.
 The Main Thing About Dr. Hoenikker 25
  So much, for now, for the _wampeter_ of my _karass_.
  After my unpleasant interview with Dr. Breed in the Research
 Laboratory of the General Forge and Foundry Company, I was put
 into the hands of Miss Faust. Her orders were to show me to the
 door. I prevailed upon her, however, to show me the laboratory of
 the late Dr Hoenikker first.
  En route, I asked her how well she had known Dr. Hoenikker.
 She gave me a frank and interesting reply, and a piquant smile to
 go with it.
  "I don't think he was knowable. I mean, when most peopie talk
 about knowing somebody a lot or a little, they're talking about
 secrets they've been told or haven't been told. They're talking
 about intimate things, family things, love things," that nice old
 lady said to me. "Dr. Hoenikker had all those things in his life,
 the way every living person has to, but they weren't the main
 things with him."
  "What _were_ the main things?" I asked her.
  "Dr. Breed keeps telling me the main thing with Dr. Hoenikker
 was truth."
  "You don't seem to agree." 
  "I don't know whether I agree or not. I just have trouble
 understanding how truth, all by itself, could be enough for a
 person."
  Miss Faust was ripe for Bokononism.
 What God Is 26
  "Did you ever talk to Dr. Hoenikker?" I asked Miss Faust.
  "Oh, certainly. I talked to him a lot."
  "Do any conversations stick in your mind?"
  "There was one where he bet I couldn't tell him anything that
 was absolutely true. So I said to him, 'God is love.'"
  "And what did he say?"
  "He said, 'What is God? What is love?'"
  "Um."
  "But God really _is_ love, you know," said Miss Faust, "no
 matter what Dr. Hoenikker said."
 Men from Mars 27
  The room that had been the laboratory of Dr. Felix Hoenikker
 was on the sixth floor, the top floor of the building.
  A purple cord had been stretched across the doorway, and a
 brass plate on the wall explained why the room was sacred:
  IN THIS ROOM, DR. FELIX HOENIKKER, NOBEL LAUREATE IN PHYSICS,
  SPENT THE LAST TWENTY-EIGHT YEARS OF HIS LIFE.
  "WHERE HE WAS, THERE WAS THE FRONTIER OF KNOWLEDGE." 
  THE IMPORTANCE OF THIS ONE MAN IN THE
  HISTORY OF MANKIND IS INCALCULABLE.
  Miss Faust offered to unshackle the purple cord for me so
 that I might go inside and traffic more intimately with whatever
 ghosts there were.
  I accepted.
  "It's just as he left it," she said, "except that there were
 rubber bands all over one counter."
  "Rubber bands?"
  "Don't ask me what for. Don't ask me what any of all this is
 for."
  The old man had left the laboratory a mess. What engaged my
 attention at once was the quantity of cheap toys lying around.
 There was a paper kite with a broken spine. There was a toy
 gyroscope, wound with string, ready to whirr and balance itself.
 There was a top. There was a bubble pipe. There was a fish bowl
 with a castle and two turtles in it.
  "He loved ten-cent stores," said Miss Faust.
  "I can see he did."
  "Some of his most famous experiments were performed with
 equipment that cost less than a dollar."
  "A penny saved is a penny earned."
  There were numerous pieces of conventional laboratory
 equipment, too, of course, but they seemed drab accessories to the
 cheap, gay toys.
  Dr. Hoenikker's desk was piled with correspondence.
  "I don't think he ever answered a letter," mused Miss Faust.
 "People had to get him on the telephone or come to see him if they
 wanted an answer."
  There was a framed photograph on his desk. Its back was
 toward me and I ventured a guess as to whose picture it was. "His
 wife?"
  "No."
  "One of his children?"
  "No."
  "Himself?"
  "No."
  So I took a look. I found that the picture was of an humble
 little war memorial in front of a small-town courthouse. Part of
 the memorial was a sign that gave the names of those villagers who
 had died in various wars, and I thought that the sign must be the
 reason for the photograph. I could read the names, and I half
 expected to find the name Hoenikker among them. It wasn't there.
  "That was one of his hobbies," said Miss Faust.
  "What was?" 
  "Photographing how cannonballs are stacked on different
 courthouse lawns. Apparently how they've got them stacked in that
 picture is very unusual."
  "I see."
  "He was an unusual man."
  "I agree."
  "Maybe in a million years everybody will be as smart as he
 was and see things the way he did. But, compared with the average
 person of today, he was as different as a man from Mars."
  "Maybe he really _was_ a Martian," I suggested.
  "That would certainly go a long way toward explaining his
 three strange kids."
 Mayonnaise 28
  While Miss Faust and I waited for an elevator to take us to
 the first floor, Miss Faust said she hoped the elevator that came
 would not be number five. Before I could ask her why this was a
 reasonable wish, number five arrived.
  Its operator was a small ancient Negro whose name was Lyman
 Enders Knowles. Knowles was insane, I'm almost sure--offensively
 so, in that he grabbed his own behind and cried, "Yes, yes!"
 whenever he felt that he'd made a point.
  "Hello, fellow anthropoids and lily pads and paddlewheels,"
 he said to Miss Faust and me. "Yes, yes!"
  "First floor, please," said Miss Faust coldly.
  All Knowles had to do to close the door and get us to the
 first floor was to press a button, but he wasn't going to do that
 yet. He wasn't going to do it, maybe, for years.
  "Man told me," he said, "that these here elevators was Mayan
 architecture. I never knew that till today. And I says to him,
 'What's that make me--mayonnaise?' Yes, yes! And while he was
 thinking that over, I hit him with a question that straightened
 him up and made him think twice as hard! Yes, yes!"
  "Could we please go down, Mr. Knowles?" begged Miss Faust.
  "I said to him," said Knowles, "'This here's a _re_-search
 laboratory. _Re_-search means _look again_, don't it? Means
 they're looking for something they found once and it got away 
 somehow, and now they got to _re_-search for it? How come they got
 to build a building like this, with mayonnaise elevators and all,
 and fill it with all these crazy people? What is it they're trying
 to find again? Who lost what?' Yes, yes!"
  "That's very interesting," sighed Miss Faust. "Now, could we
 go down?"
  "Only way we _can_ go is down," barked Knowles. "This here's
 the top. You ask me to go up and wouldn't be a thing I could do
 for you. Yes, yes!"
  "So let's go down," said Miss Faust.
  "Very soon now. This gentleman here been paying his respects
 to Dr. Hoenikker?"
  "Yes," I said. "Did you know him?"
  "_Intimately_," he said. "You know what I said when he died?"
  "No."
  "I said, 'Dr. Hoenikker--he ain't dead.'"
  "Oh?"
  "Just entered a new dimension. Yes, yes!" He punched a
 button, and down we went.
  "Did you know the Hoenikker children?" I asked him.
  "Babies full of rabies," he said. "Yes, yes!"
 Gone, but Not Forgotten 29
  There was one more thing I wanted to do in Ilium. I wanted to
 get a photograph of the old man's tomb. So I went back to my room,
 found Sandra gone, picked up my camera, hired a cab.
  Sleet was still coming down, acid and gray. I thought the old
 man's tombstone in all that sleet might photograph pretty well,
 might even make a good picture for the jacket of _The Day the
 World Ended_.
  The custodian at the cemetery gate told me how to find the
 Hoenikker burial plot. "Can't miss it," he said. "It's got the
 biggest marker in the place."
  He did not lie. The marker was an alabaster phallus twenty
 feet high and three feet thick. It was plastered with sleet. 
  "By God," I exclaimed, getting out of the cab with my camera,
 "how's that for a suitable memorial to a father of the atom bomb?"
 I laughed.
  I asked the driver if he'd mind standing by the monument in
 order to give some idea of scale. And then I asked him to wipe
 away some of the sleet so the name of the deceased would show.
  He did so.
  And there on the shaft in letters six inches high, so help me
 God, was the word:
  MOTHER
 Only Sleeping 30
  "Mother?" asked the driver, incredulously.
  I wiped away more sleet and uncovered this poem:
  Mother, Mother, how I pray
  For you to guard us every day.
  --Angela Hoenikker
  And under this poem was yet another;
  You are not dead,
  But only sleeping.
  We should smile,
  And stop our weeping.
  --Franklin Hoenikker
  And underneath this, inset in the shaft, was a square of
 cement bearing the imprint of an infant's hand. Beneath the
 imprint were the words: 
  Baby Newt.
  "If that's Mother," said the driver, "what in hell could they
 have raised over Father?" He made an obscene suggestion as to what
 the appropriate marker might be.
  We found Father close by. His memorial--as specified in his
 will, I later discovered--was a marble cube forty centimeters on
 each side.
  "FATHER," it said.
 Another Breed 31
  As we were leaving the cemetery the driver of the cab worried
 about the condition of his own mother's grave. He asked if I would
 mind taking a short detour to look at it.
  It was a pathetic little stone that marked his mother-- not
 that it mattered.
  And the driver asked me if I would mind another brief detour,
 this time to a tombstone salesroom across the street from the
 cemetery.
  I wasn't a Bokononist then, so I agreed with some
 peevishness. As a Bokononist, of course, I would have agreed gaily
 to go anywhere anyone suggested. As Bokonon says: "Peculiar travel
 suggestions are dancing lessons from God."
  The name of the tombstone establishment was Avram Breed and
 Sons. As the driver talked to the salesman I wandered among the
 monuments--blank monuments, monuments in memory of nothing so far.
  I found a little institutional joke in the showroom: over a
 stone angel hung mistletoe. Cedar boughs were heaped on her
 pedestal, and around her marble throat was a necklace of Christmas
 tree lamps.
  "How much for her?" I asked the salesman.
  "Not for sale. She's a hundred years old. My
 greatgrandfather, Avram Breed, carved her."
  "This business is that old?"
  "That's right." 
  "And you're a Breed?"
  "The fourth generation in this location."
  "Any relation to Dr. Asa Breed, the director of the Research
 Laboratory?"
  "His brother." He said his name was Marvin Breed.
  "It's a small world," I observed.
  "When you put it in a cemetery, it is." Marvin Breed was a
 sleek and vulgar, a smart and sentimental man.
 Dynamite Money 32
  "I just came from your brother's office. I'm a writer. I was
 interviewing him about Dr. Hoenikker," I said to Marvin Breed.
  "There was one queer son of a bitch. Not my brother; I mean
 Hoenikker."
  "Did you sell him that monument for his wife?"
  "I sold his kids that. He didn't have anything to do with it.
 He never got around to putting any kind of marker on her grave.
 And then, after she'd been dead for a year or more, Hoenikker's
 three kids came in here--the big tall girl, the boy, and the
 little baby. They wanted the biggest stone money could buy, and
 the two older ones had poems they'd written. They wanted the poems
 on the stone.
  "You can laugh at that stone, if you want to," said Marvin
 Breed, "but those kids got more consolation out of that than
 anything else money could have bought. They used to come and look
 at it and put flowers on it I-don't-know-how-many-times a year."
  "It must have cost a lot."
  "Nobel Prize money bought it. Two things that money bought: a
 cottage on Cape Cod and that monument."
  "Dynamite money," I marveled, thinking of the violence of
 dynamite and the absolute repose of a tombstone and a summer home.
  "What?"
  "Nobel invented dynamite."
  "Well, I guess it takes all kinds . . ."
  Had I been a Bokononist then, pondering the miraculously
 intricate chain of events that had brought dynamite money to that 
 particular tombstone company, I might have whispered, "Busy, busy,
 busy."
  _Busy, busy, busy_, is what we Bokononists whisper whenever
 we think of how complicated and unpredictable the machinery of
 life really is.
  But all I could say as a Christian then was, "Life is sure
 funny sometimes."
  "And sometimes it isn't," said Marvin Breed.
 An Ungrateful Man 33
  I asked Marvin Breed if he'd known Emily Hoenikker, the wife
 of Felix; the mother of Angela, Frank, and Newt; the woman under
 that monstrous shaft.
  "Know her?" His voice turned tragic. "Did I _know_ her,
 mister? Sure, I knew her. I knew Emily. We went to Ilium High
 together. We were co-chairmen of the Class Colors Committee then.
 Her father owned the Ilium Music Store. She could play every
 musical instrument there was. I fell so hard for her I gave up
 football and tried to play the violin. And then my big brother Asa
 came home for spring vacation from M.I.T., and I made the mistake
 of introducing him to my best girl." Marvin Breed' snapped his
 fingers. "He took her away from me just like that. I smashed up my
 seventy-five-dollar violin on a big brass knob at the foot of my
 bed, and I went down to a florist shop and got the kind of box
 they put a dozen roses in, and I put the busted fiddle in the box,
 and I sent it to her by Western Union messenger boy."
  "Pretty, was she?"
  "Pretty?" he echoed. "Mister, when I see my first lady angel,
 if God ever sees fit to show me one, it'll be her wings and not
 her face that'll make my mouth fall open. I've already seen the
 prettiest face that ever could be. There wasn't a man in Ilium
 County who wasn't in love with her, secretly or otherwise. She
 could have had any man she wanted." He spit on his own floor. "And
 she had to go and marry that little Dutch son of a bitch! She was
 engaged to my brother, and then that sneaky little bastard hit
 town." Marvin Breed snapped his fingers again. "He took her away
 from my big brother like that. 
  "I suppose it's high treason and ungrateful and ignorant and
 backward and anti-intellectual to call a dead man as famous as
 Felix Hoenikker a son of a bitch. I know all about how harmless
 and gentle and dreamy he was supposed to be, how he'd never hurt a
 fly, how he didn't care about money and power and fancy clothes
 and automobiles and things, how he wasn't like the rest of us, how
 he was better than the rest of us, how he was so innocent he was
 practically a Jesus--except for the Son of God part. .
  Marvin Breed felt it was unnecessary to complete his thought.
 I had to ask him to do it.
  "But what?" he said. "But what?" He went to a window looking
 out at the cemetery gate. "But what," he murmured at the gate and
 the sleet and the Hoenikker shaft that could be dimly seen.
  "But," he said, "but how the hell innocent is a man who helps
 make a thing like an atomic bomb? And how can you say a man had a
 good mind when he couldn't even bother to do anything when the
 best-hearted, most beautiful woman in the world, his own wife, was
 dying for lack of love and understanding . . ."
  He shuddered, "Sometimes I wonder if he wasn't born dead. I
 never met a man who was less interested in the living. Sometimes I
 think that's the trouble with the world: too many people in high
 places who are stone-cold dead."
 Vin-dit 34
  It was in the tombstone salesroom that I had my first _vindit_,
 a Bokononist word meaning a sudden, very personal shove in
 the direction of Bokononism, in the direction of believing that
 God Almighty knew all about me, after all, that God Almighty had
 some pretty elaborate plans for me.
  The _vin-dit_ had to do with the stone angel under the
 mistletoe. The cab driver had gotten it into his head that he had
 to have that angel for his mother's grave at any price. He was
 standing in front of it with tears in his eyes.
  Marvin Breed was still staring out the window at the cemetery
 gate, having just said his piece about Felix Hoenikker. "The
 little Dutch son of a bitch may have been a modern holy man," he 
 added, "But Goddamn if he ever did anything he didn't want to, and
 Goddamn if he didn't get everything he ever wanted.
  "Music," he said.
  "Pardon me?" I asked.
  "That's why she married him. She said his mind was tuned to
 the biggest music there was, the music of the stars." He shook his
 head. "Crap."
  And then the gate reminded him of the last time he'd seen
 Frank Hoenikker, the model-maker, the tormentor of bugs in jars.
 "Frank," he said.
  "What about him?"
  "The last I saw of that poor, queer kid was when he came out
 through that cemetery gate. His father's funeral was still going
 on. The old man wasn't underground yet, and out through the gate
 came Frank. He raised his thumb at the first car that came by. It
 was a new Pontiac with a Florida license plate. It stopped. Frank
 got in it, and that was the last anybody in Ilium ever saw of
 him."
  "I hear he's wanted by the police."
  "That was an accident, a freak. Frank wasn't any criminal. He
 didn't have that kind of nerve. The only work he was any good at
 was model-making. The only job he ever held onto was at Jack's
 Hobby Shop, selling models, making models, giving people advice on
 how to make models. When he cleared out of here, went to Florida,
 he got a job in a model shop in Sarasota. Turned out the model
 shop was a front for a ring that stole Cadillacs, ran 'em straight
 on board old L.S.T.'s and shipped 'em to Cuba. That's how Frank
 got balled up in all that. I expect the reason the cops haven't
 found him is he's dead. He just heard too much while he was
 sticking turrets on the battleship _Missouri_ with Duco Cement."
  "Where's Newt now, do you know?"
  "Guess he's with his sister in Indianapolis. Last I heard was
 he got mixed up with that Russian midget and flunked out of premed
 at Cornell. Can you imagine a midget trying to become a
 doctor? And, in that same miserable family, there's that great
 big, gawky girl, over six feet tall. That man, who's so famous for
 having a great mind, he pulled that girl out of high school in her
 sophomore year so he could go on having some woman take care of
 him. All she had going for her was the clarinet she'd played in
 the Ilium High School band, the Marching Hundred.
  "After she left school," said Breed, "nobody ever asked her
 out. She didn't have any friends, and the old man never even
 thought to give her any money to go anywhere. You know what she
 used to do?"
  "Nope."
  "Every so often at night she'd lock herself in her room and
 she'd play records, and she'd play along with the records on her 
 clarinet. The miracle of this age, as far as I'm concerned, is
 that that woman ever got herself a husband."
  "How much do you want for this angel?" asked the cab driver.
  "I've told you, it's not for sale."
  "I don't suppose there's anybody around who can do that kind
 of stone cutting any more," I observed.
  "I've got a nephew who can," said Breed. "Asa's boy. He was
 all set to be a heap-big _re_-search scientist, and then they
 dropped the bomb on Hiroshima and the kid quit, and he got drunk,
 and he came out here, and he told me he wanted to go to work
 cutting stone."
  "He works here now?"
  "He's a sculptor in Rome."
  "If somebody offered you enough," said the driver, "you'd
 take it, wouldn't you?"
  "Might. But it would take a lot of money."
  "Where would you put the name on a thing like that?" asked
 the driver.
  "There's already a name on it--on the pedestal." We couldn't
 see the name, because of the boughs banked against the pedestal.
  "It was never called for?" I wanted to know.
  "It was never _paid_ for. The way the story goes: this German
 immigrant was on his way West with his wife, and she died of
 smallpox here in Ilium. So he ordered this angel to be put up over
 her, and he showed my great-grandfather he had the cash to pay for
 it. But then he was robbed. Somebody took practically every cent
 he had. All he had left in this world was some land he'd bought in
 Indiana, land he'd never seen. So he moved on--said he'd be back
 later to pay for the angel."
  "But he never came back?" I asked.
  "Nope." Marvin Breed nudged some of the boughs aside with his
 toe so that we could see the raised letters on the pedestal. There
 was a last name written there. "There's a screwy name for you," he
 said. "If that immigrant had any descendants, I expect they
 Americanized the name. They're probably Jones or Black or Thompson
 now."
  "There you're wrong," I murmured.
  The room seemed to tip, and its walls and ceiling and floor
 were transformed momentarily into the mouths of many tunnels--
 tunnels leading in all directions through time. I had a Bokononist
 vision of the unity in every second of all time and all wandering
 mankind, all wandering womankind, all wandering children.
  "There you're wrong," I said, when the vision was gone.
  "You know some people by that name?"
  "Yes."
  The name was my last name, too. 
 Hobby Shop 35
  On the way back to the hotel I caught sight of Jack's Hobby
 Shop, the place where Franklin Hoenikker had worked. I told the
 cab driver to stop and wait.
  I went in and found Jack himself presiding over his teenyweeny
 fire engines, railroad trains, airplanes, boats, houses,
 lampposts, trees, tanks, rockets, automobiles, porters,
 conductors, policemen, firemen, mommies, daddies, cats, dogs,
 chickens, soldiers, ducks, and cows. He was a cadaverous man, a
 serious man, a dirty man, and he coughed a lot.
  "What kind of a boy was Franklin Hoenikker?" he echoed, and
 he coughed and coughed. He shook his head, and he showed me that
 he adored Frank as much as he'd ever adored anybody. "That isn't a
 question I have to answer with words. I can _show_ you what kind
 of a boy Franklin Hoenikker was." He coughed. "You can look," he
 said, "and you can judge for yourself."
  And he took me down into the basement of his store. He lived
 down there. There was a double bed and a dresser and a hot plate.
  Jack apologized for the unmade bed. "My wife left me a week
 ago." He coughed. "I'm still trying to pull the strings of my life
 back together."
  And then he turned on a switch, and the far end of the
 basement was filled with a blinding light.
  We approached the light and found that it was sunshine to a
 fantastic little country build on plywood, an island as perfectly
 rectangular as a township in Kansas. Any restless soul, any soul
 seeking to find what lay beyond its green boundaries, really would
 fall off the edge of the world.
  The details were so exquisitely in scale, so cunningly
 textured and tinted, that it was unnecessary for me to squint in
 order to believe that the nation was real--the hills, the lakes,
 the rivers, the forests, the towns, and all else that good natives
 everywhere hold so dear.
  And everywhere ran a spaghetti pattern of railroad tracks.
  "Look at the doors of the houses," said Jack reverently.
  "Neat. Keen." 
  "They've got real knobs on 'em, and the knockers really
 work."
  "God."
  "You ask what kind of a boy Franklin Hoenikker was; he built
 this." Jack choked up.
  "All by himself?"
  "Oh, I helped some, but anything I did was according to his
 plans. That kid was a genius."
  "How could anybody argue with you?"
  "His kid brother was a midget, you know."
  "I know."
  "He did some of the soldering underneath."
  "It sure looks real."
  "It wasn't easy, and it wasn't done overnight, either."
  "Rome wasn't built in a day."
  "That kid didn't have any home life, you know."
  "I've heard."
  "This was his real home. Thousands of hours he spent down
 here. Sometimes he wouldn't even run the trains; just sit and
 look, the way we're doing."
  "There's a lot to see. It's practically like a trip to
 Europe, there are so many things to see, if you look close."
  "He'd see things you and I wouldn't see. He'd all of a sudden
 tear down a hill that would look just as real as any hill you ever
 saw--to you and me. And he'd be right, too. He'd put a lake where
 that hill had been and a trestle over the lake, and it would look
 ten times as good as it did before."
  "It isn't a talent everybody has."
  "That's right!" said Jack passionately. The passion cost him
 another coughing fit. When the fit was over, his eyes were
 watering copiously. "Listen, I told that kid he should go to
 college and study some engineering so he could go to work for
 American Flyer or somebody like that--somebody big, somebody who'd
 really back all the ideas he had."
  "Looks to me as if you backed him a good deal."
  "Wish I had, wish I could have," mourned Jack. "I didn't have
 the capital. I gave him stuff whenever I could, but most of this
 stuff he bought out of what he earned working upstairs for me. He
 didn't spend a dime on anything but this--didn't drink, didn't
 smoke, didn't go to movies, didn't go out with girls, wasn't car
 crazy."
  "This country could certainly use a few more of those."
  Jack shrugged. "Well . . . I guess the Florida gangsters got
 him. Afraid he'd talk."
  "Guess they did." 
  Jack suddenly broke down and cried. "I wonder if those dirty
 sons of bitches," he sobbed, "have any idea what it was they
 killed!"
 Meow 36
  During my trip to Ilium and to points beyond--a two-week
 expedition bridging Christmas--I let a poor poet named Sherman
 Krebbs have my New York City apartment free. My second wife had
 left me on the grounds that I was too pessimistic for an optimist
 to live with.
  Krebbs was a bearded man, a platinum blond Jesus with spaniel
 eyes. He was no close friend of mine. I had met him at a cocktail
 party where he presented himself as National Chairman of Poets and
 Painters for Immediate Nuclear War. He begged for shelter, not
 necessarily bomb proof, and it happened that I had some.
  When I returned to my apartment, still twanging with the
 puzzling spiritual implications of the unclaimed stone angel in
 Ilium, I found my apartment wrecked by a nihilistic debauch.
 Krebbs was gone; but, before leaving, he had run up three-hundreddollars'
 worth of long-distance calls, set my couch on fire in
 five places, killed my cat and my avocado tree, and torn the door
 off my medicine cabinet.
  He wrote this poem, in what proved to be excrement, on the
 yellow linoleum floor of my kitchen:
  I have a kitchen.
  But it is not a complete kitchen.
  I will not be truly gay
  Until I have a
  Dispose-all.
  There was another message, written in lipstick in a feminine
 hand on the wallpaper over my bed. It said: "No, no, no, said
 Chicken-licken." 
  There was a sign hung around my dead cat's neck. It said,
 "Meow."
  I have not seen Krebbs since. Nonetheless, I sense that he
 was my _karass_. If he was, he served it as a _wrang-wrang_. A
 _wrang-wrang_, according to Bokonon, is a person who steers people
 away from a line of speculation by reducing that line, with the
 example of the _wrang-wrang's_ own life, to an absurdity.
  I might have been vaguely inclined to dismiss the stone angel
 as meaningless, and to go from there to the meaninglessness of
 all. But after I saw what Krebbs had done, in particular what he
 had done to my sweet cat, nihilism was not for me.
  Somebody or something did not wish me to be a nihilist. It
 was Krebbs's mission, whether he knew it or not, to disenchant me
 with that philosophy. Well, done, Mr. Krebbs, well done.
 A Modern Major General 37
  And then, one day, one Sunday, I found out where the fugitive
 from justice, the model-maker, the Great God Jehovah and Beelzebub
 of bugs in Mason jars was--where Franklin Hoenikker could be
 found.
  He was alive!
  The news was in a special supplement to the New York _Sunday
 Times_. The supplement was a paid ad for a banana republic. On its
 cover was the profile of the most heartbreakingly beautiful girl I
 ever hope to see.
  Beyond the girl, bulldozers were knocking down palm trees,
 making a broad avenue. At the end of the avenue were the steel
 skeletons of three new buildings.
  "The Republic of San Lorenzo," said the copy on the cover,
 "on the move! A healthy, happy, progressive, freedom-loving,
 beautiful nation makes itself extremely attractive to American
 investors and tourists alike."
  I was in no hurry to read the contents. The girl on the cover
 was enough for me--more than enough, since I had fallen in love
 with her on sight. She was very young and very grave, too--and
 luminously compassionate and wise.
  She was as brown as chocolate. Her hair was like golden flax. 
  Her name was Mona Aamons Monzano, the cover said. She was the
 adopted daughter of the dictator of the island.
  I opened the supplement, hoping for more pictures of this
 sublime mongrel Madonna.
  I found instead a portrait of the island's dictator, Miguel
 "Papa" Monzano, a gorilla in his late seventies.
  Next to "Papa's" portrait was a picture of a narrowshouldered,
 fox-faced, immature young man. He wore a snow white
 military blouse with some sort of jeweled sunburst hanging on it.
 His eyes were close together; they had circles under them. He had
 apparently told barbers all his life to shave the sides and back
 of his head, but to leave the top of his hair alone. He had a wiry
 pompadour, a sort of cube of hair, marcelled, that arose to an
 incredible height.
  This unattractive child was identified as Major General
 Franklin Hoenikker, _Minister of Science and Progress in the
 Republic of San Lorenzo_.
  He was twenty-six years old.
 Barracuda Capital of the World 38
  San Lorenzo was fifty miles long and twenty miles wide, I
 learned from the supplement to the New York _Sunday Times_. Its
 population was four hundred, fifty thousand souls, ". . . all
 fiercely dedicated to the ideals of the Free World."
  Its highest point, Mount McCabe, was eleven thousand feet
 above sea level. Its capital was Bolivar, ". . . a strikingly
 modern city built on a harbor capable of sheltering the entire
 United States Navy." The principal exports were sugar, coffee,
 bananas, indigo, and handcrafted novelties.
  "And sports fishermen recognize San Lorenzo as the
 unchallenged barracuda capital of the world."
  I wondered how Franklin Hoenikker, who had never even
 finished high school, had got himself such a fancy job. I found a
 partial answer in an essay on San Lorenzo that was signed by
 "Papa" Monzano.
  "Papa" said that Frank was the architect of the "San Lorenzo
 Master Plan," which included new roads, rural electrification, 
 sewage-disposal plants, hotels, hospitals, clinics, railroads--the
 works. And, though the essay was brief and tightly edited, "papa"
 referred to Frank five times as: ". . . the _blood son_ of Dr.
 Felix Hoenikker."
  The phrase reeked of cannibalism.
  "Papa" plainly felt that Frank was a chunk of the old man's
 magic meat.
 Fata Morgana 39
  A little more light was shed by another essay in the
 supplement, a florid essay titled, "What San Lorenzo Has Meant to
 One American." It was almost certainly ghost-written. It was
 signed by Major General Franklin Hoenikker.
  In the essay, Frank told of being all alone on a nearly
 swamped sixty-eight-foot Chris-Craft in the Caribbean. He didn't
 explain what he was doing on it or how he happened to be alone. He
 did indicate, though, that his point of departure had been Cuba.
  "The luxurious pleasure craft was going down, and my
 meaningless life with it," said the essay. "All I'd eaten for four
 days was two biscuits and a sea gull. The dorsal fins of maneating
 sharks were cleaving the warm seas around me, and needleteethed
 barracuda were making those waters boil.
  "I raised my eyes to my Maker, willing to accept whatever His
 decision might be. And my eyes alit on a glorious mountain peak
 above the clouds. Was this Fata Morgana--the cruel deception of a
 mirage?"
  I looked up Fata Morgana at this point in my reading; learned
 that it was, in fact, a mirage named after Morgan le Fay, a fairy
 who lived at the bottom of a lake. It was famous for appearing in
 the Strait of Messina, between Calabria and Sicily. Fata Morgana
 was poetic crap, in short.
  What Frank saw from his sinking pleasure craft was not cruel
 Fata Morgana, but the peak of Mount McCabe. Gentle seas then
 nuzzled Frank's pleasure craft to the rocky shores of San Lorenzo,
 as though God wanted him to go there. 
  Frank stepped ashore, dry shod, and asked where he was. The
 essay didn't say so, but the son of a bitch had a piece of _icenine_
 with him--in a thermos jug.
  Frank, having no passport, was put in jail in the capital
 city of Bolivar. He was visited there by "Papa" Monzano, who
 wanted to know if it were possible that Frank was a blood relative
 of the immortal Dr. Felix Hoenikker.
  "I admitted I was," said Frank in the essay. "Since that
 moment, every door to opportunity in San Lorenzo has been opened
 wide to me."
 House of Hope and Mercy 40
  As it happened--"As it was _supposed_ to happen," Bokonon
 would say--I was assigned by a magazine to do a story in San
 Lorenzo. The story wasn't to be about "Papa" Monzano or Frank. It
 was to be about Julian Castle, an American sugar millionaire who
 had, at the age of forty, followed the example of Dr. Albert
 Schweitzer by founding a free hospital in a jungle, by devoting
 his life to miserable folk of another race.
  Castle's hospital was called the House of Hope and Mercy in
 the Jungle. Its jungle was on San Lorenzo, among the wild coffee
 trees on the northern slope of Mount McCabe.
  When I flew to San Lorenzo, Julian Castle was sixty years
 old.
  He had been absolutely unselfish for twenty years.
  In his selfish days he had been as familiar to tabloid
 readers as Tommy Manville, Adolf Hitler, Benito Mussolini, and
 Barbara Hutton. His fame had rested on lechery, alcoholism,
 reckless driving, and draft evasion. He had had a dazzling talent
 for spending millions without increasing mankind's stores of
 anything but chagrin.
  He had been married five times, had produced one son. The one
 son, Philip Castle, was the manager and owner of the hotel at
 which I planned to stay. The hotel was called the Casa Mona and
 was named after Mona Aamons Monzano, the blonde Negro on the cover
 of the supplement to the New York _Sunday Times_. The Casa Mona 
 was brand new; it was one of the three new buildings in the
 background of the supplement's portrait of Mona.
  While I didn't feel that purposeful seas were wafting me to
 San Lorenzo, I did feel that love was doing the job. The Fata
 Morgana, the mirage of what it would be like to be loved by Mona
 Aamons Monzano, had become a tremendous force in my meaningless
 life. I imagined that she could make me far happier than any woman
 had so far succeeded in doing.
 A Karass Built for Two 41
  The seating on the airplane, bound ultimately for San Lorenzo
 from Miami, was three and three. As it happened-- "As it was
 _supposed_ to happen"--my seatmates were Horlick Minton, the new
 American Ambassador to the Republic of San Lorenzo, and his wife,
 Claire. They were whitehaired, gentle, and frail.
  Minton told me that he was a career diplomat, holding the
 rank of Ambassador for the first time. He and his wife had so far
 served, he told me, in Bolivia, Chile, Japan, France, Yugoslavia,
 Egypt, the Union of South Africa, Liberia, and Pakistan.
  They were lovebirds. They entertained each other endlessly
 with little gifts: sights worth seeing out the plane window,
 amusing or instructive bits from things they read, random
 recollections of times gone by. They were, I think, a flawless
 example of what Bokonon calls a _duprass_, which is a _karass_
 composed of only two persons.
  "A true _duprass_," Bokonon tells us, "can't be invaded, not
 even by children born of such a union."
  I exclude the Mintons, therefore, from my own _karass_, from
 Frank's _karass_, from Newt's _karass_, from Asa Breed's _karass_,
 from Angela's _karass_, from Lyman Enders Knowles's _karass_, from
 Sherman Krebbs's _karass_. The Mintons' _karass_ was a tidy one,
 composed of only two.
  "I should think you'd be very pleased," I said to Minton.
  "What should I be pleased about?"
  "Pleased to have the rank of Ambassador."
  From the pitying way Minton and his wife looked at each
 other, I gathered that I had said a fat-headed thing. But they 
 humored me. "Yes," winced Minton, "I'm very pleased." He smiled
 wanly. "I'm _deeply_ honored."
  And so it went with almost every subject I brought up. I
 couldn't make the Mintons bubble about anything.
  For instance: "I suppose you can speak a lot of languages," I
 said.
  "Oh, six or seven--between us," said Minton"
  "That must be very gratifying."
  "What must?"
  "Being able to speak to people of so many different
 nationalities."
  "Very gratifying," said Minton emptily.
  "Very gratifying," said his wife.
  And they went back to reading a fat, typewritten manuscript
 that was spread across the chair arm between them.
  "Tell me," I said a little later, "in all your wide travels,
 have you found people everywhere about the same at heart?"
  "Hm?" asked Minton.
  "Do you find people to be about the same at heart, wherever
 you go?"
  He looked at his wife, making sure she had heard the
 question, then turned back to me. "About the same, wherever you
 go," he agreed.
  "Um," I said.
  Bokonon tells us, incidentally, that members of a _duprass_
 always die within a week of each other. When it came time for the
 Mintons to die, they did it within the same second.
 Bicycles for Afghanistan 42
  There was a small saloon in the rear of the plane and I
 repaired there for a drink. It was there that I met another fellow
 American, H. Lowe Crosby of Evanston, Illinois, and his wife,
 Hazel.
  They were heavy people, in their fifties. They spoke
 twangingly. Crosby told me that he owned a bicycle factory in
 Chicago, that he had had nothing but ingratitude from his 
 employees. He was going to move his business to grateful San
 Lorenzo.
  "You know San Lorenzo well?" I asked.
  "This'll be the first time I've ever seen it, but everything
 I've heard about it I like," said H. Lowe Crosby. "They've got
 discipline, They've got something you can count on from one year
 to the next. They don't have the government encouraging everybody
 to be some kind of original pissant nobody every heard of before."
  "Sir?"
  "Christ, back in Chicago, we don't make bicycles any more.
 It's all human relations now. The eggheads sit around trying to
 figure out new ways for everybody to be happy. Nobody can get
 fired, no matter what; and if somebody does accidentally make a
 bicycle, the union accuses us of cruel and inhuman practices and
 the government confiscates the bicycle for back taxes and gives it
 to a blind man in Afghanistan."
  "And you think things will be better in San Lorenzo?"
  "I know damn well they will be. The people down there are
 poor enough and scared enough and ignorant enough to have some
 common sense!"
  Crosby asked me what my name was and what my business was. I
 told him, and his wife Hazel recognized my name as an Indiana
 name. She was from Indiana, too.
  "My God," she said, "are you a _Hoosier?_"
  I admitted I was.
  "I'm a Hoosier, too," she crowed. "Nobody has to be ashamed
 of being a Hoosier."
  "I'm not," I said. "I never knew anybody who was."
  "Hoosiers do all right. Lowe and I've been around the world
 twice, and everywhere we went we found Hoosiers in charge of
 everything."
  "That's reassuring."
  "You know the manager of that new hotel in Istanbul?"
  "No."
  "He's a Hoosier. And the military-whatever-he-is in Tokyo . .
 ."
  "Attaché," said her husband.
  "He's a Hoosier," said Hazel. "And the new Ambassador to
 Yugoslavia . . ."
  "A Hoosier?" I asked.
  "Not only him, but the Hollywood Editor of _Life_ magazine,
 too. And that man in Chile . . ."
  "A Hoosier, too?"
  "You can't go anywhere a _Hoosier_ hasn't made his mark," she
 said.
  "The man who wrote _Ben Hur_ was a Hoosier."
  "And James Whitcomb Riley." 
  "Are you from Indiana, too?" I asked her husband.
  "Nope. I'm a Prairie Stater. 'Land of Lincoln,' as they say."
  "As far as that goes," said Hazel triumphantly, "Lincoln was
 a Hoosier, too. He grew up in Spencer County."
  "Sure," I said.
  "I don't know what it is about Hoosiers," said Hazel, "but
 they've sure got something. If somebody was to make a list, they'd
 be amazed."
  "That's true," I said.
  She grasped me firmly by the arm. "We Hoosiers got to stick
 together."
  "Right."
  "You call me 'Mom.'"
  "What?"
  "Whenever I meet a young Hoosier, I tell them, 'You call me
 _Mom_.'"
  "Uh huh."
  "Let me hear you say it," she urged.
  "Mom?"
  She smiled and let go of my arm. Some piece of clockwork had
 completed its cycle. My calling Hazel "Mom" had shut it off, and
 now Hazel was rewinding it for the next Hoosier to come along.
  Hazel's obsession with Hoosiers around the world was a
 textbook example of a false _karass_, of a seeming team that was
 meaningless in terms of the ways God gets things done, a textbook
 example of what Bokonon calls a _granfalloon_. Other examples of
 _granfalloons_ are the Communist party, the Daughters of the
 American Revolution, the General Electric Company, the
 International Order of Odd Fellows--and any nation, anytime,
 anywhere.
  As Bokonon invites us to sing along with him:
  If you wish to study a _granfalloon_,
  Just remove the skin of a toy balloon.
 The Demonstrator 43 
  H. Lowe Crosby was of the opinion that dictatorships were
 often very good things. He wasn't a terrible person and he wasn't
 a fool. It suited him to confront the world with a certain barnyard
 clownishness, but many of the things he had to say about
 undisciplined mankind were not only funny but true.
  The major point at which his reason and his sense of humor
 left him was when he approached the question of what people were
 really supposed to do with their time on Earth.
  He believed firmly that they were meant to build bicycles for
 him.
  "I hope San Lorenzo is every bit as good as you've heard it
 is," I said.
  "I only have to talk to one man to find out if it is or not,"
 he said. "When 'Papa' Monzano gives his word of honor about
 anything on that little island, that's it. That's how it is;
 that's how it'll be."
  "The thing I like," said Hazel, "is they all speak English
 and they're all Christians. That makes things so much easier."
  "You know how they deal with crime down there?" Crosby asked
 me.
  "Nope."
  "They just don't have any crime down there. 'Papa' Monzano's
 made crime so damn unattractive, nobody even thinks about it
 without getting sick. I heard you can lay a billfold in the middle
 of a sidewalk and you can come back a week later and it'll be
 right there, with everything still in it."
  "Um."
  "You know what the punishment is for stealing something?"
  "Nope."
  "The hook," he said. "No fines, no probation, no thirty days
 in jail. It's the hook. The hook for stealing, for murder, for
 arson, for treason, for rape, for being a peeping Tom. Break a
 law--any damn law at all--and it's the hook. Everybody can
 understand that, and San Lorenzo is the best-behaved country in
 the world."
  "What is the hook?"
  "They put up a gallows, see? Two posts and a cross beam. And
 then they take a great big kind of iron fishhook and they hang it
 down from the cross beam. Then they take somebody who's dumb
 enough to break the law, and they put the point of the hook in
 through one side of his belly and out the other and they let him
 go--and there he hangs, by God, one damn sorry law-breaker."
  "Good God!"
  "I don't say it's good," said Crosby, "but I don't say it's
 bad either. I sometimes wonder if something like that wouldn't
 clear up juvenile delinquency. Maybe the hook's a little extreme
 for a democracy. Public hanging's more like it. String up a few 
 teen-age car thieves on lampposts in front of their houses with
 signs around their necks saying, 'Mama, here's your boy.' Do that
 a few times and I think ignition locks would go the way of the
 rumble seat and the running board."
  "We saw that thing in the basement of the waxworks in
 London," said Hazel.
  "What thing?" I asked her.
  "The hook. Down in the Chamber of Horrors in the basement;
 they had a wax person hanging from the hook. It looked so real I
 wanted to throw up."
  "Harry Truman didn't look anything like Harry Truman," said
 Crosby.
  "Pardon me?"
  "In the waxworks," said Crosby. "The statue of Truman didn't
 really look like him."
  "Most of them did, though," said Hazel.
  "Was it anybody in particular hanging from the hook?" I asked
 her.
  "I don't think so. It was just somebody."
  "Just a demonstrator?" I asked.
  "Yeah. There was a black velvet curtain in front of it and
 you had to pull the curtain back to see. And there was a note
 pinned to the curtain that said children weren't supposed to
 look."
  "But kids did," said Crosby. "There were kids down there, and
 they all looked."
  "A sign like that is just catnip to kids," said Hazel.
  "How did the kids react when they saw the person on the
 hook?" I asked.
  "Oh," said Hazel, "they reacted just about the way the
 grownups did. They just looked at it and didn't say anything, just
 moved on to see what the next thing was."
  "What was the next thing?"
  "It was an iron chair a man had been roasted alive in," said
 Crosby. "He was roasted for murdering his son."
  "Only, after they roasted him," Hazel recalled blandly, "they
 found out he hadn't murdered his son after all."
 Communist Sympathizers 44 
  When I again took my seat beside the _duprass_ of Claire and
 Horlick Minton, I had some new information about them. I got it
 from the Crosbys.
  The Crosbys didn't know Minton, but they knew his reputation.
 They were indignant about his appointment as Ambassador. They told
 me that Minton had once been fired by the State Department for his
 softness toward communism, and the Communist dupes or worse had
 had him reinstated.
  "Very pleasant little saloon back there," I said to Minton
 as I sat down.
  "Hm?" He and his wife were still reading the manuscript that
 lay between them.
  "Nice bar back there."
  "Good. I'm glad."
  The two read on, apparently uninterested in talking to me.
 And then Minton turned to me suddenly, with a bittersweet smile,
 and he demanded, "Who was he, anyway?"
  "Who was who?"
  "The man you were talking to in the bar. We went back there
 for a drink, and, when we were just outside, we heard you and a
 man talking. The man was talking very loudly. He said I was a
 Communist sympathizer."
  "A bicycle manufacturer named H. Lowe Crosby," I said. I felt
 myself reddening.
  "I was fired for pessimism. Communism had nothing to do with
 it."
  "I got him fired," said his wife. "The only piece of real
 evidence produced against him was a letter I wrote to the New York
 _Times_ from Pakistan."
  "What did it say?"
  "It said a lot of things," she said, "because I was very
 upset about how Americans couldn't imagine what it was like to be
 something else, to be something else and proud of it."
  "I see."
  "But there was one sentence they kept coming to again and
 again in the loyalty hearing," sighed Minton. "'Americans,'" he
 said, quoting his wife's letter to the _Times_, "'are forever
 searching for love in forms it never takes, in places it can never
 be. It must have something to do with the vanished frontier.'" 
 Why Americans Are Hated 45
  Claire Minton's letter to the _Times_ was published during
 the worst of the era of Senator McCarthy, and her husband was
 fired twelve hours after the letter was printed.
  "What was so awful about the letter?" I asked.
  "The highest possible form of treason," said Minton, "is to
 say that Americans aren't loved wherever they go, whatever they
 do. Claire tried to make the point that American foreign policy
 should recognize hate rather than imagine love."
  "I guess Americans _are_ hated a lot of places."
  "_People_ are hated a lot of places. Claire pointed out in
 her letter that Americans, in being hated, were simply paying the
 normal penalty for being people, and that they were foolish to
 think they should somehow be exempted from that penalty. But the
 loyalty board didn't pay any attention to that. All they knew was
 that Claire and I both felt that Americans were unloved."
  "Well, I'm glad the story had a happy ending."
  "Hm?" said Minton.
  "It finally came out all right," I said. "Here you are on
 your way to an embassy all your own."
  Minton and his wife exchanged another of those pitying
 _duprass_ glances. Then Minton said to me, "Yes. The pot of gold
 at the end of the rainbow is ours."
 The Bokononist Method for Handling Caesar 46
  I talked to the Mintons about the legal status of Franklin
 Hoenikker, who was, after all, not only a big shot in "Papa"
 Monzano's government, but a fugitive from United States justice.
  "That's all been written off," said Minton. "He isn't a
 United States citizen any more, and he seems to be doing good
 things where he is, so that's that."
  "He gave up his citizenship?" 
  "Anybody who declares allegiance to a foreign state or serves
 in its armed forces or accepts employment in its government loses
 his citizenship. Read your passport. You can't lead the sort of
 funny-paper international romance that Frank has led and still
 have Uncle Sam for a mother chicken."
  "Is he well liked in San Lorenzo?"
  Minton weighed in his hands the manuscript he and his wife
 had been reading. "I don't know yet. This book says not."
  "What book is that?"
  "It's the only scholarly book ever written about San
 Lorenzo."
  "_Sort_ of scholarly," said Claire.
  "Sort of scholarly," echoed Minton. "It hasn't been published
 yet. This is one of five copies." He handed it to me, inviting me
 to read as much as I liked.
  I opened the book to its title page and found that the name
 of the book was _San Lorenzo: The Land, the History, the People_.
 The author was Philip Castle, the son of Julian Castle, the hotelkeeping
 son of the great altruist I was on my way to see.
  I let the book fall open where it would. As it happened, it
 fell open to the chapter about the island's outlawed holy man,
 Bokonon.
  There was a quotation from _The Books of Bokonon_ on the page
 before me. Those words leapt from the page and into my mind, and
 they were welcomed there.
  The words were a paraphrase of the suggestion by Jesus:
 "Render therefore unto Caesar the things which are Caesar's."
  Bokonon's paraphrase was this:
  "Pay no attention to Caesar. Caesar doesn't have the
 slightest idea what's _really_ going on."
 Dynamic Tension 47
  I became so absorbed in Philip Castle's book that I didn't
 even look up from it when we put down for ten minutes in San Juan,
 Puerto Rico. I didn't even look up when somebody behind me
 whispered, thrilled, that a midget had come aboard. 
  A little while later I looked around for the midget, but
 could not see him. I did see, right in front of Hazel and H. Lowe
 Crosby, a horse-faced woman with platinum blonde hair, a woman new
 to the passenger list. Next to hers was a seat that appeared to be
 empty, a seat that might well have sheltered a midget without my
 seeing even the top of his head.
  But it was San Lorenzo--the land, the history, the people--
 that intrigued me then, so I looked no harder for the midget.
 Midgets are, after all, diversions for silly or quiet times, and I
 was serious and excited about Bokonon's theory of what he called
 "Dynamic Tension," his sense of a priceless equilibrium between
 good and evil.
  When I first saw the term "Dynamic Tension" in Philip
 Castle's book, I laughed what I imagined to be a superior laugh.
 The term was a favorite of Bokonon's, according to young Castle's
 book, and I supposed that I knew something that Bokonon didn't
 know: that the term was one vu!garized by Charles Atlas, a mailorder
 muscle-builder.
  As I learned when I read on, briefly, Bokonon knew exactly
 who Charles Atlas was. Bokonon was, in fact, an alumnus of his
 muscle-building school.
  It was the belief of Charles Atlas that muscles could be
 built without bar bells or spring exercisers, could be built by
 simply pitting one set of muscles against another.
  It was the belief of Bokonon that good societies could be
 built only by pitting good against evil, and by keeping the
 tension between the two high at all times.
  And, in Castle's book, I read my first Bokononist poem, or
 "Calypso." It went like this:
  "Papa" Monzano, he's so very bad,
  But without bad "Papa" I would be so sad;
  Because without "Papa's" badness,
  Tell me, if you would,
  How could wicked old Bokonon
  Ever, ever look good?
 Just Like Saint Augustine 48 
  Bokonon, I learned from Castle's book, was born in 1891. He
 was a Negro, born an Episcopalian and a British subject on the
 island of Tobago.
  He was christened Lionel Boyd Johnson.
  He was the youngest of six children, born to a wealthy
 family. His family's wealth derived from the discovery by
 Bokonon's grandfather of one quarter of a million dollars in
 buried pirate treasure, presumably a treasure of Blackbeard, of
 Edward Teach.
  Blackbeard's treasure was reinvested by Bokonon's family in
 asphalt, copra, cacao, livestock, and poultry.
  Young Lionel Boyd Johnson was educated in Episcopal schools,
 did well as a student, and was more interested in ritual than
 most. As a youth, for all his interest in the outward trappings of
 organized religion, he seems to have been a carouser, for he
 invites us to sing along with him in his "Fourteenth Calypso":
  When I was young,
  I was so gay and mean,
  And I drank and chased the girls
  Just like young St. Augustine.
  Saint Augustine,
  He got to be a saint.
  So, if I get to be one, also,
  Please, Mama, don't you faint.
 A Fish Pitched Up by an Angry Sea 49
  Lionel Boyd Johnson was intellectually ambitious enough, in
 1911, to sail alone from Tobago to London in a sloop named the
 _Lady's Slipper_. His purpose was to gain a higher education.
  He enrolled in the London School of Economics and Political
 Science.
  His education was interrupted by the First World War. He
 enlisted in the infantry, fought with distinction, was 
 commissioned in the field, was mentioned four times in dispatches.
 He was gassed in the second Battle of Ypres, was hospitalized for
 two years, and then discharged.
  And he set sail for home, for Tobago, alone in the _Lady's
 Slipper_ again.
  When only eighty miles from home, he was stopped and searched
 by a German submarine, the _U-99_. He was taken prisoner, and his
 little vessel was used by the Huns for target practice. While
 still surfaced, the submarine was surprised and captured by the
 British destroyer, the _Raven_.
  Johnson and the Germans were taken on board the destroyer and
 the _U-99_ was sunk.
  The _Raven_ was bound for the Mediterranean, but it never got
 there. It lost its steering; it could only wallow helplessly or
 make grand, clockwise circles. It came to rest at last in the Cape
 Verde Islands.
  Johnson stayed in those islands for eight months, awaiting
 some sort of transportation to the Western Hemisphere.
  He got a job at last as a crewman on a fishing vessel that
 was carrying illegal immigrants to New Bedford, Massachusetts. The
 vessel was blown ashore at Newport, Rhode Island.
  By that time Johnson had developed a conviction that
 something was trying to get him somewhere for some reason. So he
 stayed in Newport for a while to see if he had a destiny there. He
 worked as a gardener and carpenter on the famous Rumfoord Estate.
  During that time, he glimpsed many distinguished guests of
 the Rumfoords, among them, J. P. Morgan, General John J. Pershing,
 Franklin Delano Roosevelt, Enrico Caruso, Warren Gamaliel Harding,
 and Harry Houdini. And it was during that time that the First
 World War came to an end, having killed ten million persons and
 wounded twenty million, Johnson among them.
  When the war ended, the young rakehell of the Rumfoord
 family, Remington Rumfoord, IV, proposed to sail his steam yacht,
 the _Scheherazade_, around the world, visiting Spain, France,
 Italy, Greece, Egypt, India, China, and Japan. He invited Johnson
 to accompany him as first mate, and Johnson agreed.
  Johnson saw many wonders of the world on the voyage. The
 _Scheherazade_ was rammed in a fog in Bombay harbor, and only
 Johnson survived. He stayed in India for two years, becoming a
 follower of Mohandas K. Gandhi. He was arrested for leading groups
 that protested British rule by lying down on railroad tracks. When
 his jail term was over, he was shipped at Crown expense to his
 home in Tobago.
  There, he built another schooner, which he called the _Lady's
 Slipper II_. 
  And he sailed her about the Caribbean, an idler, still
 seeking the storm that would drive him ashore on what was
 unmistakably his destiny.
  In 1922, he sought shelter from a hurricane in Port-auPrince,
 Haiti, which country was then occupied by United States
 Marines.
  Johnson was approached there by a brilliant, self-educated,
 idealistic Marine deserter named Earl McCabe. McCabe was a
 corporal. He had just stolen his company's recreation fund. He
 offered Johnson five hundred dollars for transportation to Miami.
  The two set sail for Miami.
  But a gale hounded the schooner onto the rocks of San
 Lorenzo. The boat went down. Johnson and McCabe, absolutely naked,
 managed to swim ashore. As Bokonon himself reports the adventure:
  A fish pitched up
  By the angry sea,
  I gasped on land,
  And I became me.
  He was enchanted by the mystery of coming ashore naked on an
 unfamiliar island. He resolved to let the adventure run its full
 course, resolved to see just how far a man might go, emerging
 naked from salt water.
  It was a rebirth for him:
  Be like a baby,
  The Bible say,
  So I stay like a baby
  To this very day.
  How he came by the name of Bokonon was very simple. "Bokonon"
 was the pronunciation given the name Johnson in the island's
 English dialect.
  As for that dialect . . .
  The dialect of San Lorenzo is both easy to understand and
 difficult to write down. I say it is easy to understand, but I
 speak only for myself. Others have found it as incomprehensible as
 Basque, so my understanding of it may be telepathic.
  Philip Castle, in his book, gave a phonetic demonstration of
 the dialect and caught its flavor very well. He chose for his
 sample the San Lorenzan version of "Twinkle, Twinkle, Little
 Star." 
  In American English, one version of that immortal poem goes
 like this:
  Twinkle, twinkle, little star,
  How I wonder what you are,
  Shining in the sky so bright,
  Like a tea tray in the night,
  Twinkle, twinkle, little star,
  How I wonder what you are.
  In San Lorenzan dialect, according to Castle, the same poem
 went like this:
  _Tsvent-kiul, tsvent-kiul, lett-pool store,_
  _Ko jy tsvantoor bat voo yore._
  _Put-shinik on lo shee zo brath,_
  _Kam oon teetron on lo nath,_
  _Tsvent-kiul, tsvent-kiul, lett-poll store,_
  _Ko jy tsvantoor bat voo yore._
  Shortly after Johnson became Bokonon, incidentally, the
 lifeboat of his shattered ship was found on shore. That boat was
 later painted gold and made the bed of the island's chief
 executive.
  "There is a legend, made up by Bokonon," Philip Castle wrote
 in his book, "that the golden boat will sail again when the end of
 the world is near."
 A Nice Midget 50
  My reading of the life of Bokonon was interrupted by H. Lowe
 Crosby's wife, Hazel. She was standing in the aisle next to me.
 "You'll never believe it," she said, "but I just found two more
 Hoosiers on this airplane."
  "I'll be damned." 
  "They weren't born Hoosiers, but they _live_ there now. They
 live in Indianapolis."
  "Very interesting."
  "You want to meet them?"
  "You think I should?"
  The question baffled her. "They're your fellow Hoosiers."
  "What are their names?"
  "Her name is Conners and his name is Hoenikker. They're
 brother and sister, and he's a midget. He's a nice midget,
 though." She winked. "He's a smart little thing."
  "Does he call you Mom?"
  "I almost asked him to. And then I stopped, and I wondered if
 maybe it wouldn't be rude to ask a midget to do that."
  "Nonsense."
 O.K., Mom 51
  So I went aft to talk to Angela Hoenikker Conners and little
 Newton Hoenikker, members of my _karass_.
  Angela was the horse-faced platinum blonde I had noticed
 earlier.
  Newt was a very tiny young man indeed, though not grotesque.
 He was as nicely scaled as Gulliver among the Brobdingnagians, and
 as shrewdly watchful, too.
  He held a glass of champagne, which was included in the price
 of his ticket. That glass was to him what a fishbowl would have
 been to a normal man, but he drank from it with elegant ease--as
 though he and the glass could not have been better matched.
  The little son of a bitch had a crystal of _ice-nine_ in a
 thermos bottle in his luggage, and so did his miserable sister,
 while under us was God's own amount of water, the Caribbean Sea.
  When Hazel had got all the pleasure she could from
 introducing Hoosiers to Hoosiers, she left us alone. "Remember,"
 she said as she left us, "from now on, call me _Mom_."
  "O.K., Mom," I said.
  "O.K., Mom," said Newt. His voice was fairly high, in keeping
 with his little larynx. But he managed to make that voice
 distinctly masculine. 
  Angela persisted in treating Newt like an infant--and he
 forgave her for it with an amiable grace I would have thought
 impossible for one so small.
  Newt and Angela remembered me, remembered the letters I'd
 written, and invited me to take the empty seat in their group of
 three.
  Angela apologized to me for never having answered my letters.
  "I couldn't think of anything to say that would interest
 anybody reading a book. I could have made up something about that
 day, but I didn't think you'd want that. Actually, the day was
 just like a regular day."
  "Your brother here wrote me a very good letter."
  Angela was surprised. "Newt did? How could Newt remember
 anything?" She turned to him. "Honey, you don't remember anything
 about that day, do you? You were just a baby."
  "I remember," he said mildly.
  "I wish I'd _seen_ the letter." She implied that Newt was
 still too immature to deal directly with the outside world. Angela
 was a God-awfully insensitive woman, with no feeling for what
 smallness meant to Newt.
  "Honey, you should have showed me that letter," she scolded.
  "Sorry," said Newt. "I didn't think."
  "I might as well tell you," Angela said to me, "Dr. Breed
 told me I wasn't supposed to co-operate with you. He said you
 weren't interested in giving a fair picture of Father." She showed
 me that she didn't like me for that.
  I placated her some by telling her that the book would
 probably never be done anyway, that I no longer had a clear idea
 of what it would or should mean.
  "Well, if you ever _do_ do the book, you better make Father a
 saint, because that's what he was."
  I promised that I would do my best to paint that picture. I
 asked if she and Newt were bound for a family reunion with Frank
 in San Lorenzo.
  "Frank's getting married," said Angela. "We're going to the
 engagement party."
  "Oh? Who's the lucky girl?"
  "I'll show you," said Angela, and she took from her purse a
 billfold that contained a sort of plastic accordion. In each of
 the accordion's pleats was a photograph. Angela flipped through
 the photographs, giving me glimpses of little Newt on a Cape Cod
 beach, of Dr. Felix Hoenikker accepting his Nobel Prize, of
 Angela's own homely twin girls, of Frank flying a model plane on
 the end of a string.
  And then she showed me a picture of the girl Frank was going
 to marry.
  She might, with equal effect, have struck me in the groin. 
  The picture she showed me was of Mona Aamons Monzano, the
 woman I loved.
 No Pain 52
  Once Angela had opened her plastic accordion, she was
 reluctant to close it until someone had looked at every
 photograph.
  "There are the people I love," she declared.
  So I looked at the people she loved. What she had trapped in
 plexiglass, what she had trapped like fossil beetles in amber,
 were the images of a large part of our _karass_. There wasn't a
 _granfallooner_ in the collection.
  There were many photographs of Dr. Hoenikker, father of a
 bomb, father of three children, father of _ice-nine_. He was a
 little person, the purported sire of a midget and a giantess.
  My favorite picture of the old man in Angela's fossil
 collection showed him all bundled up for winter, in an overcoat,
 scarf, galoshes, and a wool knit cap with a big pom-pom on the
 crown.
  This picture, Angela told me, with a catch in her throat, had
 been taken in Hyannis just about three hours before the old man
 died. A newspaper photographer had recognized the seeming
 Christmas elf for the great man he was.
  "Did your father die in the hospital?"
  "Oh, no! He died in our cottage, in a big white wicker chair
 facing the sea. Newt and Frank had gone walking down the beach in
 the snow . . ."
  "It was a very warm snow," said Newt. "It was almost like
 walking through orange blossoms. It was very strange. Nobody was
 in any of the other cottages . . ."
  "Ours was the only one with heat," said Angela.
  "Nobody within miles," recalled Newt wonderingly, "and Frank
 and I came across this big black dog out on the beach, a Labrador
 retriever. We threw sticks into the ocean and he brought them
 back."
  "I'd gone back into the village for more Christmas tree
 bulbs," said Angela. "We always had a tree." 
  "Did your father enjoy having a Christmas tree?"
  "He never said," said Newt.
  "I think he liked it," said Angela. "He just wasn't very
 demonstrative. Some people aren't."
  "And some people are," said Newt. He gave a small shrug.
  "Anyway," said Angela, "when we got back home, we found him
 in the chair." She shook her head. "I don't think he suffered any.
 He just looked asleep. He couldn't have looked like that if
 there'd been the least bit of pain."
  She left out an interesting part of the story. She left out
 the fact that it was on that same Christmas Eve that she and Frank
 and little Newt had divided up the old man's _ice-nine_.
 The President of Fabri-Tek 53
  Angela encouraged me to go on looking at snapshots.
  "That's me, if you can believe it." She showed me an
 adolescent girl six feet tall. She was holding a clarinet in the
 picture, wearing the marching uniform of the Ilium High School
 band. Her hair was tucked up under a bandsman's hat. She was
 smiling with shy good cheer.
  And then Angela, a woman to whom God had given virtually
 nothing with which to catch a man, showed me a picture of her
 husband.
  "So that's Harrison C. Conners." I was stunned. Her husband
 was a strikingly handsome man, and looked as though he knew it. He
 was a snappy dresser, and had the lazy rapture of a Don Juan
 about.the eyes.
  "What--what does he do?" I asked.
  "He's president of Fabri-Tek."
  "Electronics?"
  "I couldn't tell you, even if I knew. It's all very secret
 government work."
  "Weapons?"
  "Well, war anyway."
  "How did you happen to meet?"
  "He used to work as a laboratory assistant to Father," said
 Angela. "Then he went out to Indianapolis and started Fabri-Tek." 
  "So your marriage to him was a happy ending to a long
 romance?"
  "No. I didn't even know he knew I was alive. I used to think
 he was nice, but he never paid any attention to me until after
 Father died.
  "One day he came through Ilium. I was sitting around that big
 old house, thinking my life was over . . ." She spoke of the awful
 days and weeks that followed her father's death. "Just me and
 little Newt in that big old house. Frank had disappeared, and the
 ghosts were making ten times as much noise as Newt and I were. I'd
 given my whole life to taking care of Father, driving him to and
 from work, bundling him up when it was cold, unbundling him when
 it was hot, making him eat, paying his bills. Suddenly, there
 wasn't anything for me to do. I'd never had any close friends,
 didn't have a soul to turn to but Newt.
  "And then," she continued, "there was a knock on the door--
 and there stood Harrison Conners. He was the most beautiful thing
 I'd ever seen. He came in, and we talked about Father's last days
 and about old times in general."
  Angela almost cried now.
  "Two weeks later, we were married."
 Communists, Nazis, Royalists, Parachutists, and Draft Dodgers 54
  Returning to my own seat in the plane, feeling far shabbier
 for having lost Mona Aamons Monzano to Frank, I resumed my reading
 of Philip Castle's manuscript.
  I looked up _Monzano, Mona Aamons_ in the index, and was told
 by the index to see Aamons, Mona.
  So I saw _Aamons, Mona_, and found almost as many page
 references as I'd found after the name of "Papa" Monzano himself.
  And after _Aamons, Mona_ came _Aamons, Nestor_. So I turned
 to the few pages that had to do with Nestor, and learned that he
 was Mona's father, a native Finn, an architect.
  Nestor Aamons was captured by the Russians, then liberated by
 the Germans during the Second World War. He was not returned home
 by his liberators, but was forced to serve in a _Wehrmacht_
 engineer unit that was sent to fight the Yugoslav partisans. He 
 was captured by Chetniks, royalist Serbian partisans, and then by
 Communist partisans who attacked the Chetniks. He was liberated by
 Italian parachutists who surprised the Communists, and he was
 shipped to Italy.
  The Italians put him to work designing fortifications for
 Sicily. He stole a fishing boat in Sicily, and reached neutral
 Portugal.
  While there, he met an American draft dodger named Julian
 Castle.
  Castle, upon learning that Aamons was an architect, invited
 him to come with him to the island of San Lorenzo and to design
 for him a hospital to be called the House of Hope and Mercy in the
 Jungle.
  Aamons accepted. He designed the hospital, married a native
 woman named Celia, fathered a perfect daughter, and died.
 Never Index Your Own Book 55
  As for the life of _Aamons, Mona_, the index itself gave a
 jangling, surrealistic picture of the many conflicting forces that
 had been brought to bear on her and of her dismayed reactions to
 them.
  "_Aamons, Mona:_" the index said, "adopted by Monzano in
 order to boost Monzano's popularity, 194-199, 216a.; childhood in
 compound of House of Hope and Mercy, 63-81; childhood romance with
 P. Castle, 72f; death of father, 89ff; death of mother, 92f;
 embarrassed by role as national erotic symbol, 80, 95f, 166n.,
 209, 247n., 400-406, 566n., 678; engaged to P. Castle, 193;
 essential naïveté, 67-71, 80, 95f, 116a., 209, 274n., 400-406,
 566a., 678; lives with Bokonon, 92-98, 196-197; poems about, 2n.,
 26, 114, 119, 311, 316, 477n., 501, 507, 555n., 689, 718ff, 799ff,
 800n., 841, 846ff, 908n., 971, 974; poems by, 89, 92, 193; returns
 to Monzano, 199; returns to Bokonon, 197; runs away from Bokonon,
 199; runs away from Moazano, 197; tries to make self ugly in order
 to stop being erotic symbol to islanders, 89, 95f, 116n., 209,
 247n., 400-406, 566n., 678; tutored by Bokonon, 63-80; writes
 letter to United Nations, 200; xylophone virtuoso, 71." 
  I showed this index entry to the Mintons, asking them if they
 didn't think it was an enchanting biography in itself, a biography
 of a reluctant goddess of love. I got an unexpectedly expert
 answer, as one does in life sometimes. It appeared that Claire
 Minton, in her time, had been a professional indexer. I had never
 heard of such a profession before.
  She told me that she had put her husband through college
 years before with her earnings as an indexer, that the earnings
 had been good, and that few people could index well.
  She said that indexing was a thing that only the most
 amateurish author undertook to do for his own book. I asked her
 what she thought of Philip Castle's job.
  "Flattering to the author, insulting to the reader," she
 said. "In a hyphenated word," she observed, with the shrewd
 amiability of an expert, " '_self-indulgent_.' I'm always
 embarrassed when I see an index an author has made of his own
 work."
  "Embarrassed?"
  "It's a revealing thing, an author's index of his own work,"
 she informed me. "It's a shameless exhibition--to the _trained_
 eye."
  "She can read character from an index," said her husband.
  "Oh?" I said. "What can you tell about Philip Castle?"
  She smiled faintly. "Things I'd better not tell strangers."
  "Sorry."
  "He's obviously in love with this Mona Aamons Monzano," she
 said.
  "That's true of every man in San Lorenzo I gather."
  "He has mixed feelings about his father," she said.
  "That's true of every man on earth." I egged her on gently.
  "He's insecure."
  "What mortal isn't?" I demanded. I didn't know it then, but
 that was a very Bokononist thing to demand.
  "He'll never marry her."
  "Why not?"
  "I've said all I'm going to say," she said.
  "I'm gratified to meet an indexer who respects the privacy of
 others."
  "Never index your own book," she stated.
  A _duprass_, Bokonon tells us, is a valuable instrument for
 gaining and developing, in the privacy of an interminable love
 affair, insights that are queer but true. The Mintons' cunning
 exploration of indexes was surely a case in point. A _duprass_,
 Bokonon tells us, is also a sweetly conceited establishment. The
 Mintons' establishment was no exception.
  Sometime later, Ambassador Minton and I met in the aisle of
 the airplane, away from his wife, and he showed that it was 
 important to him that I respect what his wife could find out from
 indexes.
  "You know why Castle will never marry the girl, even though
 he loves her, even though she loves him, even though they grew up
 together?" he whispered.
  "No, sir, I don't."
  "Because he's a homosexual," whispered Minton. "She can tell
 that from an index, too."
 A Self-supporting Squirrel Cage 56
  When Lionel Boyd Johnson and Corporal Earl McCabe were washed
 up naked onto the shore of San Lorenzo, I read, they were greeted
 by persons far worse off than they. The people of San Lorenzo had
 nothing but diseases, which they were at a loss to treat or even
 name. By contrast, Johnson and McCabe had the glittering treasures
 of literacy, ambition, curiosity, gall, irreverence, health,
 humor, and considerable information about the outside world.
  From the "Calypsos" again:
  Oh, a very sorry people, yes,
  Did I find here.
  Oh, they had no music,
  And they had no beer.
  And, oh, everywhere
  Where they tried to perch
  Belonged to Castle Sugar, Incorporated,
  Or the Catholic church.
  This statement of the property situation in San Lorenzo in
 1922 is entirely accurate, according to Philip Castle. Castle
 Sugar was founded, as it happened, by Philip Castle's greatgrandfather.
 In 1922, it owned every piece of arable land on the
 island.
  "Castle Sugar's San Lorenzo operations," wrote young Castle,
 "never showed a profit. But, by paying laborers nothing for their 
 labor, the company managed to break even year after year, making
 just enough money to pay the salaries of the workers' tormentors.
  "The form of government was anarchy, save in limited
 situations wherein Castle Sugar wanted to own something or to get
 something done. In such situations the form or government was
 feudalism. The nobility was composed of Castle Sugar's plantation
 bosses, who were heavily armed white men from the outside world.
 The knighthood was composed of big natives who, for small gifts
 and silly privileges, would kill or wound or torture on command.
 The spiritual needs of the people caught in this demoniacal
 squirrel cage were taken care of by a handful of butterball
 priests.
  "The San Lorenzo Cathedral, dynamited in 1923, was generally
 regarded as one of the man-made wonders of the New World," wrote
 Castle.
 The Queasy Dream 51
  That Corporal McCabe and Johnson were able to take command of
 San Lorenzo was not a miracle in any sense. Many people had taken
 over San Lorenzo--had invariably found it lightly held. The reason
 was simple: God, in His Infinite Wisdom, had made the island
 worthless.
  Hernando Cortes was the first man to have his sterile
 conquest of San Lorenzo recorded on paper. Cortes and his men came
 ashore for fresh water in 1519, named the island, claimed it for
 Emperor Charles the Fifth, and never returned. Subsequent
 expeditions came for gold and diamonds and rubies and spices,
 found none, burned a few natives for entertainment and heresy, and
 sailed on.
  "When France claimed San Lorenzo in 1682," wrote Castle, "no
 Spaniards complained. When Denmark claimed San Lorenzo in 1699, no
 Frenchmen complained. When the Dutch claimed San Lorenzo in 1704,
 no Danes complained. When England claimed San Lorenzo in 1706, no
 Dutchmen complained. When Spain reclaimed San Lorenzo in 1720, no
 Englishmen complained. When, in 1786, African Negroes took command
 of a British slave ship, ran it ashore on San Lorenzo, and 
 proclaimed San Lorenzo an independent nation, an empire with an
 emperor, in fact, no Spaniards complained.
  "The emperor was Tum-bumwa, the only person who ever regarded
 the island as being worth defending. A maniac, Tum-bumwa caused to
 be erected the San Lorenzo Cathedral and the fantastic
 fortifications on the north shore of the island, fortifications
 within which the private residence of the so-called President of
 the Republic now stands.
  "The fortifications have never been attacked, nor has any
 sane man ever proposed any reason why they should be attacked.
 They have never defended anything. Fourteen hundred persons are
 said to have died while building them. Of these fourteen hundred,
 about half are said to have been executed in public for
 substandard zeal."
  Castle Sugar came into San Lorenzo in 1916, during the sugar
 boom of the First World War. There was no government at all. The
 company imagined that even the clay and gravel fields of San
 Lorenzo could be tilled profitably, with the price of sugar so
 high. No one complained.
  When McCabe and Johnson arrived in 1922 and announced that
 they were placing themselves in charge, Castle Sugar withdrew
 flaccidly, as though from a queasy dream.
 Tyranny with a Difference 58
  "There was at least one quality of the new conquerors of San
 Lorenzo that was really new," wrote young Castle. "McCabe and
 Johnson dreamed of making San Lorenzo a Utopia.
  "To this end, McCabe overhauled the economy and the laws.
  "Johnson designed a new religion."
  Castle quoted the "Calypsos" again:
  I wanted all things
  To seem to make some sense,
  So we all could be happy, yes,
  Instead of tense.
  And I made up lies 
  So that they all fit nice,
  And I made this sad world
  A par-a-dise.
  There was a tug at my coat sleeve as I read. I looked up.
 Little Newt Hoenikker was standing in the aisle next to me. "I
 thought maybe you'd like to go back to the bar," he said, "and
 hoist a few."
  So we did hoist and topple a few, and Newt's tongue was
 loosened enough to tell me some things about Zinka, his Russian
 midget dancer friend. Their love nest, he told me, had been in his
 father's cottage on Cape Cod.
  "I may not ever have a marriage, but at least I've had a
 honeymoon."
  He told me of idyllic hours he and his Zinka had spent in
 each other's arms, cradled in Felix Hoenikker's old white wicker
 chair, the chair that faced the sea.
  And Zinka would dance for him. "Imagine a woman dancing just
 for me."
  "I can see you have no regrets."
  "She broke my heart. I didn't like that much. But that was
 the price. In this world, you get what you pay for."
  He proposed a gallant toast. "Sweethearts and wives," he
 cried.
 Fasten Your Seat Belts 59
  I was in the bar with Newt and H. Lowe Crosby and a couple of
 strangers, when San Lorenzo was sighted. Crosby was talking about
 pissants. "You know what I mean by a pissant?"
  "I know the term," I said, "but it obviously doesn't have the
 ding-a-ling associations for me that it has for you."
  Crosby was in his cups and had the drunkard's illusion that
 he could speak frankly, provided he spoke affectionately. He spoke
 frankly and affectionately of Newt's size, something nobody else
 in the bar had so far commented on. 
  "I don't mean a little feller like this." Crosby hung a ham
 hand on Newt's shoulder. "It isn't size that makes a man a
 pissant. It's the way he thinks. I've seen men four times as big
 as this little feller here, and they were pissants. And I've seen
 little fellers--well, not this little actually, but pretty damn
 little, by God--and I'd call them real men."
  "Thanks," said Newt pleasantly, not even glancing at the
 monstrous hand on his shoulder. Never had I seen a human being
 better adjusted to such a humiliating physical handicap. I
 shuddered with admiration.
  "You were talking about pissants," I said to Crosby, hoping
 to get the weight of his hand off Newt.
  "Damn right I was." Crosby straightened up.
  "You haven't told us what a pissant is yet," I said.
  "A pissant is somebody who thinks he's so damn smart, he
 never can keep his mouth shut. No matter what anybody says, he's
 got to argue with it. You say you like something, and, by God,
 he'll tell you why you're wrong to like it. A pissant does his
 best to make you feel like a boob all the time. No matter what you
 say, he knows better."
  "Not a very attractive characteristic," I suggested.
  "My daughter wanted to marry a pissant once," said Crosby
 darkly.
  "Did she?"
  "I squashed him like a bug." Crosby hammered on the bar,
 remembering things the pissant had said and done. "Jesus!" he
 said, "we've all been to college!" His gaze lit on Newt again.
 "You go to college?"
  "Cornell," said Newt.
  "Cornell!" cried Crosby gladly. "My God, I went to Cornell."
  "So did he." Newt nodded at me.
  "Three Cornellians--all in the same plane!" said Crosby, and
 we had another _granfalloon_ festival on our hands.
  When it subsided some, Crosby asked Newt what he did.
  "I paint."
  "Houses?"
  "Pictures."
  "I'll be damned," said Crosby.
  "Return to your seats and fasten your seat belts, please,"
 warned the airline hostess. "We're over Monzano Airport, Bolivar,
 San Lorenzo."
  "Christ! Now wait just a Goddamn minute here," said Crosby,
 looking down at Newt. "All of a sudden I realize you've got a name
 I've heard before."
  "My father was the father of the atom bomb." Newt didn't say
 Felix Hoenikker was _one_ of the fathers. He said Felix was _the_
 father. 
  "Is that so?" asked Crosby.
  "That's so."
  "I was thinking about something else," said Crosby. He had to
 think hard. "Something about a dancer."
  "I think we'd better get back to our seats," said Newt,
 tightening some.
  "Something about a Russian dancer." Crosby was sufficiently
 addled by booze to see no harm in thinking out loud. "I remember
 an editorial about how maybe the dancer was a spy."
  "Please, gentlemen," said the stewardess, "you really must
 get back to your seats and fasten your belts."
  Newt looked up at H. Lowe Crosby innocently. "You sure the
 name was Hoenikker?" And, in order to eliminate any chance of
 mistaken identity, he spelled the name for Crosby.
  "I could be wrong," said H. Lowe Crosby.
 An Underprivileged Nation 60
  The island, seen from the air, was an amazingly regular
 rectangle. Cruel and useless stone needles were thrust up from the
 sea. They sketched a circle around it.
  At the south end of the island was the port city of Bolivar.
  It was the only city.
  It was the capital.
  It was built on a marshy table. The runways of Monzano
 Airport were on its water front.
  Mountains arose abruptly to the north of Bolivar, crowding
 the remainder of the island with their brutal humps. They were
 called the Sangre de Cristo Mountains, but they looked like pigs
 at a trough to me.
  Bolivar had had many names: Caz-ma-caz-ma, Santa Maria, Saint
 Louis, Saint George, and Port Glory among them. It was given its
 present name by Johnson and McCabe in 1922, was named in honor of
 Simon Bolivar, the great Latin-American idealist and hero.
  When Johnson and McCabe came upon the city, it was built of
 twigs, tin, crates, and mud--rested on the catacombs of a trillion
 happy scavengers, catacombs in a sour mash of slop, feculence, and
 slime. 
  That was pretty much the way I found it, too, except for the
 new architectural false face along the water front.
  Johnson and McCabe had failed to raise the people from misery
 and muck.
  "Papa" Monzano had failed, too.
  Everybody was bound to fail, for San Lorenzo was as
 unproductive as an equal area in the Sahara or the Polar Icecap.
  At the same time, it had as dense a population as could be
 found anywhere, India and China not excluded. There were four
 hundred and fifty inhabitants for each uninhabitable square mile.
  "During the idealistic phase of McCabe's and Johnson's
 reorganization of San Lorenzo, it was announced that the country's
 total income would be divided among all adult persons in equal
 shares," wrote Philip Castle. "The first and only time this was
 tried, each share came to between six and seven dollars."
 What a Corporal Was Worth 61
  In the customs shed at Monzano Airport, we were all required
 to submit to a luggage inspection, and to convert what money we
 intended to spend in San Lorenzo into the local currency, into
 _Corporals_, which "Papa" Monzano insisted were worth fifty
 American cents.
  The shed was neat and new, but plenty of signs had already
 been slapped on the walls, higgledy-piggledy.
  ANYBODY CAUGHT PRACTICING BOKONONISM IN SAN LORENZO, said
 one, WILL DIE ON THE HOOK!
  Another poster featured a picture of Bokonon, a scrawny old
 colored man who was smoking a cigar. He looked clever and kind and
 amused.
  Under the picture were the words: WANTED DEAD OR ALIVE,
 10,000 CORPORALS REWARD!
  I took a closer look at that poster and found reproduced at
 the bottom of it some sort of police identification form Bokonon
 had had to fill out way back in 1929. It was reproduced,
 apparently, to show Bokonon hunters what his fingerprints and
 handwriting were like. 
  But what interested me were some of the words Bokonon had
 chosen to put into the blanks in 1929. Wherever possible, he had
 taken the cosmic view, had taken into consideration, for instance,
 such things as the shortness of life and the longness of eternity.
  He reported his avocation as: "Being alive."
  He reported his principal occupation as: "Being dead."
  THIS IS A CHRISTIAN NATION! ALL FOOT PLAY WILL BE PUNISHED BY
 THE HOOK, said another sign. The sign was meaningless to me, since
 I had not yet learned that Bokononists mingled their souls by
 pressing the bottoms of their feet together.
  And the greatest mystery of all, since I had not read all of
 Philip Castle's book, was how Bokonon, bosom friend of Corporal
 McCabe, had come to be an outlaw.
 Why Hazel Wasn't Scared 62
  There were seven of us who got off at San Lorenzo: Newt and
 Angela, Ambassador Minton and his wife, H. Lowe Crosby and his
 wife, and I. When we had cleared customs, we were herded outdoors
 and onto a reviewing stand.
  There, we faced a very quiet crowd.
  Five thousand or more San Lorenzans stared at us. The
 islanders were oatmeal colored. The people were thin. There wasn't
 a fat person to be seen. Every person had teeth missing. Many legs
 were bowed or swollen.
  Not one pair of eyes was clear.
  The women's breasts were bare and paltry. The men wore loose
 loincloths that did little to conceal penes like pendulums on
 grandfather clocks.
  There were many dogs, but not one barked. There were many
 infants, but not one cried. Here and there someone coughed--and
 that was all.
  A military band stood at attention before the crowd. It did
 not play.
  There was a color guard before the band. It carried two
 banners, the Stars and Stripes and the flag of San Lorenzo. The
 flag of San Lorenzo consisted of a Marine Corporal's chevrons on a
 royal blue field. The banners hung lank in the windless day. 
  I imagined that somewhere far away I heard the blamming of a
 sledge on a brazen drum. There was no such sound. My soul was
 simply resonating the beat of the brassy, clanging heat of the San
 Lorenzan clime.
  "I'm sure glad it's a Christian country," Hazel Crosby
 whispered to her husband, "or I'd be a little scared."
  Behind us was a xylophone.
  There was a glittering sign on the xylophone. The sign was
 made of garnets and rhinestones.
  The sign said, MONA.
 Reverent and Free 63
  To the left side of our reviewing stand were six propellerdriven
 fighter planes in a row, military assistance from the
 United States to San Lorenzo. On the fuselage of each plane was
 painted, with childish bloodlust, a boa constrictor which was
 crushing a devil to death. Blood came from the devil's ears, nose,
 and mouth. A pitchfork was slipping from satanic red fingers.
  Before each plane stood an oatmeal-colored pilot; silent,
 too.
  Then, above that tumid silence, there came a nagging song
 like the song of a gnat. It was a siren approaching. The siren was
 on "Papa's" glossy black Cadillac limousine.
  The limousine came to a stop before us, tires smoking.
  Out climbed "Papa" Monzano, his adopted daughter, Mona Aamons
 Monzano, and Franklin Hoenikker.
  At a limp, imperious signal from "Papa," the crowd sang the
 San Lorenzan National Anthem. Its melody was "Home on the Range."
 The words had been written in 1922 by Lionel Boyd Johnson, by
 Bokonon. The words were these:
  Oh, ours is a land
  Where the living is grand,
  And the men are as fearless as sharks;
  The women are pure,
  And we always are sure 
  That our children will all toe their marks.
  San, San Lo-ren-zo!
  What a rich, lucky island are we!
  Our enemies quail,
  For they know they will fail
  Against people so reverent and free.
 Peace and Plenty 64
  And then the crowd was deathly still again.
  "Papa" and Mona and Frank joined us on the reviewing stand.
 One snare drum played as they did so. The drumming stopped when
 "Papa" pointed a finger at the drummer.
  He wore a shoulder holster on the outside of his blouse. The
 weapon in it was a chromium-plated .45. He was an old, old man, as
 so many members of my _karass_ were. He was in poor shape. His
 steps were small and bounceless. He was still a fat man, but his
 lard was melting fast, for his simple uniform was loose. The balls
 of his hoptoad eyes were yellow. His hands trembled.
  His personal bodyguard was Major General Franklin Hoenikker,
 whose uniform was white. Frank--thin-wristed, narrow-shouldered--
 looked like a child kept up long after his customary bedtime. On
 his breast was a medal.
  I observed the two, "Papa" and Frank, with some difficulty--
 not because my view was blocked, but because I could not take my
 eyes off Mona. I was thrilled, heartbroken, hilarious, insane.
 Every greedy, unreasonable dream I'd ever had about what a woman
 should be came true in Mona. There, God love her warm and creamy
 soul, was peace and plenty forever.
  That girl--and she was only eighteen--was rapturously serene.
 She seemed to understand all, and to be all there was to
 understand. In _The Books of Bokonon_ she is mentioned by name.
 One thing Bokonon says of her is this: "Mona has the simplicity of
 the all."
  Her dress was white and Greek.
  She wore flat sandals on her small brown feet.
  Her pale gold hair was lank and long.
  Her hips were a lyre. 
  Oh God.
  Peace and plenty forever.
  She was the one beautiful girl in San Lorenzo. She was the
 national treasure. "Papa" had adopted her, according to Philip
 Castle, in order to mingle divinity with the harshness of his
 rule.
  The xylophone was rolled to the front of the stand. And Mona
 played it. She played "When Day Is Done." It was all tremolo--
 swelling, fading, swelling again. The crowd was intoxicated by
 beauty. And then it was time for "Papa" to greet us.
 A Good Time to Come to San Lorenzo 65
  "Papa" was a self-educated man, who had been majordomo to
 Corporal McCabe. He had never been off the island. He spoke
 American English passably well.
  Everything that any one of us said on the reviewing stand was
 bellowed out at the crowd through doomsday horns.
  Whatever went out through those horns gabbled down a wide,
 short boulevard at the back of the crowd, ricocheted off the three
 glass-faced new buildings at the end of the boulevard, and came
 cackling back.
  "Welcome," said "Papa." "You are coming to the best friend
 America ever had. America is misunderstood many places, but not
 here, Mr. Ambassador." He bowed to H. Lowe Crosby, the bicycle
 manufacturer, mistaking him for the new Ambassador.
  "I know you've got a good country here, Mr. President," said
 Crosby. "Everything I ever heard about it sounds great to me.
 There's just one thing . . ."
  "Oh?"
  "I'm not the Ambassador," said' Crosby. "I wish I was, but
 I'm just a plain, ordinary businessman." It hurt him to say who
 the real Ambassador was. "This man over here is the big cheese."
  "Ah!" "Papa" smiled at his mistake. The smile went away
 suddenly. Some pain inside of him made him wince, then made him
 hunch over, close his eyes--made him concentrate on surviving the
 pain. 
  Frank Hoenikker went to his support, feebly, incompetently.
 "Are you all right?"
  "Excuse me," "Papa" whispered at last, straightening up some.
 There were tears in his eyes. He brushed them away, straightening
 up all the way. "I beg your pardon."
  He seemed to be in doubt for a moment as to where he was, as
 to what was expected of him. And then he remembered. He shook
 Horlick Minton's hand. "Here, you are among friends."
  "I'm sure of it," said Minton gently.
  "Christian," said "Papa."
  "Good."
  "Anti-Communists," said "Papa."
  "Good."
  "No Communists here," said "Papa." "They fear the hook too
 much."
  "I should think they would," said Minton.
  "You have picked a very good time to come to us," said
 "Papa." "Tomorrow will be one of the happiest days in the history
 of our country. Tomorrow is our greatest national holiday, The Day
 of the Hundred Martyrs to Democracy. It will also be the day of
 the engagement of Major General Hoenikker to Mona Aamons Monzano,
 to the most precious person in my life and in the life of San
 Lorenzo."
  "I wish you much happiness, Miss Monzano," said Minton
 warmly. "And I congratulate _you_, General Hoenikker."
  The two young people nodded their thanks.
  Minton now spoke of the so-called Hundred Martyrs to
 Democracy, and he told a whooping lie. "There is not an American
 schoolchild who does not know the story of San Lorenzo's noble
 sacrifice in World War Two. The hundred brave San Lorenzans, whose
 day tomorrow is, gave as much as freedom-loving men can. The
 President of the United States has asked me to be his personal
 representative at ceremonies tomorrow, to cast a wreath, the gift
 of the American people to the people of San Lorenzo, on the sea."
  "The people of San Lorenzo thank you and your President and
 the generous people of the United States of America for their
 thoughtfulness," said "Papa." "We would be honored if you would
 cast the wreath into the sea during the engagement party
 tomorrow."
  "The honor is mine."
  "Papa" commanded us all to honor him with our presence at the
 wreath ceremony and engagement party next day. We were to appear
 at his palace at noon.
  "What children these two will have!" "Papa" said, inviting us
 to stare at Frank and Mona. "What blood! What beauty!"
  The pain hit him again.
  He again closed his eyes to huddle himself around that pain. 
  He waited for it to pass, but it did not pass.
  Still in agony, he turned away from us, faced the crowd and
 the microphone. He tried to gesture at the crowd, failed. He tried
 to say something to the crowd, failed.
  And then the words came out. "Go home," he cried strangling.
 "Go home!"
  The crowd scattered like leaves.
  "Papa" faced us again, still grotesque in pain. . . .
  And then he collapsed.
 The Strongest Thing There Is 66
  He wasn't dead.
  But he certainly looked dead; except that now and then, in
 the midst of all that seeming death, he would give a shivering
 twitch.
  Frank protested loudly that "Papa" wasn't dead, that he
 _couldn't_ be dead. He was frantic. "'Papa'! You can't die! You
 can't!"
  Frank loosened "Papa's" collar and blouse, rubbed his wrists.
 "Give him air! Give 'Papa' air!"
  The fighter-plane pilots came running over to help us. One
 had sense enough to go for the airport ambulance.
  The band and the color guard, which had received no orders,
 remained at quivering attention.
  I looked for Mona, found that she was still serene and had
 withdrawn to the rail of the reviewing stand. Death, if there was
 going to be death, did not alarm her.
  Standing next to her was a pilot. He was not looking at her,
 but he had a perspiring radiance that I attributed to his being so
 near to her.
  "Papa" now regained something like consciousness. With a hand
 that flapped like a captured bird, he pointed at Frank. "You . .
 ." he said.
  We all fell silent, in order to hear his words.
  His lips moved, but we could hear nothing but bubbling
 sounds. 
  Somebody had what looked like a wonderful idea then--what
 looks like a hideous idea in retrospect. Someone--a pilot, I
 think--took the microphone from its mount and held it by "Papa's"
 bubbling lips in order to amplify his words.
  So death rattles and all sorts of spastic yodels bounced off
 the new buildings.
  And then came words.
  "You," he said to Frank hoarsely, "you--Franklin Hoenikker--
 you will be the next President of San Lorenzo. Science--you have
 science. Science is the strongest thing there is.
  "Science," said "Papa." "Ice." He rolled his yellow eyes, and
 he passed out again.
  I looked at Mona.
  Her expression was unchanged.
  The pilot next to her, however, had his features composed in
 the catatonic, orgiastic rigidity of one receiving the
 Congressional Medal of Honor.
  I looked down and I saw what I was not meant to see.
  Mona had slipped off her sandal. Her small brown foot was
 bare.
  And with that foot, she was kneading and kneading and
 kneading--obscenely kneading--the instep of the flyer's boot.
 Hy-u-o-ook-kuh! 67
  "Papa" didn't die--not then.
  He was rolled away in the airport's big red meat wagon. The
 Mintons were taken to their embassy by an American limousine.
  Newt and Angela were taken to Frank's house in a San Lorenzan
 limousine.
  The Crosbys and I were taken to the Casa Mona hotel in San
 Lorenzo's one taxi, a hearselike 1939 Chrysler limousine with jump
 seats. The name on the side of the cab was Castle Transportation
 Inc. The cab was owned by Philip Castle, the owner of the Casa
 Mona, the son of the completely unselfish man I had come to
 interview.
  The Crosbys and I were both upset. Our consternation was
 expressed in questions we had to have answered at once. The 
 Crosbys wanted to know who Bokonon was. They were scandalized by
 the idea that anyone should be opposed to "Papa" Monzano.
  Irrelevantly, I found that I had to know at once who the
 Hundred Martyrs to Democracy had been.
  The Crosbys got their answer first. They could not understand
 the San Lorenzan dialect, so I had to translate for them. Crosby's
 basic question to our driver was: "Who the hell is this pissant
 Bokonon, anyway?"
  "Very bad man," said the driver. What he actually said was,
 "_Vorry ball moan_."
  "A Communist?" asked Crosby, when he heard my translation.
  "Oh, sure."
  "Has he got any following?"
  "Sir?"
  "Does anybody think he's any good?"
  "Oh, no, sir," said the driver piously. "Nobody that crazy."
  "Why hasn't he been caught?" demanded Crosby.
  "Hard man to find," said the driver. "Very smart."
  "Well, people must be hiding him and giving him food or he'd
 be caught by now."
  "Nobody hide him; nobody feed him. Everybody too smart to do
 that."
  "You sure?"
  "Oh, sure," said the driver. "Anybody feed that crazy old
 man, anybody give him place to sleep, they get the hook. Nobody
 want the hook."
  He pronounced that last word: "_hy-u-o-_ook_-kuh_."
 Hoon-yera Mora-toorz 68
  I asked the driver who the Hundred Martyrs to Democracy had
 been. The boulevard we were going down, I saw, was called the
 Boulevard of the Hundred Martyrs to Democracy.
  The driver told me that San Lorenzo had declared war on
 Germany and Japan an hour after Pearl Harbor was attacked.
  San Lorenzo conscripted a hundred men to fight on the side of
 democracy. These hundred men were put on a ship bound for the
 United States, where they were to be armed and trained. 
  The ship was sunk by a German submarine right outside of
 Bolivar harbor.
  "_Dose, sore_," he said, "_yeeara lo hoon-yera mora-toorz tut
 zamoo-cratz-ya_."
  "Those, sir," he'd said in dialect, "are the Hundred Martyrs
 to Democracy."
 A Big Mosaic 69
  The Crosbys and I had the curious experience of being the
 very first guests of a new hotel. We were the first to sign the
 register of the Casa Mona.
  The Crosbys got to the desk ahead of me, but H. Lowe Crosby
 was so startled by a wholly blank register that he couldn't bring
 himself to sign. He had to think about it a while.
  "You sign," he said to me. And then, defying me to think he
 was superstitious, he declared his wish to photograph a man who
 was making a huge mosaic on the fresh plaster of the lobby wall.
  The mosaic was a portrait of Mona Aamons Monzano. It was
 twenty feet high. The man who was working on it was young and
 muscular. He sat at the top of a stepladder. He wore nothing but a
 pair of white duck trousers.
  He was a white man.
  The mosaicist was making the fine hairs on the nape of Mona's
 swan neck out of chips of gold.
  Crosby went over to photograph him; came back to report that
 the man was the biggest pissant he had ever met. Crosby was the
 color of tomato juice when he reported this. "You can't say a damn
 thing to him that he won't turn inside out."
  So I went over to the mosaicist, watched him for a while, and
 then I told him, "I envy you."
  "I always knew," he sighed, "that, if I waited long enough,
 somebody would come and envy me. I kept telling myself to be
 patient, that, sooner or later, somebody envious would come
 along."
  "Are you an American?" 
  "That happiness is mine." He went right on working; he was
 incurious as to what I looked like. "Do you want to take my
 photograph, too?"
  "Do you mind?"
  "I think; therefore I am, therefore I am photographable."
  "I'm afraid I don't have my camera with me."
  "Well, for Christ's sake, get it! You're not one of those
 people who trusts his memory, are you?"
  "I don't think I'll forget that face you're working on very
 soon."
  "You'll forget it when you're dead, and so will I. When I'm
 dead, I'm going to forget everything--and I advise you to do the
 same."
  "Has she been posing for this or are you working from
 photographs or what?"
  "I'm working from or what."
  "What?"
  "I'm working from or what." He tapped his temple. "It's all
 in this enviable head of mine."
  "You know her?"
  "That happiness is mine."
  "Frank Hoenikker's a lucky man."
  "Frank Hoenikker is a piece of shit."
  "You're certainly candid."
  "I'm also rich."
  "Glad to hear it."
  "If you want an expert opinion, money doesn't necessarily
 make people happy."
  "Thanks for the information. You've just saved me a lot of
 trouble. I was just about to make some money."
  "How?"
  "Writing."
  "I wrote a book once."
  "What was it called?"
  "_San Lorenzo_," he said, "the Land, the History, the
 People_."
 Tutored by Bokonon 70 
  "You, I take it," I said to the mosaicist, "are Philip
 Castle, son of Julian Castle."
  "That happiness is mine."
  "I'm here to see your father."
  "Are you an aspirin salesman?"
  "No."
  "Too bad. Father's low on aspirin. How about miracle drugs?
 Father enjoys pulling off a miracle now and then."
  "I'm not a drug salesman. I'm a writer."
  "What makes you think a writer isn't a drug salesman?"
  "I'll accept that. Guilty as charged."
  "Father needs some kind of book to read to people who are
 dying or in terrible pain. I don't suppose you've written anything
 like that."
  "Not yet."
  "I think there'd be money in it. There's another valuable tip
 for you."
  "I suppose I could overhaul the 'Twenty-third Psalm,' switch
 it around a little so nobody would realize it wasn't original with
 me."
  "Bokonon tried to overhaul it," he told me. "Bokonon found
 out he couldn't change a word."
  "You know him, too?"
  "That happiness is mine. He was my tutor when I was a little
 boy." He gestured sentimentally at the mosaic. "He was Mona's
 tutor, too."
  "Was he a good teacher?"
  "Mona and I can both read and write and do simple sums," said
 Castle, "if that's what you mean."
 The Happiness of Being an American 71
  H. Lowe Crosby came over to have another go at Castle, the
 pissant.
  "What do you call yourself," sneered Crosby, "a beatnik or
 what?"
  "I call myself a Bokononist." 
  "That's against the law in this country, isn't it?"
  "I happen to have the happiness of being an American. I've
 been able to say I'm a Bokononist any time I damn please, and, so
 far, nobody's bothered me at all."
  "I believe in obeying the laws of whatever country I happen
 to be in."
  "You are not telling me the news."
  Crosby was livid. "Screw you, Jack!"
  "Screw you, Jasper," said Castle mildly, "and screw Mother's
 Day and Christmas, too."
  Crosby marched across the lobby to the desk clerk and he
 said, "I want to report that man over there, that pissant, that
 so-called artist. You've got a nice little country here that's
 trying to attract the tourist trade and new investment in
 industry. The way that man talked to me, I don't ever want to see
 San Lorenzo again--and any friend who asks me about San Lorenzo,
 I'll tell him to keep the hell away. You may be getting a nice
 picture on the wall over there, but, by God, the pissant who's
 making it is the most insulting, discouraging son of a bitch I
 ever met in my life."
  The clerk looked sick. "Sir . . ."
  "I'm listening," said Crosby, full of fire.
  "Sir--he owns the hotel."
 The Pissant Hilton 72
  H. Lowe Crosby and his wife checked out of the Casa Mona.
 Crosby called it "The Pissant Hilton," and he demanded quarters at
 the American embassy.
  So I was the only guest in a one-hundred-room hotel.
  My room was a pleasant one. It faced, as did all the rooms,
 the Boulevard of the Hundred Martyrs to Democracy, Monzano
 Airport, and Bolivar harbor beyond. The Casa Mona was built like a
 bookcase, with solid sides and back and with a front of blue-green
 glass. The squalor and misery of the city, being to the sides and
 back of the Casa Mona, were impossible to see.
  My room was air-conditioned. It was almost chilly. And,
 coming from the blamming heat into that chilliness, I sneezed. 
  There were fresh flowers on my bedside table, but my bed had
 not yet been made. There wasn't even a pillow on the bed. There
 was simply a bare, brand-new Beautyrest mattress. And there
 weren't any coat hangers in the closet; and there wasn't any
 toilet paper in the bathroom.
  So I went out in the corridor to see if there was a
 chambermaid who would equip me a little more completely. There
 wasn't anybody out there, but there was a door open at the far end
 and very faint sounds of life.
  I went to this door and found a large suite paved with dropcloths.
 It was being painted, but the two painters weren't
 painting when I appeared. They were sitting on a shelf that ran
 the width of the window wall.
  They had their shoes off. They had their eyes closed. They
 were facing each other.
  They were pressing the soles of their bare feet together.
  Each grasped his own ankles, giving himself the rigidity of a
 triangle.
  I cleared my throat.
  The two rolled off the shelf and fell to the spattered
 dropcloth. They landed on their hands and knees, and they stayed
 in that position--their behinds in the air, their noses close to
 the ground.
  They were expecting to be killed.
  "Excuse me," I said, amazed.
  "Don't tell," begged one querulously. "Please--please don't
 tell."
  "Tell what?"
  "What you saw!"
  "I didn't see anything."
  "If you tell," he said, and he put his cheek to the floor and
 looked up at me beseechingly, "if you tell, we'll die on the _hyu-o-ook-kuh!_"
 
  "Look, friends," I said, "either I came in too early or too
 late, but, I tell you again, I didn't see anything worth
 mentioning to anybody. Please--get up."
  They got up, their eyes still on me. They trembled and
 cowered. I convinced them at last that I would never tell what I
 had seen.
  What I had seen, of course, was the Bokononist ritual of
 _boko-maru_, or the mingling of awarenesses.
  We Bokononists believe that it is impossible to be sole-tosole
 with another person without loving the person, provided the
 feet of both persons are clean and nicely tended.
  The basis for the foot ceremony is this "Calypso": 
  We will touch our feet, yes,
  Yes, for all we're worth,
  And we will love each other, yes,
  Yes, like we love our Mother Earth.
 Black Death 73
  When I got back to my room I found that Philip Castle--
 mosaicist, historian, self-indexer, pissant, and hotel-keeper--was
 installing a roll of toilet paper in my bathroom.
  "Thank you very much," I said.
  "You're entirely welcome."
  "This is what I'd call a hotel with a real heart. How many
 hotel owners would take such a direct interest in the comfort of a
 guest?"
  "How many hotel owners have just one guest?"
  "You used to have three."
  "Those were the days."
  "You know, I may be speaking out of turn, but I find it hard
 to understand how a person of your interests and talents would be
 attracted to the hotel business."
  He frowned perplexedly. "I don't seem to be as good with
 guests as I might, do I?"
  "I knew some people in the Hotel School at Cornell, and I
 can't help feeling they would have treated the Crosbys somewhat
 differently."
  He nodded uncomfortably. "I know. I know." He flapped his
 arms. "Damned if I know why I built this hotel --something to do
 with my life, I guess. A way to be busy, a way not to be
 lonesome." He shook his head. "It was be a hermit or open a hotel-
 -with nothing in between."
  "Weren't you raised at your father's hospital?"
  "That's right. Mona and I both grew up there."
  "Well, aren't you at all tempted to do with your life what
 your father's done with his?"
  Young Castle smiled wanly, avoiding a direct answer. "He's a
 funny person, Father is," he said. "I think you'll like him." 
  "I expect to. There aren't many people who've been as
 unselfish as he has."
  "One time," said Castle, "when I was about fifteen, there was
 a mutiny near here on a Greek ship bound from Hong Kong to Havana
 with a load of wicker furniture. The mutineers got control of the
 ship, didn't know how to run her, and smashed her up on the rocks
 near 'Papa' Monzano's castle. Everybody drowned but the rats. The
 rats and the wicker furniture came ashore."
  That seemed to be the end of the story, but I couldn't be
 sure. "So?"
  "So some people got free furniture, and some people got
 bubonic plague. At Father's hospital, we had fourteen-hundred
 deaths inside of ten days. Have you ever seen anyone die of
 bubonic plague?"
  "That unhappiness has not been mine."
  "The lymph glands in the groin and the armpits swell to the
 size of grapefruit."
  "I can well believe it."
  "After death, the body turns black--coals to Newcastle in the
 case of San Lorenzo. When the plague was having everything its own
 way, the House of Hope and Mercy in the Jungle looked like
 Auschwitz or Buchenwald. We had stacks of dead so deep and wide
 that a bulldozer actually stalled trying to shove them toward a
 common grave. Father worked without sleep for days, worked not
 only without sleep but without saving many lives, either."
  Castle's grisly tale was interrupted by the ringing of my
 telephone.
  "My God," said Castle, "I didn't even know the telephones
 were connected yet."
  I picked up the phone. "Hello?"
  It was Major General Franklin Hoenikker who had called me up.
 He sounded out of breath and scared stiff. "Listen! You've got to
 come out to my house right away. We've got to have a talk! It
 could be a very important thing in your life!"
  "Could you give me some idea?"
  "Not on the phone, not on the phone. You come to my house.
 You come right away! Please!"
  "All right."
  "I'm not kidding you. This is a really important thing in
 your life. This is the most important thing ever." He hung up.
  "What was that all about?" asked Castle.
  "I haven't got the slightest idea. Frank Hoenikker wants to
 see me right away."
  "Take your time. Relax. He's a moron."
  "He said it was important."
  "How does he know what's important? I could carve a better
 man out of a banana." 
  "Well, finish your story anyway."
  "Where was I?"
  "The bubonic plague. The bulldozer was stalled by corpses."
  "Oh, yes. Anyway, one sleepless night I stayed up with Father
 while he worked. It was all we could do to find a live patient to
 treat. In bed after bed after bed we found dead people.
  "And Father started giggling," Castle continued.
  "He couldn't stop. He walked out into the night with his
 flashlight. He was still giggling. He was making the flashlight
 beam dance over all the dead people stacked outside. He put his
 hand on my head, and do you know what that marvelous man said to
 me?" asked Castle.
  "Nope."
  "'Son,' my father said to me, 'someday this will all be
 yours.'"
 Cat's Cradle 74
  I went to Frank's house in San Lorenzo's one taxicab.
  We passed through scenes of hideous want. We climbed the
 slope of Mount McCabe. The air grew cooler. There was mist.
  Frank's house had once been the home of Nestor Aamons, father
 of Mona, architect of the House of Hope and Mercy in the Jungle.
  Aamons had designed it.
  It straddled a waterfall; had a terrace cantilevered out into
 the mist rising from the fall. It was a cunning lattice of very
 light steel posts and beams. The interstices of the lattice were
 variously open, chinked with native stone, glazed, or curtained by
 sheets of canvas.
  The effect of the house was not so much to enclose as to
 announce that a man had been whimsically busy there.
  A servant greeted me politely and told me that Frank wasn't
 home yet. Frank was expected at any moment. Frank had left orders
 to the effect that I was to be made happy and comfortable, and
 that I was to stay for supper and the night. The servant, who
 introduced himself as Stanley, was the first plump San Lorenzan I
 had seen. 
  Stanley led me to my room; led me around the heart of the
 house, down a staircase of living stone, a staircase sheltered or
 exposed by steel-framed rectangles at random. My bed was a foamrubber
 slab on a stone shelf, a shelf of living stone. The walls
 of my chamber were canvas. Stanley demonstrated how I might roll
 them up or down, as I pleased.
  I asked Stanley if anybody else was home, and he told me that
 only Newt was. Newt, he said, was out on the cantilevered terrace,
 painting a picture. Angela, he said, had gone sightseeing to the
 House of Hope and Mercy in the Jungle.
  I went out onto the giddy terrace that straddled the
 waterfall and found little Newt asleep in a yellow butterfly
 chair.
  The painting on which Newt had been working was set on an
 easel next to the aluminum railing. The painting was framed in a
 misty view of sky, sea, and valley.
  Newt's painting was small and black and warty.
  It consisted of scratches made in a black, gummy impasto. The
 scratches formed a sort of spider's web, and I wondered if they
 might not be the sticky nets of human futility hung up on a
 moonless night to dry.
  I did not wake up the midget who had made this dreadful
 thing. I smoked, listening to imagined voices in the water sounds.
  What awakened little Newt was an explosion far away below. It
 caromed up the valley and went to God. It was a cannon on the
 water front of Bolivar, Frank's major-domo told me. It was fired
 every day at five.
  Little Newt stirred.
  While still half-snoozing, he put his black, painty hands to
 his mouth and chin, leaving black smears there. He rubbed his eyes
 and made black smears around them, too.
  "Hello," he said to me, sleepily.
  "Hello," I said. "I like your painting."
  "You see what it is?"
  "I suppose it means something different to everyone who sees
 it."
  "It's a cat's cradle."
  "Aha," I said. "Very good. The scratches are string. Right?"
  "One of the oldest games there is, cat's cradle. Even the
 Eskimos know it."
  "You don't say."
  "For maybe a hundred thousand years or more, grownups have
 been waving tangles of string in their children's faces."
  "Um."
  Newt remained curled in the chair. He held out his painty
 hands as though a cat's cradle were strung between them. "No
 wonder kids grow up crazy. A cat's cradle is nothing but a bunch 
 of X's between somebody's hands, and little kids look and look and
 look at all those X's . . ."
  "And?"
  "_No damn cat, and no damn cradle_."
 Give My Regards to Albert Schweitzer 75
  And then Angela Hoenikker Conners, Newt's beanpole sister,
 came in with Julian Castle, father of Philip, and founder of the
 House of Hope and Mercy in the Jungle. Castle wore a baggy white
 linen suit and a string tie. He had a scraggly mustache. He was
 bald. He was scrawny. He was a saint, I think.
  He introduced himself to Newt and to me on the cantilevered
 terrace. He forestalled all references to his possible saintliness
 by talking out of the corner of his mouth like a movie gangster.
  "I understand you are a follower of Albert Schweitzer," I
 said to him.
  "At a distance . . ." He gave a criminal sneer. "I've never
 met the gentleman."
  "He must surely know of your work, just as you know of his."
  "Maybe and maybe not. You ever see him?"
  "No."
  "You ever expect to see him?"
  "Someday maybe I will."
  "Well," said Julian Castle, "in case you run across Dr.
 Schweitzer in your travels, you might tell him that he is _not_ my
 hero." He lit a big cigar.
  When the cigar was going good and hot he pointed its red end
 at me. "You can tell him he isn't my hero," he said, "but you can
 also tell him that, thanks to him, Jesus Christ _is_."
  "I think he'll be glad to hear it."
  "I don't give a damn if he is or not. This is something
 between Jesus and me." 
 Julian Castle Agrees with Newt 76
 that Everything Is Meaningless
  Julian Castle and Angela went to Newt's painting. Castle made
 a pinhole of a curled index finger, squinted at the painting
 through it.
  "What do you think of it?" I asked him.
  "It's _black_. What is it--hell?"
  "It means whatever it means," said Newt.
  "Then it's hell," snarled Castle.
  "I was told a moment ago that it was a cat's cradle," I said.
  "Inside information always helps," said Castle.
  "I don't think it's very nice," Angela complained. "I think
 it's ugly, but I don't know anything about modern art. Sometimes I
 wish Newt would take some lessons, so he could know for sure if he
 was doing something or not."
  "Self-taught, are you?" Julian Castle asked Newt.
  "Isn't everybody?" Newt inquired.
  "Very good answer." Castle was respectful.
  I undertook to explain the deeper significance of the cat's
 cradle, since Newt seemed disinclined to go through that song and
 dance again.
  And Castle nodded sagely. "So this is a picture of the
 meaninglessness of it all! I couldn't agree more."
  "Do you _really_ agree?" I asked. "A minute ago you said
 something about Jesus."
  "Who?" said, Castle.
  "Jesus Christ?"
  "Oh," said Castle. "_Him_." He shrugged. "People have to talk
 about something just to keep their voice boxes in working order,
 so they'll have good voice boxes in case there's ever anything
 really meaningful to say."
  "I see." I knew I wasn't going to have an easy time writing a
 popular article about him. I was going to have to concentrate on
 his saintly deeds and ignore entirely the satanic things he
 thought and said.
  "You may quote me:" he said. "Man is vile, and man makes
 nothing worth making, knows nothing worth knowing."
  He leaned down and he shook little Newt's painty hand.
 "Right?"
  Newt nodded, seeming to suspect momentarily that the case had
 been a little overstated. "Right." 
  And then the saint marched to Newt's painting and took it
 from its easel. He beamed at us all. "Garbage--like everything
 else."
  And he threw the painting off the cantilevered terrace. It
 sailed out on an updraft, stalled, boomeranged back, sliced into
 the waterfall.
  There was nothing little Newt could say.
  Angela spoke first. "You've got paint all over your face,
 honey. Go wash it off."
 Aspirin and Boko-maru 77
  "Tell me, Doctor," I said to Julian Castle, "how is 'Papa'
 Monzano?"
  "How would I know?"
  "I thought you'd probably been treating him."
  "We don't speak . . ." Castle smiled. "He doesn't speak to
 me, that is. The last thing he said to me, which was about three
 years ago, was that the only thing that kept me off the hook was
 my American citizenship."
  "What have you done to offend him? You come down here and
 with your own money found a free hospital for his people . . ."
  "'Papa' doesn't like the way we treat the whole patient,"
 said Castle, "particularly the whole patient when he's dying. At
 the House of Hope and Mercy in the Jungle, we administer the last
 rites of the Bokononist Church to those who want them."
  "What are the rites like?"
  "Very simple. They start with a responsive reading. You want
 to respond?"
  "I'm not that close to death just now, if you don't mind."
  He gave me a grisly wink. "You're wise to be cautious. People
 taking the last rites have a way of dying on cue. I think we could
 keep you from going all the way, though, if we didn't touch feet."
  "Feet?"
  He told me about the Bokononist attitude relative to feet.
  "That explains something I saw in the hotel." I told him
 about the two painters on the window sill. 
  "It works, you know," he said. "People who do that really do
 feel better about each other and the world."
  "Um."
  "_Boko-maru_."
  "Sir?"
  "That's what the foot business is called," said Castle. "It
 works. I'm grateful for things that work. Not many things _do_
 work, you know."
  "I suppose not."
  "I couldn't possibly run that hospital of mine if it weren't
 for aspirin and _boko-maru_."
  "I gather," I said, "that there are still several Bokononists
 on the island, despite the laws, despite the _hy-u-o-ook-kuh_ . .
 ."
  He laughed. "You haven't caught on, yet?"
  "To what?"
  "Everybody on San Lorenzo is a devout Bokononist, the _hy-uo-ook-kuh_
 notwithstanding."
 Ring of Steel 78
  "When Bokonon and McCabe took over this miserable country
 years ago," said Julian Castle, "they threw out the priests. And
 then Bokonon, cynically and playfully, invented a new religion."
  "I know," I said.
  "Well, when it became evident that no governmental or
 economic reform was going to make the people much less miserable,
 the religion became the one real instrument of hope. Truth was the
 enemy of the people, because the truth was so terrible, so Bokonon
 made it his business to provide the people with better and better
 lies."
  "How did he come to be an outlaw?"
  "It was his own idea. He asked McCabe to outlaw him and his
 religion, too, in order to give the religious life of the people
 more zest, more tang. He wrote a little poem about it,
 incidentally."
  Castle quoted this poem, which does not appear in _The Books
 of Bokonon_: 
  So I said good-bye to government,
  And I gave my reason:
  That a really good religion
  Is a form of treason.
  "Bokonon suggested the hook, too, as the proper punishment
 for Bokononists," he said. "It was something he'd seen in the
 Chamber of Horrors at Madame Tussaud's." He winked ghoulishly.
 "That was for zest, too."
  "Did many people die on the hook?"
  "Not at first, not at first. At first it was all makebelieve.
 Rumors were cunningly circulated about executions, but no
 one really knew anyone who had died that way. McCabe had a good
 old time making bloodthirsty threats against the Bokononists--
 which was everybody.
  "And Bokonon went into cozy hiding in the jungle," Castle
 continued, "where he wrote and preached all day long and ate good
 things his disciples brought him.
  "McCabe would organize the unemployed, which was practically
 everybody, into great Bokonon hunts.
  "About every six months McCabe would announce triumphantly
 that Bokonon was surrounded by a ring of steel, which was
 remorselessly closing in.
  "And then the leaders of the remorseless ring would have to
 report to McCabe, full of chagrin and apoplexy, that Bokonon had
 done the impossible.
  "He had escaped, had evaporated, had lived to preach another
 day. Miracle!"
 Why McCabe's Soul Grew Coarse 79
  "McCabe and Bokonon did not succeed in raising what is
 generally thought of as the standard of living," said Castle. "The
 truth was that life was as short and brutish and mean as ever. 
  "But people didn't have to pay as much attention to the awful
 truth. As the living legend of the cruel tyrant in the city and
 the gentle holy man in the jungle grew, so, too, did the happiness
 of the people grow. They were all employed full time as actors in
 a play they understood, that any human being anywhere could
 understand and applaud."
  "So life became a work of art," I marveled.
  "Yes. There was only one trouble with it."
  "Oh?"
  "The drama was very tough on the souls of the two main
 actors, McCabe and Bokonon. As young men, they had been pretty
 much alike, had both been half-angel, half-pirate.
  "But the drama demanded that the pirate half of Bokonon and
 the angel half of McCabe wither away. And McCabe and Bokonon paid
 a terrible price in agony for the happiness of the people--McCabe
 knowing the agony of the tyrant and Bokonon knowing the agony of
 the saint. They both became, for all practical purposes, insane."
  Castle crooked the index finger of his left hand. "And then,
 people really did start dying on the _hy-u-o-ook-kuh_."
  "But Bokonon was never caught?" I asked.
  "McCabe never went that crazy. He never made a really serious
 effort to catch Bokonon. It would have been easy to do."
  "Why didn't he catch him?"
  "McCabe was always sane enough to realize that without the
 holy man to war against, he himself would become meaningless.
 'Papa' Monzano understands that, too."
  "Do people still die on the hook?"
  "It's inevitably fatal."
  "I mean," I said, "does 'Papa' really have people executed
 that way?"
  "He executes one every two years--just to keep the pot
 boiling, so to speak." He sighed, looking up at the evening sky.
 "Busy, busy, busy."
  "Sir?"
  "It's what we Bokononists say," he said, "when we feel that a
 lot of mysterious things are going on."
  "You?" I was amazed. "A Bokononist, too?"
  He gazed at me levelly. "You, too. You'll find out." 
 The Waterfall Strainers 80
  Angela and Newt were on the cantilevered terrace with Julian
 Castle and me. We had cocktails. There was still no word from
 Frank.
  Both Angela and Newt, it appeared, were fairly heavy
 drinkers. Castle told me that his days as a playboy had cost him a
 kidney, and that he was unhappily compelled, per force, to stick
 to ginger ale.
  Angela, when she got a few drinks into her, complained of how
 the world had swindled her father. "He gave so much, and they gave
 him so little."
  I pressed her for examples of the world's stinginess and got
 some exact numbers. "General Forge and Foundry gave him a fortyfive-dollar
 bonus for every patent his work led to," she said.
 "That's the same patent bonus they paid anybody in the company."
 She shook her head mournfully. "Forty-five dollars--and just think
 what some of those patents were for!"
  "Um," I said. "I assume he got a salary, too."
  "The most he ever made was twenty-eight thousand dollars a
 year."
  "I'd say that was pretty good."
  She got very huffy. "You know what movie stars make?"
  "A lot, sometimes."
  "You know Dr. Breed made ten thousand more dollars a year
 than Father did?"
  "That was certainly an injustice."
  "I'm sick of injustice."
  She was so shrilly exercised that I changed the subject. I
 asked Julian Castle what he thought had become of the painting he
 had thrown down the waterfall.
  "There's a little village at the bottom," he told me. "Five
 or ten shacks, I'd say. It's 'Papa' Monzano's birthplace,
 incidentally. The waterfall ends in a big stone bowl there.
  "The villagers have a net made out of chicken wire stretched
 across a notch in the bowl. Water spills out through the notch
 into a stream."
  "And Newt's painting is in the net now, you think?" I asked.
  "This is a poor country--in case you haven't noticed," said
 Castle. "Nothing stays in the net very long. I imagine Newt's
 painting is being dried in the sun by now, along with the butt of
 my cigar. Four square feet of gummy canvas, the four milled and
 mitered sticks of the stretcher, some tacks, too, and a cigar. All
 in all, a pretty nice catch for some poor, poor man."
  "I could just scream sometimes," said Angela, "when I think
 about how much some people get paid and how little they paid 
 Father--and how much he gave." She was on the edge of a crying
 jag.
  "Don't cry," Newt begged her gently.
  "Sometimes I can't help it," she said.
  "Go get your clarinet," urged Newt. "That always helps."
  I thought at first that this was a fairly comical suggestion.
 But then, from Angela's reaction, I learned that the suggestion
 was serious and practical.
  "When I get this way," she said to Castle and me, "sometimes
 it's the only thing that helps."
  But she was too shy to get her clarinet right away. We had to
 keep begging her to play, and she had to have two more drinks.
  "She's really just wonderful," little Newt promised.
  "I'd love to hear you play," said Castle.
  "All right," said Angela finally as she rose unsteadily. "All
 right--I will."
  When she was out of earshot, Newt apologized for her., "She's
 had a tough time. She needs a rest."
  "She's been sick?" I asked.
  "Her husband is mean as hell to her," said Newt. He showed us
 that he hated Angela's handsome young husband, the extremely
 successful Harrison C. Conners, President of Fabri-Tek. "He hardly
 ever comes home--and, when he does, he's drunk and generally
 covered with lipstick."
  "From the way she talked," I said, "I thought it was a very
 happy marriage."
  Little Newt held his hands six inches apart and he spread his
 fingers. "See the cat? See the cradle?"
 A White Bride for the Son of a Pullman Porter 81
  I did not know what was going to come from Angela's clarinet.
 No one could have imagined what was going to come from there.
  I expected something pathological, but I did not expect the
 depth, the violence, and the almost intolerable beauty of the
 disease. 
  Angela moistened and warmed the mouthpiece, but did not blow
 a single preliminary note. Her eyes glazed over, and her long,
 bony fingers twittered idly over the noiseless keys.
  I waited anxiously, and I remembered what Marvin Breed had
 told me--that Angela's one escape from her bleak life with her
 father was to her room, where she would lock the door and play
 along with phonograph records.
  Newt now put a long-playing record on the large phonograph in
 the room off the terrace. He came back with the record's slipcase,
 which he handed to me.
  The record was called _Cat House Piano_. It was of
 unaccompanied piano by Meade Lux Lewis.
  Since Angela, in order to deepen her trance, let Lewis play
 his first number without joining him, I read some of what the
 jacket said about Lewis.
  "Born in Louisville, Ky., in 1905," I read, "Mr. Lewis didn't
 turn to music until he had passed his 16th birthday and then the
 instrument provided by his father was the violin. A year later
 young Lewis chanced to hear Jimmy Yancey play the piano. 'This,'
 as Lewis recalls, 'was the real thing.' Soon," I read, "Lewis was
 teaching himself to play the boogie-woogie piano, absorbing all
 that was possible from the older Yancey, who remained until his
 death a close friend and idol to Mr. Lewis. Since his father was a
 Pullman porter," I read, "the Lewis family lived near the
 railroad. The rhythm of the trains soon became a natural pattern
 to young Lewis and he composed the boogie-woogie solo, now a
 classic of its kind, which became known as 'Honky Tonk Train
 Blues.'"
  I looked up from my reading. The first number on the record
 was done. The phonograph needle was now scratching its slow way
 across the void to the second. The second number, I learned from
 the jacket, was "Dragon Blues."
  Meade Lux Lewis played four bars alone-and then Angela
 Hoenikker joined in.
  Her eyes were closed.
  I was flabbergasted.
  She was great.
  She improvised around the music of the Pullman porter's son;
 went from liquid lyricism to rasping lechery to the shrill
 skittishness of a frightened child, to a heroin nightmare.
  Her glissandi spoke of heaven and hell and all that lay
 between.
  Such music from such a woman could only be a case of
 schizophrenia or demonic possession.
  My hair stood on end, as though Angela were rolling on the
 floor, foaming at the mouth, and babbling fluent Babylonian. 
  When the music was done, I shrieked at Julian Castle, who was
 transfixed, too, "My God--life! Who can understand even one little
 minute of it?"
  "Don't try," he said. "Just pretend you understand."
  "That's--that's very good advice." I went limp.
  Castle quoted another poem:
  Tiger got to hunt,
  Bird got to fly;
  Man got to sit and wonder, "Why, why, why?"
  Tiger got to sleep,
  Bird got to land;
  Man got to tell himself he understand.
  "What's that from?" I asked.
  "What could it possibly be from but _The Books of Bokonon?_"
  "I'd love to see a copy sometime."
  "Copies are hard to come by," said Castle. "They aren't
 printed. They're made by hand. And, of course, there is no such
 thing as a completed copy, since Bokonon is adding things every
 day."
  Little Newt snorted. "Religion!"
  "Beg your pardon?" Castle said.
  "See the cat?" asked Newt. "See the cradle?"
 Zah-mah-ki-bo 82
  Major General Franklin Hoenikker didn't appear for supper.
  He telephoned, and insisted on talking to me and to no one
 else. He told me that he was keeping a vigil by "Papa's" bed; that
 "Papa" was dying in great pain. Frank sounded scared and lonely.
  "Look," I said, "why don't I go back to my hotel, and you and
 I can get together later, when this crisis is over."
  "No, no, no. You stay right there! I want you to be where I
 can get hold of you right away!" He was panicky about my slipping 
 out of his grasp. Since I couldn't account for his interest in me,
 I began to feel panic, too.
  "Could you give me some idea what you want to see me about?"
 I asked.
  "Not over the telephone."
  "Something about your father?"
  "Something about _you_."
  "Something I've done?"
  "Something you're _going_ to do."
  I heard a chicken clucking in the background of Frank's end
 of the line. I heard a door open, and xylophone music came from
 some chamber. The music was again "When Day Is Done." And then the
 door was closed, and I couldn't hear the music any more.
  "I'd appreciate it if you'd give me some small hint of what
 you expect me to do--so I can sort of get set," I said.
  "_Zah-mah-ki-bo_."
  "What?"
  "It's a Bokononist word."
  "I don't know any Bokononist words."
  "Julian Castle's there?"
  "Yes."
  "Ask him," said Frank. "I've got to go now." He hung up. So I
 asked Julian Castle what _zah-mah-ki-bo_ meant.
  "You want a simple answer or a whole answer?"
  "Let's start with a simple one."
  "Fate--inevitable destiny."
 Dr. Schlichter von Koenigswald 83
 Approaches the Break-even Point
  "Cancer," said Julian Castle at dinner, when I told him that
 "Papa" was dying in pain.
  "Cancer of what?"
  "Cancer of about everything. You say he collapsed on the
 reviewing stand today?"
  "He sure did," said Angela. 
  "That was the effect of drugs," Castle declared. "He's at the
 point now where drugs and pain just about balance out. More drugs
 would kill him."
  "I'd kill myself, I think," murmured Newt. He was sitting on
 a sort of folding high chair he took with him when he went
 visiting. It was made of aluminum tubing and canvas. "It beats
 sitting on a dictionary, an atlas, and a telephone book," he'd
 said when he erected it.
  "That's what Corporal McCabe did, of course," said Castle.
 "He named his major-domo as his successor, then he shot himself."
  "Cancer, too?" I asked.
  "I can't be sure; I don't think so, though. Unrelieved
 villainy just wore him out, is my guess. That was all before my
 time."
  "This certainly is a cheerful conversation," said Angela.
  "I think everybody would agree that these are cheerful
 times," said Castle.
  "Well," I said to him, "I'd think you would have more reasons
 for being cheerful than most, doing what you are doing with your
 life."
  "I once had a yacht, too, you know."
  "I don't follow you."
  "Having a yacht is a reason for being more cheerful than
 most, too."
  "If you aren't 'Papa's' doctor," I said, "who is?"
  "One of my staff, a Dr. Schlichter von Koenigswald."
  "A German?"
  "Vaguely. He was in the S.S. for fourteen years. He was a
 camp physician at Auschwitz for six of those years."
  "Doing penance at the House of Hope and Mercy is he?"
  "Yes," said Castle, "and making great strides, too, saving
 lives right and left."
  "Good for him."
  "Yes. If he keeps going at his present rate, working night
 and day, the number of people he's saved will equal the number of
 people he let die--in the year 3010."
  So there's another member of my _karass_: Dr. Schlichter von
 Koenigswald. 
 Blackout 84
  Three hours after supper Frank still hadn't come home. Julian
 Castle excused himself and went back to the House of Hope and
 Mercy in the Jungle.
  Angela and Newt and I sat on the cantilevered terrace. The
 lights of Bolivar were lovely below us. There was a great,
 illuminated cross on top of the administration building of Monzano
 Airport. It was motor-driven, turning slowly, boxing the compass
 with electric piety.
  There were other bright places on the island, too, to the
 north of us. Mountains prevented our seeing them directly, but we
 could see in the sky their balloons of light. I asked Stanley,
 Frank Hoenikker's major-domo, to identify for me the sources of
 the auroras.
  He pointed them out, counterclockwise. "House of Hope and
 Mercy in the Jungle, 'Papa's' palace, and Fort Jesus."
  "Fort Jesus?"
  "The training camp for our soldiers."
  "It's named after Jesus Christ?"
  "Sure. Why not?"
  There was a new balloon of light growing quickly to the
 north. Before I could ask what it was, it revealed itself as
 headlights topping a ridge. The headlights were coming toward us.
 They belonged to a convoy.
  The convoy was composed of five American-made army trucks.
 Machine gunners manned ring mounts on the tops of the cabs.
  The convoy stopped in Frank's driveway. Soldiers dismounted
 at once. They set to work on the grounds, digging foxholes and
 machine-gun pits. I went out with Frank's major-domo to ask the
 officer in charge what was going on.
  "We have been ordered to protect the next President of San
 Lorenzo," said the officer in island dialect.
  "He isn't here now," I informed him.
  "I don't know anything about it," he said. "My orders are to
 dig in here. That's all I know."
  I told Angela and Newt about it.
  "Do you think there's any real danger?" Angela asked me.
  "I'm a stranger here myself," I said.
  At that moment there was a power failure. Every electric
 light in San Lorenzo went out. 
 A Pack of Foma 85
  Frank's servants brought us gasoline lanterns; told us that
 power failures were common in San Lorenzo, that there was no cause
 for alarm. I found that disquiet was hard for me to set aside,
 however, since Frank had spoken of my _zah-mah-ki-bo_.
  He had made me feel as though my own free will were as
 irrelevant as the free will of a piggy-wig arriving at the Chicago
 stockyards.
  I remembered again the stone angel in ilium.
  And I listened to the soldiers outside--to their clinking,
 chunking, murmuring labors.
  I was unable to concentrate on the conversation of Angela and
 Newt, though they got onto a fairly interesting subject. They told
 me that their father had had an identical twin. They had never met
 him. His name was Rudolph. The last they had heard of him, he was
 a music-box manufacturer in Zurich, Switzerland.
  "Father hardly ever mentioned him," said Angela.
  "Father hardly ever mentioned anybody," Newt declared.
  There was a sister of the old man, too, they told me. Her
 name was Celia. She raised giant schnauzers on Shelter Island, New
 York.
  "She always sends a Christmas card," said Angela.
  "With a picture of a giant schnauzer on it," said little
 Newt.
  "It sure is funny how different people in different families
 turn out," Angela observed.
  "That's very true and well said," I agreed. I excused myself
 from the glittering company, and I asked Stanley, the major-domo,
 if there happened to be a copy of _The Books of Bokonon_ about the
 house.
  Stanley pretended not to know what I was talking about. And
 then he grumbled that _The Books of Bokonon_ were filth. And then
 he insisted that anyone who read them should die on the hook. And
 then he brought me a copy from Frank's bedside table.
  It was a heavy thing, about the size of an unabridged
 dictionary. It was written by hand. I trundled it off to my
 bedroom, to my slab of rubber on living rock.
  There was no index, so my search for the implications of
 _zah-mah-ki-bo_ was difficult; was, in fact, fruitless that night.
  I learned some things, but they were scarcely helpful. I
 learned of the Bokononist cosmogony, for instance, wherein 
 _Borasisi_, the sun, held _Pabu_, the moon, in his arms, and hoped
 that _Pabu_ would bear him a fiery child.
  But poor _Pabu_ gave birth to children that were cold, that
 did not burn; and _Borasisi_ threw them away in disgust. These
 were the planets, who circled their terrible father at a safe
 distance.
  Then poor _Pabu_ herself was cast away, and she went to live
 with her favorite child, which was Earth. Earth was _Pabu's_
 favorite because it had people on it; and the people looked up at
 her and loved her and sympathized.
  And what opinion did Bokonon hold of his own cosmogony?
  "_Foma!_ Lies!" he wrote. "A pack of _foma!_"
 Two Little Jugs 86
  It's hard to believe that I slept at all, but I must have--
 for, otherwise, how could I have found myself awakened by a series
 of bangs and a flood of light?
  I rolled out of bed at the first bang and ran to the heart of
 the house in the brainless ecstasy of a volunteer fireman.
  I found myself rushing headlong at Newt and Angela, who were
 fleeing from beds of their own.
  We all stopped short, sheepishly analyzing the nightmarish
 sounds around us, sorting them out as coming from a radio, from an
 electric dishwasher, from a pump--all restored to noisy life by
 the return of electric power.
  The three of us awakened enough to realize that there was
 humor in our situation, that we had reacted in amusingly human
 ways to a situation that seemed mortal but wasn't. And to
 demonstrate my mastery over my illusory fate, I turned the radio
 off.
  We all chuckled.
  And we all vied, in saving face, to be the greatest student
 of human nature, the person with the quickest sense of humor.
  Newt was the quickest; he pointed out to me that I had my
 passport and my billfold and my wristwatch in my hands. I had no
 idea what I'd grabbed in the face of death--didn't know I'd
 grabbed anything. 
  I countered hilariously by asking Angela and Newt why it was
 that they both carried little Thermos jugs, identical red-and-gray
 jugs capable of holding about three cups of coffee.
  It was news to them both that they were carrying such jugs.
 They were shocked to find them in their hands.
  They were spared making an explanation by more banging
 outside. I was bound to find out what the banging was right away;
 and, with a brazenness as unjustified as my earlier panic, I
 investigated, found Frank Hoenikker outside tinkering with a
 motor-generator set mounted on a truck.
  The generator was the new source of our electricity. The
 gasoline motor that drove it was backfiring and smoking. Frank was
 trying to fix it.
  He had the heavenly Mona with him. She was watching him, as
 always, gravely.
  "Boy, have I got news for you!" he yelled at me, and he led
 the way back into the house.
  Angela and Newt were still in the living room, but, somehow,
 somewhere, they had managed to get rid of their peculiar Thermos
 jugs.
  The contents of those jugs, of course, were parts of the
 legacies from Dr. Felix Hoenikker, were parts of the _wampeter_ of
 my _karass_, were chips of _ice-nine_.
  Frank took me aside. "How awake are you?"
  "As awake as I ever was."
  "I hope you're really wide awake, because we've got to have a
 talk right now."
  "Start talking."
  "Let's get some privacy." Frank told Mona to make herself
 comfortable. "We'll call you if we need you."
  I looked at Mona, meltingly, and I thought that I had never
 needed anyone as much as I needed her.
 The Cut of My Jib 81
  About this Franklin Hoenikker--the pinch-faced child spoke
 with the timbre and conviction of a kazoo. I had heard it said in
 the Army that such and such a man spoke like a man with a paper 
 rectum. Such a man was General Hoenikker. Poor Frank had had
 almost no experience in talking to anyone, having spent a furtive
 childhood as Secret Agent X-9.
  Now, hoping to be hearty and persuasive, he said tinny things
 to me, things like, "I like the cut of your jib!" and "I want to
 talk cold turkey to you, man to man!"
  And he took me down to what he called his "den" in order that
 we might, ". . . call a spade a spade, and let the chips fall
 where they may."
  So we went down steps cut into a cliff and into a natural
 cave that was beneath and behind the waterfall. There were a
 couple of drawing tables down there; three pale, bare-boned
 Scandinavian chairs; a bookcase containing books on architecture,
 books in German, French, Finnish, Italian, English.
  All was lit by electric lights, lights that pulsed with the
 panting of the motor-generator set.
  And the most striking thing about the cave was that there
 were pictures painted on the walls, painted with kindergarten
 boldness, painted with the flat clay, earth, and charcoal colors
 of very early man. I did not have to ask Frank how old the cave
 paintings were. I was able to date them by their subject. The
 paintings were not of mammoths or saber-toothed tigers or
 ithyphallic cave bears.
  The paintings treated endlessly the aspects of Mona Aamons
 Monzano as a little girl.
  "This--this is where Mona's father worked?" I asked.
  "That's right. He was the Finn who designed the House of Hope
 and Mercy in the Jungle."
  "I know."
  "That isn't what I brought you down here to talk about."
  "This is something about your father?"
  "This is about _you_." Frank put his hand on my shoulder and
 he looked me in the eye. The effect was dismaying. Frank meant to
 inspire camaraderie, but his head looked to me like a bizarre
 little owl, blinded by light and perched on a tall white post.
  "Maybe you'd better come to the point."
  "There's no sense in beating around the bush," he said. "I'm
 a pretty good judge of character, if I do say so myself, and I
 like the cut of your jib."
  "Thank you."
  "I think you and I could really hit it off."
  "I have no doubt of it."
  'We've both got things that mesh."
  I was grateful when he took his hand from my shoulder. He
 meshed the fingers of his hands like gear teeth. One hand
 represented him, I suppose, and the other represented me. 
  "We need each other." He wiggled his fingers to show me how
 gears worked.
  I was silent for some time, though outwardly friendly.
  "Do you get my meaning?" asked Frank at last.
  "You and I--we're going to _do_ something together?"
  "That's right!" Frank clapped his hands. "You're a worldly
 person, used to meeting the public; and I'm a technical person,
 used to working behind the scenes, making things go."
  "How can you possibly know what kind of a person I am? We've
 just met."
  "Your clothes, the way you talk." He put his hand on my
 shoulder again. "I like the cut of your jib!"
  "So you said."
  Frank was frantic for me to complete his thought, to do it
 enthusiastically, but I was still at sea. "Am I to understand that
 . . . that you are offering me some kind of job here, here in San
 Lorenzo?"
  He clapped his hands. He was delighted. "That's right! What
 would you say to a hundred thousand dollars a year?"
  "Good God!" I cried. "What would I have to do for that?"
  "Practically nothing. And you'd drink out of gold goblets
 every night and eat off of gold plates and have a palace all your
 own."
  "What's the job?"
  "President of the Republic of San Lorenzo."
 Why Frank Couldn't Be President 88
  "Me? President?" I gasped.
  "Who else is there?"
  "Nuts!"
  "Don't say no until you've really thought about it." Frank
 watched me anxiously.
  "No!"
  "You haven't really thought about it."
  "Enough to know it's crazy."
  Frank made his fingers into gears again. "We'd work
 _together_. I'd be backing you up all the time." 
  "Good. So, if I got plugged from the front you'd get it,
 too."
  "Plugged?"
  "Shot! Assassinated!"
  Frank was mystified. "Why would anybody shoot you?"
  "So he could get to be President."
  Frank shook his head. "Nobody in San Lorenzo wants to be
 President," he promised me. "It's against their religion."
  "It's against _your_ religion, too? I thought you were going
 to be the next President."
  "I . . ." he said, and found it hard to go on. He looked
 haunted.
  "You what?" I asked.
  He faced the sheet of water that curtained the cave.
 "Maturity, the way I understand it," he told me, "is knowing what
 your limitations are."
  He wasn't far from Bokonon in defining maturity. "Maturity,"
 Bokonon tells us, "is a bitter disappointment for which no remedy
 exists, unless laughter can be said to remedy anything."
  "I know I've got limitations," Frank continued. "They're the
 same limitations my father had."
  "Oh?"
  "I've got a lot of very good ideas, just the way my father
 did," Frank told me and the waterfall, "but he was no good at
 facing the public, and neither am I."
 Duffle 89
  "You'll take the job?" Frank inquired anxiously.
  "No," I told him.
  "Do you know anybody who _might_ want the job?" Frank was
 giving a classic illustration of what Bokonon calls _duffle_.
 _Duffle_, in the Bokononist sense, is the destiny of thousands
 upon thousands of persons when placed in the hands of a _stuppa_.
 A _stuppa_ is a fogbound child.
  I laughed.
  "Something's funny?" 
  "Pay no attention when I laugh," I begged him. "I'm a
 notorious pervert in that respect."
  "Are you laughing at me?" I shook my head.
  "No."
  "Word of honor?"
  "Word of honor."
  "People used to make fun of me all the time."
  "You must have imagined that."
  "They used to yell things at me. I didn't imagine _that_."
  "People are unkind sometimes without meaning to be," I
 suggested. I wouldn't have given him my word of honor on that.
  "You know what they used to yell at me?"
  "No."
  "They used to yell at me, 'Hey, X-9, where you going?'"
  "That doesn't seem too bad."
  "That's what they used to call me," said Frank in sulky
 reminiscence, "'Secret Agent X-9.'"
  I didn't tell him I knew that already.
  "'Where are you going, X-9?' "Frank echoed again.
  I imagined what the taunters had been like, imagined where
 Fate had eventually goosed and chivvied them to. The wits who had
 yelled at Frank were surely nicely settled in deathlike jobs at
 Genera! Forge and Foundry, at Ilium Power and Light, at the
 Telephone Company. .
  And here, by God, was Secret Agent X-9, a Major General,
 offering to make me king . . . in a cave that was curtained by a
 tropical waterfall.
  "They really would have been surprised if I'd stopped and
 told them where I was going."
  "You mean you had some premonition you'd end up here?" It was
 a Bokononist question.
  "I was going to Jack's Hobby Shop," he said, with no sense of
 anticlimax.
  "Oh."
  "They all knew I was going there, but they didn't know what
 really went on there. They would have been really surprised--
 especially the girls--if they'd found out what _really_ went on.
 The girls didn't think I knew anything about girls."
  "What _really_ went on?"
  "I was screwing Jack's wife every day. That's how come I fell
 asleep all the time in high school. That's how come I never
 achieved my full potential."
  He roused himself from this sordid recollection. "Come on. Be
 president of San Lorenzo. You'd be real good at it, with your
 personality. Please?" 
 Only One Catch 90
  And the time of night and the cave and the waterfall--and the
 stone angel in Ilium . . .
  And 250,000 cigarettes and 3,000 quarts of booze, and two
 wives and no wife . . .
  And no love waiting for me anywhere . . .
  And the listless life of an ink-stained hack . . .
  And _Pabu_, the moon, and _Borasisi_, the sun, and their
 children . . .
  All things conspired to form one cosmic _vin-dit_, one mighty
 shove into Bokononism, into the belief that God was running my
 life and that He had work for me to do. And, inwardly, I
 _sarooned_, which is to say that I acquiesced to the seeming
 demands of my _vin-dit_.
  Inwardly, I agreed to become the next President of San
 Lorenzo.
  Outwardly, I was still guarded, suspicious. "There must be a
 catch," I hedged.
  "There isn't."
  "There'll be an election?"
  "There never has been. We'll just announce who the new
 President is."
  "And nobody will object?"
  "Nobody objects to anything. They aren't interested. They
 don't care."
  "There _has_ to be a catch!"
  "There's kind of one," Frank admitted.
  "I knew it!" I began to shrink from my _vin-dit_. "What is
 it? What's the catch?"
  "Well, it isn't really a catch, because you don't have to do
 it, if you don't want to. It _would_ be a good idea, though."
  "Let's hear this great idea."
  "Well, if you're going to be President, I think you really
 ought to marry Mona. But you don't have to, if you don't want to.
 You're the boss."
  "She would _have_ me?"
  "If she'd have me, she'd have you. All you have to do is ask
 her." 
  "Why should she say yes?"
  "It's predicted in _The Books of Bokonon_ that she'll marry
 the next President of San Lorenzo," said Frank.
 Mona 91
  Frank brought Mona to her father's cave and left us alone. We
 had difficulty in speaking at first. I was shy. Her gown was
 diaphanous. Her gown was azure. It was a simple gown, caught
 lightly at the waist by a gossamer thread. All else was shaped by
 Mona herself. Her breasts were like pomegranates or what you will,
 but like nothing so much as a young woman's breasts.
  Her feet were all but bare. Her toenails were exquisitely
 manicured. Her scanty sandals were gold.
  "How--how do you do?" I asked. My heart was pounding. Blood
 boiled in my ears.
  "It is not possible to make a mistake," she assured me. I did
 not know that this was a customary greeting given by all
 Bokononists when meeting a shy person. So, I responded with a
 feverish discussion of whether it was possible to make a mistake
 or not.
  "My God, you have no idea how many mistakes I've already
 made. You're looking at the world's champion mistake-maker," I
 blurted--and so on. "Do you have any idea what Frank just said to
 me?"
  "About _me?_"
  "About everything, but _especially_ about you."
  "He told you that you could have me, if you wanted."
  "Yes."
  "That's true."
  "I--I--I . . ."
  "Yes?"
  "I don't know what to say next."
  "_Boko-maru_ would help," she suggested.
  "What?"
  "Take off your shoes," she commanded. And she removed her
 sandals with the utmost grace. 
  I am a man of the world, having had, by a reckoning I once
 made, more than fifty-three women. I can say that I have seen
 women undress themselves in every way that it can be done. I have
 watched the curtains part in every variation of the final act.
  And yet, the one woman who made me groan involuntarily did no
 more than remove her sandals.
  I tried to untie my shoes. No bridegroom ever did worse. I
 got one shoe off, but knotted the other one tight. I tore a
 thumbnail on the knot; finally ripped off the shoe without untying
 it.
  Then off came my socks.
  Mona was already sitting on the floor, her legs extended, her
 round arms thrust behind her for support, her head tilted back,
 her eyes closed.
  It was up to me now to complete my first--my first--my first,
 Great God . . .
  _Boko-maru_.
 On the Poet's Celebration of His First Boko-maru 92
  These are not Bokonon's words. They are mine.
  Sweet wraith,
  Invisible mist of . . .
  I am--
  My soul--
  Wraith lovesick o'erlong,
  O'erlong alone:
  Wouldst another sweet soul meet?
  Long have I
  Advised thee ill
  As to where two souls
  Might tryst.
  My soles, my soles!
  My soul, my soul,
  Go there,
  Sweet soul;
  Be kissed. 
  Mmmmmmm.
 How I Almost Lost My Mona 93
  "Do you find it easier to talk to me now?" Mona inquired.
  "As though I'd known you for a thousand years," I confessed.
 I felt like crying. "I love you, Mona."
  "I love you." She said it simply.
  "What a fool Frank was!"
  "Oh?"
  "To give you up."
  "He did not love me. He was going to marry me only because
 'Papa' wanted him to. He loves another."
  "Who?"
  "A woman he knew in Ilium."
  The lucky woman had to be the wife of the owner of Jack's
 Hobby Shop. "He told you?"
  "Tonight, when he freed me to marry you."
  "Mona?"
  "Yes?"
  "Is--is there anyone else in your life?"
  She was puzzled. "Many," she said at last.
  "That you _love?_"
  "I love everyone."
  "As--as much as me?"
  "Yes." She seemed to have no idea that this might bother me.
  I got off the floor, sat in a chair, and started putting my
 shoes and socks back on.
  "I suppose you--you perform--you do what we just did with--
 with other people?"
  "_Boko-maru?_"
  "_Boko-maru_."
  "Of course."
  "I don't want you to do it with anybody but me from now on,"
 I declared.
  Tears filled her eyes. She adored her promiscuity; was
 angered that I should try to make her feel shame. "I make people
 happy. Love is good, not bad." 
  "As your husband, I'll want all your love for myself."
  She stared at me with widening eyes. "A _sin-wat!_"
  "What was that?"
  "A _sin-wat!_" she cried. "A man who wants all of somebody's
 love. That's very bad."
  "In the case of marriage, I think it's a very good thing.
 It's the only thing."
  She was still on the floor, and I, now with my shoes and
 socks back on, was standing. I felt very tall, though I'm not very
 tall; and I felt very strong, though I'm not very strong; and I
 was a respectful stranger to my own voice. My voice had a metallic
 authority that was new.
  As I went on talking in ball-peen tones, it dawned on me what
 was happening, what was happening already. I was already starting
 to rule.
  I told Mona that I had seen her performing a sort of vertical
 _boko-maru_ with a pilot on the reviewing stand shortly after my
 arrival. "You are to have nothing more to do with him," I told
 her. "What is his name?"
  "I don't even know," she whispered. She was looking down now.
  "And what about young Philip Castle?"
  "You mean _boko-maru?_"
  "I mean anything and everything. As I understand it, you two
 grew up together."
  "Yes."
  "Bokonon tutored you both?"
  "Yes." The recollection made her radiant again.
  "I suppose there was plenty of _boko-maruing_ in those days."
  "Oh, yes!" she said happily.
  "You aren't to see him any more, either. Is that clear?"
  "No."
  "No?"
  "I will not marry a _sin-wat_." She stood. "Good-bye."
  "Good-bye?" I was crushed.
  "Bokonon tells us it is very wrong not to love everyone
 exactly the same. What does _your_ religion say?"
  "I--I don't have one."
  "I _do_."
  I had stopped ruling. "I see you do," I said.
  "Good-bye, man-with-no-religion." She went to the stone
 staircase.
  "Mona . . ."
  She stopped. "Yes?"
  "Could I have your religion, if I wanted it?"
  "Of course."
  "I want it."
  "Good. I love you." 
  "And I love you," I sighed.
 The Highest Mountain 94
  So I became betrothed at dawn to the most beautiful woman in
 the world. And I agreed to become the next President of San
 Lorenzo.
  "Papa" wasn't dead yet, and it was Frank's feeling that I
 should get "Papa's" blessing, if possible. So, as _Borasisi_, the
 sun, came up, Frank and I drove to "Papa's" castle in a Jeep we
 commandeered from the troops guarding the next President.
  Mona stayed at Frank's. I kissed her sacredly, and she went
 to sacred sleep.
  Over the mountains Frank and I went, through groves of wild
 coffee trees, with the flamboyant sunrise on our right.
  It was in the sunrise that the cetacean majesty of the
 highest mountain on the island, of Mount McCabe, made itself known
 to me. It was a fearful hump, a blue whale, with one queer stone
 plug on its back for a peak. In scale with a whale, the plug might
 have been the stump of a snapped harpoon, and it seemed so
 unrelated to the rest of the mountain that I asked Frank if it had
 been built by men.
  He told me that it was a natural formation. Moreover, he
 declared that no man, as far as he knew, had ever been to the top
 of Mount McCabe.
  "It _doesn't_ look very tough to climb," I commented. Save
 for the plug at the top, the mountain presented inclines no more
 forbidding than courthouse steps. And the plug itself, from a
 distance at any rate, seemed conveniently laced with ramps and
 ledges.
  "Is it sacred or something?" I asked.
  "Maybe it was once. But not since Bokonon."
  "Then why hasn't anybody climbed it?"
  "Nobody's felt like it yet."
  "Maybe I'll climb it."
  "Go ahead. Nobody's stopping you."
  We rode in silence.
  "What _is_ sacred to Bokononists?" I asked after a while. 
  "Not even God, as near as I can tell."
  "Nothing?"
  "Just one thing."
  I made some guesses. "The ocean? The sun?"
  "Man," said Frank. "That's all. Just man."
 I See the Hook 95
  We came at last to the castle.
  It was low and black and cruel.
  Antique cannons still lolled on the battlements. Vines and
 bird nests clogged the crenels, the machicolations, and the
 balistrariae.
  Its parapets to the north were continuous with the scarp of a
 monstrous precipice that fell six hundred feet straight down to
 the lukewarm sea.
  It posed the question posed by all such stone piles: how had
 puny men moved stones so big? And, like all such stone piles, it
 answered the question itself. Dumb terror had moved those stones
 so big.
  The castle was built according to the wish of Tum-bumwa,
 Emperor of San Lorenzo, a demented man, an escaped slave. Tumbumwa
 was said to have found its design in a child's picture book.
  A gory book it must have been.
  Just before we reached the palace gate the ruts carried us
 through a rustic arch made of two telephone poles and a beam that
 spanned them.
  Hanging from the middle of the beam was a huge iron hook.
 There was a sign impaled on the hook.
  "This hook," the sign proclaimed, "is reserved for Bokonon
 himself."
  I turned to look at the hook again, and that thing of sharp
 iron communicated to me that I really was going to rule. I would
 chop down the hook!
  And I flattered myself that I was going to be a firm, just,
 and kindly ruler, and that my people would prosper.
  Fata Morgana.
  Mirage! 
 Bell, Book, and Chicken in a Hatbox 96
  Frank and I couldn't get right in to see "Papa." Dr.
 Schlichter von Koenigswald, the physician in attendance, muttered
 that we would have to wait about half an hour. So Frank and I
 waited in the anteroom of "Papa's" suite, a room without windows.
 The room was thirty feet square, furnished with several rugged
 benches and a card table. The card table supported an electric
 fan. The walls were stone. There were no pictures, no decorations
 of any sort on the walls.
  There were iron rings fixed to the wall, however, seven feet
 off the floor and at intervals of six feet. I asked Frank if the
 room had ever been a torture chamber.
  He told me that it had, and that the manhole cover on which I
 stood was the lid of an oubliette.
  There was a listless guard in the anteroom. There was also a
 Christian minister, who was ready to take care of "Papa's"
 spiritual needs as they arose. He had a brass dinner bell and a
 hatbox with holes drilled in it, and a Bible, and a butcher knife-
 -all laid out on the bench beside him.
  He told me there was a live chicken in the hatbox. The
 chicken was quiet, he said, because he had fed it tranquilizers.
  Like all San Lorenzans past the age of twenty-five, he looked
 at least sixty. He told me that his name was Dr. Vox Humana, that
 he was named after an organ stop that had struck his mother when
 San Lorenzo Cathedral was dynamited in 1923. His father, he told
 me without shame, was unknown.
  I asked him what particular Christian sect he represented,
 and I observed frankly that the chicken and the butcher knife were
 novelties insofar as my understanding of Christianity went.
  "The bell," I commented, "I can understand how that might fit
 in nicely."
  He turned out to be an intelligent man. His doctorate, which
 he invited me to examine, was awarded by the Western Hemisphere
 University of the Bible of Little Rock, Arkansas. He made contact
 with the University through a classified ad in _Popular
 Mechanics_, he told me. He said that the motto of the University 
 had become his own, and that it explained the chicken and the
 butcher knife. The motto of the University was this:
  MAKE RELIGION LIVE!
  He said that he had had to feel his way along with
 Christianity, since Catholicism and Protestantism had been
 outlawed along with Bokononism.
  "So, if I am going to be a Christian under those conditions,
 I have to make up a lot of new stuff."
  "_Zo_," he said in dialect, "_yeff jy bam gong be Kret-yeen
 hooner yoze kon-steez-yen, jy hap my yup oon lot nee stopf_."
  Dr. Schlichter von Koenigswald now came out of "Papa's"
 suite, looking very German, very tired. "You can see 'Papa' now."
  "We'll be careful not to tire him," Frank promised.
  "If you could kill him," said Von Koenigswald, "I think he'd
 be grateful."
 The Stinking Christian 97
  "Papa" Monzano and his merciless disease were in a bed that
 was made of a golden dinghy--tiller, painter, oarlocks and all,
 all gilt. His bed was the lifeboat of Bokonon's old schooner, the
 _Lady's Slipper_; it was the lifeboat of the ship that had brought
 Bokonon and Corporal McCabe to San Lorenzo so long ago.
  The walls of the room were white. But "Papa" radiated pain so
 hot and bright that the walls seemed bathed in angry red.
  He was stripped from the waist up, and, his glistening belly
 wall was knotted. His belly shivered like a luffing sail.
  Around his neck hung a chain with a cylinder the size of a
 rifle cartridge for a pendant. I supposed that the cylinder
 contained some magic charm. I was mistaken. It contained a
 splinter of _ice-nine_.
  "Papa" could hardly speak. His teeth chattered and his
 breathing was beyond control. 
  "Papa's" agonized head was at the bow of the dinghy, bent
 back.
  Mona's xylophone was near the bed. She had apparently tried
 to soothe "Papa" with music the previous evening.
  "'Papa'?" whispered Frank.
  "Good-bye," "Papa" gasped. His eyes were bugging, sightless.
  "I brought a friend."
  "Good-bye."
  "He's going to be the next President of San Lorenzo. He'll be
 a much better President than I could be."
  "Ice!" "Papa" whimpered.
  "He asks for ice," said Von Koenigswald. "When we bring it,
 he does not want it."
  "Papa" rolled his eyes. He relaxed his neck, took the weight
 of his body from the crown of his head. And then he arched his
 neck again. "Does not matter," he said, "who is President of . .
 ." He did not finish.
  I finished for him. "San Lorenzo?"
  "San Lorenzo," he agreed. He managed a crooked smile. "Good
 luck!" he croaked.
  "Thank you, sir," I said.
  "Doesn't matter! Bokonon. Get Bokonon."
  I attempted a sophisticated reply to this last. I remembered
 that, for the joy of the people, Bokonon was always to be chased,
 was never to be caught. "I will get him."
  "Tell him . . ."
  I leaned closer, in order to hear the message from "Papa" to
 Bokonon.
  "Tell him I am sorry I did not kill him," said "Papa."
  "I will."
  "_You_ kill him."
  "Yessir."
  "Papa" gained control enough of his voice to make it
 commanding. "I mean _really!_"
  I said nothing to that. I was not eager to kill anyone.
  "He teaches the people lies and lies and lies. Kill him and
 teach the people truth."
  "Yessir."
  "You and Hoenikker, you teach them science."
  "Yessir, we will," I promised.
  "Science is magic that _works_."
  He fell silent, relaxed, closed his eyes. And then he
 whispered, "Last rites."
  Von Koenigswald called Dr. Vox Humana in. Dr. Humana took his
 tranquilized chicken out of the hatbox, preparing to administer
 Christian last rites as he understood them. 
  "Papa" opened one eye. "Not you," he sneered at Dr. Humana.
 "Get out!"
  "Sir?" asked Dr. Humana.
  "I am a member of the Bokononist faith," "Papa" wheezed. "Get
 out, you stinking Christian."
 Last Rites 98
  So I was privileged to see the last rites of the Bokononist
 faith.
  We made an effort to find someone among the soldiers and the
 household staff who would admit that he knew the rites and would
 give them to "Papa." We got no volunteers. That was hardly
 surprising, with a hook and an oubliette so near.
  So Dr. von Koenigswald said that he would have a go at the
 job. He had never administered the rites before, but he had seen
 Julian Castle do it hundreds of times.
  "Are you a Bokononist?" I asked him.
  "I agree with one Bokononist idea. I agree that all
 religions, including Bokononism, are nothing but lies."
  "Will this bother you as a scientist," I inquired, "to go
 through a ritual like this?"
  "I am a very bad scientist. I will do anything to make a
 human being feel better, even if it's unscientific. No scientist
 worthy of the name could say such a thing."
  And he climbed into the golden boat with "Papa." He sat in
 the stern. Cramped quarters obliged him to have the golden tiller
 under one arm.
  He wore sandals without socks, and he took these off. And
 then he rolled back the covers at the foot of the bed, exposing
 "Papa's" bare feet. He put the soles of his feet against "Papa's"
 feet, assuming the classical position for _boko-maru_. 
 Dyot meet mat 99
  "_Gott mate mutt_," crooned Dr. von Koenigswald.
  "_Dyot meet mat_," echoed "Papa" Monzano.
  "God made mud," was what they'd said, each in his own
 dialect. I will here abandon the dialects of the litany.
  "God got lonesome," said Von Koenigswald.
  "God got lonesome."
  "So God said to some of the mud, 'Sit up!'"
  "So God said to some of the mud, 'Sit up!'"
  "'See all I've made,' said God, 'the hills, the sea, the sky,
 the stars.'
  "'See all I've made,' said God, 'the hills, the sea, the sky,
 the stars.'"
  "And I was some of the mud that got to sit up and look
 around."
  "And I was some of the mud that got to sit up and look
 around."
  "Lucky me; lucky mud."
  "Lucky me, lucky mud." Tears were streaming down "Papa's"
 cheeks.
  "I, mud, sat up and saw what a nice job God had done."
  "I, mud, sat up and saw what a nice job God had done."
  "Nice going, God!"
  "Nice going, God!" "Papa" said it with all his heart.
  "Nobody but You could have done it, God! I certainly couldn't
 have."
  "Nobody but You could have done it, God! I certainly couldn't
 have."
  "I feel very unimportant compared to You."
  "I feel very unimportant compared to You."
  "The only way I can feel the least bit important is to think
 of all the mud that didn't even get to sit up and look around."
  "The only way I can feel the least bit important is to think
 of all the mud that didn't even get to sit up and look around."
  "I got so much, and most mud got so little."
  "I got so much, and most mud got so little."
  "_Deng you vore da on-oh!_" cried Von Koenigswald.
  "_Tz-yenk voo vore lo yon-yo!_" wheezed "Papa."
  What they had said was, "Thank you for the honor!"
  "Now mud lies down again and goes to sleep."
  "Now mud lies down again and goes to sleep."
  "What memories for mud to have!"
  "What memories for mud to have!" 
  "What interesting other kinds of sitting-up mud I met!"
  "What interesting other kinds of sitting-up mud I met!"
  "I loved everything I saw!"
  "I loved everything I saw!"
  "Good night."
  "Good night."
  "I will go to heaven now."
  "I will go to heaven now."
  "I can hardly wait . . ."
  "I can hardly wait . . ."
  "To find out for certain what my _wampeter_ was . . ."
  "To find out for certain what my _wampeter_ was . . ."
  "And who was in my _karass_ . . ."
  "And who was in my _karass_ . . ."
  "And all the good things our _karass_ did for you."
  "And all the good things our _karass_ did for you."
  "Amen."
  "Amen."
 Down the Oubliette Goes Frank 100
  But "Papa" didn't die and go to heaven--not then. I asked
 Frank how we might best time the announcement of my elevation to
 the Presidency. He was no help, had no ideas; he left it all up to
 me.
  "I thought you were going to back me up," I complained.
  "As far as anything _technical_ goes." Frank was prim about
 it. I wasn't to violate his integrity as a technician; wasn't to
 make him exceed the limits of his job.
  "I see."
  "However you want to handle people is all right with me.
 That's _your_ responsibility."
  This abrupt abdication of Frank from all human affairs
 shocked and angered me, and I said to him, meaning to be
 satirical, "You mind telling me what, in a purely technical way,
 is planned for this day of days?"
  I got a strictly technical reply. "Repair the power plant and
 stage an air show." 
  "Good! So one of my first triumphs as President will be to
 restore electricity to my people."
  Frank didn't see anything funny in that. He gave me a salute.
 "I'll try, sir. I'll do my best for you, sir. I can't guarantee
 how long it'll be before we get juice back."
  "That's what I want--a juicy country."
  "I'll do my best, sir." Frank saluted me again.
  "And the air show?" I asked. "What's that?"
  I got another wooden reply. "At one o'clock this afternoon,
 sir, six planes of the San Lorenzan Air Force will fly past the
 palace here and shoot at targets in the water. It's part of the
 celebration of the Day of the Hundred Martyrs to Democracy. The
 American Ambassador also plans to throw a wreath into the sea."
  So I decided, tentatively, that I would have Frank announce
 my apotheosis immediately following the wreath ceremony and the
 air show.
  "What do you think of that?" I said to Frank.
  "You're the boss, sir."
  "I think I'd better have a speech ready," I said. "And there
 should be some sort of swearing-in, to make it look dignified,
 official."
  "You're the boss, sir." Each time he said those words they
 seemed to come from farther away, as though Frank were descending
 the rungs of a ladder into a deep shaft, while I was obliged to
 remain above.
  And I realized with chagrin that my agreeing to be boss had
 freed Frank to do what he wanted to do more than anything else, to
 do what his father had done: to receive honors and creature
 comforts while escaping human responsibilities. He was
 accomplishing this by going down a spiritual oubliette.
 Like My Predecesors, I Outlaw Bokonon 101
  So I wrote my speech in a round, bare room at the foot of a
 tower. There was a table and a chair. And the speech I wrote was
 round and bare and sparsely furnished, too.
  It was hopeful. It was humble. 
  And I found it impossible not to lean on God. I had never
 needed such support before, and so had never believed that such
 support was available.
  Now, I found that I had to believe in it--and I did.
  In addition, I would need the help of people. I called for a
 list of the guests who were to be at the ceremonies and found that
 Julian Castle and his son had not been invited. I sent messengers
 to invite them at once, since they knew more about my people than
 anyone, with the exception of Bokonon.
  As for Bokonon:
  I pondered asking him to join my government, thus bringing
 about a sort of millennium for my people. And I thought of
 ordering that the awful hook outside the palace gate be taken down
 at once, amidst great rejoicing.
  But then I understood that a millennium would have to offer
 something more than a holy man in a position of power, that there
 would have to be plenty of good things for all to eat, too, and
 nice places to live for all, and good schools and good health and
 good times for all, and work for all who wanted it--things Bokonon
 and I were in no position to provide.
  So good and evil had to remain separate; good in the jungle,
 and evil in the palace. Whatever entertainment there was in that
 was about all we had to give the people.
  There was a knock on my door. A servant told me the guests
 had begun to arrive.
  So I put my speech in my pocket and I mounted the spiral
 staircase in my tower. I arrived at the uppermost battlement of my
 castle, and I looked out at my guests, my servants, my cliff, and
 my lukewarm sea.
 Enemies of Freedom 102
  When I think of all those people on my uppermost battlement,
 I think of Bokonon's "hundred-and-nineteenth Calypso," wherein he
 invites us to sing along with him:
  "Where's my good old gang done gone?" 
  I heard a sad man say.
  I whispered in that sad man's ear,
  "Your gang's done gone away."
  Present were Ambassador Horlick Minton and his lady; H. Lowe
 Crosby, the bicycle manufacturer, and his Hazel; Dr. Julian
 Castle, humanitarian and philanthropist, and his son Philip,
 author and innkeeper; little Newton Hoenikker, the picture
 painter, and his musical sister, Mrs. Harrison C. Conners; my
 heavenly Mona; Major General Franklin Hoenikker; and twenty
 assorted San Lorenzo bureaucrats and military men.
  Dead--almost all dead now.
  As Bokonon tells us, "It is never a mistake to say goodbye."
  There was a buffet on my battlements, a buffet burdened with
 native delicacies: roasted warblers in little overcoats made of
 their own blue-green feathers; lavender land crabs taken from
 their shells, minced, fried in coconut oil, and returned to their
 shells; fingerling barracuda stuffed with banana paste; and, on
 unleavened, unseasoned cornmeal wafers, bite-sized cubes of boiled
 albatross.
  The albatross, I was told, had been shot from the very
 bartizan in which the buffet stood. There were two beverages
 offered, both un-iced: Pepsi-Cola and native rum. The Pepsi-Cola
 was served in plastic Pilseners. The rum was served in coconut
 shells. I was unable to identify the sweet bouquet of the rum,
 though it somehow reminded me of early adolescence.
  Frank was able to name the bouquet for me. "Acetone."
  "Acetone?"
  "Used in model-airplane cement."
  I did not drink the rum.
  Ambassador Minton did a lot of ambassadorial, gourmand
 saluting with his coconut, pretending to love all men and all the
 beverages that sustained them. But I did not see him drink. He had
 with him, incidentally, a piece of luggage of a sort I had never
 seen before. It looked like a French horn case, and proved to
 contain the memorial wreath that was to be cast into the sea.
  The only person I saw drink the rum was H. Lowe Crosby, who
 plainly had no sense of smell. He was having a good time, drinking
 acetone from his coconut, sitting on a cannon, blocking the
 touchhole with his big behind. He was looking out to sea through a
 huge pair of Japanese binoculars. He was looking at targets
 mounted on bobbing floats anchored offshore.
  The targets were cardboard cutouts shaped like men.
  They were to be fired upon and bombed in a demonstration of
 might by the six planes of the San Lorenzan Air Force. 
  Each target was a caricature of some real person, and the
 name of that person was painted on the targets' back and front.
  I asked who the caricaturist was and learned that he was Dr.
 Vox Humana, the Christian minister. He was at my elbow.
  "I didn't know you were talented in that direction, too."
  "Oh, yes. When I was a young man, I had a very hard time
 deciding what to be."
  "I think the choice you made was the right one."
  "I prayed for guidance from Above."
  "You got it."
  H. Lowe Crosby handed his binoculars to his wife. "There's
 old Joe Stalin, closest in, and old Fidel Castro's anchored right
 next to him."
  "And there's old Hitler," chuckled Hazel, delighted. "And
 there's old Mussolini and some old Jap."
  "And there's old Karl Marx."
  "And there's old Kaiser Bill, spiked hat and all," cooed
 Hazel. "I never expected to see _him_ again."
  "And there's old Mao. You see old Mao?"
  "Isn't _he_ gonna get it?" asked Hazel. "Isn't _he_ gonna get
 the surprise of his life? This sure is a cute idea."
  "They got practically every enemy that freedom, ever had out
 there," H. Lowe Crosby declared.
 A Medical Opinion on the 103
 Effects of a Writers' Strike
  None of the guests knew yet that I was to be President. None
 knew how close to death "Papa" was. Frank gave out the official
 word that "Papa" was resting comfortably, that "Papa" sent his
 best wishes to all.
  The order of events, as announced by Frank, was that
 Ambassador Minton would throw his wreath into the sea, in honor of
 the Hundred Martyrs; and then the airplanes would shoot the
 targets in the sea; and then he, Frank, would say a few words.
  He did not tell the company that, following his speech, there
 would be a speech by me. 
  So I was treated as nothing more than a visiting journalist,
 and I engaged in harmless _granfalloonery_ here and there.
  "Hello, Mom," I said to Hazel Crosby.
  "Why, if it isn't my boy!" Hazel gave me a perfumed hug, and
 she told everybody, "This boy's a Hoosier!"
  The Castles, father and son, stood separate from the rest of
 the company. Long unwelcome at "Papa's" palace, they were curious
 as to why they had now been invited there.
  Young Castle called me "Scoop." "Good morning, Scoop. What's
 new in the word game?"
  "I might ask the same of you," I replied.
  "I'm thinking of calling a general strike of all writers
 until mankind finally comes to its senses. Would you support it?"
  "Do writers have a right to strike? That would be like the
 police or the firemen walking out."
  "Or the college professors."
  "Or the college professors," I agreed. I shook my head. "No,
 I don't think my conscience would let me support a strike like
 that. When a man becomes a writer, I think he takes on a sacred
 obligation to produce beauty and enlightenment and comfort at top
 speed."
  "I just can't help thinking what a real shaking up it would
 give people if, all of a sudden, there were no new books, new
 plays, new histories, new poems . . ."
  "And how proud would you be when people started dying like
 flies?" I demanded.
  "They'd die more like mad dogs, I think--snarling and
 snapping at each other and biting their own tails."
  I turned to Castle the elder. "Sir, how does a man die when
 he's deprived of the consolations of literature?"
  "In one of two ways," he said, "petrescence of the heart or
 atrophy of the nervous system."
  "Neither one very pleasant, I expect," I suggested.
  "No," said Castle the elder. "For the love of God, _both_ of
 you, _please_ keep writing!"
 Sulfathiazole 104 
  My heavenly Mona did not approach me and did not encourage me
 with languishing glances to come to her side. She made a hostess
 of herself, introducing Angela and little Newt to San Lorenzans.
  As I ponder now the meaning of that girl--recall her
 indifference to "Papa's" collapse, to her betrothal to me-- I
 vacillate between lofty and cheap appraisals.
  Did she represent the highest form of female spirituality?
  Or was she anesthetized, frigid--a cold fish, in fact, a
 dazed addict of the xylophone, the cult of beauty, and _bokomaru?_
 
  I shall never know.
  Bokonon tells us:
  A lover's a liar,
  To himself he lies.
  The truthful are loveless,
  Like oysters their eyes!
  So my instructions are clear, I suppose. I am to remember my
 Mona as having been sublime.
  "Tell me," I appealed to young Philip Castle on the Day of
 the Hundred Martyrs to Democracy, "have you spoken to your friend
 and admirer, H. Lowe Crosby, today?"
  "He didn't recognize me with a suit and shoes and necktie
 on," young Castle replied. "We've already had a nice talk about
 bicycles. We may have another."
  I found that I was no longer amused by Crosby's wanting to
 build bicycles in San Lorenzo. As chief executive of the island I
 wanted a bicycle factory very much. I developed sudden respect for
 what H. Lowe Crosby was and could do.
  "How do you think the people of San Lorenzo would take to
 industrialization?" I asked the Castles, father and son.
  "The people of San Lorenzo," the father told me, "are
 interested in only three things: fishing, fornication, and
 Bokononism."
  "Don't you think they could be interested in progress?"
  "They've seen some of it. There's only one aspect of progress
 that really excites them."
  "What's that?"
  "The electric guitar."
  I excused myself and I rejoined the Crosbys.
  Frank Hoenikker was with them, explaining who Bokonon was and
 what he was against. "He's against science."
  "How can anybody in his right mind be against science?" asked
 Crosby. 
  "I'd be dead now if it wasn't for penicillin," said Hazel.
 "And so would my mother."
  "How old _is_ your mother?" I inquired.
  "A hundred and six. Isn't that wonderful?"
  "It certainly is," I agreed.
  "And I'd be a widow, too, if it wasn't for the medicine they
 gave my husband that time," said Hazel. She had to ask her husband
 the name of the medicine. "Honey, what was the name of that stuff
 that saved your life that time?"
  "Sulfathiazole."
  And I made the mistake of taking an albatross canape from a
 passing tray.
 Pain-killer 105
  As it happened--"As it was _supposed_ to happen," Bokonon
 would say--albatross meat disagreed with me so violently that I
 was ill the moment I'd choked the first piece down. I was
 compelled to canter down the stone spiral staircase in search of a
 bathroom. I availed myself of one adjacent to "Papa's" suite.
  When I shuffled out, somewhat relieved, I was met by Dr.
 Schlichter von Koenigswald, who was bounding from "Papa's"
 bedroom. He had a wild look, and he took me by the arms and he
 cried, "What is it? What was it he had hanging around his neck?"
  "I beg your pardon?"
  "He took it! Whatever was in that cylinder, 'Papa' took--and
 now he's dead."
  I remembered the cylinder "Papa" had hung around his neck,
 and I made an obvious guess as to its contents. "Cyanide?"
  "Cyanide? Cyanide turns a man to cement in a second?"
  "Cement?"
  "Marble! Iron! I have never seen such a rigid corpse before.
 Strike it anywhere and you get a note like a marimba! Come look!"
 Von Koenigswald hustled me into "Papa's" bedroom.
  In bed, in the golden dinghy, was a hideous thing to see.
 "Papa" was dead, but his was not a corpse to which one could say,
 "At rest at last." 
  'Papa's" head was bent back as far as it would go. His weight
 rested on the crown of his head and the soles of his feet, with
 the rest of his body forming a bridge whose arch thrust toward the
 ceiling. He was shaped like an andiron.
  That he had died of the contents of the cylinder around his
 neck was obvious. One hand held the cylinder and the cylinder was
 uncapped. And the thumb and index finger of the other hand, as
 though having just released a little pinch of something, were
 stuck between his teeth.
  Dr. von Koenigswald slipped the tholepin of an oarlock from
 its socket in the gunwale of the gilded dinghy. He tapped "Papa"
 on his belly with the steel oarlock, and "Papa" really did make a
 sound like a marimba.
  And "Papa's" lips and nostrils and eyeballs were glazed with
 a blue-white frost.
  Such a syndrome is no novelty now, God knows. But it
 certainly was then. "Papa" Monzano was the first man in history to
 die of _ice-nine_.
  I record that fact for whatever it may be worth. "Write it
 all down," Bokonon tells us. He is really telling us, of course,
 how futile it is to write or read histories. "Without accurate
 records of the past, how can men and women be expected to avoid
 making serious mistakes in the future?" he asks ironically.
  So, again: "Papa" Monzano was the first man in history to die
 of _ice-nine_.
 What Bokononists Say 106
 When They Commit Suicide
  Dr. von Koenigswald, the humanitarian with the terrible
 deficit of Auschwitz in his kindliness account, was the second to
 die of _ice-nine_.
  He was talking about rigor mortis, a subject I had
 introduced.
  "Rigor mortis does not set in in seconds," he declared. "I
 turned my back to 'Papa' for just a moment. He was raving . . ."
  "What about?" I asked. 
  "Pain, ice, Mona--everything. And then 'Papa' said, 'Now I
 will destroy the whole world.'"
  "What did he mean by that?"
  "It's what Bokononists always say when they are about to
 commit suicide." Von Koenigswald went to a basin of water, meaning
 to wash his hands. "When I turned to look at him," he told me, his
 hands poised over the water, "he was dead--as hard as a statue,
 just as you see him. I brushed my fingers over his lips. They
 looked so peculiar."
  He put his hands into the water. "What chemical could
 possibly . . ." The question trailed off.
  Von Koenigswald raised his hands, and the water in the basin
 came with them. It was no longer water, but a hemisphere of _icenine_.
 
  Von Koenigswald touched the tip of his tongue to the bluewhite
 mystery.
  Frost bloomed on his lips. He froze solid, tottered, and
 crashed.
  The blue-white hemisphere shattered. Chunks skittered over
 the floor.
  I went to the door and bawled for help.
  Soldiers and servants came running.
  I ordered them to bring Frank and Newt and Angela to "Papa's"
 room at once.
  At last I had seen _ice-nine!_
 Feast Your Eyes! 101
  I let the three children of Dr. Felix Hoenikker into "Papa"
 Monzano's bedroom. I closed the door and put my back to it. My
 mood was bitter and grand. I knew _ice-nine_ for what it was. I
 had seen it often in my dreams.
  There could be no doubt that Frank had given "Papa" _icenine_.
 And it seemed certain that if _ice-nine_ were Frank's to
 give, then it was Angela's and little Newt's to give, too.
  So I snarled at all three, calling them to account for
 monstrous criminality. I told them that the jig was up, that I
 knew about them and _ice-nine_. I tried to alarm them about _ice-
 nine's_ being a means to ending life on earth. I was so impressive
 that they never thought to ask how I knew about _ice-nine_.
  "Feast your eyes!" I said.
  Well, as Bokonon tells us: "God never wrote a good play in
 His Life." The scene in "Papa's" room did not lack for spectacular
 issues and props, and my opening speech was the right one.
  But the first reply from a Hoenikker destroyed all
 magnificence.
  Little Newt threw up.
 Frank Tells Us What to Do 108
  And then we all wanted to throw up.
  Newt certainly did what was called for.
  "I couldn't agree more," I told Newt. And I snarled at Angela
 and Frank, "Now that we've got Newt's opinion, I'd like to hear
 what you two have to say."
  "Uck," said Angela, cringing, her tongue out. She was the
 color of putty.
  "Are those your sentiments, too?" I asked Frank. "'Uck?'
 General, is that what you say?"
  Frank had his teeth bared, and his teeth were clenched, and
 he was breathing shallowly and whistlingly between them.
  "Like the dog," murmured little Newt, looking down at Von
 Koenigswald.
  "What dog?"
  Newt whispered his answer, and there was scarcely any wind
 behind the whisper. But such were the acoustics of the stonewalled
 room that we all heard the whisper as clearly as we would have
 heard the chiming of a crystal bell.
  "Christmas Eve, when Father died."
  Newt was talking to himself. And, when I asked him to tell me
 about the dog on the night his father died, he looked up at me as
 though I had intruded on a dream. He found me irrelevant.
  His brother and sister, however, belonged in the dream. And
 he talked to his brother in that nightmare; told Frank, "You gave
 it to him. 
  "That's how you got this fancy job, isn't it?" Newt asked
 Frank wonderingly. "What did you tell him--that you had something
 better than the hydrogen bomb?"
  Frank didn't acknowledge the question. He was looking around
 the room intently, taking it all in. He unclenched his teeth, and
 he made them click rapidly, blinking his eyes with every click.
 His color was coming back. This is what he said.
  "Listen, we've got to clean up this mess."
 Frank Defends Himself 109
  "General," I told Frank, "that must be one of the most cogent
 statements made by a major general this year. As my technical
 advisor, how do you recommend that _we_, as you put it so well,
 'clean up this mess'?"
  Frank gave me a straight answer. He snapped his fingers. I
 could see him dissociating himself from the causes of the mess;
 identifying himself, with growing pride and energy, with the
 purifiers, the world-savers, the cleaners-up.
  "Brooms, dustpans, blowtorch, hot plate, buckets," he
 commanded, snapping, snapping, snapping his fingers.
  "You propose applying a blowtorch to the bodies?" I asked.
  Frank was so charged with technical thinking now that he was
 practically tap dancing to the music of his fingers. "We'll sweep
 up the big pieces on the floor, melt them in a bucket on a hot
 plate. Then we'll go over every square inch of floor with a
 blowtorch, in case there are any microscopic crystals. What we'll
 do with the bodies--and the bed . . ." He had to think some more.
  "A funeral pyre!" he cried, really pleased with himself.
 "I'll have a great big funeral pyre built out by the hook, and
 we'll have the bodies and the bed carried out and thrown on."
  He started to leave, to order the pyre built and to get the
 things we needed in order to clean up the room.
  Angela stopped him. "How _could_ you?" she wanted to know.
  Frank gave her a glassy smile. "Everything's going to be all
 right."
  "How _could_ you give it to a man like 'Papa' Monzano?"
 Angela asked him. 
  "Let's clean up the mess first; then we can talk."
  Angela had him by the arms, and she wouldn't let him go. "How
 _could_ you!" She shook him.
  Frank pried his sister's hands from himself. His glassy smile
 went away and he turned sneeringly nasty for a moment--a moment in
 which he told her with all possible contempt, "I bought myself a
 job, just the way you bought yourself a tomcat husband, just the
 way Newt bought himself a week on Cape Cod with a Russian midget!"
  The glassy smile returned.
  Frank left; and he slammed the door.
 The Fourteenth Book 110
  "Sometimes the _pool-pah_," Bokonon tells us, "exceeds the
 power of humans to comment." Bokonon translates _pool-pah_ at one
 point in _The Books of Bokonon_ as "shit storm" and at another
 point as "wrath of God."
  From what Frank had said before he slammed the door, I
 gathered that the Republic of San Lorenzo and the three Hoenikkers
 weren't the only ones who had _ice-nine_. Apparently the United
 States of America and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics had
 it, too. The United States had obtained it through Angela's
 husband, whose plant in Indianapolis was understandably surrounded
 by electrified fences and homicidal German shepherds. And Soviet
 Russia had come by it through Newt's little Zinka, that winsome
 troll of Ukrainian ballet.
  I was without comment.
  I bowed my head and closed my eyes; and I awaited Frank's
 return with the humble tools it would take to clean up one
 bedroom--one bedroom out of all the bedrooms in the world, a
 bedroom infested with _ice-nine_.
  Somewhere, in the violet, velvet oblivion, I heard Angela say
 something to me. It wasn't in her own defense. It was in defense
 of little Newt. "Newt didn't give it to her. She stole it."
  I found the explanation uninteresting.
  "What hope can there be for mankind," I thought, "when there
 are such men as Felix Hoenikker to give such playthings as _ice-
 nine_ to such short-sighted children as almost all men and women
 are?"
  And I remembered _The Fourteenth Book of Bokonon_, which I
 had read in its entirety the night before. _The Fourteenth Book_
 is entitled, "What Can a Thoughtful Man Hope for Mankind on Earth,
 Given the Experience of the Past Million Years?"
  It doesn't take long to read _The Fourteenth Book_. It
 consists of one word and a period.
  This is it:
  "Nothing."
 Time Out 111
  Frank came back with brooms and dustpans, a blowtorch, and a
 kerosene hot plate, and a good old bucket and rubber gloves.
  We put on the gloves in order not to contaminate our hands
 with _ice-nine_. Frank set the hot plate on the heavenly Mona's
 xylophone and put the honest old bucket on top of that.
  And we picked up the bigger chunks of _ice-nine_ from the
 floor; and we dropped them into that humble bucket; and they
 melted. They became good old, sweet old, honest old water.
  Angela and I swept the floor, and little Newt looked under
 furniture for bits of _ice-nine_ we might have missed. And Frank
 followed our sweeping with the purifying flame of the torch.
  The brainless serenity of charwomen and janitors working late
 at night came over us. In a messy world we were at least making
 our little corner clean.
  And I heard myself asking Newt and Angela and Frank in
 conversational tones to tell me about the Christmas Eve on which
 the old-man died, to tell me about the dog.
  And, childishly sure that they were making everything all
 right by cleaning up, the Hoenikkers told me the tale.
  The tale went like this:
  On that fateful Christmas Eve, Angela went into the village
 for Christmas tree lights, and Newt and Frank went for a walk on
 the lonely winter beach, where they met a black Labrador
 retriever. The dog was friendly, as all Labrador retrievers are,
 and he followed Frank and little Newt home. 
  Felix Hoenikker died--died in his white wicker chair looking
 out at the sea--while his chldren were gone. All day the old man
 had been teasing his children with hints about _ice-nine_, showing
 it to them in a little bottle on whose label he had drawn a skull
 and crossbones, and on whose label he had written: "Danger! _Icenine!_
 Keep away from moisture!"
  All day long the old man had been nagging his children with
 words like these, merry in tone: "Come on now, stretch your minds
 a little. I've told you that its melting point is a hundred
 fourteen-point-four degrees Fahrenheit, and I've told you that
 it's composed of nothing but hydrogen and oxygen. What could the
 explanation be? Think a little! Don't be afraid of straining your
 brains. They won't break."
  "He was always telling us to stretch our brains," said Frank,
 recalling olden times.
  "I gave up trying to stretch my brain when I-don't-know-howold-I-was,"
 Angela confessed, leaning on her broom. "I couldn't
 even listen to him when he talked about science. I'd just nod and
 pretend I was trying to stretch my brain, but that poor brain, as
 far as science went, didn't have any more stretch than an old
 garter belt."
  Apparently, before he sat down in his wicker chair and died,
 the old man played puddly games in the kitchen with water and pots
 and pans and _ice-nine_. He must have been converting water to
 _ice-nine_ and back to water again, for every pot and pan was out
 on the kitchen countertops. A meat thermometer was out, too, so
 the old man must have been taking the temperature of things.
  The old man meant to take only a brief time out in his chair,
 for he left quite a mess in the kitchen. Part of the disorder was
 a saucepan filled with solid _ice-nine_. He no doubt meant to melt
 it up, to reduce the world's supply of the blue-white stuff to a
 splinter in a bottle again--after a brief time out.
  But, as Bokonon tells us, "Any man can call time out, but no
 man can say how long the time out will be."
 Newt's Mother's Reticule 112 
  "I should have know he was dead the minute I came in," said
 Angela, leaning on her broom again. "That wicker chair, it wasn't
 making a sound. It always talked, creaked away, when Father was in
 it--even when he was asleep."
  But Angela had assumed that her father was sleeping, and she
 went on to decorate the Christmas tree.
  Newt and Frank came in with the Labrador retriever. They went
 out into the kitchen to find something for the dog to eat. They
 found the old man's puddles.
  There was water on the floor, and little Newt took a dishrag
 and wiped it up. He tossed the sopping dishrag onto the counter.
  As it happened, the dishrag fell into the pan containing
 _ice-nine_.
  Frank thought the pan contained some sort of cake frosting,
 and he held it down to Newt, to show Newt what his carelessness
 with the dishrag had done.
  Newt peeled the dishrag from the surface and found that the
 dishrag had a peculiar, metallic, snaky quality, as though it were
 made of finely-woven gold mesh.
  "The reason I say 'gold mesh,'" said little Newt, there in
 "Papa's" bedroom, "is that it reminded me right away of Mother's
 reticule, of how the reticule felt."
  Angela explained sentimentally that when a child, Newt had
 treasured his mother's gold reticule. I gathered that it was a
 little evening bag.
  "It felt so funny to me, like nothing else I'd ever touched,"
 and Newt, investigating his old fondness for the reticule. "I
 wonder whatever happened to it."
  "I wonder what happened to a _lot_ of things," said Angela.
 The question echoed back through time--woeful, lost.
  What happened to the dishrag that felt like a reticule, at
 any rate, was that Newt held it out to the dog, and the dog licked
 it. And the dog froze stiff.
  Newt went to tell his father about the stiff dog and found
 out that his father was stiff, too.
 History 113 
  Our work in "Papa's" bedroom was done at last.
  But the bodies still had to be carried to the funeral pyre.
 We decided that this should be done with pomp, that we should put
 it off until the ceremonies in honor of the Hundred Martyrs to
 Democracy were over.
  The last thing we did was stand Von Koenigswald on his feet
 in order to decontaminate the place where he had been lying. And
 then we hid him, standing up, in "Papa's" clothes closet.
  I'm not quite sure why we hid him. I think it must have been
 to simplify the tableau.
  As for Newt's and Angela's and Frank's tale of how they
 divided up the world's supply of _ice-nine_ on Christmas Eve--it
 petered out when they got to details of the crime itself. The
 Hoenikkers couldn't remember that anyone said anything to justify
 their taking _ice-nine_ as personal property. They talked about
 what _ice-nine_ was, recalling the old man's brain-stretchers, but
 there was no talk of morals.
  "Who did the dividing?" I inquired.
  So thoroughly had the three Hoenikkers obliterated their
 memories of the incident that it was difficult for them to give me
 even that fundamental detail.
  "It wasn't Newt," said Angela at last. "I'm sure of ihat."
  "It was either you or me," mused Frank, thinking hard.
  "You got the three Mason jars off the kitchen shelf," said
 Angela. "It wasn't until the next day that we got the three little
 Thermos jugs."
  "That's right," Frank agreed. "And then you took an ice pick
 and chipped up the _ice-nine_ in the saucepan."
  "That's right," said Angela. "I did. And then somebody
 brought tweezers from the bathroom."
  Newt raised his little hand. "I did."
  Angela and Newt were amazed, remembering how enterprising
 little Newt had been.
  "I was the one who picked up the chips and put them in the
 Mason jars," Newt recounted. He didn't bother to hide the swagger
 he must have felt.
  "What did you people do with the dog?" I asked limply.
  "We put him in the oven," Frank told me. "It was the only
 thing to do."
  "History!" writes Bokonon. "Read it and weep!" 
 When I Felt the Bullet Enter My Heart 114
  So I once again mounted the spiral staircase in my tower;
 once again arrived at the uppermost battlement of my castle; and
 once more looked out at my guests, my servants, my cliff, and my
 lukewarm sea.
  The Hoenikkers were with me. We had locked "Papa's" door, and
 had spread the word among the household staff that "Papa" was
 feeling much better.
  Soldiers were now building a funeral pyre out by the hook.
 They did not know what the pyre was for.
  There were many, many secrets that day.
  Busy, busy, busy.
  I supposed that the ceremonies might as well begin, and I
 told Frank to suggest to Ambassador Horlick Minton that he deliver
 his speech.
  Ambassador Minton went to the seaward parapet with his
 memorial wreath still in its case. And he delivered an amazing
 speech in honor of the Hundred Martyrs to Democracy. He dignified
 the dead, their country, and the life that was over for them by
 saying the "Hundred Martyrs to Democracy" in island dialect. That
 fragment of dialect was graceful and easy on his lips.
  The rest of his speech was in American English. He had a
 written speech with him--fustian and bombast, I imagine. But, when
 he found he was going to speak to so few, and to fellow Americans
 for the most part, he put the formal speech away.
  A light sea wind ruffled his thinning hair. "I am about to do
 a very un-ambassadorial thing," he declared. "I am about to tell
 you what I really feel."
  Perhaps Minton had inhaled too much acetone, or perhaps he
 had an inkling of what was about to happen to everybody but me. At
 any rate, it was a strikingly Bokononist speech he gave.
  "We are gathered here, friends," he said, "to honor _lo Hoonyera
 Mora-toorz tut Zamoo-cratz-ya_, children dead, all dead, all
 murdered in war. It is customary on days like this to call such
 lost children men. I am unable to call them men for this simple
 reason: that in the same war in which _lo Hoon-yera Mora-toorz tut
 Zamoo-cratz-ya_ died, my own son died.
  "My soul insists that I mourn not a man but a child.
  "I do not say that children at war do not die like men, if
 they have to die. To their everlasting honor and our everlasting
 shame they _do_ die like men, thus making possible the manly
 jubilation of patriotic holidays.
  "But they are murdered children all the same. 
  "And I propose to you that if we are to pay our sincere
 respects to the hundred lost children of San Lorenzo, that we
 might best spend the day despising what killed them; which is to
 say, the stupidity and viciousness of all mankind.
  "Perhaps, when we remember wars, we should take off our
 clothes and paint ourselves blue and go on all fours all day long
 and grunt like pigs. That would surely be more appropriate than
 noble oratory and shows of flags and well-oiled guns.
  "I do not mean to be ungrateful for the fine, martial show we
 are about to see--and a thrilling show it really will be . . ."
  He looked each of us in the eye, and then he commented very
 softly, throwing it away, "And hooray say I for thrilling shows."
  We had to strain our ears to hear what Minton said next.
  "But if today is really in honor of a hundred children
 murdered in war," he said, "is today a day for a thrilling show?
  "The answer is yes, on one condition: that we, the
 celebrants, are working consciously and tirelessly to reduce the
 stupidity and viciousness of ourselves and of all mankind."
  He unsnapped the catches on his wreath case.
  "See what I have brought?" he asked us.
  He opened the case and showed us the scarlet lining and the
 golden wreath. The wreath was made of wire and artificial laurel
 leaves, and the whole was sprayed with radiator paint.
  The wreath was spanned by a cream-colored silk ribbon on
 which was printed, "PRO PATRIA."
  Minton now recited a poem from Edgar Lee Masters' the _Spoon
 River Anthology_, a poem that must have been incomprehensible to
 the San Lorenzans in the audience--and to H. Lowe Crosby and his
 Hazel, too, for that matter, and to Angela and Frank.
  I was the first fruits of the battle of Missionary
 Ridge.
  When I felt the bullet enter my heart
  I wished I had staid at home and gone to jail
  For stealing the hogs of Curl Trenary,
  Instead of running away and joining the army.
  Rather a thousand times the county jail
  Than to lie under this marble figure with wings,
  And this granite pedestal
  Bearing the words, "_Pro Patria_."
  What do they mean, anyway?
  "What do they mean, anyway?" echoed Ambassador Horlick
 Minton. "They mean, 'For one's country.'" And he threw away
 another line. "Any country at all," he murmured. 
  "This wreath I bring is a gift from the people of one country
 to the people of another. Never mind which countries. Think of
 people . . .
  "And children murdered in war.
  "And any country at all.
  "Think of peace.
  "Think of brotherly love.
  "Think of plenty.
  "Think of what paradise, this world would be if men were kind
 and wise.
  "As stupid and vicious as men are, this is a lovely day,"
 said Ambassador Horlick Minton. "I, in my own heart and as a
 representative of the peace-loving people of the United States of
 America, pity _lo Hoon-yera Mora-toorz tut Za-moo-cratz-ya_ for
 being dead on this fine day."
  And he sailed the wreath off the parapet.
  There was a hum in the air. The six planes of the San
 Lorenzan Air Force were coming, skimming my lukewarm sea. They
 were going to shoot the effigies of what H. Lowe Crosby had called
 "practically every enemy that freedom ever had."
 As It Happened 115
  We went to the seaward parapet to see the show. The planes
 were no larger than grains of black pepper. We were able to spot
 them because one, as it happened, was trailing smoke.
  We supposed that the smoke was part of the show.
  I stood next to H. Lowe Crosby, who, as it happened, was
 alternately eating albatross and drinking native rum. He exhaled
 fumes of model airplane cement between lips glistening with
 albatross fat. My recent nausea returned.
  I withdrew to the landward parapet alone, gulping air. There
 were sixty feet of old stone pavement between me and all the rest.
  I saw that the planes would be coming in low, below the
 footings of the castle, and that I would miss the show. But nausea
 made me incurious. I turned my head in the direction of their now
 snarling approach. Just as their guns began to hammer, one plane, 
 the one that had been trailing smoke, suddenly appeared, belly up,
 in flames.
  It dropped from my line of sight again and crashed at once
 into the cliff below the castle. Its bombs and fuel exploded.
  The surviving planes went booming on, their racket thinning
 down to a mosquito hum.
  And then there was the sound of a rockslide--and one great
 tower of "Papa's" castle, undermined, crashed down to the sea.
  The people on the seaward parapet looked in astonishment at
 the empty socket where the tower had stood. Then I could hear
 rockslides of all sizes in a conversation that was almost
 orchestral.
  The conversation went very fast, and new voices entered in.
 They were the voices of the castle's timbers lamenting that their
 burdens were becoming too great.
  And then a crack crossed the battlement like lightning, ten
 feet from my curling toes.
  It separated me from my fellow men.
  The castle groaned and wept aloud.
  The others comprehended their peril. They, along with tons of
 masonry, were about to lurch out and down. Although the crack was
 only a foot wide, people began to cross it with heroic leaps.
  Only my complacent Mona crossed the crack with a simple step.
  The crack gnashed shut; opened wider, leeringly. Still
 trapped on the canted deathtrap were H. Lowe Crosby and his Hazel
 and Ambassador Horlick Minton and his Claire.
  Philip Castle and Frank and I reached across the abyss to
 haul the Crosbys to safety. Our arms were now extended imploringly
 to the Mintons.
  Their expressions were bland. I can only guess what was going
 through their minds. My guess is that they were thinking of
 dignity, of emotional proportion above all else.
  Panic was not their style. I doubt that suicide was their
 style either. But their good manners killed them, for the doomed
 crescent of castle now moved away from us like an ocean liner
 moving away from a dock.
  The image of a voyage seems to have occurred to the voyaging
 Mintons, too, for they waved to us with wan amiability.
  They held hands.
  They faced the sea.
  Out they went; then down they went in a cataclysmic rush,
 were gone! 
 The Grand Ah-whoom 116
  The ragged rim of oblivion was now inches from my curling
 toes. I looked down. My lukewarm sea had swallowed all. A lazy
 curtain of dust was wafting out to sea, the only trace of all that
 fell.
  The palace, its massive, seaward mask now gone, greeted the
 north with a leper's smile, snaggle-toothed and bristly. The
 bristles were the splintered ends of timbers. Immediately below me
 a large chamber had been laid open. The floor of that chamber,
 unsupported, stabbed out into space like a diving platform.
  I dreamed for a moment of dropping to the platform, of
 springing up from it in a breath-taking swan dive, of folding my
 arms, of knifing downward into a blood-warm eternity with never a
 splash.
  I was recalled from this dream by the cry of a darting bird
 above me. It seemed to be asking me what had happened. "Pooteephweet?"
 it asked.
  We all looked up at the bird, and then at one another. We
 backed away from the abyss, full of dread. And, when I stepped off
 the paving stone that had supported me, the stone began to rock.
 It was no more stable than a teeter-totter. And it tottered now
 over the diving platform.
  Down it crashed onto the platform, made the platform a chute.
 And down the chute came the furnishings still remaining in the
 room below.
  A xylophone shot out first, scampering fast on its tiny
 wheels. Out came a bedside table in a crazy race with a bounding
 blowtorch. Out came chairs in hot pursuit.
  And somewhere in that room below, out of sight, something
 mightily reluctant to move was beginning to move.
  Down the chute it crept. At last it showed its golden bow. It
 was the boat in which dead "Papa" lay.
  It reached the end of the chute. Its bow nodded. Down it
 tipped. Down it fell, end over end.
  "Papa" was thrown clear, and he fell separately.
  I closed my eyes.
  There was a sound like that of the gentle closing of a portal
 as big as the sky, the great door of heaven being closed softly.
 It was a grand AH-WHOOM. 
  I opened my eyes--and all the sea was _ice-nine_. The moist
 green earth was a blue-white pearl. The sky darkened. _Borasisi_,
 the sun, became a sickly yellow ball, tiny and cruel.
  The sky was filled with worms. The worms were tornadoes.
 Sanctuary 117
  I looked up at the sky where the bird had been. An enormous
 worm with a violet mouth was directly overhead. It buzzed like
 bees. It swayed. With obscene peristalsis, it ingested air.
  We humans separated; fled my shattered battlements tumbled
 down staircases on the landward side.
  Only H. Lowe Crosby and his Hazel cried out. "American!
 American!" they cried, as though tornadoes were interested in the
 _granfalloons_ to which their victims belonged.
  I could not see the Crosbys. They had descended by another
 staircase. Their cries and the sounds of others, panting and
 running, came gabbling to me through a corridor of the castle. My
 only companion was my heavenly Mona, who had followed noiselessly.
  When I hesitated, she slipped past me and opened the door to
 the anteroom of "Papa's" suite. The walls and roof of the anteroom
 were gone. But the stone floor remained. And in its center was the
 manhole cover of the oubliette. Under the wormy sky, in the
 flickering violet light from the mouths of tornadoes that wished
 to eat us, I lifted the cover.
  The esophagus of the dungeon was fitted with iron rungs. I
 replaced the manhole cover from within. Down those iron rungs we
 went.
  And at the foot of the ladder we found a state secret. "Papa"
 Monzano had caused a cozy bomb shelter to be constructed there. It
 had a ventilation shaft, with a fan driven by a stationary
 bicycle. A tank of water was recessed in one wall. The water was
 sweet and wet, as yet untainted by _ice-nine_. And there was a
 chemical toilet, and a short-wave radio, and a Sears, Roebuck
 catalogue; and there were cases of delicacies, and liquor, and
 candles; and there were bound copies of the _National Geographic_
 going back twenty years.
  And there was a set of _The Books of Bokonon_. 
  And there were twin beds.
  I lighted a candle. I opened a can of campbell's chicken
 gumbo soup and I put it on a Sterno stove. And I poured two
 glasses of Virgin Islands rum.
  Mona sat on one bed. I sat down on the other. "I am about to
 say something that must have been said by men to women several
 times before," I informed her. "However, I don't believe that
 these words have ever carried quite the freight they carry now."
  "Oh?"
  I spread my hands. "Here we are."
 The Iron Maiden and the Oubliette 118
  _The Sixth Book of The Books of Bokonon_ is devoted to pain,
 in particular to tortures inflicted by men on men. "If I am ever
 put to death on the hook," Bokonon warns us, "expect a very human
 performance."
  Then he speaks of the rack and the peddiwinkus and the iron
 maiden and the _veglia_ and the oubliette.
  In any case, there's bound to be much crying.
  But the oubliette alone will let you think while dying.
  And so it was in Mona's and my rock womb. At least we could
 think. And one thing I thought was that the creature comforts of
 the dungeon did nothing to mitigate the basic fact of oubliation.
  During our first day and night underground, tornadoes rattled
 our manhole cover many times an hour. Each time the pressure in
 our hole would drop suddenly, and our ears would pop and our heads
 would ring.
  As for the radio--there was crackling, fizzing static and
 that was all. From one end of the short-wave band to the other not
 one word, not one telegrapher's beep, did I hear. If life still
 existed here and there, it did not broadcast.
  Nor does life broadcast to this day.
  This I assumed: tornadoes, strewing the poisonous blue-white
 frost of _ice-nine_ everywhere, tore everyone and everything above 
 ground to pieces. Anything that still lived would die soon enough
 of thirst--or hunger--or rage--or apathy.
  I turned to _The Books of Bokonon_, still sufficiently
 unfamiliar with them to believe that they contained spiritual
 comfort somewhere. I passed quickly over the warning on the title
 page of _The First Book_:
  "Don't be a fool! Close this book at once! It is nothing but
 _foma!_"
  _Foma_, of course, are lies.
  And then I read this:
  In the beginning, God created the earth, and he looked upon
 it in His cosmic loneliness.
  And God said, "Let Us make living creatures out of mud, so
 the mud can see what We have done." And God created every living
 creature that now moveth, and one was man. Mud as man alone could
 speak. God leaned close as mud as man sat up, looked around, and
 spoke. Man blinked. "What is the _purpose_ of all this?" he asked
 politely.
  "Everything must have a purpose?" asked God.
  "Certainly," said man.
  "Then I leave it to you to think of one for all this," said
 God.
  And He went away.
  I thought this was trash.
  "Of course it's trash!" says Bokonon.
  And I turned to my heavenly Mona for comforting secrets a
 good deal more profound.
  I was able, while mooning at her across the space that
 separated our beds, to imagine that behind her marvelous eyes
 lurked mysteries as old as Eve.
  I will not go into the sordid sex episode that followed.
 Suffice it to say that I was both repulsive and repulsed.
  The girl was not interested in reproduction--hated the idea.
 Before the tussle was over, I was given full credit by her, and by
 myself, too, for having invented the whole bizarre, grunting,
 sweating enterprise by which new human beings were made.
  Returning to my own bed, gnashing my teeth, I supposed that
 she honestly had no idea what love-making was all about. But then 
 she said to me, gently, "It would be very sad to have a little
 baby now. Don't you agree?"
  "Yes," I agreed murkily.
  "Well, that's the way little babies are made, in case you
 didn't know."
 Mona Thanks Me 119
  "Today I will be a Bulgarian Minister of Education," Bokonon
 tells us. "Tomorrow I will be Helen of Troy." His meaning is
 crystal clear: Each one of us has to be what he or she is. And,
 down in the oubliette, that was mainly what I thought--with the
 help of _The Books of Bokonon_.
  Bokonon invited me to sing along with him:
  We do, doodley do, doodley do, doodley do,
  What we must, muddily must, muddily must, muddily must;
  Muddily do, muddily do, muddily do, muddily do,
  Until we bust, bodily bust, bodily bust, bodily bust.
  I made up a tune to go with that and I whistled it under my
 breath as I drove the bicycle that drove the fan that gave us air,
 good old air.
  "Man breathes in oxygen and exhales carbon dioxide," I called
 to Mona.
  "What?"
  "Science."
  "Oh."
  "One of the secrets of life man was a long time
 understanding: Animals breathe in what animals breathe out, and
 vice versa."
  "I didn't know."
  "You know now."
  "Thank you."
  "You're welcome." 
  When I'd bicycled our atmosphere to sweetness and freshness,
 I dismounted and climbed the iron rungs to see what the weather
 was like above. I did that several times a day. On that day, the
 fourth day, I perceived through the narrow crescent of the lifted
 manhole cover that the weather had become somewhat stabilized.
  The stability was of a wildly dynamic sort, for the tornadoes
 were as numerous as ever, and tornadoes remain numerous to this
 day. But their mouths no longer gobbled and gnashed at the earth.
 The mouths in all directions were discreetly withdrawn to an
 altitude of perhaps a half of a mile. And their altitude varied so
 little from moment to moment that San Lorenzo might have been
 protected by a tornado-proof sheet of glass.
  We let three more days go by, making certain that the
 tornadoes had become as sincerely reticent as they seemed. And
 then we filled canteens from our water tank and we went above.
  The air was dry and hot and deathly still.
  I had heard it suggested one time that the seasons in the
 temperate zone ought to be six rather than four in number: summer,
 autumn, locking, winter, unlocking, and spring. And I remembered
 that as I straightened up beside our manhole, and stared and
 listened and sniffed.
  There were no smells. There was no movement. Every step I
 took made a gravelly squeak in blue-white frost. And every squeak
 was echoed loudly. The season of locking was over. The earth was
 locked up tight.
  It was winter, now and forever.
  I helped my Mona out of our hole. I warned her to keep her
 hands away from the blue-white frost and to keep her hands away
 from her mouth, too. "Death has never been quite so easy to come
 by," I told her. "All you have to do is touch the ground and then
 your lips and you're done for."
  She shook her head and sighed. "A very bad mother."
  "What?"
  "Mother Earth--she isn't a very good mother any more."
  "Hello? Hello?" I called through the palace ruins. The
 awesome winds had torn canyons through that great stone pile. Mona
 and I made a half-hearted search for survivors--half-hearted
 because we could sense no life. Not even a nibbling, twinkle-nosed
 rat had survived.
  The arch of the palace gate was the only man-made form
 untouched. Mona and I went to it. Written at its base in white
 paint was a Bokononist "Calypso." The lettering was neat. It was
 new. It was proof that someone else had survived the winds.
  The "Calypso" was this:
  Someday, someday, this crazy world will have to end, 
  And our God will take things back that He to us did
 lend.
  And if, on that sad day, you want to scold our God,
  Why go right ahead and scold Him. He'll just smile and
 nod.
 To Whom It May Concern 120
  I recalled an advertisement for a set of children's books
 called _The Book of Knowledge_. In that ad, a trusting boy and
 girl looked up at their father. "Daddy," one asked, "what makes
 the sky blue?" The answer, presumably, could be found in _The Book
 of Knowledge_.
  If I had had my daddy beside me as Mona and I walked down the
 road from the palace, I would have had plenty of questions to ask
 as I clung to his hand. "Daddy, why are all the trees broken?
 Daddy, why are all the birds dead? Daddy, what makes the sky so
 sick and wormy? Daddy, what makes the sea so hard and still?"
  It occurred to me that I was better qualified to answer those
 tough questions than any other human being, provided there were
 any other human beings alive. In case anyone was interested, I
 knew what had gone wrong-- where and how.
  So what?
  I wondered where the dead could be. Mona and I ventured more
 than a mile from our oubliette without seeing one dead human
 being.
  I wasn't half so curious about the living, probably because I
 sensed accurately that I would first have to contemplate a lot of
 dead. I saw no columns of smoke from possible campfires; but they
 would have been hard to see against an horizon of worms.
  One thing did catch my eye: a lavender corona about the queer
 plug that was the peak on the hump of Mount McCabe. It seemed to
 be calling me, and I had a silly, cinematic notion of climbing
 that peak with Mona. But what would it mean?
  We were walking into the wrinkles now at the foot of Mount
 McCabe. And Mona, as though aimlessly, left my side, left the
 road, and climbed one of the wrinkles. I followed. 
  I joined her at the top of the ridge. She was looking down
 raptly into a broad, natural bowl. She was not crying.
  She might well have cried.
  In that bowl were thousands upon thousands of dead. On the
 lips of each decedent was the blue-white frost of _ice-nine_.
  Since the corpses were not scattered or tumbled about, it was
 clear that they had been assembled since the withdrawal of the
 frightful winds. And, since each corpse had its finger in or near
 its mouth, I understood that each person had delivered himself to
 this melancholy place and then poisoned himself with _ice-nine_.
  There were men, women,, and children, too, many in the
 attitudes of _boko-maru_. All faced the center of the bowl, as
 though they were spectators in an amphitheater.
  Mona and I looked at the focus of all those frosted eyes,
 looked at the center of the bowl. There was a round clearing
 there, a place in which one orator might have stood.
  Mona and I approached the clearing gingerly, avoiding the
 morbid statuary. We found a boulder in it. And under the boulder
 was a penciled note which said:
  To whom it may concern: These people around you are almost
 all of the survivors on San Lorenzo of the winds that followed the
 freezing of the sea. These people made a captive of the spurious
 holy man named Bokonon. They brought him here, placed him at their
 center, and commanded him to tell them exactly what God Almighty
 was up to and what they should now do. The mountebank told them
 that God was surely trying to kill them, possible because He was
 through with them, and that they should have the good manners to
 die. This, as you can see, they did.
  The note was signed by Bokonon.
 I Am Slow to Answer 121
  "What a cynic!" I gasped. I looked up from the note and gazed
 around the death-filled bowl. "Is _he_ here somewhere?" 
  "I do not see him," said Mona mildly. She wasn't depressed or
 angry. In fact, she seemed to verge on laughter. "He always said
 he would never take his own advice, because he knew it was
 worthless."
  "He'd _better_ be here!" I said bitterly. "Think of the gall
 of the man, advising all these people to kill themselves!"
  Now Mona did laugh. I had never heard her laugh. Her laugh
 was startlingly deep and raw.
  "This strikes you as _funny?_"
  She raised her arms lazily. "It's all so simple, that's all.
 It solves so much for so many, so simply."
  And she went strolling up among the petrified thousands,
 still laughing. She paused about midway up the slope and faced me.
 She called down to me, "Would you wish any of these alive again,
 if you could? Answer me quickly.
  "Not quick enough with your answer," she called playfully,
 after half a minute had passed. And, still laughing a little, she
 touched her finger to the ground, straightened up, and touched the
 finger to her lips and died.
  Did I weep? They say I did. H. Lowe Crosby and his Hazel and
 little Newton Hoenikker came upon me as I stumbled down the road.
 They were in Bolivar's one taxicab, which had been spared by the
 storm. They tell me I was crying. Hazel cried, too, cried for joy
 that I was alive.
  They coaxed me into the cab.
  Hazel put her arm around me. "You're with your mom, now.
 Don't you worry about a thing."
  I let my mind go blank. I closed my eyes. It was with deep,
 idiotic relief that I leaned on that fleshy, humid, barn-yard
 fool.
 The Swiss Family Robinson 122
  They took me to what was left of Franklin Hoenikker's house
 at the head of the waterfall. What remained was the cave under the
 waterfall, which had become a sort of igloo under a translucent,
 blue-white dome of _ice-nine_. 
  The ménage consisted of Frank, little Newt, and the Crosbys.
 They had survived in a dungeon in the palace, one far shallower
 and more unpleasant than the oubliette. They had moved out the
 moment the winds had abated, while Mona and I had stayed
 underground for another three days.
  As it happened, they had found the miraculous taxicab waiting
 for them under the arch of the palace gate. They had found a can
 of white paint, and on the front doors of the cab Frank had
 painted white stars, and on the roof he had painted the letters of
 a _granfalloon_: U.S.A.
  "And you left the paint under the arch," I said.
  "How did you know?" asked Crosby.
  "Somebody else came along and wrote a poem."
  I did not inquire at once as to how Angela Hoenikker Conners
 and Philip and Julian Castle had met their ends, for I would have
 had to speak at once about Mona. I wasn't ready to do that yet.
  I particularly didn't want to discuss the death of Mona
 since, as we rode along in the taxi, the Crosbys and little Newt
 seemed so inappropriately gay.
  Hazel gave me a clue to the gaiety. "Wait until you see how
 we live. We've got all kinds of good things to eat. Whenever we
 want water, we just build a campfire and melt some. The Swiss
 Family Robinson--that's what we call ourselves."
 Of Mice and Men 123
  A curious six months followed--the six months in which I
 wrote this book. Hazel spoke accurately when she called our little
 society the Swiss Family Robinson, for we had survived a storm,
 were isolated, and then the living became very easy indeed. It was
 not without a certain Walt Disney charm.
  No plants or animals survived, it's true. But _ice-nine_
 preserved pigs and cows and little deer and windrows of birds and
 berries until we were ready to thaw and cook them. Moreover, there
 were tons of canned goods to be had for the grubbing in the ruins
 of Bolivar. And we seemed to be the only people left on San
 Lorenzo. 
  Food was no problem, and neither were clothing or shelter,
 for the weather was uniformly dry and dead and hot. Our health was
 monotonously good. Apparently all the germs were dead, too--or
 napping.
  Our adjustment became so satisfactory, so complacent, that no
 one marveled or protested when Hazel said, "One good thing anyway,
 no mosquitoes."
  She was sitting on a three-legged stool in the clearing where
 Frank's house had stood. She was sewing strips of red, white, and
 blue cloth together. Like Betsy Ross, she was making an American
 flag. No one was unkind enough to point out to her that the red
 was really a peach, that the blue was nearly a Kelly green, and
 that the fifty stars she had cut out were six-pointed stars of
 David rather than five-pointed American stars.
  Her husband, who had always been a pretty good cook, now
 simmered a stew in an iron pot over a wood fire nearby. He did all
 our cooking for us; he loved to cook.
  "Looks good, smells good," I commented.
  He winked. "Don't shoot the cook. He's doing the best he
 can."
  In the background of this cozy conversation were the nagging
 dah-dah-dahs and dit-dit-dits of an automatic SOS transmitter
 Frank had made. It called for help both night and day.
  "Save our soullllls," Hazel intoned, singing along with the
 transmitter as she sewed, "save our soulllllls."
  "How's the writing going?" Hazel asked me.
  "Fine, Mom, just fine."
  "When you going to show us some of it?"
  "When it's ready, Mom, when it's ready."
  "A lot of famous writers were Hoosiers."
  "I know."
  "You'll be one of a long, long line." She smiled hopefully.
 "Is it a funny book?"
  "I hope so, Mom."
  "I like a good laugh."
  "I know you do."
  "Each person here had some specialty, something to give the
 rest. You write books that make us laugh, and Frank goes science
 things, and little Newt--he paints pictures for us all, and I sew,
 and Lowie cooks."
  "'Many hands make much work light.' Old Chinese proverb."
  "They were smart in a lot of ways, those Chinese were."
  "Yes, let's ketp their memory alive."
  "I wish now I'd studied them more."
  "Well, it was hard to do, even under ideal conditions."
  "I wish now I'd studied everything more."
  "We've all got regrets, Mom." 
  "No use crying over spilt milk."
  "As the poet said, Mom, 'Of all the words of mice and men,
 the saddest are, "It might have been."'"
  "That's so beautiful, and so true."
 Frank's Ant Farm 124
  I hated to see Hazel finishing the flag, because I was all
 balled up in her addled plans for it. She had the idea that I had
 agreed to plant the fool thing on the peak of Mount McCabe.
  "If Lowe and I were younger, we'd do it ourselves. Now all we
 can do is give you the flag and send our best wishes with you."
  "Mom, I wonder if that's really a good place for the flag."
  "What other place _is_ there?'
  "I'll put on my thinking cap." I excused myself and went down
 into the cave to see what Frank was up to.
  He was up to nothing new. He was watching an ant farm he had
 constructed. He had dug up a few surviving ants in the threedimensional
 world of the ruins of Bolivar, and he had reduced the
 dimensions to two by making a dirt and ant sandwich between two
 sheets of glass. The ants could do nothing without Frank's
 catching them at it and commenting upon it.
  The experiment had solved in short order the mystery of how
 ants could survive in a waterless world. As far as I know, they
 were the only insects that did survive, and they did it by forming
 with their bodies tight balls around grains of _ice-nine_. They
 would generate enough heat at the center to kill half their number
 and produce one bead of dew. The dew was drinkable. The corpses
 were edible.
  "Eat, drink, and be merry, for tomorrow we die," I said to
 Frank and his tiny cannibals.
  His response was always the same. It was a peevish lecture on
 all the things that people could learn from ants.
  My responses were ritualized, too. "Nature's a wonderful
 thing, Frank. Nature's a wonderful thing."
  "You know why ants are so successful?" he asked me for the
 thousandth time. "They co-_op_-er-ate."
  "That's a hell of a good word--co-operation." 
  "Who _taught_ them how to make water?"
  "Who taught _me_ how to make water?"
  "That's a silly answer and you know it."
  "Sorry."
  "There was a time when I took people's silly answers
 seriously. I'm past that now."
  "A milestone."
  "I've grown up a good deal."
  "At a certain amount of expense to the world." I could say
 things like that to Frank with an absolute assurance that he would
 not hear them.
  "There was a time when people could bluff me without much
 trouble because I didn't have much self-confidence in myself."
  "The mere cutting down of the number of people on earth would
 go a long way toward alleviating your own particular social
 problems," I suggested. Again, I made the suggestion to a deaf
 man.
  "You _tell_ me, you _tell_ me who told these ants how to make
 water," he challenged me again.
  Several times I had offered the obvious notion that God had
 taught them. And I knew from onerous experience that he would
 neither reject nor accept this theory. He simply got madder and
 madder, putting the question again and again.
  I walked away from Frank, just as _The Books of Bokonon_
 advised me to do. "Beware of the man who works hard to learn
 something, learns it, and finds himself no wiser than before,"
 Bokonon tells us. "He is full of murderous resentment of people
 who are ignorant without having come by their ignorance the hard
 way."
  I went looking for our painter, for little Newt.
 The Tasmanians 125
  When I found little Newt, painting a blasted landscape a
 quarter of a mile from the cave, he asked me if I would drive him
 into Bolivar to forage for paints. He couldn't drive himself. He
 couldn't reach the pedals. 
  So off we went, and, on the way, I asked him if he had any
 sex urge left. I mourned that I had none--no dreams in that line,
 nothing.
  "I used to dream of women twenty, thirty, forty feet tall,"
 he told me. "But now? God, I can't even remember what my Ukrainian
 midget looked like."
  I recalled a thing I had read about the aboriginal
 Tasmanians, habitually naked persons who, when encountered by
 white men in the seventeenth century, were strangers to
 agriculture, animal husbandry, architecture of any sort, and
 possibly even fire. They were so contemptible in the eyes of white
 men, by reason of their ignorance, that they were hunted for sport
 by the first settlers, who were convicts from England. And the
 aborigines found life so unattractive that they gave up
 reproducing.
  I suggested to Newt now that it was a similar hopelessness
 that had unmanned us.
  Newt made a shrewd observation. "I guess all the excitement
 in bed had more to do with excitement about keeping the human race
 going than anybody ever imagined."
  "Of course, if we had a woman of breeding age among us, that
 might change the situation radically. Poor old Hazel is years
 beyond having even a Mongolian idiot."
  Newt revealed that he knew quite a bit about Mongolian
 idiots. He had once attended a special school for grotesque
 children, and several of his schoolmates had been Mongoloids. "The
 best writer in our class was a Mongoloid named Myrna--I mean
 penmanship, not what she actually wrote down. God, I haven't
 thought about her for years."
  "Was it a good school?"
  "All I remember is what the headmaster used to say all the
 time. He was always bawling us out over the loudspeaker system for
 some mess we'd made, and he always started out the same way: 'I am
 sick and tired . . .'"
  "That comes pretty close to describing how I feel most of the
 time."
  "Maybe that's the way you're supposed to feel."
  "You talk like a Bokononist, Newt."
  "Why shouldn't I? As far as I know, Bokononism is the only
 religion that has any commentary on midgets."
  When I hadn't been writing, I'd been poring over _The Books
 of Bokonon_, but the reference to midgets had escaped me. I was
 grateful to Newt for calling it to my attention, for the quotation
 captured in a couplet the cruel paradox of Bokononist thought, the
 heartbreaking necessity of lying about reality, and the
 heartbreaking impossibility of lying about it. 
  Midget, midget, midget, how he struts and winks,
  For he knows a man's as big as what he hopes and thinks!
 Soft Pipes, Play On 126
  "Such a _depressing_ religion!" I cried. I directed our
 conversation into the area of Utopias, of what might have been, of
 what should have been, of what might yet be, if the world would
 thaw.
  But Bokonon had been there, too, had written a whole book
 about Utopias, _The Seventh Book_, which he called "Bokonon's
 Republic." In that book are these ghastly aphorisms:
  The hand that stocks the drug stores rules the world.
  Let us start our Republic with a chain of drug stores, a
 chain of grocery stores, a chain of gas chambers, and a national
 game. After that, we can write our Constitution.
  I called Bokonon a jigaboo bastard, and I changed the subject
 again. I spoke of meaningful, individual heroic acts. I praised in
 particular the way in which Julian Castle and his son had chosen
 to die. While the tornadoes still raged, they had set out on foot
 for the House of Hope and Mercy in the Jungle to give whatever
 hope and mercy was theirs to give. And I saw magnificence in the
 way poor Angela had died, too. She had picked up a clarinet in the
 ruins of Bolivar and had begun to play it at once, without
 concerning herself as to whether the mouthpiece might be
 contaminated with _ice-nine_.
  "Soft pipes, play on," I murmured huskily.
  "Well, maybe you can find some neat way to die, too," said
 Newt.
  It was a Bokononist thing to say.
  I blurted out my dream of climbing Mount McCabe with some
 magnificent symbol and planting it there. I took my hands from the
 wheel for an instant to show him how empty of symbols they were. 
 "But what in hell would the right symbol _be_, Newt? What in hell
 would it _be?_" I grabbed the wheel again. "Here it is, the end of
 the world; and here I am, almost the very last man; and there it
 is, the highest mountain in sight. I know now what my _karass_ has
 been up to, Newt. It's been working night and day for maybe half a
 million years to get me up that mountain." I wagged my head and
 nearly wept. "But what, for the love of God, is supposed to be in
 my hands?"
  I looked out of the car window blindly as I asked that, so
 blindly that I went more than a mile before realizing that I had
 looked into the eyes of an old Negro man, a living colored man,
 who was sitting by the side of the road.
  And then I slowed down. And then I stopped. I covered my
 eyes.
  "What's the matter?" asked Newt.
  "I saw Bokonon back there."
 The End 127
  He was sitting on a rock. He was barefoot. His feet were
 frosty with _ice-nine_. His only garment was a white bedspread
 with blue tufts. The tufts said Casa Mona. He took no note of our
 arrival. In one hand was a pencil. In the other was paper.
  "Bokonon?"
  "Yes?"
  "May I ask what you're thinking?"
  "I am thinking, young man, about the final sentence for _The
 Books of Bokonon_. The time for the final sentence has come."
  "Any luck?"
  He shrugged and handed me a piece of paper.
  This is what I read:
  If I were a younger man, I would write a history of human
 stupidity; and I would climb to the top of Mount McCabe and lie
 down on my back with my history for a pillow; and I would take
 from the ground some of the blue-white poison that makes statues 
 of men; and I would make a statue of myself, lying on my back,
A Duty-dance with Death
 Author: Kurt Vonnegut
 
 Grateful acknowledgment is made for permission to reprint the following material:
 'The Waking': copyright 1953 by Theodore Roethke from
 THE COLLECTED POEMS OF THEODORE ROETHKE
 printed by permission of Doubleday & Company, Inc.
 THE DESTRUCTION OF DRESDEN by David Irving:
 From the Introduction by Ira C. Eaker, Lt. Gen. USAF (RET.) and Foreword by Air
 Marshall Sir Robert Saundby. Copyright 1963 by William Kimber and Co. Limited.
 Reprinted by permission of Holt, Rinehart and Winston, Inc. and William Kimber and
 Co. Limited.
 'Leven Cent Cotton' by Bob Miller and Emma Dermer: Copyright 1928, 1929 by MCA
 Music, a Division of MCA Inc. Copyright renewed 1955,1956 and assigned to MCA
 Music, a division of MCA Inc. Used by permission. 
 for
 Mary O’Hare
 and
 Gerhard Müller
 The cattle are lowing,
 The Baby awakes,
 But the little Lord Jesus
 No crying He makes.
 One
 All this happened, more or less. The war parts, anyway, are pretty much true. One guy I
 knew really was shot in Dresden for taking a teapot that wasn't his. Another guy I knew
 really did threaten to have his personal enemies killed by hired gunmen after the war.
 And so on. I've changed all the names.
  I really did go back to Dresden with Guggenheim money (God love it) in 1967. It
 looked a lot like Dayton, Ohio, more open spaces than Dayton has. There must be tons of
 human bone meal in the ground.
  I went back there with an old war buddy, Bernard V. O'Hare, and we made friends
 with a taxi driver, who took us to the slaughterhouse where we had been locked up at
 night as prisoner of war. His name was Gerhard Müller. He told us that he was a prisoner
 of the Americans for a while. We asked him how it was to live under Communism, and
 he said that it was terrible at first, because everybody had to work so hard, and because
 there wasn't much shelter or food or clothing. But things were much better now. He had a
 pleasant little apartment, and his daughter was getting an excellent education. His mother
 was incinerated in the Dresden fire-storm. So it goes.
  He sent O'Hare a postcard at Christmastime, and here is what it said:
  'I wish you and your family also as to your friend Merry Christmas and a happy New
 Year and I hope that we'll meet again in a world of peace and freedom in the taxi cab if
 the accident will.'
  I like that very much: 'If the accident will.'
  I would hate to tell you what this lousy little book cost me in money and anxiety and
 time. When I got home from the Second World War twenty-three years ago, I thought it
 would be easy for me to write about the destruction of Dresden, since all I would have to
 do would be to report what I had seen. And I thought, too, that it would be a masterpiece
 or at least make me a lot of money, since the subject was so big.
  But not many words about Dresden came from my mind then-not enough of them to
 make a book, anyway. And not many words come now, either, when I have become an 
 old fart with his memories and his Pall Malls, with his sons full grown. I think of how
 useless the Dresden -part of my memory has been, and yet how tempting Dresden has
 been to write about, and I am reminded of the famous limerick:
 There was a young man from Stamboul,
 Who soliloquized thus to his tool,
 'You took all my wealth
 And you ruined my health,
 And now you won't pee, you old fool’
  And I'm reminded, too, of the song that goes
 My name is Yon Yonson,
 I work in Wisconsin,
 I work in a lumbermill there.
 The people I meet when I walk down the street,
 They say, 'What's your name?
 And I say,
 ‘My name is Yon Yonson,
 I work in Wisconsin...
  And so on to infinity.
  Over the years, people I've met have often asked me what I'm working on, and I've
 usually replied that the main thing was a book about Dresden.
  I said that to Harrison Starr, the movie-maker, one time, and he raised his eyebrows
 and inquired, 'Is it an anti-war book?'
  'Yes,' I said. 'I guess.'
  'You know what I say to people when I hear they're writing anti-war books?'
 'No. What do you say, Harrison Starr?'
 'I say, "Why don't you write an anti-glacier book instead?"'
 What he meant, of course, was that there would always be wars, that they were as easy to
 stop as glaciers. I believe that too.
  And, even if wars didn't keep coming like glaciers, there would still be plain old death.
  When I was somewhat younger, working on my famous Dresden book, I asked an old
 war buddy named Bernard V. O'Hare if I could come to see him. He was a district
 attorney in Pennsylvania. I was a writer on Cape Cod. We had been privates in the war,
 infantry scouts. We had never expected to make any money after the war, but we were
 doing quite well.
  I had the Bell Telephone Company find him for me. They are wonderful that way. I
 have this, disease late at night sometimes, involving alcohol and the telephone. I get
 drunk, and I drive my wife away with a breath like mustard gas and roses. And then,
 speaking gravely and elegantly into the telephone, I ask the telephone operators to
 connect me with this friend or that one, from whom I have not heard in years. 
  I got O'Hare on the line in this way. He is short and I am tall. We were Mutt and Jeff in
 the war. We were captured together in the war. I told him who I was on the telephone. He
 had no trouble believing it. He was up. He was reading. Everybody else in his house was
 asleep.
  'Listen,' I said, 'I'm writing this book about Dresden. I'd like some help remembering
 stuff. I wonder if I could come down and see you, and we could drink and talk and
 remember.'
  He was unenthusiastic. He said he couldn't remember much. He told me, though, to
 come ahead.
  'I think the climax of the book will be the execution of poor old Edgar Derby,' I said.
 'The irony is so great. A whole city gets burned down, and thousands and thousands of
 people are killed. And then this one American foot soldier is arrested in the ruins for
 taking a teapot. And he's given a regular trial, and then he's shot by a firing squad.'
  'Um,' said O'Hare.
  'Don't you think that's really where the climax should come?' 'I don't know anything
 about it,' he said. 'That's your trade, not mine.'
  As a trafficker in climaxes and thrills and characterization and wonderful dialogue and
 suspense and confrontations, I had outlined the Dresden story many times. The best
 outline I ever made, or anyway the prettiest one, was on the back of a roll of wallpaper.
  I used my daughter's crayons, a different color for each main character. One end of the
 wallpaper was the beginning of the story, and the other end was the end, and then there
 was all that middle part, which was the middle. And the blue line met the red line and
 then the yellow line, and the yellow line stopped because the character represented by the
 yellow line was dead. And so on. The destruction of Dresden was represented by a
 vertical band of orange cross-hatching, and all the lines that were still alive passed
 through it, came out the other side.
  The end, where all the lines stopped, was a beetfield on the Elbe, outside of Halle. The
 rain was coming down. The war in Europe had been over for a couple of weeks. We were
 formed in ranks, with Russian soldiers guarding us-Englishmen, Americans, Dutchmen,
 Belgians, Frenchmen, Canadians, South Africans, New Zealanders, Australians,
 thousands of us about to stop being prisoners of war.
  And on the other side of the field were thousands of Russians and Poles and
 Yugoslavians and so on guarded by American soldiers. An exchange was made there in
 the rain-one for one. O'Hare and I climbed into the back of an American truck with a lot
 of others. O'Hare didn't have any souvenirs. Almost everybody else did. I had a
 ceremonial Luftwaffe saber, still do. The rabid little American I call Paul Lazzaro in this
 book had about a quart of diamonds and emeralds and rubies and so on' He had taken
 these from dead people in the cellars of Dresden.' So it goes.
  An idiotic Englishman, who had lost all his teeth somewhere had his souvenir in a
 canvas bag. The bag was resting on my insteps. He would peek into the bag every now
 and then, and he would roll his eyes and swivel his scrawny neck,, trying to catch people
 looking covetously at his bag. And he would bounce the bag on my insteps.
 I thought this bouncing was accidental. But I was mistaken. He had to show somebody
 what was in the bag, and he had decided he could trust me. He caught my eye, winked, 
 opened the bag. There was a plaster model of the Eiffel Tower in there. It was painted
 gold. It had a clock in it.
  'There's a smashin' thing,' he said.
  And we were flown to a rest camp in France, where we were fed chocolate malted
 milkshakes and other rich foods until we were all covered with baby fat. Then we were
 sent home, and I married a pretty girl who was covered with baby fat, too.
  And we had babies.
  And they're all grown up now, and I'm an old fart with his memories and his Pall
 Malls. My name is Yon Yonson, I work in Wisconsin, I work in a lumbermill there.
  Sometimes I try to call up old girl friends on the telephone late at night, after my wife
 has gone to bed. 'Operator, I wonder if you could give me the number of a Mrs. So-andSo.
 I think she lives at such-and-such.'
  'I'm sorry, sir. There is no such listing.'
 'Thanks, Operator. Thanks just the same.'
  And I let the dog out or I let him in, and we talk some. I let him know I like him, and
 he lets me know he likes me. He doesn't mind the smell of mustard gas and roses.
  'You're all right, Sandy, I'll say to the dog. 'You know that, Sandy? You're O.K.'
  Sometimes I'll turn on the radio and listen to a talk program from Boston or New York.
 I can't stand recorded music if I've been drinking a good deal.
  Sooner or later I go to bed, and my wife asks me what time it is. She always has to
 know the time. Sometimes I don't know, and I say, 'Search me.'
  I think about my education sometimes. I went to the University of Chicago for a while
 after the Second World War. I was a student in the Department of Anthropology. At that
 time, they were teaching that there was absolutely no difference between anybody. They
 may be teaching that still.
  Another thing they taught was that nobody was ridiculous or bad or disgusting. Shortly
 before my father died, he said to me, 'You know-you never wrote a story with a villain in
 it.'
  I told him that was one of the things I learned in college after the war.
  While I was studying to be an anthropologist, I was also working as a police reporter
 for the famous Chicago City News Bureau for twenty-eight dollars a week. One time they
 switched me from the night shift to the day shift., so I worked sixteen hours straight. We
 were supported by all the newspapers in town, and the AP and the UP and all that. And
 we would cover the courts and the police stations and the Fire Department and the Coast
 Guard out on Lake Michigan and all that. We were connected to the institutions that
 supported us by means of pneumatic tubes which ran under the streets of Chicago.
  Reporters would telephone in stories to writers wearing headphones, and the writers
 would stencil the stories on mimeograph sheets. The stories were mimeographed and
 stuffed into the brass and velvet cartridges which the pneumatic tubes ate. The very
 toughest reporters and writers were women who had taken over the jobs of men who'd
 gone to war.
  And the first story I covered I had to dictate over the telephone to one of those beastly
 girls. It was about a young veteran who had taken a job running an old-fashioned elevator 
 in an office building. The elevator door on the first floor was ornamental iron lace. Iron
 ivy snaked in and out of the holes. There was an iron twig with two iron lovebirds
 perched upon it.
  This veteran decided to take his car into the basement, and he closed the door and
 started down, but his wedding ring Was caught in all the ornaments. So he was hoisted
 into the air and the floor of the car went down, dropped out from under him, and the top
 of the car squashed him. So it goes.
  So I phoned this in, and the woman who was going to cut the stencil asked me. 'What
 did his wife say?'
  'She doesn't know yet,' I said. 'It just happened.'
  'Call her up and get a statement.'
  'What?'
  'Tell her you're Captain Finn of the Police Department. Say you have some sad news.
 Give her the news, and see what she says.'
  So I did. She said about what you would expect her to say. There was a baby. And so
 on.
  When I got back to the office, the woman writer asked me, just for her own
 information, what the squashed guy had looked Eke when he was squashed.
  I told her.
  'Did it bother you?' she said. She was eating a Three Musketeers Candy Bar.
  'Heck no, Nancy,' I said. 'I've seen lots worse than that in the war.'
  Even then I was supposedly writing a book about Dresden. It wasn't a famous air raid
 back then in America. Not many Americans knew how much worse it had been than
 Hiroshima, for instance. I didn't know that, either. There hadn't been much publicity.
  I happened to tell a University of Chicago professor at a cocktail party about the raid as
 I had seen it, about the book I would write. He was a member of a thing called The
 Committee on Social Thought. And he told me about the concentration camps, and about
 how the Germans had made soap and candles out of the fat of dead Jews and so on.
  All could say was, 'I know, I know. I know.'
  The Second World War had certainly made everybody very tough. And I became a
 public relations man for General Electric in Schenectady, New York, and a volunteer
 fireman in the Village of Alplaus, where I bought my first home. My boss there was one
 of the toughest guys I ever hope to meet. He had been a lieutenant colonel in public
 relations in Baltimore. While I was in Schenectady he joined the Dutch Reformed
 Church, which is a very tough church, indeed.
  He used to ask me sneeringly sometimes why I hadn't been an officer,, as though I'd
 done something wrong.
  My wife and I had lost our baby fat. Those were our scrawny years. We had a lot of
 scrawny veterans and their scrawny wives for friends. The nicest veterans in
 Schenectady,, I thought,, the kindest and funniest ones, the ones who hated war the most,
 were the ones who'd really fought.
  I wrote the Air Force back then, asking for details about the raid on Dresden, who
 ordered it, how many planes did it, why they did it, what desirable results there had been 
 and so on. I was answered by a man who, like myself, was in public relations. He said
 that he was sorry, but that the information was top secret still.
  I read the letter out loud to my wife, and I said, 'Secret? My God-from whom?'
  We were United World Federalists back then. I don't know what we are now.
 Telephoners, I guess. We telephone a lot-or I do, anyway, late at night.
  A couple of weeks after I telephoned my old war buddy, Bernard V. O'Hare, I really
 did go to see him. That must have been in 1964 or so-whatever the last year was for the
 New York World's Fair. Eheu, fugaces labuntur anni. My name is Yon Yonson. There
 was a young man from Stamboul.
  I took two little girls with me, my daughter, Nanny, and her best friend, Allison
 Mitchell. They had never been off Cape Cod before. When we saw a river, we had to stop
 so they could stand by it and think about it for a while. They had never seen water in that
 long and narrow, unsalted form before. The river was the Hudson. There were carp in
 there and we saw them. They were as big as atomic submarines.
  We saw waterfalls, too, streams jumping off cliffs into the valley of the Delaware.
 There were lots of things to stop and see-and then it was time to go, always time to go.
 The little girls were wearing white party dresses and black party shoes, so strangers
 would know at once how nice they were. 'Time to go, girls,' I'd say. And we would go.
  And the sun went down, and we had supper in an Italian place, and then I knocked on
 the front door of the beautiful stone house of Bernard V. O'Hare. I was carrying a bottle
 of Irish whiskey like a dinner bell.
  I met his nice wife, Mary, to whom I dedicate this book. I dedicate it to Gerhard
 Müller, the Dresden taxi driver, too. Mary O'Hare is a trained nurse, which is a lovely
 thing for a woman to be.
  Mary admired the two little girls I'd brought, mixed them in with her own children,
 sent them all upstairs to play games and watch television. It was only after the children
 were gone that I sensed that Mary didn't like me or didn't like something about the night.
 She was polite but chilly.
  'It's a nice cozy house you have here,' I said, and it really was.
 'I've fixed up a place where you can talk and not be bothered,' she said.
  'Good,' I said, and I imagined two leather chairs near a fire in a paneled room, where
 two old soldiers could drink and talk. But she took us into the kitchen. She had put two
 straight-backed chairs at a kitchen table with a white porcelain top. That table top was
 screaming with reflected light from a two-hundred-watt bulb overhead. Mary had
 prepared an operating room. She put only one glass on it, which was for me. She
 explained that O'Hare couldn't drink the hard stuff since the war.
  So we sat down. O'Hare was embarrassed, but he wouldn't tell me what was wrong. I
 couldn't imagine what it was about me that could bum up Mary so. I was a family man.
 I'd been married only once. I wasn't a drunk. I hadn't done her husband any dirt in the
 war.
  She fixed herself a Coca-Cola, made a lot of noise banging the ice-cube tray in the
 stainless steel sink. Then she went into another part of the house. But she wouldn't sit
 still. She was moving all over the house, opening and shutting doors, even moving
 furniture around to work off anger. 
  I asked O'Hare what I'd said or done to make her act that way.
  'It's all right,' he said. "Don't worry about it. It doesn't have anything to do with you.'
 That was kind of him. He was lying. It had everything to do with me.
  So we tried to ignore Mary and remember the war. I took a couple of belts of the
 booze I'd brought. We would chuckle or grin sometimes, as though war stories were
 coming back, but neither one of us could remember anything good. O'Hare remembered
 one guy who got into a lot of wine in Dresden, before it was bombed, and we had to take
 him home in a wheelbarrow.
  It wasn't much to write a book about. I remembered two Russian soldiers who had
 looted a clock factory. They had a horse-drawn wagon full of clocks. They were happy
 and drunk. They were smoking huge cigarettes they had rolled in newspaper.
  That was about it for memories, and Mary was still making noise. She finally came
 out in the kitchen again for another Coke. She took another tray of ice cubes from the
 refrigerator, banged it in the sink, even though there was already plenty of ice out.
  Then she turned to me, let me see how angry she was, and that the anger was for me.
 She had been talking to herself, so what she said was a fragment of a much larger
 conversation. "You were just babies then!' she said.
  'What?" I said.
 'You were just babies in the war-like the ones upstairs! '
  I nodded that this was true. We had been foolish virgins in the war, right at the end of
 childhood.
  'But you're not going to write it that way, are you.' This wasn't a question. It was an
 accusation.
  'I-I don't know,' I said.
  'Well, I know,' she said. 'You'll pretend you were men instead of babies, and you'll be
 played in the movies by Frank Sinatra and John Wayne or some of those other
 glamorous, war-loving, dirty old men. And war will look just wonderful, so we'll have a
 lot more of them. And they'll be fought by babies like the babies upstairs.'
  So then I understood. It was war that made her so angry. She didn't want her babies or
 anybody else's babies killed in wars. And she thought wars were partly encouraged by
 books and movies.
  So I held up my right hand and I made her a promise 'Mary,' I said, 'I don't think this
 book is ever going to be finished. I must have written five thousand pages by now, and
 thrown them all away. If I ever do finish it, though, I give you my word of honor: there
 won't be a part for Frank Sinatra or John Wayne.
  'I tell you what,' I said, 'I'll call it The Children's Crusade.'
  She was my friend after that.
  O'Hare and I gave up on remembering, went into the living room, talked about other
 things. We became curious about the real Children's Crusade, so O'Hare looked it up in a
 book he had, Extraordinary Popular Delusions and the Madness of Crowds, by Charles
 Mackay, LL.D. It was first published in London in 1841.
  Mackay had a low opinion of all Crusades. The Children's Crusade struck him as only
 slightly more sordid than the ten Crusades for grown-ups. O'Hare read this handsome
 passage out loud: 
  History in her solemn page informs us that the Crusaders were but ignorant and savage
 men, that their motives were those of bigotry unmitigated, and that their pathway was one
 of blood and rears. Romance, on the other hand, dilates upon their piety and heroism,
 and portrays, in her most glowing and impassioned hues, their virtue and magnanimity,
 the imperishable honor they acquired for themselves, and the great services they rendered
 to Christianity.
  And then O'Hare read this: Now what was the grand result of all these struggles?
 Europe expended millions of her treasures, and the blood of two million of her people;
 and a handful of quarrelsome knights retained possession of Palestine for about one
 hundred years!
  Mackay told us that the Children's Crusade started in 1213, when two monks got the
 idea of raising armies of children in Germany and France, and selling them in North
 Africa as slaves. Thirty thousand children volunteered, thinking they were going to
 Palestine. They were no doubt idle and deserted children who generally swarm in great
 cities, nurtured on vice and daring, said Mackay, and ready for anything.
  Pope Innocent the Third thought they were going to Palestine, too, and he was thrilled.
 'These children are awake while we are asleep!' he said.
  Most of the children were shipped out of Marseilles, and about half of them drowned
 in shipwrecks. The other half got to North Africa where they were sold.
  Through a misunderstanding, some children reported for duty at Genoa, where no slave
 ships were waiting. They were fed and sheltered and questioned kindly by good people
 there-then given a little money and a lot of advice and sent back home.
  'Hooray for the good people of Genoa,' said Mary O'Hare.
  I slept that night in one of the children's bedrooms. O'Hare had put a book for me on
 the bedside table. It was Dresden, History, Stage and Gallery, by Mary Endell. It was
 published in 1908, and its introduction began
  It is hoped that this little book will make itself useful. It attempts to give to an
 English-reading public a bird's-eye view of how Dresden came to look as it does,
 architecturally; of how it expanded musically, through the genius of a few men, to its
 present bloom; and it calls attention to certain permanent landmarks in art that make its
 Gallery the resort of those seeking lasting impressions.
  I read some history further on
  Now, in 1760, Dresden underwent siege by the Prussians. On the fifteenth of July
 began the cannonade. The Picture-Gallery took fire. Many of the paintings had been
 transported to -the Konigstein, but some were seriously injured by splinters of
 bombshells-notably Francia's 'Baptism of Christ.' Furthermore, the stately Kreuzkirche
 tower, from which the enemy's movements had been watched day and night, stood in
 flames. It later succumbed. In sturdy contrast with the pitiful fate of the Kreuzkirche,
 stood the Frauenkirche, from the curves of whose stone dome the Prussian bombs -
 rebounded like rain. Friederich was obliged finally to give up the siege, because he
 learned of the fall of Glatz, the critical point of his new conquests. 'We must be off to
 Silesia, so that we do not lose everything.'
  The devastation of Dresden was boundless. When Goethe as a young student visited
 the city, he still found sad ruins 'Von der Kuppel der Frauenkirche sah ich these leidigen
 Trümmer zwischen die schone stddtische Ordnung hineingesät; da rühmte mir der Kiister 
 die Kunst des Baumeisters, welcher Kirche und Kuppel auf einen so unerüinschten Fall
 schon eingeyichtet und bombenfest erbaut hatte. Der gute Sakristan deutete mir alsdann
 auf Ruinen nach allen Seiten und sagte bedenklich lakonisch: Das hat her Feind Gethan!'
  The two little girls and I crossed the Delaware River where George Washington had
 crossed it, the next morning. We went to the New York World's Fair, saw what the past
 had been like, according to the Ford Motor Car Company and Walt Disney, saw what the
 future would be like, according to General Motors.
  And I asked myself about the present: how wide it was, how deep it was, how much
 was mine to keep.
  I taught creative writing in the famous Writers Workshop at the University of Iowa for
 a couple of years after that. I got into some perfectly beautiful trouble, got out of it again.
 I taught in the afternoons. In the mornings I wrote. I was not be disturbed. I was working
 on my famous book about Dresden.
  And somewhere in there a nice man named Seymour Lawrence gave me a three-book
 contract, and I said, 'O.K., the first of the three will be my famous book about Dresden.'
  The friends of Seymour Lawrence call him 'Sam.' And I say to Sam now: 'Sam-here's
 the book.'
  It is so short and jumbled and jangled, Sam, because there is nothing intelligent to say
 about a massacre. Everybody is supposed to be dead, to never say anything or want
 anything ever again. Everything is supposed to be very quiet after a massacre, and it
 always is, except for the birds.
  And what do the birds say? All there is to say about a massacre, things like 'Poo-teeweet?'
 
  I have told my sons that they are not under any circumstances to take part in
 massacres, and that the news of massacres of enemies is not to fill them with satisfaction
 or glee.
  I have also told them not to work for companies which make massacre machinery, and
 to express contempt for people who think we need machinery like that.
  As I've said I recently went back to Dresden with my friend O'Hare. We had a million
 laughs in Hamburg and West Berlin and East Berlin and Vienna and Salzburg and
 Helsinki, and in Leningrad, too. It was very good for me, because I saw a lot of authentic
 backgrounds for made-up stories which I will write later on. One of them will be Russian
 Baroque and another will be No Kissing and another will be Dollar Bar and another will
 be If the Accident Will, and so on.
  And so on.
  There was a Lufthansa plane that was supposed to fly from Philadelphia to Boston to
 Frankfurt. O'Hare was supposed to get on in Philadelphia and I was supposed to get on in
 Boston, and off we'd go. But Boston was socked in, so the plane flew straight to
 Frankfurt from Philadelphia. And I became a non-person in the Boston Fog, and 
 Lufthansa put me in a limousine with some other non-persons and sent us to a motel for a
 non-night.
  The time would not pass. Somebody was playing with the clocks, and not only with the
 electric clocks, but the wind-up kind, too. The second hand on my watch would twitch
 once, and a year would pass, and then it would twitch again.
  There was nothing I could do about it. As an Earthling., I had to believe whatever
 clocks said-and calendars.
  I had two books with me, which I'd meant to read on the plane. One was Words for the
 Wind, by Theodore Roethke, and this is what I found in there:
 I wake to steep, and take my waking slow.
 I feet my late in what I cannot fear.
 I learn by going where I have to go.
  My other book was Erika Ostrovsky's Céline and His Vision. Céline was a brave
 French soldier in the First World War-until his skull was cracked. After that he couldn't
 sleep, and there were noises in his head. He became a doctor, and he treated poor people
 in the daytime, and he wrote grotesque novels all night. No art is possible without a dance
 with death, he wrote.
  The truth is death, he wrote. I've fought nicely against it as long as I could ... danced
 with it, festooned it, waltzed it around ... decorated it with streamers, titillated it...
 Time obsessed him. Miss Ostrovsky reminded me of the amazing scene in Death on the
 Installment Plan where Céline wants to stop the bustling of a street crowd. He screams on
 paper, Make them stop ... don't let them move anymore at all ... There, make them freeze
 ... once and for all! ... So that they won't disappear anymore!
  I looked through the Gideon Bible in my motel room for tales of great destruction. The
 sun was risen upon the Earth when Lot entered into Zo-ar, I read. Then the Lord rained
 upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah brimstone and fire from the Lord out of Heaven; and
 He overthrew those cities, and all the plain, and all the inhabitants of the cities, and that
 which grew upon the ground.
  So it goes.
  Those were vile people in both those cities, as is well known. The world was better off
 without them.
  And Lot's wife, of course, was told not to look back where all those people and their
 homes had been. But she did look back, and I love her for that, because it was so human.
  She was turned to a pillar of salt. So it goes.
  People aren't supposed to look back. I'm certainly not going to do it anymore.
  I've finished my war book now. The next one I write is going to be fun.
  This one is a failure, and had to be, since it was written by a pillar of salt. It begins
 like this:
  Listen:
  Billy Pilgrim has come unstuck in time.
  It ends like this:
  Poo-tee-weet?
 Two 
 Listen:
  Billy Pilgrim has come unstuck in time.
  Billy has gone to sleep a senile widower and awakened on his wedding day. He has
 walked through a door in 1955 and come out another one in 1941. He has gone back
 through that door to find himself in 1963. He has seen his birth and death many times, he
 says, and pays random visits to all the events in between.
  He says.
  Billy is spastic in time, has no control over where he is going next, and the trips aren't
 necessarily fun. He is 'm a constant state of stage fright, he says, because he never knows
 what part of his life he is going to have to act in next.
  Billy was bon in 1922 in Ilium, New York, the only child of a barber there. He was a
 funny-looking child who became a funny-looking youth-tall and weak, and shaped like a
 bottle of Coca-Cola. He graduated from Ilium High School in the upper third of his class,
 and attended night sessions at the Ilium School of Optometry for one semester before
 being drafted for military service in the Second World War. His father died in a hunting
 accident during the war. So it goes.
  Billy saw service with the infantry in Europe, and was taken prisoner by the Germans.
 After his honorable discharge from the Army in 1945, Billy again enrolled in the Ilium
 School of Optometry. During his senior year there, he became engaged to the daughter
 of the founder and owner of the school, and then suffered a mild nervous collapse.
  He was treated in a veterans' hospital near Lake Placid, and was given shock
 treatments and released. He married his fiancée, finished his education, and was set up in
 business in Ilium by his father-in-law. Ilium is a particularly good city for optometrists
 because the General Forge and Foundry Company is there. Every employee is required
 to own a pair of safety glasses, and to wear them in areas where manufacturing is going
 on. GF&F has sixty-eight thousand employees in Ilium. That calls for a lot of lenses and
 a lot of frames.
  Frames are where the money is.
  Bill became rich. He had two children, Barbara and Robert. In time, his daughter
 Barbara married another optometrist., and Billy set him up in business. Billy's son Robert
 had a lot of trouble in high school, but then he joined the famous Green Berets. He
 straightened out, became a fine Young man, and he fought in Vietnam.
  Early in 1968, a group of optometrists, with Billy among them, chartered an airplane to
 fly them from Ilium to an international convention of optometrists in Montreal. The plane
 crashed on top of Sugarbush Mountain, in Vermont. Everybody was killed but Billy. So
 it goes.
  While Billy was recuperating in a hospital in Vermont, his wife died accidentally of
 carbon-monoxide poisoning. So it goes.
  When Billy finally got home to Ilium after the airplane crash, he was quiet for a while.
 He had a terrible scar across the top Of his skull. He didn't resume practice. He had a
 housekeeper. His daughter came over almost every day.
  And then, without any warning, Billy went to New York City, and got on an all-night
 radio program devoted to talk. He told about having come unstuck in time. He said, too,
 that he had been kidnapped by a flying saucer in 1967. The saucer was from the planet
 Tralfamadore, he said. He was taken to Tralfamadore, where he was displayed naked in a 
 zoo, he said. He was mated there with a former Earthling movie star named Montana
 Wildhack.
  Some night owls in Ilium heard Billy on the radio, and one of them called Billy's
 daughter Barbara. Barbara was upset. She and her husband went down to New York and
 brought Billy home. Billy insisted mildly that everything he had said on the radio was
 true. He said he had been kidnapped by the Tralfamadorians on the night of his daughter's
 wedding. He hadn't been missed, he said, because the Tralfamadorians had taken him
 through a time warp, so that he could be on Tralfamadore for years, and still be away
 from Earth for only a microsecond.
  Another month went by without incident, and then Billy wrote a letter to the Ilium
 News Leader, which the paper published. It described the creatures from Tralfamadore.
  The letter said that they were two feet high, and green., and shaped like plumber's
 friends. Their suction cups were on the ground, and their shafts, which were extremely
 flexible, usually pointed to the sky. At the top of each shaft was a little hand with a green
 eye in its palm. The creatures were friendly, and they could see in four dimensions. They
 pitied Earthlings for being able to see only three. They had many wonderful things to
 teach Earthlings, especially about time. Billy promised to tell what some of those
 wonderful things were in his next letter.
  Billy was working on his second letter when the first letter was published. The second
 letter started out like this:
  'The most important thing I learned on Tralfamadore was that when a person dies he
 only appears to die. He is still very much alive in the past, so it is very silly for people to
 cry at his funeral. All moments, past, present and future, always have existed, always will
 exist. The Tralfamadorians can look at all the different moments just that way we can
 look at a stretch of the Rocky Mountains, for instance. They can see how permanent all
 the moments are, and they can look at any moment that interests them. It is just an
 illusion we have here on Earth that one moment follows another one, like beads on a
 string, and that once a moment is gone it is gone forever.
  'When a Tralfamadorian sees a corpse, all he thinks is that the dead person is in a bad
 condition in that particular moment, but that the same person is just fine in plenty of other
 moments. Now, when I myself hear that somebody is dead, I simply shrug and say what
 the Tralfamadorians say about dead people, which is "so it goes."'
  And so on.
  Billy was working on this letter in the basement rumpus room of his empty house. It
 was his housekeeper's day off. There was an old typewriter in the rumpus room. It was a
 beast. It weighed as much as a storage battery. Billy couldn't carry it very far very easily,
 which was why he was writing in the rumpus room instead of somewhere else.
  The oil burner had quit. A mouse had eaten through the insulation of a wire leading to
 the thermostat. The temperature in the house was down to fifty degrees, but Billy hadn't
 noticed. He wasn't warmly dressed, either. He was barefoot, and still in his pajamas and a
 bathrobe, though it was late afternoon. His bare feet were blue and ivory.
 The cockles of Billy's heart, at any rate, were glowing coals. What made them so hot was
 Billy's belief that he was going to comfort so many people with the truth about time. His 
 door chimes upstairs had been ringing and ringing. It was his daughter Barbara up there
 wanting in. Now she let herself in with a key, crossed the floor over his head calling,
 'Father? Daddy, where are you?' And so on.
  Billy didn't answer her, so she was nearly hysterical, expecting to find his corpse. And
 then she looked into the very last place there was to look-which was the rumpus room.
  'Why didn't you answer me when I called?' Barbara wanted to know, standing there in
 the door of the rumpus room. She had the afternoon paper with her, the one in which
 Billy described his friends from Tralfamadore.
  'I didn't hear you,' said Billy.
  The orchestration of the moment was this: Barbara was only twenty-one years old, but
 she thought her father was senile, even though he was only forty-six-senile because of
 damage to his brain in the airplane crash. She also thought that she was head of the
 family, since she had had to manage her mother's funeral, since she had to get a
 housekeeper for Billy, and all that. Also, Barbara and her husband were having to look
 after Billy's business interests, which were considerable, since Billy didn't seem to give a
 damn for business any more. All this responsibility at such an early age made her a bitchy
 flibbertigibbet. And Billy, meanwhile, was trying to hang onto his dignity, to persuade
 Barbara and everybody else that he was far from senile, that, on the contrary, he was
 devoting himself to a calling much higher than mere business.
  He was doing nothing less now, he thought, then prescribing corrective lenses for
 Earthling souls. So many of those souls were lost and wretched, Billy believed, because
 they could not see as well as Ws little green friends on Tralfamadore.
  'Don't lie to me, Father,' said Barbara. 'I know perfectly well you heard me when I
 called.' This was a fairly pretty girl, except that she had legs like an Edwardian grand
 piano. Now she raised hell with him about the letter in the paper. She said he was making
 a laughing stock of himself and everybody associated with him.
  'Father, Father, Father,' said Barbara, 'what are we going to do with you? Are you
 going to force us to put you where your mother is?' Billy's mother was still alive. She was
 in bed in an old people's home called Pine Knoll on the edge of Ilium.
  'What is it about my letter that makes you so mad?' Billy wanted to know.
  'It's all just crazy. None of it's true! '
  'It's all true. ' Bill's anger was not going to rise with hers. He never got mad at
 anything. He was wonderful that way.
  'There is no such planet as Tralfamadore.'
 'It can't be detected from Earth, if that's what you mean,' said Billy. 'Earth can't be
 detected from Tralfamadore, as far as that goes. They're both very small. They're very far
 apart.'
  'Where did you get a crazy name like "Tralfamadore?"'
  'That's what the creatures who live there call it.
  'Oh God,' said Barbara, and she turned her back on him. She celebrated frustration by
 clapping her hands. 'May I ask you a simple question?'
  'Of course.'
  'Why is it you never mentioned any of this before the airplane crash?'
  'I didn't think the time was ripe.' 
  And so on. Billy says that he first came unstuck in time in 1944, long before his trip to
 Tralfamadore. The Tralfamadorians didn't have anything to do with his coming unstuck
 They were simply able to give him insights into what was really going on.
  Billy first came unstuck while the Second World War was in progress. Billy was a
 chaplain's assistant in the war. A chaplain's assistant is customarily a figure of fun in the
 American Army. Billy was no exception. He was powerless to harm the enemy or to help
 his friends. In fact, he had no friends. He was a valet to a preacher, expected no
 promotions or medals, bore no arms, and had a meek faith in a loving Jesus which most
 soldiers found putrid.
  While on maneuvers in South Carolina, Billy played hymns he knew from childhood,
 played them on a little black organ which was waterproof. It had thirty-nine keys and two
 stops- vox humana and vox celeste. Billy also had charge of a portable altar, an olivedrab
 attaché case with telescoping legs. It was lined with crimson plush, and nestled in
 that passionate plush were an anodized aluminum cross and a Bible.
  The altar and the organ were made by a vacuum-cleaner company in Camden, New
 Jersey-and said so.
  One time on maneuvers Billy was playing 'A Mighty Fortress Is Our God,' with music
 by Johann Sebastian Bach and words by Martin Luther. It was Sunday morning. Billy and
 his chaplain had gathered a congregatation of about fifty soldiers on a Carolina hillside.
 An umpire appeared. There were umpires everywhere, men who said who was winning
 or losing the theoretical battle, who was alive and who was dead.
  The umpire had comical news. The congregation had been theoretically spotted from
 the air by a theoretical enemy. They Were all theoretically dead now. The theoretical
 corpses laughed and ate a hearty noontime meal.
  Remembering this incident years later, Billy was struck by what a Tralfamadorian
 adventure with death that had been, to be dead and to eat at the same time.
  Toward the end of maneuvers., Billy was given an emergency furlough home because
 his father, a barber in Ilium, New York, was shot dead by a friend while they were out
 hunting deer. So it goes.
  When Billy got back from his furlough., there were orders for him to go overseas. He
 was needed in the headquarters company of an infantry regiment fighting in
 Luxembourg. The regimental chaplain's assistant had been killed in action. So it goes.
  When Billy joined the regiment, it was in the process of being destroyed by the
 Germans in the famous Battle of the Bulge. Billy never even got to meet the chaplain he
 was supposed to assist, was never even issued a steel helmet and combat boots. This was
 in December of 1944, during the last mighty German attack of the war.
  Billy survived, but he was a dazed wanderer far behind the new German lines. Three
 other wanderers, not quite so dazed, allowed Billy to tag along. Two of them were scouts,
 and one was an antitank gunner. They were without food or maps. Avoiding Germans
 they were delivering themselves into rural silences ever more profound. They ate snow. 
  They went Indian file. First came the scouts, clever, graceful quiet. They had rifles.
 Next came the antitank gunner, clumsy and dense, warning Germans away with a Colt
 .45 automatic in one hand and a trench knife in the other.
  Last came Billy Pilgrim, empty-handed, bleakly ready for death. Billy was
 Preposterous-six feet and three inches tall, with a chest and shoulders like a box of
 kitchen matches. He had no helmet, no overcoat, no weapon and no boots. On his feet
 were cheap, low-cut civilian shoes which he had bought for his father's funeral. Billy had
 lost a heel, which made him bob up-and-down, up-and-down. The involuntary dancing up
 and down, up and down, made his hip joints sore.
  Billy was wearing a thin field jacket, a shirt and trousers of scratchy wool, and long
 underwear that was soaked with sweat. He was the only one of the four who had a beard.
 It was a random, bristly beard, and some of the bristles were white, even though Billy
 was only twenty-one years old. He was also going bald. Wind and cold and violent
 exercise had turned his face crimson.
  He didn't look like a soldier at all. He looked like a filthy flamingo.
  And on the third day of wandering, somebody shot at the four from far away-shot four
 times as they crossed a narrow brick road. One shot was for the scouts. The next one was
 for the antitank gunner, whose name was Roland Weary.
  The third bullet was for the filthy flamingo, who stopped dead center in the road when
 the lethal bee buzzed past his ear. Billy stood there politely, giving the marksman another
 chance. It was his addled understanding of the rules of warfare that the marksman should
 be given a second chance. The next shot missed Billy's kneecaps by inches, going endon-end,
 from the sound of it.
  Roland Weary and the scouts were safe in a ditch, and Weary growled at Billy, 'Get
 out of the road, you dumb motherfucker.' The last word was still a novelty in the speech
 of white people in 1944. It was fresh and astonishing to Billy, who had never fucked
 anybody-and it did its job. It woke him up and got him off the road.
  'Saved your life again, you dumb bastard,' Weary said to Billy in the ditch. He had
 been saving Billy's fife for days, cursing him, kicking him, slapping him, making him
 move. It was absolutely necessary that cruelty be used, because Billy wouldn't do
 anything to save himself. Billy wanted to quit. He was cold, hungry, embarrassed,
 incompetent. He could scarcely distinguish between sleep and wakefulness now, on the
 third day, found no important differences either, between walking and standing still.
  He wished everybody would leave him alone. 'You guys go on without me,' he said
 again and again.
  Weary was as new to war as Billy. He was a replacement, too. As a part of a gun crew,
 he had helped to fire one shot in anger-from a 57-millimeter antitank gun. The gun made
 a ripping sound like the opening of a zipper on the fly of God Almighty. The gun lapped
 up snow and vegetation with a blowtorch feet long. The flame left a black arrow on the
 ground, showing the Germans exactly where the gun was hidden. The shot was a miss.
  What had been missed was a Tiger tank. It swiveled its 88-millimeter snout around
 sniffingly, saw the arrow on the ground. It fired. It killed everybody on the gun crew but
 Weary. So it goes. 
  Roland Weary was only eighteen, was at the end of an unhappy childhood spent
 mostly in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. He had been unpopular in Pittsburgh. He had been
 unpopular because he was stupid and fat and mean, and smelled like bacon no matter how
 much he washed. He was always being ditched in Pittsburgh by people who did not want
 him with them.
  It made Weary sick to be ditched. When Weary was ditched, le would find somebody
 who was even more unpopular than himself, and he would horse around with that person
 for a while, pretending to be friendly. And then he would find some pretext for beating
 the shit out of him.
  It was a pattern. It was a crazy, sexy, murderous relationship Weary entered into with
 people he eventually beat up. He told hem about his father's collection of guns and
 swords and torture instruments and leg irons and so on. Weary's father, who was a
 plumber, actually did collect such things, and his collection was insured for four thousand
 dollars. He wasn't alone. He belonged to a big club composed of people who collected
 things like that.
  Weary's father once gave Weary's mother a Spanish thumbscrew in - working
 condition-for a kitchen paperweight. Another time he gave her a table lamp whose base
 was a model one foot high of the famous 'Iron Maiden of Nuremburg.' The real Iron
 Maiden was a medieval torture instrument, a sort of boiler which was shaped like a
 woman on the outside-and lined with spikes. The front of the woman was composed of
 two hinged doors. The idea was to put a criminal inside and then close the doors slowly.
 There were two special spikes where his eyes would be. There was a drain in the bottom
 to let out all the blood.
  So it goes.
  Weary had told Billy Pilgrim about the Iron Maiden, about the drain in the bottom-and
 what that was for. He had talked to Billy about dum-dums. He told him about his father's
 Derringer pistol, which could be carried in a vest pocket, which was yet capable of
 making a hole in a man 'which a bull bat could fly through without touching either wing.'
  Weary scornfully bet Billy one time that he didn't even know what a blood gutter was.
 Billy guessed that it was the drain in the bottom of the Iron Maiden, but that was wrong.
 A blood gutter, Billy learned, was the shallow groove in the side of the blade of a sword
 or bayonet.
  Weary told Billy about neat tortures he'd read about or seen in the movies or heard on
 the radio-about other neat tortures he himself had invented. One of the inventions was
 sticking a dentist's drill into a guy's ear. He asked Billy what he thought the worst form of
 execution was. Billy had no opinion. The correct answer turned out to be this: 'You stake
 a guy out on an anthill in the desert-see? He's face upward, and you put honey all over his
 balls and pecker, and you cut off his eyelids so he has to stare at the sun till he dies.' So it
 goes.
  Now, lying in the ditch with Billy and the scouts after having been shot at, Weary
 made Billy take a very close look at his trench knife. It wasn't government issue. It was a
 present from his father. It had a ten-inch blade that was triangular 'in 'cross section. Its
 grip consisted of brass knuckles, was a chain of rings through which Weary slipped his
 stubby fingers. The rings weren't simple. They bristled with spikes. 
  Weary laid the spikes along Billy's cheek, roweled the cheek with savagely
 affectionate restraint. 'How'd you-like to be hit with this-hm? Hmmmmmmmmm?' he
 wanted to know.
  'I wouldn't,' said Billy.
  'Know why the blade's triangular?'
  'No.'
  'Makes a wound that won't close up.'
  'Oh.'
  'Makes a three-sided hole in a guy. You stick an ordinary knife in a guy-makes a slit.
 Right? A slit closes right up. Right?
  'Right.'
  'Shit. What do you know? What the hell they teach you in college?'
  'I wasn't there very long.' said Billy, which was true. He had had only six months of
 college and the college hadn't been a regular college, either. It had been the night school
 of the Ilium School of Optometry.
  "Joe College,' said Weary scathingly.
  Billy shrugged.
  'There's more to life than what you read in books.' said Weary. 'You'll find that out.'
  Billy made no reply to this, either, there in the ditch, since he didn't want the
 conversation to go on any longer than necessary. He was dimly tempted to say, though,
 that he knew a thing or two about gore. Billy, after all, had contemplated torture and
 hideous wounds at the beginning and the end of nearly every day of his childhood. Billy
 had an extremely gruesome crucifix hanging on the wall of his little bedroom in Ilium. A
 military surgeon would have admired the clinical fidelity of the artist's rendition of all
 Christ's wounds-the spear wound, the thorn wounds, the holes that were made by the iron
 spikes. Billy's Christ died horribly. He was pitiful.
  So it goes.
  Billy wasn't a Catholic, even though he grew up with a ghastly crucifix on the wall.
 His father had no religion. His mother was a substitute organist for several churches
 around town. She took Billy with her whenever she played, taught him to play a little,
 too. She said she was going to join a church as soon as she decided which one was right.
  She never did decide. She did develop a terrific hankering for a crucifix, though. And
 she bought one from a Sante Fé gift shop during a trip the little family made out West
 during the Great Depression. Like so many Americans, she was trying to construct a life
 that made sense from things she found in gift shops.
  And the crucifix went up on the wall of Billy Pilgrim.
  The two scouts, loving the walnut stocks of their rifles in the ditch, whispered that it
 was time to move out again. Ten minutes had gone by without anybody's coming to see if
 they were hit or not, to finish them off. Whoever had shot was evidently far away and all
 alone.
  And the four crawled out of the ditch without drawing any more fire. They crawled
 into a forest like the big, unlucky mammals they were. Then they stood up and began to
 walk quickly. The forest was dark and cold. The pines were planted in ranks and files.
 There was no undergrowth. Four inches of unmarked snow blanketed the ground. The 
 Americans had no choice but to leave trails in the show as unambiguous as diagrams in a
 book on ballroom dancing-step, slide, rest-step, slide,-rest.
 
  'Close it up and keep it closed!' Roland Weary warned Billy Pilgrim as they moved out.
 Weary looked like Tweedledum or Tweedledee, all bundled up for battle. He was short
 and thick.
  He had every piece of equipment he had ever been issued, every present he'd received
 from home: helmet, helmet liner, wool cap, scarf, gloves, cotton undershirt, woolen
 undershirt, wool shirt, sweater, blouse, jacket, overcoat, cotton underpants, woolen
 underpants, woolen trousers, cotton socks, woolen socks, combat boots, gas mask,
 canteen, mess kit, first-aid kit, trench knife, blanket, shelter-half , raincoat, bulletproof
 Bible, a pamphlet entitled 'Know Your Enemy,' another pamphlet entitled 'Why We
 Fight' and another pamphlet of German phrases rendered in English phonetics,, which
 would enable Weary to ask Germans questions such as 'Where is your headquarters?' and
 'How many howitzers have you?' Or to tell them, 'Surrender. Your situation is hopeless,'
 and so on.
  Weary had a block of balsa wood which was supposed to be a foxhole pillow. He had a
 prophylactic kit containing two tough condoms 'For the Prevention of Disease Only!' He
 had a whistle he wasn't going to show anybody until he got promoted to corporal. He had
 a dirty picture of a woman attempting sexual intercourse with a Shetland pony. He had
 made Billy Pilgrim admire that picture several times.
  The woman and the pony were posed before velvet draperies which were fringed with
 deedlee-balls. They were flanked by Doric columns. In front of one column was a potted
 palm. The Picture that Weary had was a print of the first dirty photograph in history. The
 word photography was first used in 1839, and it was in that year, too, that Louis J. M.
 Daguerre revealed to the French Academy that an image formed on a silvered metal plate
 covered with a thin film of silver iodide could be developed in the presence of mercury
 vapor.
  In 1841, only two years later, an assistant to Daguerre, André Le Fèvre, was arrested in
 the Tuileries Gardens for attempting to sell a gentleman a picture of the woman and the
 pony. That was where Weary bought his picture,, too-in the Tuileries. Le Fèvre argued
 that the picture was fine art, and that his intention was to make Greek mythology come
 alive. He said that columns and the potted palm proved that.
  When asked which myth he meant to represent, Le Fèvre, replied that there were
 thousands of myths like that, with the woman a mortal and the pony a god.
  He was sentenced to six months in prison. He died there of pneumonia. So it goes.
  Billy and the Scouts were skinny people. Roland Weary had fat to burn. He was a
 roaring furnace under all his layers of wool and straps and canvas. He had so much
 energy that he bustled back and forth between Billy and the scouts, delivering dumb
 messages which nobody had sent and which nobody was pleased to receive. He also
 began to suspect, since he was so much busier than anybody else, that he was the leader.
  He was so hot and bundled up, in fact, that he had no sense of danger. His vision of the
 outside world was limited to what he could see through a narrow slit between the rim of
 his helmet and his scarf from home, which concealed his baby face from the bridge of his 
 nose on down. He was so snug in there that he was able to pretend that he was safe at
 home, having survived the war, and that he was telling his parents and his sister a true
 war story-whereas the true war story was still going on.
  Weary's version of the true war story went like this: There was a big German attack,
 and Weary and his antitank buddies fought like hell until everybody was killed but
 Weary. So it goes. And then Weary tied in with two scouts, and they became close
 friends immediately, and they decided to fight them way back to their own lines. They
 were going to travel fast. They were damned if they'd surrender. They shook hands all
 around. They called themselves 'The Three Musketeers.'
  But then this damn college kid, who was so weak he shouldn't even have been in the
 army, asked if he could come along. He didn't even have a gun or a knife. He didn't even
 have a helmet or a cap. He couldn't even walk right-kept bobbing up-and down, up-anddown,
 driving everybody crazy, giving their position away. He was pitiful. The Three
 Musketeers pushed and carried and dragged the college kid all the way back to their own
 lines, Weary's story went. They saved his God-damned hide for him.
  In. real life, Weary was retracing his steps, trying to find out what had happened to
 Billy. He had told the scouts to wait while he went back for the college bastard. He
 passed under a low branch now. It hit the top of his helmet with a clonk. Weary didn't
 hear it. Somewhere a big dog was barking. Weary didn't hear that, either. His war story
 was at a very exciting point. An officer was congratulating the Three Musketeers, telling
 them that he was going to put them in for Bronze Stars.
  'Anything else I can do for you boys?' said the officer.
  'Yes, sir,' said one of the scouts. 'We'd like to stick together for the rest of the war, sir.
 Is there some way you can fix it so nobody will ever break up the Three Musketeers?'
  Billy Pilgrim had stopped in the forest. He was leaning against a tree with his eyes
 closed. His head was tilted back and his nostrils were flaring. He was like a poet in the
 Parthenon.
  This was when Billy first came unstuck in time. His attention began to swing grandly
 through the full arc of his life, passing into death, which was violet light. There wasn't
 anybody else there, or any thing. There was just violet light and a hum.
 And then Billy swung into life again, going backwards until he was in pre-birth, which
 was red light and bubbling sounds. And then he swung into life again and stopped. He
 was a little boy taking a shower with his hairy father at the Ilium Y.M.C.A. He smelled
 chlorine from the swimming pool next door, heard the springboard boom.
  Little Billy was terrified, because his father had said Billy was going to learn to swim
 by the method of sink-or-swim. Ms father was going to throw Billy into the deep end, and
 Billy was going to damn well swim.
  It was like an execution. Billy was numb as his father carried him from the shower
 room to the pool. His eyes were closed. When he opened his eyes, he was on the bottom
 of the pool, and there was beautiful music everywhere. He lost consciousness, but the
 music went on. He dimly sensed that somebody was rescuing him. Billy resented that.
  From there he traveled in time to 1965. He was forty-one years old, and he was visiting
 his decrepit mother at Pine Knoll, an old people's home he had put her in only a month
 before. She had caught pneumonia, and wasn't expected to live. She did live, though, for
 years after that. 
  Her voice was nearly gone, so, in order to hear her, Billy had to put his ear right next to
 her papery lips. She evidently had something very important to say.
  'How ...?' she began, and she stopped. She was too tired. She hoped that she wouldn’t
 have to say the rest of the sentence, and that Billy would finish it for her
  But Billy had no idea what was on her mind. 'How what, Mother?' he prompted.
  She swallowed hard, shed some tears. Then she gathered energy from all over her
 ruined body, even from her toes and fingertips. At last she bad accumulated enough to
 whisper this complete sentence:
  'How did I get so old? '
  Billy's antique mother passed out, and Billy was led from the room by a pretty nurse.
 The body of an old man covered by a sheet was wheeled by just as Billy entered the
 corridor. The man had been a famous marathon runner in his day. So it goes. This was
 before Billy had his head broken in an airplane crash, by the way-before he became so
 vocal about flying saucers and traveling in time.
  Billy sat down in a waiting room. He wasn't a widower yet. He sensed something hard
 under the cushion of his overstuffed chair. He dug it out, discovered that it was a book,
 The Execution of Private Slovik, by William Bradford Huie. It was a true account of the
 death before an American fixing squad of private Eddie D. Slovik, 36896415, the only
 American soldier to be shot for cowardice since the Civil War. So it goes.
  Billy read the opinion of a staff judge advocate who reviewed Slovik's case, which
 ended like this: He has directly challenged the authority of the government, and future
 discipline depends upon a resolute reply to this challenge. If the death penalty is ever to
 be imposed for desertion, it should be imposed in this case, not as a punitive measure nor
 as retribution, but to maintain that discipline upon which alone an army can succeed
 against the enemy. There was no recommendation for clemency in the case and none is
 here recommended. So it goes.
  Billy blinked in 1965, traveled in time to 1958. He was at a banquet in honour of a
 Little League team of which his son Robert was a member. The coach, who had never
 been married, was speaking. He was all choked up. 'Honest to God,' he was Saying, 'I'd
 consider it an honor just to be water boy for these kids.'
  Billy blinked in 1958, traveled in time to 1961. It was New Year's Eve, and Billy was
 disgracefully drunk at a party where everybody was in optometry or married to an
 optometrist.
  Billy usually didn't drink much, because the war had ruined his stomach, but he
 certainly had a snootful now, and he was being unfaithful to his wife Valencia for the
 first and only time. He had somehow persuaded a woman to come into the laundry room
 of the house, and then sit up on the gas dryer, which was running.
  The woman was very drunk herself, and she helped Billy get her girdle off. 'What was
 it you wanted to talk about?' she said.
  'It's all night,' said Billy. He honestly thought it was all right. He couldn't remember the
 name of the woman.
  'How come they call you Billy instead of William?' 
  'Business reasons,' said Billy. That was true. His father-in-law, who owned the Ilium
 School of Optometry, who had set Billy up in practice, was a genius in his field. He told
 Billy to encourage people to call him Billy-because it would stick in their memories. It
 would also make him seem slightly magical, since there weren't any other grown Billys
 around. It also compelled people to think of him as a friend right away.
  Somewhere in there was an awful scene, with people expressing disgust for Billy and
 the woman, and Billy found himself out in his automobile, trying to find the steering
 wheel.
  The main thing now was to find the steering wheel. At first, Billy windmilled his arms,
 hoping to find it by luck. When that didn't work, he became methodical, working in such
 a way that the wheel could not possibly escape him. He placed himself hard against the
 left-hand door, searched every square inch of the area before him. When he failed to find
 the wheel, he moved over six inches, and searched again. Amazingly, he was eventually
 hard against the right-hand door, without having found the wheel. He concluded that
 somebody had stolen it. This angered him as he passed out.
  He was in the back seat of his car., which was why he couldn't find the steering wheel.
  Now somebody was shaking Billy awake. Billy stiff felt drunk, was still angered by the
 stolen steering wheel. He was back in the Second World War again, behind the German
 lines. The person who was shaking him was Roland Weary. Weary had gathered the front
 of Billy's field jacket into his hands. He banged Billy against a tree, then puffed him
 away from it, flung him in the direction he was supposed to take under his own power.
  Billy stopped, shook his head. 'You go on,' he said.
  'What? '
  'You guys go on without me. I'm all right.'
  'You're what?'
  'I'm O.K.'
  'Jesus-I'd hate to see somebody sick,' said Weary, through five layers of humid scarf
 from home. Lilly had never seen Weary's face. He had tried to imagine it one time, had
 imagined a toad in a fishbowl.
  Weary kicked and shoved Billy for a quarter of a mile. The scouts were waiting
 between the banks of a frozen creek. They had heard the dog. They had heard men calling
 back and forth, too-calling like hunters who had a pretty good idea of where their quarry
 was.
  The banks of the creek were high enough to allow the scouts, to stand without being
 seen. Billy staggered down the bank ridiculously. After him came Weary, clanking and
 clinking and tinkling and hot.
  'Here he is, boys,' said Weary. 'He don't want to live, but he's gonna live anyway.
 When he gets out of this, by God, he's gonna owe his life to the Three Musketeers. '
  Billy Pilgrim, there in the creekbed, thought he, Billy Pilgrim, was turning to steam
 painlessly. If everybody would leave him alone for just a little while, he thought, he
 wouldn't cause anybody any more trouble. He would turn to steam and float up among
 the treetops.
  Somewhere the big dog barked again. With the help of fear and echoes and winter
 silences, that dog had a voice like a big bronze gong. 
  Roland Weary, eighteen years old, insinuated himself between the scouts, draped a
 heavy arm around the shoulder of each. 'So what do the Three Musketeers do now?' he
 said.
  Billy Pilgrim was having a delightful hallucination. He was wearing dry, warm, white
 sweatsocks, and he was skating on a ballroom floor. Thousands cheered. This wasn't
 time-travel. it had never happened, never would happen. It was the craziness of a dying
 young man with his shoes full of snow.
  One scout hung his head, let spit fall from his lips. The other did the same. They
 studied the infinitesimal effects of spit on snow and history. They were small, graceful
 people. They had been behind German lines before many times- living like woods
 creatures, living from moment to moment in useful terror, thinking brainlessly with their
 spinal cords.
  Now they twisted out from under Weary's loving arms. They told Weary that he and
 Billy had better find somebody to surrender to. The Scouts weren't going to wait for them
 any more.
  And they ditched Weary and Billy in the creekbed.
  Billy Pilgrim went on skating, doing tricks in sweat-socks, tricks that most people
 would consider impossible-making turns, stopping on a dime and so on. The cheering
 went on, but its tone was altered as the hallucination gave way to time-travel.
  Billy stopped skating, found himself at a lectern in a Chinese restaurant in Ilium, New
 York, on an early afternoon in the autumn of 1957. He was receiving a standing ovation
 from the Lions Club. He had just been elected President, and it was necessary that he
 speak. He was scared stiff, thought a ghastly mistake had been made. AR those
 prosperous, solid men out there would discover now that they had elected a ludicrous
 waif. They would hear his reedy voice, the one he'd had in the war. He swallowed, knew
 that all he -had for a voice box was a little whistle cut from a willow switch. Worse-he
 had nothing to say. The crowd quieted down. Everybody was pink and beaming.
  Billy opened his mouth, and out came a deep, resonant tone. His voice was a gorgeous
 instrument. It told jokes which brought down the house. It grew serious, told jokes again,
 and ended on a note of humility. The explanation of the miracle was this: Billy had taken
 a course in public speaking.
  And then he was back in the bed of the frozen creek again. Roland Weary was about to
 beat the living shit out of him.
  Weary was filled with a tragic wrath. He had been ditched again. He stuffed his pistol
 into its holster. He slipped his knife into its scabbard. Its triangular blade and blood
 gutters on all three faces. And then he shook Billy hard, rattled his skeleton, slammed
 him against a bank.
  Weary barked and whimpered through his layers of scarf from home. He spoke
 unintelligibly of the sacrifices he had made on Billy's behalf. He dilated upon the piety
 and heroism of 'The Three Musketeers,' portrayed, in the most glowing and impassioned
 hues, their virtue and magnanimity, the imperishable honor they acquired for themselves,
 and the great services they rendered to Christianity, 
  It was entirely Billy's fault that this fighting organization no longer existed, Weary felt,
 and Billy was going to pay. Weary socked Billy a good one on the side of the jaw,
 knocked Billy away from the bank and onto the snow-covered ice of the creek. Billy was
 down on all fours on the ice, and Weary kicked him in the ribs, rolled him over on his
 side. Billy tried to form himself into a ball.
  'You shouldn't even be in the Army,' said Weary.
  Billy was involuntarily making convulsive sounds that were a lot like laughter. 'You
 think it's funny, huh?' Weary inquired. He walked around to Billy's back. Billy's jacket
 and shirt and undershirt had been hauled up around his shoulders by the violence, so his
 back was naked. There, inches from the tips of Weary's combat boots, were the pitiful
 buttons of Billy's spine.
  Weary drew back his right boot, aimed a kick at the spine, at the tube which had so
 many of Billy's important wires in it. Weary was going to break that tube.
  But then Weary saw that he had an audience. Five German soldiers and a police dog on
 a leash were looking down into the bed of the creek. The soldiers' blue eyes were filled
 with bleary civilian curiosity as to why one American would try to murder another one so
 far from home, and why the victim should laugh.
 Three
 The Germans and the dog were engaged in a military operation which had an amusingly
 self-explanatory name, a human enterprise which is seldom described in detail, whose
 name alone, when reported as news or history, gives many war enthusiasts a sort of postcoital
 satisfaction. It is, in the imagination of combat's fans, the divinely listless loveplay
 that follows the orgasm of victory. It is called 'mopping up.'
  The dog, who had sounded so ferocious in the winter distances, was a female German
 shepherd. She was shivering. Her tail was between her legs. She had been borrowed that
 morning from a farmer. She had never been to war before. She had no idea what game
 was being played. Her mine was Princess.
  Two of the Germans were boys in their early teens. Two were ramshackle old me
 droolers as toothless as carp. They were irregulars, armed and clothed fragmentarily with
 junk taken from real soldiers who were newly dead. So it goes. They were farmers from
 just across the German border, not far away.
  Their commanander was a middle-aged corporal-red-eyed., scrawny, tough as dried
 beef, sick of war. He had been wounded four times-and patched up, and sent back to war.
 He was a very good soldier-about to quit, about to find somebody to surrender to. His
 bandy legs were thrust into golden cavalry boots which he had taken from a dead
 Hungarian colonel on the Russian front. So it goes.
  Those boots were almost all he owned in this world. They were his home. An
 anecdote: One time a recruit was watching him bone and wax those golden boots, and he
 held one up to the recruit and said, 'If you look in there deeply enough, you'll see Adam
 and Eve.'
  Billy Pilgrim had not heard this anecdote. But, lying on the black ice there, Billy stared
 into the patina of the corporal's boots, saw Adam and Eve in the golden depths. They
 were naked. They were so innocent, so vulnerable, so eager to behave decently. Billy
 Pilgrim loved them. 
  Next to the golden boots were a pair of feet which were swaddled in rags. They were
 crisscrossed by canvas straps, were shod with hinged wooden clogs. Billy looked up at
 the face that went with the clogs. It was the face of a blond angel of fifteen-year-old boy.
  The boy was as beautiful as Eve.
  Billy was helped to his feet by the lovely boy, by the heavenly androgyne. And the
 others came forward to dust the snow off Billy., and then they searched him for weapons.
 He didn't have any. The most dangerous thing they found on his person was a two-inch
 pencil stub.
  Three inoffensive bangs came from far away. They came from German rifles. The two
 scouts who had ditched Billy and Weary had just been shot. They had been lying in
 ambush for Germans. They had been discovered and shot from behind. Now they were
 dying in the snow, feeling nothing, turning the snow to the color of raspberry sherbet. So
 it goes. So Roland Weary was the last of the Three Musketeers.
  And Weary, bug-eyed with terror, was being disarmed. The corporal gave Weary's
 pistol to the pretty boy. He marveled at Weary's cruel trench knife, said in German that
 Weary would no doubt like to use the knife on him, to tear his face off with the spiked
 knuckles, to stick the blade into his belly or throat. He spoke no English, and Billy and
 Weary understood no German.
  'Nice playthings you have, the corporal told Weary, and he handed the knife to an old
 man. 'Isn't that a pretty thing? Hmmm?
  He tore open Weary's overcoat and blouse. Brass buttons flew like popcorn. The
 corporal reached into Weary's gaping bosom as though he meant to tear out his pounding
 heart, but he brought out Weary's bulletproof Bible instead.
  A bullet-proof Bible is a Bible small enough to be slipped into a soldier's breast
 pocket, over his heart. It is sheathed in steel.
  The corporal found the dirty picture of the woman and the pony in Weary's hip pocket.
 'What a lucky pony, eh?' he said. "Hmmmm? Hmmmm? Don't you wish you were that
 pony?' He handed the picture to the other old man. 'Spoils of war! It's all yours, you lucky
 lad.'
  Then he made Weary sit down in the snow and take off his combat boots, which he
 gave to the beautiful boy. He gave Weary, the boy's clogs. So Weary and Billy were both
 without decent military footwear now' and they had to walk for miles and miles, with
 Weary's clogs clacking, with Billy bobbing up-and-down, up-and-down, crashing into
 Weary from time to time.
  'Excuse me,' Billy would say, or 'I beg your pardon.'
  They were brought at last to a stone cottage at a fork in the road. It was a collecting
 point for prisoners of war. Billy and Weary were taken inside, where it was warm and
 smoky. There vas a fire sizzling and popping in the fireplace. The fuel was furniture.
 There were about twenty other Americans in there, sitting on the floor with their backs to
 the wall, staring into the flames-thinking whatever there was to think, which was zero.
 Nobody talked. Nobody had any good war stories to tell. 
  Billy and Weary found places for themselves, and Billy went to sleep with his head on
 the shoulder of an unprotesting captain. The captain was a chaplain. He was a rabbi. He
 had been shot through the hand.
  Billy traveled in time, opened his eyes, found himself staring into the glass eyes of a
 jade green mechanical owl. The owl was hanging upside down from a rod of stainless
 steel. The owl was Billy's optometer in his office in Ilium. An optometer is an instrument
 for measuring refractive errors in eyes-in order that corrective lenses may be prescribed.
  Billy had fallen asleep while examining a female patient who was m a chair on the
 other side of the owl. He had fallen asleep at work before. It had been funny at first. Now
 Billy was starting to get worried about it, about his mind in general. He tried to remember
 how old he was, couldn't. He tried to remember what year it was. He couldn't remember
 that, either.
  'Doctor,' said the patient tentatively.
  'Hm?' he said.
  'You're so quiet.'
  'Sorry.'
  'You were talking away there-and then you got so quiet'
  'Um.'
  'You see something terrible?' 'Terrible?'
  'Some disease in my eyes?'
  'No, no,' said Billy, wanting to doze again. 'Your eyes are fine. You just need glasses
 for reading.' He told her to go across the corridor-to see the wide selection of frames
 there.
  When she was gone, Billy opened the drapes and was no wiser as to what was outside.
 The view was still blocked by a venetian blind., which he hoisted clatteringly. Bright
 sunlight came crashing in. There were thousands of parked automobiles out there,
 twinkling on a vast lake of blacktop. Billy's office was part of a suburban shopping
 center.
  Right outside the window was Billy's own Cadillac El Dorado Coupe de Ville. He read
 the stickers on the bumper. 'Visit Ausable Chasm,' said one. 'Support Your Police
 Department,' said another. There was a third. 'Impeach Earl Warren it said. The stickers
 about the police and Earl Warren were gifts from Billy's father-in-law, a member of the
 John Birch Society. The date on the license plate was 1967, which would make Billy
 Pilgrim forty-four years old. He asked himself this: 'Where have all the years gone?'
  Billy turned his attention to his desk. There was an open copy of The Review of
 Optometry there. It was opened to an editorial, which Billy now read, his lips moving
 slightly.
 What happens in 1968 will rule the fare of European optometrists for at least 50 years!
 Billy read. With this warning, Jean Thiriart, Secretary of the National Union of Belgium
 Opticians, is pressing for formation of a 'European Optometry Society.' The alternatives,
 he says, will be the obtaining of Professional status, or, by 1971, reduction to the role of
 spectacle-sellers.
  Billy Pilgrim tried hard to care. 
  A siren went off, scared the hell out of him. He was expecting the Third World War at
 any time. The siren was simply announcing high noon. It was housed in a cupola atop a
 firehouse across the street from Billy's office.
  Billy closed his eyes. When he opened them, he was back in the Second World War
 again. His head was on the wounded rabbi's shoulder. A German was kicking his feet,
 telling him to wake up, that it was time to move on.
  The Americans, with Billy among them, formed a fools' parade on the road outside.
  There was a photographer present, a German war correspondent with a Leica. He took
 pictures of Billy's and Roland Weary's feet. The picture was widely published two days
 later as heartening evidence of how miserably equipped the American Army often was,
 despite its reputation for being rich.
  The photographer wanted something more lively, though, a picture of an actual
 capture. So the guards staged one for him. They threw Billy into shrubbery. When Billy
 came out of the shrubbery, his face wreathed in goofy good will, they menaced him with
 their machine pistols, as though they were capturing him then.
  Billy's smile as he came out of the shrubbery was at least as peculiar as Mona Lisa's,
 for he was simultaneously on foot in Germany in 1944 and riding his Cadillac in 1967.
 Germany dropped away, and 1967 became bright and clear, free of interference from any
 other time. Billy was on his way to a Lions Club luncheon meeting. It was a hot August,
 but Billy's car was air-conditioned. He was stopped by a signal in the middle of Ilium's
 black ghetto. The people who lived here hated it so much that they had burned down a lot
 of it a month before. It was all they had, and they'd wrecked it. The neighborhood
 reminded Billy of some of the towns he had seen in the war. The curbs and sidewalks
 were crushed in many places, showing where the National Guard tanks and half-tracks
 had been.
  'Blood brother,' said a message written in pink paint on the side of a shattered grocery
 store.
  There was a tap on Billy's car window. A black man was out there. He wanted to talk
 about something. The light had changed. Billy did the simplest thing. He drove on.
  Billy drove through a scene of even greater desolation. It looked like Dresden after it
 was fire-bombed-like the surface of the moon. The house where Billy had grown up used
 to be somewhere in what was so empty now. This was urban renewal. A new Ilium
 Government Center and a Pavilion of the Arts and a Peace Lagoon and high-rise
 apartment buildings were going up here soon.
  That was all right with Billy Pilgrim.
  The speaker at the Lions Club meeting was a major in the Marines. He said that
 Americans had no choice but to keep fighting in Vietnam until they achieved victory or
 until the Communists realized that they could not force their way of life -on weak
 countries. The major had been there on two separate tours of duty. He told of many
 terrible and many wonderful things he had seen. He was in favor of increased bombings,
 of bombing North Vietnam back into the Stone Age, if it refused to see reason. 
  Billy was not moved to protest the bombing of North Vietnam-, did not shudder about
 the hideous things he himself had seen bombing do. He was simply having lunch with
 the Lions Club, of which he was past president now.
  Billy had a framed prayer on his office wall which expressed his method for keeping
 going, even though he was unenthusiastic about living. A lot of patients who saw the
 prayer on Billy's wall told him that it helped them to keep going,, too. It went like this
 GOD GRANT ME
 THE SERENITY TO ACCEPT
 THE THINGS I CANNOT CHANGE
 COURAGE
 TO CHANGE THE THINGS I CAN,
 AND WISDOM ALWAYS
 TO TELL THE
 DIFFERENCE.
  Among the things Billy Pilgrim could not change were the past, the present and the
 future.
  Now he was being introduced to the Marine major. The person who was performing
 the introduction was telling the major that Billy was a veteran., and that Billy had a son
 who was a sergeant in the Green Berets-in Vietnam.
  The major told Billy that the Green Berets were doing a great job, and that he should
 be proud of his son.
  'I am. I certainly am,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  He went home for a nap after lunch. He was under doctor's orders to take a nap every
 day. The doctor hoped that this would relieve a complaint that Billy had: Every so often,
 for no apparent reason, Billy Pilgrim would find himself weeping. Nobody had ever
 caught Billy doing it. Only the doctor knew. It was an extremely quiet thing Billy did,
 and not very moist.
  Billy owned a lovely Georgian home in Ilium. He was rich as Croesus, something he
 had never expected to be, not in a million years. He had five other optometrists working
 for him in the shopping plaza location, and netted over sixty thousand dollars a year. In
 addition, he owned a fifth of the new Holiday Inn out on Route 54, and -half of three
 Tastee-Freeze stands. Tastee-Freeze was a sort of frozen custard. It gave all the pleasure
 that ice cream could give, without the stiffness and bitter coldness of ice cream.
  Billy's home was empty. His daughter Barbara was about to get warned, and she and
 his wife had gone downtown to pick out patterns for her crystal and silverware. There
 was a note saying so on the kitchen table. There were no servants. People just weren't
 interested in careers in domestic service anymore. There wasn't a dog, either. 
  There used to be a dog named Spot, but he died. So it goes. Billy had liked Spot a lot,
 and Spot had liked him.
  Billy went up the carpeted stairway and into his and his wife's bedroom. The room had
 flowered wallpaper. There was a double bed with a clock-radio on a table beside it. Also
 on the table were controls for the electric blanket, and a switch to turn on a gentle
 vibrator which was bolted to the springs of the box mattress. The trade name of the
 vibrator was 'Magic Fingers.' The vibrator was the doctor's idea, too.
 Billy took off his tri-focals and his coat and his necktie and his shoes, and he closed the
 venetian blinds and then the drapes, and he lay down on the outside of the coverlet. But
 sleep would not come. Tears came instead. They seeped. Billy turned on the Magic
 Fingers, and he was jiggled as he wept.
  The doorchimes rang. Billy got off the bed and looked down through a window at the
 front doorstep, to see if somebody important had come to call. There was a crippled man
 down there, as spastic in space as Billy Pilgrim was in time. Convulsions made the man
 dance flappingly all the time, made him change his expressions, too, as though he were
 trying to imitate various famous movie stars.
  Another cripple was ringing a doorbell across the street. He was an crutches. He had
 only one leg. He was so jammed between his crutches that his shoulders hid his ears.
  Billy knew what the cripples were up to: They were selling subscriptions to magazines
 that would never come. People subscribed to them because the salesmen were so pitiful.
 Billy had heard about this racket from a speaker at the Lions Club two weeks before--a
 man from the Better Business Bureau. The man said that anybody who saw cripples
 working a neighbourhood for magazine subscriptions should call the police.
  Billy looked down the street, saw a new, Buick Riviera parked about half a block
 away. There was a man in it, and Billy assumed correctly that he was the man who had
 hired the cripples to do this thing. Billy went on weeping as he contemplated the cripples
 and their boss. His doorchimes clanged hellishly.
  He closed his eyes, and opened them again. lie was still weeping, but he was back in
 Luxembourg again. He was marching with a lot of other prisoners. It was a winter wind
 that was bringing tears to his eyes.
  Ever since Billy had been thrown into shrubbery for the sake of the picture, he had
 been seeing Saint Elmo's fire, a sort of electronic radiance around the heads of his
 companions and captors. It was in the treetops and on the rooftops of Luxembourg, too. It
 was beautiful.
  Billy was marching with his hands on top of his head, and so were all the other
 Americans. Billy was bobbing up-and-down, up-and-down. Now he crashed into Roland
 Weary accidentally. 'I beg your pardon,' he said.
  Weary's eyes were tearful also. Weary was crying because of horrible pains in his feet.
 The hinged clogs were transforming his feet into blood puddings.
  At each road intersection Billy's group was joined by more Americans with their hands
 on top of their haloed heads. Billy had smiled for them all. They were moving like water,
 downhill all the time, and they flowed at last to a main highway on a valley's floor.
 Through the valley flowed a Mississippi of humiliated Americans. Tens of thousands of 
 Americans shuffled eastward, their hands clasped on top of their heads. They sighed and
 groaned.
  Billy and his group joined the river of humiliation, and the late afternoon sun came out
 from the clouds. The Americans didn't have the road to themselves. The west-bound lane
 boiled and boomed with vehicles which were rushing German reserves to the front. The
 reserves were violent, windburned, bristly men. They had teeth like piano keys.
  They were festooned with machine-gun belts, smoked cigars, and guzzled booze. They
 took wolfish bites from sausages, patted their horny palms with potato-masher grenades.
  One soldier in black was having a drunk herd's picnic all by himself on top of a tank.
 He spit on the Americans. The spit hit Roland Weary's shoulder, gave Weary a
 fourragière of snot and blutwurst and tobacco juice, and Schnapps.
  Billy found the afternoon stingingly exciting. There was so much to see-dragon's teeth,
 killing machine, corpses with bare feet that were blue and ivory. So it goes.
  Bobbing up-and-down, up-and-down, Billy beamed lovingly at a bright lavender
 farmhouse that had been spattered with machine-gun bullets. Standing in its cock-eyed
 doorway was a German colonel. With him was his unpainted whore.
  Billy crashed into Weary's shoulder, and Weary cried out sobbingly. 'Walk right! Walk
 right!'
  They were climbing a gentle rise now. When they reached the top, they weren't in
 Luxembourg any more. They were in Germany.
  A motion-picture camera was set up at the border-to record the fabulous victory. Two
 civilians in bearskin coats were leaning on the camera when Billy and Weary came by.
 They had run out of film hours ago.
  One of them singled out Billy's face for a moment, then focused at infinity again.
 There was a tiny plume of smoke at infinity. There was a battle there. People were dying
 there. So it goes.
  And the sun went down, and Billy found himself bobbing in place in a railroad yard.
 There were rows and rows of boxcars waiting. They had brought reserves to the front.
 Now they were going to take prisoners into Germany's interior.
  Flashlight beams danced crazily.
  The Germans sorted out the prisoners according to rank. They put sergeants with
 sergeants, majors with majors, and so on. A squad of full colonels was halted near Billy.
 One of them had double pneumonia. He had a high fever and vertigo. As the railroad yard
 dipped and swooped around the colonel, he tried to hold himself steady by staring into
 Billy's eyes.
  The colonel coughed and coughed, and then he said to Billy, 'You one of my boys?'
 This was a man who had lost an entire regiment, about forty-five hundred men-a lot of
 them children, actually. Billy didn't reply. The question made no sense.
  'What was your outfit?' said the colonel. He coughed and coughed. Every time he
 inhaled his lungs rattled like greasy paper bags.
  Billy couldn't remember the outfit he was from.
  'You from the Four-fifty-first?'
  'Four-fifty-first what?' said Billy.
  There was a silence. 'Infantry regiment,' said the colonel at last. 
  'Oh,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  There was another long silence, with the colonel dying and dying, drowning where he
 stood. And then he cited out wetly, 'It's me, boys! It's Wild Bob!' That is what he had
 always wanted his troops to call him: 'Wild Bob.'
  None of the people who could hear him were actually from his regiment, except for
 Roland Weary, and Weary wasn't listening. All Weary could think of was the agony in
 his own feet.
  But the colonel imagined that he was addressing his beloved troops for the last time,
 and he told them that they had nothing to be ashamed of, that there were dead Germans
 all over the battlefield who wished to God that they had never heard of the Four-fiftyfirst.
 He said that after the war he was going to have a regimental reunion in his home
 town, which was Cody, Wyoming. He was going to barbecue whole steers.
  He said all this while staring into Billy's eyes. He made the inside of poor Bill's skull
 echo with balderdash. 'God be with you, boys!' he said, and that echoed and echoed. And
 then he said. 'If you're ever in Cody, Wyoming, just ask for Wild Bob!' I was there. So
 was my old war buddy, Bernard V. O'Hare.
  Billy Pilgrim was packed into a boxcar with many other privates. He and Roland
 Weary were separated. Weary was packed into another car in the same train.
  There were narrow ventilators at the comers of the car, under the eaves. Billy stood by
 one of these, and, as the crowd pressed against him, he climbed part way up a diagonal
 comer brace to make more room. 'Ms placed his eyes on a level with the ventilator, so he
 could see another train about ten yards away.
  Germans were writing on the cars with blue chalk-the number of persons in each car,
 their rank, their nationality, the date on which they had been put aboard. Other Germans
 were securing the hasps on the car doors with wire and spikes and other trackside trash.
 Billy could hear somebody writing on his car, too, but he couldn't see who was doing it.
  Most of the privates on Billy's car were very young-at the end of childhood. But
 crammed into the comer with Billy was a former hobo who was forty years old.
  'I been hungrier than this,' the hobo told Billy. 'I been m worse places than this. This
 ain't so bad.'
  A man in a boxcar across the way called out through the ventilator that a man. had just
 died in there. So it goes. There were four guards who heard him. They weren't excited by
 the news.
  'Yo, yo,' said one, nodding dreamily. 'Yo, yo.'
  And the guards didn't open the car with the dead man in it. They opened the next car
 instead, and Billy Pilgrim was enchanted by what was in there. It was like heaven. There
 was candlelight, and there were bunks with quilts and blankets heaped on them. There
 was a cannonball stove with a steaming coffeepot on top. There was a table with a bottle
 of wine and a loaf of bread and a sausage on it. There were four bowls of soup.
  There were pictures of castles and lakes and pretty girls on the walls. This was the
 rolling home of the railroad guards, men whose business it was to be forever guarding
 freight rolling from here to there. The four guards went inside and closed the door. 
  A little while later they came out smoking cigars, talking contentedly in the mellow
 lower register of the German language. One of them saw Billy's face at the ventilator. He
 wagged a finger at him in affectionate warning, telling him to be a good boy.
  The Americans across the way told the guards again about the dead man on their car.
 The guards got a stretcher out of their own cozy car, opened the dead man's car and went
 inside. The dead man's car wasn't crowded at all. There were just six live colonels in
 there-and one dead one.
  The Germans carried the corpse out. The corpse was Wild Bob. So it goes.
  During the night, some of the locomotives began to tootle to one another, and then to
 move. The locomotive and the last car of each train were marked with a striped banner of
 orange and black, indicating that the train was not fair game for airplanes that it was
 carrying prisoners of war.
  The war was nearly over. The locomotives began to move east in late December. The
 war would end in May. German prisons everywhere were absolutely full, and there was
 no longer any food for the prisoners to eat, and no longer any fuel to keep them warm.
 And yet-here came more prisoners.
  Billy Pilgrim's train, the longest train of all, did not move for two days.
  'This ain't bad,' the hobo told Billy on the second day. 'This ain't nothing at all.'
  Billy looked out through the ventilator. The railroad yard was a desert now, except for
 a hospital train marked with red crosses-on a siding far, far away. Its locomotive
 whistled. The locomotive of Billy Pilgrim's train whistled back. They were saying,
 'Hello.'
  Even though Billy's train wasn't moving., its boxcars were kept locked tight. Nobody
 was to get off until the final destination. To the guards who walked up and down outside,
 each car became a single organism which ate and drank and excreted through its
 ventilators. It talked or sometimes yelled through its ventilators, too. In went water and
 loaves of blackbread and sausage and cheese, and out came shit and piss and language.
  Human beings in there were excreting into steel helmets, which were passed to the
 people at the ventilators, who dumped them. Billy was a dumper. The human beings also
 passed canteens, which guards would fill with water. When food came in, the human
 beings were quiet and trusting and beautiful. They shared.
  Human beings in there took turns standing or lying down. The legs of those who stood
 were like fence posts driven into a warm., squirming, fatting, sighing earth. The queer
 earth was a mosaic of sleepers who nestled like spoons.
  Now the train began to creep eastward.
  Somewhere in there was Christmas. Billy Pilgrim nestled like a spoon with the hobo
 on Christmas night, and he fell asleep, and he traveled in time to 1967 again-to the night
 he was kidnapped by a flying saucer from Tralfamadore.
 Four 
  Billy Pilgrim could not sleep on his daughters wedding night. He was forty-four. The
 wedding had taken place that afternoon in a gaily striped tent in Billy's backyard. The
 stripes were orange and black.
  Billy and his wife, Valencia, nestled like spoons in their big double bed. They were
 jiggled by Magic Fingers. Valencia didn't need to be jiggled to sleep. Valencia was
 snoring like a bandsaw. The poor woman didn't have ovaries or a uterus any more.
  They had been removed by a surgeon-by one of Billy's partners in the New Holiday
 Inn.
  There was a full moon.
  Billy got out of bed in the moonlight. He felt spooky and luminous felt as though he
 were wrapped in cool fur that was full of static electricity. He looked down at his bare
 feet. They were ivory and blue.
  Billy now shuffled down his upstairs hallway, knowing he was about to be kidnapped
 by a flying saucer. The hallway was zebra-striped with darkness and moonlight. The
 moonlight came into the hallway through doorways of the empty rooms of Billy's two
 children, children no more. They were gone forever. Billy was guided by dread and the
 lack of dread. Dread told him when to stop. Lack of it told him when to move again. He
 stopped.
  He went into his daughter's room. Her drawers were dumped. her closet was empty.
 Heaped in the middle of the room were all the possessions she could not take on a
 honeymoon. She had a Princess telephone extension all her own-on her windowsill Its
 tiny night light stared at Billy. And then it rang.
  Billy answered. There was a drunk on the other end. Billy could almost smell his
 breath-mustard gas and roses. It was a wrong number. Billy hung up. There was a soft
 drink bottle on the windowsill. Its label boasted that it contained no nourishment
 whatsoever.
  Billy Pilgrim padded downstairs on his blue and ivory feet. He went into the kitchen,
 where the moonlight called his attention to a half bottle of champagne on the kitchen
 table, all that was left from the reception in the tent. Somebody had stoppered it again.
 Drink me,' it seemed to say.
  So Billy uncorked it with his thumbs. It didn't make a pop. The champagne was dead.
 So it goes.
  Billy looked at the clock on the gas stove. He had an hour to kill before the saucer
 came. He went into the living room, swinging the bottle like a dinner bell, turned on the
 television. He came slightly unstuck in time, saw the late movie backwards, then
 forwards again. It was a movie about American bombers in the Second World War and
 the gallant men who flew them. Seen backwards by Billy, the story went like this:
  American planes, full of holes and wounded men and corpses took off backwards from
 an airfield in England. Over France a few German fighter planes flew at them backwards,
 sucked bullets and shell fragments from some of the planes and crewmen. They did the
 same for wrecked American bombers on the ground, and those planes flew up backwards
 to join the formation.
  The formation flew backwards over a German city that was in flames. The bombers
 opened their bomb bay doors, exerted a miraculous magnetism which shrunk the fires, 
 gathered them into cylindrical steel containers, and lifted the containers into the bellies of
 the planes. The containers were stored neatly in racks. The Germans below had
 miraculous devices of their own, which were long steel tubes. They used them to suck
 more fragments from the crewmen and planes. But there were still a few wounded
 Americans, though, and some of the bombers were in bad repair. Over France, though,
 German fighters came up again, made everything and everybody as good as new.
  When the bombers got back to their base, the steel cylinders were taken from the racks
 and shipped back to the United States of America, where factories were operating night
 and day, dismantling the cylinders, separating the dangerous contents into minerals.
 Touchingly, it was mainly women who did this work. The minerals were then shipped to
 specialists in remote areas. It was their business to put them into the ground., to hide
 them cleverly, so they would never hurt anybody ever again.
  The American fliers turned in their uniforms, became high school kids. And Hitler
 turned into a baby, Billy Pilgrim supposed. That wasn't in the movie. Billy was
 extrapolating. Everybody turned into a baby, and all humanity, without exception,
 conspired biologically to produce two perfect people named Adam and Eve, he supposed.
  Billy saw the war movies backwards then forwards-and then it was time to go out into
 his backyard to meet the flying saucer. Out he went, his blue and ivory feet crushing the
 wet salad of the lawn. He stopped, took a swig, of the dead champagne. It was like 7-Up.
 He would not raise his eyes to the sky, though he knew there was a flying saucer from
 Tralfamadore up there. He would see it soon enough, inside and out, and he would see,
 too, where it came from soon enough-soon enough.
  Overhead he heard the cry of what might have been a melodious owl, but it wasn't a
 melodious owl. It was a flying saucer from Tralfamadore, navigating in both space and
 time, therefore seeming to Billy Pilgrim to have come from nowhere all at once.
 Somewhere a big dog barked.
  The saucer was one hundred feet in diameter, with portholes around its rim. The light
 from the portholes was a pulsing purple. The only noise it made was the owl song. It came
 down to hover over Billy, and to enclose him in a cylinder of pulsing in purple light.
 Now there was the sound of a seeming kiss as an airtight hatch in the bottom of the
 saucer was opened. Down snaked a ladder that was outlined in pretty lights like a Ferris
 wheel.
  Billy's will was paralyzed by a zap gun aimed at him from one of the portholes. It
 became imperative that he take hold of the bottom rung of the sinuous ladder, which he
 did. The rung was electrified, so that Billy's hands locked onto it hard. He was hauled
 into the airlock, and machinery closed the bottom door. Only then did the ladder, wound
 onto a reel in the airlock, let him go. Only then did Billy's brain start working again.
  There were two peepholes inside the airlock-with yellow eyes pressed to them. There
 was a speaker on the wall. The Tralfamadorians had no voice boxes. They communicated
 telepathicary. They were able to talk to Billy by means of a computer and a sort of
 electric organ which made every Earthling speech sound.
  'Welcome aboard, Mr. Pilgrim,' said the loudspeaker. 'Any questions?'
  Billy licked his lips, thought a while, inquired at last: 'Why me? ' 
  That is a very Earthling question to ask, Mr. Pilgrim. Why you? Why us for that
 matter? Why anything? Because this moment simply is. Have you ever seen bugs
 trapped in amber?'
  'Yes.' Billy in fact, had a paperweight in his office which was a blob of polished amber
 with three ladybugs embedded in it.
  'Well, here we are, Mr. Pilgrim, trapped in the amber of this moment. There is no why.'
  They introduced an anesthetic into Billy's atmosphere now, put him to sleep. They
 carded him to a cabin where he was strapped to a yellow Barca-Lounger which they had
 stolen from a Sears & Roebuck warehouse. The hold of the saucer was crammed with
 other stolen merchandise, which would be used to furnish Billy's artificial habitat in a zoo
 on Tralfamadore.
  The terrific acceleration of the saucer as it left Earth twisted Billy's slumbering body,
 distorted his face, dislodged him m time, sent him back to the war.
  When he regained consciousness, he wasn't on the flying saucer. He was in a boxcar
 crossing Germany again.
  Some people were rising from the floor of the car, and others were lying down. Billy
 planned to He down, too. It would be lovely to sleep. It was black in the car, and black
 outside the car, which seemed to be about two miles an hour. The car never seemed to go
 any faster than that. It was a long time between clicks, between joints in the track. There
 would be a click, and then a year would go by, and then there would be another click
  The train often stopped to let really important trains bawl and hurtle by. Another thing
 it did was stop on sidings near prisons, leaving a few cars there. It was creeping across all
 of Germany, growing shorter all the time.
  And Billy let himself down oh so gradually now, hanging onto the diagonal crossbrace
 in the comer in order to make himself seem nearly weightless to those he was
 joining on the floor. He knew it was important that he made himself nearly ghostlike
 when lying down. He had forgotten why, but a reminder soon came.
  'Pilgrim,' said a person he was about to nestle with, 'is that you?'
  Billy didn't say anything, but nestled very politely, closed his eyes.
  'God damn it' said the person. 'That is you, isn't it?' He sat up and explored Billy rudely
 with his hands. 'It's you, all right. Get the hell out of here.'
  Now Billy sat up, too-wretched, close to tears.
  'Get out of here! I want to sleep!'
  'Shut up,' said somebody else.
  'I'll shut up when Pilgrim gets away from here.'
  So Billy stood up again, clung to the cross-brace. 'Where can I sleep?' he asked
 quietly.
  'Not with me.'
  'Not with me, you son of a bitch,' said somebody else. 'You yell. You kick.'
  'I do?'
  "You're God damn right you do. And whimper.'
  'I do?'
  'Keep the hell away from here., Pilgrim.' 
  And now there was an acrimonious madrigal, with parts sung in all quarters of the car.
 Nearly everybody seemingly, had an atrocity story of something Billy Pilgrim had done
 to him in his sleep. Everybody told Billy Pilgrim to keep the hell away.
  So Billy Pilgrim had to sleep standing up, or not sleep at all. And food had stopped
 coming in through the ventilators, and the days and nights were colder all the time.
  On the eighth day, the forty-year-old hobo said to Billy, 'This ain't bad. I can be
 comfortable anywhere.'
  'You can?' said Billy.
  On the ninth day, the hobo died. So it goes. His last words were, 'You think this is bad?
 This ain't bad.'
  There was something about death and the ninth day. There was a death on the ninth
 day in the car ahead of Billy's too. Roland Weary died-of gangrene that had started in his
 mangled feet. So it goes.
  Weary, in his nearly continuous delirium, told again and again of the Three
 Musketeers, acknowledged that he was dying, gave many messages to be delivered to his
 family in Pittsburgh. Above all, he wanted to be avenged, so he said again and again the
 name of the person who had killed him. Everyone on the car learned the lesson well.
  'Who killed me?" he would ask.
  And everybody knew the answer., which was this: "Billy Pilgrim.'
  Listen- on the tenth night the peg was pulled out of the hasp on Billy's boxcar door,
 and the door was opened. Billy Pilgrim was lying at an angle on the corner-brace, selfcrucified,
 holding himself there with a blue and ivory claw hooked over the- sill of the
 ventilator. Billy coughed -when the door was opened, and when he coughed he shit thin
 gruel. This was in accordance with the Third Law of Motion according to Sir Isaac
 Newton. This law tells us that for every action there is a reaction which is equal and
 opposite in direction.
  This can be useful in rocketry.
  The train had arrived on a siding by a prison which was originally constructed as an
 extermination camp for Russian prisoners of war.
  The guards peeked inside Billy's car owlishly, cooed calmingly. They had never dealt
 with Americans before, but they surely understood this general sort of freight. They knew
 that it was essentially a liquid which could be induced to flow slowly toward cooing and
 light. It was nighttime.
  The only light outside came from a single bulb which hung from a pole-high and far
 away. All was quiet outside, except for the guards, who cooed like doves. And the liquid
 began to flow. Gobs of it built up in the doorway, plopped to the ground.
  Billy was the next-to-last human being to reach the door. The hobo was the last. The
 hobo could not flow, could not plop. He wasn't liquid any more. He was stone. So it goes. 
  Billy didn't. want to drop from the car to the ground. He sincerely believed that he
 would shatter like glass. So the guards helped him down, cooing still. They set him down
 facing the train. It was such a dinky train now.
  There was a locomotive, a tender, and three little boxcars. The last boxcar was the
 railroad guards' heaven on wheels. Again-in that heaven on wheels-the table was set.
 Dinner was served.
  At the base of the pole from which the light bulb hung were three seeming haystacks.
 The Americans were wheedled and teased over to those three stacks, which weren't hay
 after all. They were overcoats taken from prisoners who were dead. So it goes.
  It was the guards' firmly expressed wish that every American without an overcoat
 should take one. The coats were cemented together with ice, so the guards used their
 bayonets as ice picks, pricking free collars and hems and sleeves and so on, then peeling
 off coats and handing them out at random. The coats were stiff and dome-shaped, having
 conformed to their piles.
  The coat that Billy Pilgrim got had been crumpled and frozen in such a way, and was
 so small, that it appeared to be not a coat but a sort of large black, three-cornered hat.
 There were gummy stains on it, too, like crankcase drainings or old strawberry jam.
 There seemed to be a dead, furry animal frozen to it. The animal was in fact the coat's fur
 collar.
  Billy glanced dully at the coats of his neighbors. Their coats all had brass buttons or
 tinsel or piping or numbers or stripes or eagles or moons or stars dangling from them.
 They were soldiers' coats. Billy was the only one who had a coat from a dead civilian. So
 it goes.
  And Billy and the rest were encouraged to shuffle around their dinky train and into the
 prison camp. There wasn't anything warm or lively to attract them-merely long, low,
 narrow sheds by the thousands, with no lights inside.
  Somewhere a dog barked. With the help of fear and echoes and winter silences, that
 dog had a voice like a big bronze gong.
  Billy and the rest were wooed through gate after gate, and Billy saw his first Russian.
 The man was all alone in the night-a ragbag with a round, flat face that glowed like a
 radium dial.
  Billy passed within a yard of him. There was barbed wire between them. The Russian
 did not wave or speak, but he looked directly into Billy's soul with sweet hopefulness, as
 though Billy might have good news for him-news he might be too stupid to understand,
 but good news all the same.
  Billy blacked out as he walked through gate after gate. He came to what he thought
 might be a building on Tralfamadore. It was shrilly lit and lined with white tiles. It was
 on Earth, though. It was a delousing station through which all new prisoners had to pass.
  Billy did as he was told, took off his clothes. That was the first thing they told him to
 do on Tralfamadore, too.
  A German measured Billy's upper right arm with his thumb and forefinger, asked a
 companion what sort of an army would send a weakling like that to the front. They 
 looked at the other American bodies now, pointed out a lot more that were nearly as bad
 as Billy's.
  One of the best bodies belonged to the oldest American by far, a high school teacher
 from Indianapolis. His name was Edgar Derby. He hadn't been in Billy's boxcar. He'd
 been in Roland Weary's car, had cradled Weary's head while he died. So it goes. Derby
 was forty-four years old. He was so old he had a son who was a marine in the Pacific
 theater of war.
  Derby had pulled political wires to get into the army at his age. The subject he had
 taught in Indianapolis was Contemporary Problems in Western Civilization. He also
 coached the tennis team, and took very good care of his body.
  Derby's son would survive the war. Derby wouldn't. That good body of his would be
 filled with holes by a firing squad in Dresden in sixty-eight days. So it goes.
  The worst American body wasn't Billy's. The worst body belonged to a car thief from
 Cicero, Illinois. Ms name was Paul Lazzaro. He was tiny, and not only were his bones
 and teeth rotten, but his skin was disgusting. Lazzaro was polka-dotted all over with
 dime-sized scars. He had had many plagues of boils.
  Lazzaro, too, had been on Roland Weary's boxcar, and had given his word of honor to
 Weary that he would find some way to make Billy Pilgrim pay for Weary's death. He was
 looking around now, wondering which naked human being was Billy.
  The naked Americans took their places under many showerheads along a white-tiled
 wall. There were no faucets they could control. They could only wait for whatever was
 coming. Their penises were shriveled and their balls were retracted. Reproduction was
 not the main business of the evening.
  An unseen hand turned a master valve. Out of the showerheads gushed scalding rain.
 The rain was a blow-torch that did not warm. It jazzed and jangled Billy's skin without
 thawing the ice in the marrow of his long bones.
  The Americans' clothes were meanwhile passing through poison gas. Body lice and
 bacteria and fleas were dying by the billions. So it goes.
  And Billy zoomed back in time to his infancy. He was a baby who had just been
 bathed by his mother. Now his mother wrapped him in a towel, carried him into a rosy
 room that was filled with sunshine. She unwrapped him, laid him on the tickling towel,
 powdered him between his legs, joked with him, patted his little jelly belly. Her palm on
 his little jelly belly made potching sounds.
  Billy gurgled and cooed.
  And then Billy was a middle-aged optometrist again, playing hacker's golf this timeon
 a blazing summer Sunday morning. Billy never went to church any more. He was
 hacking with three other optometrists. Billy was on the green in seven strokes, and it was
 his turn to putt.
  It was an eight-foot putt and he made it. He bent over to take the ball out of the cup,
 and the sun went behind a cloud. Billy was momentarily dizzy. When he recovered, he
 wasn't on the golf course any more. He was strapped to a yellow contour chair in a white
 chamber aboard a flying saucer, which was bound for Tralfamadore. 
  'Where am I?' said Billy Pilgrim.
  'Trapped in another blob of amber, Mr. Pilgrim. We are where we have to be just nowthree
 hundred million miles from Earth, bound for a time warp which will get us to
 Tralfamadore in hours rather than centuries.'
  'How-how did I get here?'
  'It would take another Earthling to explain it to you. Earthlings are the great explainers,
 explaining why this event is structured as it is, telling how other events may be achieved
 or avoided. I am a Tralfamadorian, seeing all time as you might see a stretch of Rocky
 Mountains. All time is all time. It does not change. It does not lend itself to warnings or
 explanations. It simply is. Take it moment by moment, and you will find that we are all,
 as I've said before, bugs in amber.'
  'You sound to me as though you don't believe in free will,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  'If I hadn't spent so much time studying Earthlings,' said the Tralfamadorian, 'I
 wouldn't have any idea what was meant by "free will." I've visited thirty-one inhabited
 plants in the universe, and I have studied reports on one hundred more. Only on Earth is
 there any talk of free will.'
 Five
  Billy Pilgrim says that the Universe does not look like a lot of bright little dots to the
 creatures from Tralfamadore. The creatures can see where each star has been and where it
 is going, so that the heavens are filled with rarefied, luminous spaghetti. And
 Tralfamadorians don't see human beings as two-legged creatures, either. They see them
 as great millipedes with babies' legs at one end and old people's legs at the other,' says
 Billy Pilgrim.
  Billy asked for something to read on the trip to Tralfamadore. His captors had five
 million Earthling books on microfilm, but no way to project them in Billy's cabin. They
 had only one actual book in English, which would be placed in a Tralfamadorian
 museum. It was Valley of the Dolls, by Jacqueline Susann.
  Billy read it, thought it was pretty good in spots. The people in it certainly had their
 ups-and-downs, ups-and-downs. But Billy didn't want to read about the same ups-anddowns
 over and over again. He asked if there wasn't, please, some other reading matters
 around.
  'Only Tralfamadorian novels, which I'm afraid you couldn't begin to understand,' said
 the speaker on the wall.
  'Let me look at one anyway.'
  So they sent him in several. They were little things. A dozen of them might have had
 the bulk of Valley of the Dolls-with all its ups-and-downs, up-and-downs.
  Billy couldn't read Tralfamadorian, of course, but he could at least see how the books
 were laid out-in brief clumps of symbols separated by stars. Billy commented that the
 clumps might be telegrams.
  'Exactly,' said the voice. 
  'They are telegrams?'
  'There are no telegrams on Tralfamadore. But you're right: each clump of-symbols is a
 brief, urgent message describing a situation, a scene., We Tralfamadorians read them all
 at once, not one after the other. There isn't any particular relationship between all the
 messages, except that the author has chosen them carefully, so that, when seen all at
 once, they produce an image of life that is beautiful and surprising and deep. There is no
 beginning, no middle, no end, no suspense, no moral, no causes, no effects. What we
 love in our books are the depths of many marvelous moments seen all at one time.'
  Moments after that, the saucer entered a time warp, and Billy was flung back into his
 childhood. He was twelve years old, quaking as he stood with his mother and father on
 Bright Angel Point, at the rim of Grand Canyon. The little human family was staring at
 the floor of the canyon, one mile straight down.
  'Well,' said Billy's father, manfully kicking a pebble into space, 'there it is.' They had
 come to this famous place by automobile. They had had several blowouts on the way.
  'It was worth the trip,' said Billy's mother raptly. 'Oh, God was it ever worth it.'
  Billy hated the canyon. He was sure that he was going to fall in. His mother touched
 him, and he wet his pants.
  There were other tourists looking down into the canyon, too, and a ranger was there to
 answer questions. A Frenchman who had come all the way from France asked the ranger
 in broken English ff many people committed suicide by jumping in.
  'Yes, sir,' said the ranger. 'About three folks a year.' So it goes.
  And Billy took a very short trip through time,, made a peewee jump of only ten days,
 so he was still twelve, still touring the West with his family. Now they were down in
 Carlsbad Caverns, and Billy was praying to God to get him out of there before the ceiling
 fell in.
  A ranger was explaining that the Caverns had been discovered by a cowboy who saw a
 huge cloud of bats come out of a hole in the ground. And then he said that he was going
 to mm out all the lights., and that it would probably be the first time in the lives of most
 people there that they had ever been in darkness that was total.
  Out went the lights. Billy didn't even know whether he was still alive or not. And then
 something ghostly floated in air to his left. It had numbers on it. His father had taken out
 his Pocket watch. The watch had a radium dial.
  Billy went from total dark to total light, found himself back in the war, back in the
 delousing station again. The shower was over. An unseen hand had turned the water off.
  When Billy got his clothes back, they weren't any cleaner, but all the little animals that
 had been living in them were dead. So it goes. And his new overcoat was thawed out and
 limp now. It was much too small for Billy. It had a fur collar and a g of crimson silk, and
 had apparently been made for an impresario about as big as an organ-grinder's monkey. It
 was full of bullet holes.
  Billy Pilgrim dressed himself. He put on the little overcoat, too. It split up the back,
 and, at the shoulders, the sleeves came entirely free. So the coat became a fur-collared
 vest. It was meant to flare at its owners waist, but the flaring took place at Billy's armpits. 
 'Me Germans found him to be one of the most screamingly funny things they had seen in
 all of the Second World War. They laughed and laughed.
  And the Germans told everybody else to form in ranks of five, with Billy as their pivot.
 Then out of doors went the parade, and through gate after gate again. 'Mere were more
 starving Russians with faces like radium dials. The Americans were livelier than before.
 The jazzing with hot water had cheered them up. And they came to a shed where a
 corporal with only one arm and one eye wrote the name and serial number of each
 prisoner in a big, red ledger. Everybody was legally alive now. Before they got their
 names and numbers in that book, they were missing in action and probably dead.
  So it goes.
  As the Americans were waiting to move on, an altercation broke out in their rear-most
 rank. An American had muttered something which a guard did not like. The guard knew
 English, and he hauled the American out of ranks knocked him down.
  The American was astonished. He stood up shakily, spitting blood. He'd had two teeth
 knocked out. He had meant no harm by what he'd said, evidently, had no idea that the
 guard would hear and understand.
  'Why me?' he asked the guard.
  The guard shoved him back into ranks. 'Vy you? Vy anybody?' he said.
  When Billy Pilgrim's name was inscribed in the ledger of the prison camp, he was
 given a number., too, and an iron dogtag in which that number was stamped. A slave
 laborer from Poland had done the stamping. He was dead now. So it goes.
  Billy was told to hang the tag' around his neck along with his American dogtags, which
 he did. The tag was like a salt cracker, perforated down its middle so that a strong man
 could snap it in two with his bare hands. In case Billy died, which he didn't, half the tag
 would mark his body and half would mark his grave.
  After poor Edgar Derby, the high school teacher, was shot in Dresden later on, a doctor
 pronounced him dead and snapped his dogtag in two. So it goes.
  Properly enrolled and tagged, the Americans were led through gate after gate again. In
 two days' time now their families would learn from the International Red Cross that they
 were alive.
  Next to Billy was little Paul Lazzaro, who had promised to avenge Roland Weary.
 Lazzaro wasn't thinking about vengeance. He was thinking about his terrible bellyache.
 His stomach had shrunk to the size of a walnut. That dry, shriveled pouch was as sore as
 a boil.
  Next to Lazzaro was poor, doomed old Edgar Derby, with his American and German
 dogs displayed like a necklace, on the outside of his clothes. He had expected to become
 a captain, a company commander, because of his wisdom and age. Now here he was on
 the Czechoslovakian border at midnight.
  'Halt,' said a guard.
  The Americans halted. They stood there quietly in the cold. The sheds they were
 among were outwardly like thousands of other sheds they had passed. There was this 
 difference, though: the sheds had tin chimneys, and out of the chimneys whirled
 constellations of sparks.
  A guard knocked on a door.
  The door was flung open from inside. Light leaped out through the door, escaped from
 prison at 186,000 miles per second. Out marched fifty middle-aged Englishmen. They
 were singing "Hail, Hail, the Gang's All Here' from the Pirates of Penzance'.
  These lusty, ruddy vocalists were among the first English-speaking prisoners to be
 taken in the Second World War. Now they were singing to nearly the last. They had not
 seen a woman or a child for four years or more. They hadn't seen any birds, either. Not
 even sparrows would come into the camp.
  The Englishmen were officers. Each of them had attempted to escape from another
 prison at least once. Now they were here, dead-center in a sea of dying Russians.
  They could tunnel all they pleased. They would inevitably surface within a rectangle of
 barbed wire, would find themselves greeted listlessly by dying Russians who spoke no
 English, who had no food or useful information or escape plans of their own. They could
 scheme all they pleased to hide aboard a vehicle or steal one, but no vehicle ever came
 into their compound. They could feign illness, if they liked, but that wouldn't earn them a
 trip anywhere, either. The only hospital in the camp was a six-bed affair in the British
 compound itself.
  The Englishmen were clean and enthusiastic and decent and strong. They sang
 boomingly well. They had been singing together every night for years.
  The Englishmen had also been lifting weights and chinning themselves for years. Their
 bellies were like washboards. The muscles of their calves and upper arms were like
 cannonballs. They were all masters of checkers and chess and bridge and cribbage and
 dominoes and anagrams and charades and Ping-Pong and billiards, as well.
  They were among the wealthiest people in Europe, in terms of food. A clerical error
 early in the war, when food was still getting through to prisoners, had caused the Red
 Cross to ship them five hundred parcels every month instead of fifty. The Englishmen
 had hoarded these so cunningly that now, as the war was ending, they had three tons of
 sugar, one ton of coffee, eleven hundred pounds of chocolate, seven hundred pounds of
 tobacco, seventeen hundred pounds of tea, two tons of flour, one ton of canned beef,
 twelve hundred pounds of canned butter, sixteen hundred pounds of canned cheese, eight
 hundred pounds of powdered milk., and two tons of orange marmalade.
  They kept all this in a room without windows. They had ratproofed it by lining it with
 flattened tin cans.
  They were adored by the Germans, who thought they were exactly what the
 Englishmen ought to be. They made war look stylish and reasonable, and fun. So the
 Germans let them have four sheds, though one shed would have held them all. And, in
 exchange for coffee or chocolate or tobacco, the Germans gave them paint and lumber
 and nails and cloth for fixing things up.
  The Englishmen had known for twelve hours that American guests were on their way.
 They had never had guests before, and they went to work like darling elves, sweeping, 
 mopping, cooking, baking-making mattresses of straw and burlap bags, setting tables,
 putting party favors at each place.
  Now they were singing their welcome to their guests in the winter night. Their clothes
 were aromatic with the feast they had been preparing. They were dressed half for battle,
 half for tennis or croquet. They were so elated by their own hospitality, and by all the
 goodies waiting inside, that they did not take a good look at their guests while they sang.
 And they imagined that they were singing to fellow officers fresh from the fray.
  They wrestled the Americans toward the shed door affectionately, filling the night with
 manly blather and brotherly rodomontades. They called them 'Yank,' told them 'Good
 show,' promised them that 'Jerry was on the run,' and so on.
  Billy Pilgrim wondered dimly who Jerry was.
  Now he was indoors., next to an iron cookstove that was glowing cherry red. Dozens
 of teapots were boiling there. Some of them had whistles. And there was a witches'
 cauldron full of golden soup. The soup was thick. Primeval bubbles surfaced it with
 lethargical majesty as Billy Pilgrim stared.
  There were long tables set for a banquet. At each place was a bowl made from a can
 that had once contained powdered milk. A smaller can was a cup. A taller, more slender
 can was a tumbler. Each tumbler was filled with warm milk.
  At each place was a safety razor, a washcloth, a package of razor blades, a chocolate
 bar, two cigars, a bar of soap,, ten cigarettes, a book of matches, a pencil and a candle.
  Only the candles and the soap were of German origin. They had a ghostly, opalescent
 similarity. The British had no way of knowing it, but the candles and the soap were made
 from the fat of rendered Jews and Gypsies and fairies and communists, and other enemies
 of the State.
  So it goes.
  The banquet hall was illuminated by candlelight. There were heaps of fresh baked
 white bread on the tables, gobs of butter, pots of marmalade. There were platters of sliced
 beef from cans. Soup and scrambled eggs and hot marmalade pie were yet to come.
  And, at the far end of the shed, Billy saw pink arches with azure draperies hanging
 between them, and an enormous clock, and two golden thrones, and a bucket and a mop.
 It was in this setting that the evening's entertainment would take place, a musical version
 of Cinderella, the most popular story ever told.
  Billy Pilgrim was on fire, having stood too close to the glowing stove. The hem of his
 little coat was burning. It was a quiet, patient sort of fire-like the burning of punk.
  Billy wondered ff there was a telephone somewhere. He wanted to call his mother, to
 tell her he was alive and well.
  There was silence now, as the Englishmen looked in astonishment at the frowsy
 creatures they had so lustily waltzed inside. One of the Englishmen saw that Billy was on
 fire. 'You're on fire lad!' he said, and he got Billy away from the stove and beat out the
 sparks with his hands.
  When Billy made no comment on this, the Englishman asked him, 'Can you talk? Can
 you hear?' 
  Billy nodded.
  The Englishman touched him exploratorily here and there, filled with pity. 'My Godwhat
 have they done to you, lad? This isn't a man. It's a broken kite.'
  'Are you really an American?' said the Englishman.
  'Yes,' said Billy.
  'And your rank?'
  'Private.'
  'What became of your boots, lad?'
  'I don't remember.'
  'Is that coat a joke?'
  'Sir?'
  'Where did you get such a thing?'
  Billy had to think hard about that. 'They gave it to me,' he said at last.
  'Jerry gave it to you?'
  'Who? '
  'The Germans gave it to you?'
  'Yes.'
  Billy didn't like the questions. They were fatiguing.
  'Ohhhh-Yank, Yank, Yank,' said the Englishman, 'that coat was an insult,
  'Sir? '
  'It was a deliberate attempt to humiliate you. You mustn't let Jerry do things like that.'
  Billy Pilgrim swooned.
  Billy came to on a chair facing the stage. He I had somehow eaten, and now he was
 watching Cinderella. Some part of him had evidently been enjoying the performance for
 quite a while. Billy was laughing hard.
  The women in the play were really men, of course. The clock had just struck midnight
 and Cinderella was lamenting
 'Goodness me, the clock has struckAlackaday,
 and fuck my luck.'
  Billy found the couplet so comical that he not only laughed-he shrieked. He went on
 shrieking until he was carried out of the shed and into another, where the hospital was. It
 was a six-bed hospital. There weren't any other patients in there.
  Billy was put to bed and tied down, and given a shot of morphine. Another American
 volunteered to watch over him. This volunteer was Edgar Derby, the high school teacher
 who would be shot to death in Dresden. So it goes.
  Derby sat on a three-legged stool. He was given a book to read. The book was The Red
 Badge of Courage, by Stephen Crane. Derby had read it before. Now he read it again
 while Billy Pilgrim entered a morphine paradise.
  Under morphine, Billy had a dream of giraffes in a garden. The giraffes were following
 gravel paths, were pausing to munch sugar pears from treetops. Billy was a giraffe, too. 
 He ate a pear. It was a hard one. It fought back against his grinding teeth. It snapped in
 juicy protest.
  The giraffes accepted Billy as one of their own, as a harmless creature as
 preposterously specialized as themselves. Two approached him from opposite sides,
 leaned against him. They had long, muscular upper lips which they could shape like the
 bells of bugles. They kissed him with these. They were female giraffes-cream and lemon
 yellow. They had horns like doorknobs. The knobs were covered with velvet.
  Why?
  Night came to the garden of the giraffes, and Billy Pilgrim slept without dreaming for a
 while, and then he traveled in time. He woke up with his head under a blanket in a ward
 for nonviolent mental patients in a veterans' hospital near Lake Placid, New York. It was
 springtime in 1948, three years after the end of the war.
  Billy uncovered his head. The windows of the ward were open. Birds were twittering
 outside. 'Poo-tee-weet?' one asked him. The sun was high. There were twenty-nine other
 patients assigned to the ward, but they were all outdoors now, enjoying the day. They
 were free to come and go as they pleased, to go home, even., if they liked-and so was
 Billy Pilgrim. They had come here voluntarily, alarmed by the outside world.
  Billy had committed himself in the middle of his final year at the Ilium School of
 Optometry. Nobody else suspected that he was going crazy. Everybody else thought he
 looked fine and was acting fine. Now he was in the hospital. The doctors agreed: He was
 going crazy.
  They didn't think it had anything to do with the war. They were sure Billy was going to
 pieces because his father had thrown him into the deep end of the Y.M.C.A. swimming
 pool when he was a little boy, and had then taken him to the rim of the Grand Canyon.
  The man assigned to the bed next to Billy's was a former infantry captain named Eliot
 Rosewater. Rosewater was sick and tired of being drunk all the time.
  It was Rosewater who introduced Billy to science fiction, and in particular to the
 writings of Kilgore Trout. Rosewater had a tremendous collection of science-fiction
 paperbacks under his bed. He had brought them to the hospital in a steamer trunk. Those
 beloved, frumpish books gave off a smell that permeated the ward-like flannel pajamas
 that hadn't been changed for a month, or like Irish stew.
  Kilgore Trout became Billy's favorite living author, and science fiction became the
 only sort of tales he could read.
  Rosewater was twice as smart as Billy., but he and Billy were dealing with similar
 crises in similar ways. They had both found life meaningless, partly because of what they
 had seen in war. Rosewater., for instance, had shot a fourteen-year-old fireman,
 mistaking him for a German soldier. So it goes. And Billy had seen the greatest massacre
 in European history, which was the firebombing of Dresden. So it goes.
  So they were trying to re-invent themselves and their universe. Science fiction was a
 big help.
  Rosewater said an interesting thing to Billy one time about a book that wasn't science
 fiction. He said that everything there was to know about life was in The Brothers
 Karamazov, by Feodor Dostoevsky. 'But that isn't enough any more.' said Rosewater. 
  Another time Billy heard Rosewater say to a psychiatrist, 'I think you guys are going to
 have to come up with a lot of wonderful new lies, or people just aren't going to want to
 go on living.'
  There was a still life on Billy's bedside table-two pills, an ashtray with three lipstickstained
 cigarettes in it, one cigarette Still burning, and a glass of water. The water was
 dead. So it goes. Air was trying to get out of that dead water. Bubbles were clinging to
 the walls of the glass, too weak to climb out.
  The cigarettes belonged to Billy's chain-smoking mother. She had sought the ladies'
 room, which was off the ward for WACS and WAVES and SPARS and WAFS who had
 gone bananas. She would be back at any moment now.
  Billy covered his head with his blanket again. He always covered his head when his
 mother came to see him in the mental ward-always got much sicker until she went away.
 It wasn't that she was ugly, or had bad breath or a bad personality. She was a perfectly
 nice, standard-issue, brown-haired, white woman with a high-school education.
  She upset Billy simply by being his mother. She made him feel embarrassed and
 ungrateful and weak because she had gone to so much trouble to give him life, and to
 keep that life going, and Billy didn't really like life at all.
  Billy heard Eliot Rosewater come in and lie down. Rosewater's bedsprings talked a lot
 about that. Rosewater was a big man, but not very powerful. He looked as though he
 might be made out of nose putty.
  And then Billy's mother came back from the ladies' room, sat down on a chair between
 Billy's and Rosewater's bed. Rosewater greeted her with melodious warmth, asked how
 she was today. He seemed delighted to hear that she was fine. He was experimenting with
 being ardently sympathetic with everybody he met. He thought that might make the
 world a slightly more pleasant place to live in. He called Billy's mother 'dear.' He was
 experimenting with calling everybody 'dear.'
  Some day' she promised Rosewater., "I'm going to come in here, and Billy is going to
 uncover his head, and do you know what he's going to say?'
  'What's he going to say, dear?'
  'He's going to say, "Hello, Mom," and he's going to smile. He's going to say, "Gee, it's
 good to see you, Mom. How have you been?"'
  'Today could -be the day.'
  'Every night I pray.'
  'That's a good thing to do.'
  'People would be surprised ff they knew how much in this world was due to prayers.'
  'You never said a truer word, dear.'
  'Does your mother come to see you often?'
  'My mother is dead,' said Rosewater. So it goes.
  'I'm sorry.'
  'At least she had a happy life as long as it lasted.'
  'That's a consolation, anyway.'
  'Yes.'
  'Billy's father is dead., you know, said Billy's mother. So it goes. 
  'A boy needs a father.'
  And on and on it went-that duet between the dumb, praying lady and the big, hollow
 man so full of loving echoes.
  'He was at the top of his class when this happened,' said Billy's mother.
  'Maybe he. was working too hard.' said Rosewater. He held a book he wanted to read,
 but he was much too polite to read and talk, too, easy as it was to give Billy's mother
 satisfactory answers. The book was Maniacs in the Fourth Dimension, by Kilgore Trout.
 It was about people whose mental diseases couldn't be treated because the causes of the
 diseases were all in the fourth dimension., and three-dimensional Earthling doctors
 couldn't see those causes at all, or even imagine them.
  One thing Trout said that Rosewater liked very much was that there really were
 vampires and werewolves and goblins and angels and so on, but that they were in the
 fourth dimension. So was William Blake, Rosewater's favorite poet, according to Trout.
 So were heaven and hell.
  'He's engaged to a very rich girl,' said Billy's mother.
  'That’s good,' said Rosewater. 'Money can be a great comfort sometimes.'
  'It really can.'
  'Of course it can.'
  'It isn't much fun if you have to pinch every penny till it screams.
  'It's nice to have a little breathing room.'
  'Her father owns the optometry school where Billy was going. He also owns six offices
 around our part of the state. He flies his own plane and has a summer place up on Lake
 George.'
  'That's a beautiful lake.'
  Billy fell asleep under his blanket. When he woke up again, he was tied to the bed in
 the hospital back in prison. He opened one eye, saw poor old Edgar Derby reading The
 Red Badge of Courage by candlelight.
  Billy closed that one eye saw in his memory of the future poor old Edgar Derby in
 front of a firing squad in the ruins of Dresden. There were only four men in that squad.
 Billy had heard that one man in each firing squad was customarily given a rifle loaded
 with blank cartridge. Billy didn't think there would be a blank cartridge issued in a squad
 that small, in a war that old.
  Now the head Englishman came into the hospital to check on Billy. He was an infantry
 colonel captured at Dunkirk. It was he who had given Billy morphine. There wasn't a real
 doctor in the compound, so the doctoring was up to him. 'How's the patient?' he asked
 Derby.
  'Dead to the world.'
  'But not actually dead.'
  'No.'
  'How nice-to feel nothing, and still get full credit for being alive.'
  Derby now came to lugubrious attention. 
  'No, no-please-as you were. With only two men for each officer, and all the men sick, I
 think we can do without the usual pageantry between officers and men.'
  Derby remained standing. 'You seem older than the rest,' said the colonel.
  Derby told him he was forty-five, which was two years older than the colonel. The
 colonel said that the other Americans had all shaved now, that Billy and Derby were the
 only two still with beards. And he said, 'You know we've had to imagine the war here,
 and we have imagined that it was being fought by aging men like ourselves. We had
 forgotten that wars were fought by babies. When I saw those freshly shaved faces, it was
 a shock "My God, my God-" I said to myself. "It's the Children's Crusade."'
  The colonel asked old Derby how he had been captured, and Derby told a tale of being
 in a clump of trees with about a hundred other frightened soldiers. The battle had been
 going on for five days. The hundred had been driven into the trees by tanks.
  Derby described the incredible artificial weather that Earthlings sometimes create for
 other Earthlings when they don't want those other Earthlings to inhabit Earth any more.
 Shells were bursting in the treetops with terrific bangs, he said, showering down knives
 and needles and razorblades. Little lumps of lead in copper jackets were crisscrossing the
 woods under the shellbursts, zipping along much faster than sound.
  A lot of people were being wounded or killed. So it goes.
  Then the shelling stopped, and a hidden German with a loudspeaker told the
 Americans to put their weapons down and come out of the woods with their hands on the
 top of their heads, or the shelling would start again. It wouldn't stop until everybody in
 there was dead.
  So the Americans put their weapons down, and they came out of the woods with their
 hands on top of their heads, because they wanted to go on living, if they possibly could.
  Billy traveled in time back to the veterans' hospital again. The blanket was over his
 head. It was quiet outside the blanket. "Is my mother gone?' said Billy.
  'Yes.'
  Billy peeked out from under his blanket. His fiancée was out there now, sitting on the
 visitor's chair. Her name was Valencia Merble. Valencia was the daughter of the owner of
 the Ilium School of Optometry. She was rich. She was as big as a house because she
 couldn't stop eating. She was eating now. She was eating a Three Musketeers Candy Bar.
 She was wearing trifocal lenses in harlequin frames, and the frames were trimmed with
 rhinestones. The glitter of the rhinestones was answered by the glitter of the diamond in
 her engagement ring. The diamond was insured for eighteen hundred dollars. Billy had
 found that diamond in Germany. It was booty of war.
  Billy didn't want to marry ugly Valencia. She was one of the symptoms of his disease.
 He knew he was going crazy, when he heard himself proposing marriage to her., when he
 begged her to take the diamond ring and be his companion for life.
  Billy said, 'Hello,' to her, and she asked him if he wanted some candy, and he said, 'No,
 thanks.'
  She asked him how he was, and he said, 'Much better, thanks.' She said that everybody
 at the Optometry School was sorry he was sick and hoped he would be well soon, and
 Billy said, 'When you see 'em, tell 'em, "Hello."'
  She promised she would. 
  She asked him if there was anything she could bring him from the outside, and he said,
 'No. I have just about everything I want.'
  'What about books?' said Valencia.
  'I'm right next to one of the biggest private libraries in the world,' said Billy, meaning
 Eliot Rosewater's collection of science fiction.
  Rosewater was on the next bed, reading, and Billy drew him into the conversation,
 asked him what he was reading this time.
  So Rosewater told him. It was The Gospel from Outer Space, by Kilgore Trout. It was
 about a visitor from outer space, shaped very much like a Tralfamadorian by the way.
 The visitor from outer space made a serious study of Christianity, to learn, if he could,
 why Christians found it so easy to be cruel. He concluded that at least part of the trouble
 was slipshod storytelling in the New Testament. He supposed that the intent of the
 Gospels was to teach people, among other things, to be merciful, even to the lowest of the
 low.
  But the Gospels actually taught this:
  Before you kill somebody, make absolutely sure he isn't well connected. So it goes.
  The flaw in the Christ stories, said the visitor from outer space, was that Christ, who
 didn't look like much, was actually the Son of the Most Powerful Being in the Universe.
 Readers understood that, so, when they came to the crucifixion, they naturally thought,
 and Rosewater read out loud again:
  Oh, boy-they sure picked the wrong guy to lynch that time!
  And that thought had a brother: 'There are right people to lynch.' Who? People not well
 connected. So it goes.
  The visitor from outer space made a gift to Earth of a new Gospel. In it, Jesus really
 was a nobody, and a pain in the neck to a lot of people with better connections than he
 had. He still got to say all the lovely and puzzling things he said in the other Gospels.
  So the people amused themselves one day by nailing him to a cross and planting the
 cross in the ground. There couldn't possibly be any repercussions, the lynchers thought.
 The reader would have to think that, too, since the new Gospel hammered home again
 and again what a nobody Jesus was.
  And then, just before the nobody died, the heavens opened up, and there was thunder
 and lightning. The voice of God came crashing down. He told the people that he was
 adopting the bum as his son giving him the full powers and privileges of The Son of the
 Creator of the Universe throughout all eternity. God said this From this moment on, He
 will punish horribly anybody who torments a bum who has no connections!
  Billy's fiancée had finished her Three Musketeers Candy Bar. Now she was eating a
 Milky Way.
  'Forget books,' said Rosewater, throwing that particular book under his bed. 'The hell
 with 'em.'
  'That sounded like an interesting one,' said Valencia.
  Jesus-if Kilgore Trout could only write!' Rosewater exclaimed. He had a point: Kilgore
 Trout's unpopularity was deserved. His prose was frightful. Only his ideas were good. 
  'I don't think Trout has ever been out of the country, ' Rosewater went on. 'My God-he
 writes about Earthlings all the time, and they're all Americans. Practically nobody on is
 an American.'
  'Where does he live?" Valencia asked.
  'Nobody knows,' Rosewater replied. 'I'm the only person who ever heard of him, as far
 as I can tell. No two books have the same publisher, and every time I write him in care of
 a publisher, the letter comes back because the publisher has failed.'
  He changed the subject now, congratulated Valencia on her engagement ring.
  'Thank you,' she said, and held it out so Rosewater could get a close look. 'Billy got
 that diamond in the war.'
  'That's the attractive thing about war,' said Rosewater. Absolutely everybody gets a
 little something.'
  With regard to the whereabouts of Kilgore Trout: he actually lived in Ilium, Billy's
 hometown, friendless and despised. Billy would meet him by and by.
  'Billy' said Valencia Merble.
  'Hm?'
  'You want to talk about our silver pattern? '
  'Sure.'
  'I've got it narrowed down pretty much to either Royal Danish or Rambler Rose.'
  'Rambler Rose,' said Billy.
  'It isn't something we should rush into,' she said. 'I mean whatever we decide on, that's
 what we're going to have to live with the rest of our lives.'
  Billy studied the pictures. 'Royal Danish.' he said at last.
  'Colonial Moonlight is nice, too.'
  'Yes, it is,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  And Billy traveled in time to the zoo on Tralfamadore. He was forty-four years old, on
 display under a geodesic dome. He was reclining on the lounge chair which had been his
 cradle during his trip through space. He was naked. The Tralfamadorians were
 interested in his body-all of it. There were thousands of them outside, holding up their
 little hands so that their eyes could see him. Billy had been on Tralfamadore for six
 Earthling months now. He was used to the crowd.
  Escape was out of the question. The atmosphere outside the dome was cyanide, and
 Earth was 446,120,000,000,000,000 miles away.
  Billy was displayed there in the zoo in a simulated Earthling habitat. Most of the
 furnishings had been stolen from the Sears & Roebuck warehouse in Iowa City, Iowa.
 There was a color television set and a couch that could be converted into a bed. There
 were end tables with lamps and ashtrays on them by the couch. There was a home bar
 and two stools. There was a little pool table. There was wall-to-wall carpeting in federal
 gold, except in the kitchen and bathroom areas and over the iron manhole cover in the
 center of the floor. There were magazines arranged in a fan on the coffee table in front of
 the couch. 
  There was a stereophonic phonograph. The phonograph worked. The television didn't.
 There was a picture Of one cowboy g another one pasted to the television tube. So it
 goes.
  There were no wall in the dome, nor place for Billy to hide. The mint green bathroom
 fixtures were right out in the open. Billy got off his lounge chair now, went into the
 bathroom and took a leak. The crowd went wild.
  Billy brushed his teeth on Tralfamadore, put in his partial denture, and went into his
 kitchen. His bottled-gas range and his refrigerator and his dishwasher were mint green,
 too. There was a picture painted on the door of the refrigerator. The refrigerator had
 come that way. It was a picture of a Gay Nineties couple on a bicycle built for two.
 Billy looked at that picture now, tried to think something about the couple. Nothing
 came to him. There didn't seem to be anything to think about those two people.
  Billy ate a good breakfast from cans. He washed his cup and plate and knife and fork
 and spoon and saucepan, put them away. Then he did exercises he had learned in the
 Army-straddle jumps, deep knee bends, sit-ups and push-ups. Most Tralfamadorians had
 no way of knowing Bill's body and face were not beautiful. They supposed that he was a
 splendid specimen. This had a pleasant effect on Billy, who began to enjoy his body for
 the first time.
  He showered after his exercises and trimmed his toenails. He shaved and sprayed
 deodorant under his arms, while a zoo guide on a raised platform outside explained what
 Billy was doing-and why. The guide was lecturing telepathically, simply standing there,
 sending out thought waves to the crowd. On the platform with him was the little
 keyboard instrument with which he would relay questions to Billy from the crowd.
 Now the first question came-from the speaker on the television set: 'Are you happy here?'
  'About as happy as I was on Earth,' said Billy Pilgrim, which was true.
  There were fives sexes on Tralfamadore, each of them performing a step necessary in
 the creation of a new individual. They looked identical to Billy-because their sex
 differences were all in the fourth dimension.
  One of the biggest moral bombshells handed to Billy by the Tralfamadorians,
 incidentally, had to do with sex on Earth. They said their flying-saucer crews had
 identified no fewer than seven sexes on Earth, each essential to reproduction. Again:
 Billy couldn't possibly imagine what five of those seven sexes had to do with the making
 of a baby, since they were sexually active only in the fourth dimension.
  The Tralfamadorians tried to give Billy clues that would help him imagine sex in the
 invisible dimension. They told him that there could be no Earthling babies without male
 homosexuals. There could be babies without female homosexuals. There couldn't be
 babies without women over sixty-five years old. There could be babies without men over
 sixty-five. There couldn't be babies without other babies who had lived an hour or less
 after birth. And so on.
  It was gibberish to Billy. 
  There was a lot that Billy said that was gibberish to the Tralfamadorians, too. They
 couldn't imagine what time looked like to him. Billy had given up on explaining that.
 The guide outside had to explain as best he could.
  The guide invited the crowd to imagine that they were looking across a desert at a
 mountain range on a day that was twinkling bright and clear. They could look at a peak
 or a bird or a cloud, at a stone right in front of them, or even down into a canyon behind
 them. But among them was this poor Earthling, and his head was encased in a steel
 sphere which he could never take off. There was only one eyehole through which he
 could look, and welded to that eyehole were six feet of pipe.
  This was only the beginning of Billy's miseries in the metaphor. He was also strapped
 to a steel lattice which was bolted to a flatcar on rails, And there was no way he could
 turn his head or touch the pipe. The far end of the pipe rested on a bi-pod which was also
 bolted to the flatcar. All Billy could see was the dot at the end of the pipe. He didn't
 know he was on a flatcar, didn't even know there was anything peculiar about his
 situation.
  The flatcar sometimes crept, sometimes went extremely fast, often stopped-went
 uphill, downhill, around curves, along straightaways. Whatever poor Billy saw through
 the pipe, he had no choice but to say to himself, 'That's life.'
  Billy expected the Tralfamadorians to be baffled and alarmed by all the wars and other
 forms of murder on Earth. He expected them to fear that the Earthling combination of
 ferocity and spectacular weaponry might eventually destroy part or maybe all of the
 innocent Universe. Science fiction had led him to expect that.
  But the subject of war never came up until Billy brought it up himself. Somebody in
 the zoo crowd asked him through the lecturer what the most valuable thing he had
 learned on Tralfamadore was so far, and Billy replied, 'How the inhabitants of a whole
 planet can live in peace I As you know, I am from a planet that has been engaged in
 senseless slaughter since the beginning of time. I myself have seen the bodies of
 schoolgirls who were boiled alive in a water tower by my own countrymen, who were
 proud of fighting pure evil at the time. ' This was true. Billy saw the boiled bodies in
 Dresden. 'And I have lit my way in a prison at night with candles from the fat of human
 beings who were butchered by the brothers and fathers of those school girls who were
 boiled. Earthlings must be the terrors of the Universe! If other planets aren't now in
 danger from Earth, they soon will be. So tell me the secret so I can take it back to Earth
 and save us all: How can a planet live at peace?'
  Billy felt that he had spoken soaringly. He was baffled when he saw the
 Tralfamadorians close their little hands on their eyes. He knew from past experience
 what this meant: He was being stupid.
  'Would-would you mind telling me,' he said to the guide, much deflated, 'what was so
 stupid about that?'
  'We know how the Universe ends,' said the guide, 'and Earth has nothing to do with it,
 except that it gets wiped out, too.'
  'How-how does the Universe end?' said Billy. 
  'We blow it up, experimenting with new fuels for our flying saucers. A
 Tralfamadorian test pilot presses a starter button, and the whole Universe disappears.' So
 it goes.
  "If You know this," said Billy, 'isn't there some way you can prevent it? Can't you
 keep the pilot from pressing the button?'
  'He has always pressed it, and he always will. We always let him and we always will
 let him. The moment is structured that way.'
  'So,' said Billy gropingly, I suppose that the idea of, preventing war on Earth is stupid,
 too. '
  'Of course.'
  'But you do have a peaceful planet here.'
  'Today we do. On other days we have wars as horrible as any you've ever seen or read
 about. There isn't anything we can do about them, so we simply don't look at them. We
 ignore them. We spend eternity looking at pleasant moments-like today at the zoo. Isn't
 this a nice moment?'
  'Yes.'
  'That's one thing Earthlings might learn to do, if they tried hard enough: Ignore the
 awful times, and concentrate on the good ones.'
  'Um,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  Shortly after he went to sleep that night, Billy traveled in time to another moment
 which was quite nice, his wedding night with the former Valencia Merble. He had been
 out of the veterans' hospital for six months. He was all well. He had graduated from the
 Ilium School of Optometry-third in his class of forty-seven.
  Now he was in bed with Valencia in a delightful studio apartment which was built on
 the end of a wharf on Cape Ann, Massachusetts. Across the water were the lights of
 Gloucester. Billy was on top of Valencia, making love to her. One result of this act
 would be the birth of Robert Pilgrim, who would become a problem in high school, but
 who would then straighten out as a member of the famous Green Berets.
  Valencia wasn't a time-traveler, but she did have a lively imagination. While Billy was
 making love to her, she imagined that she was a famous woman in history. She was being
 Queen Elizabeth the First of England, and Billy was supposedly Christopher Columbus.
  Billy made a noise like a small, rusty hinge. He had just emptied his seminal vesicles
 into Valencia, had contributed his share of the Green Beret According to the
 Tralfamadorians, of course, the Green Beret would have seven parents in all.
  Now he rolled off his huge wife, whose rapt expression did not change when he
 departed. He lay with the buttons of his spine along the edge of the mattress, folded his
 hands behind his head. He was rich now. He had been rewarded for marrying a girl
 nobody in his right mind would have married. His father-in-law had given him a new
 Buick Roadmaster, an all-electric home, and had made him manager of his most
 prosperous office, his Ilium office, where Billy could expect to make at least thirty
 thousand dollars a year. That was good. His father had been only a barber.
  As his mother said, "The Pilgrims are coming up in the world,' 
  The honeymoon was taking place in the bittersweet mysteries of Indian summer in
 New England. The lovers' apartment had one romantic wall which was all French doors.
 They opened onto a balcony and the oily harbor beyond.
  A green and orange dragger, black in the night, grumbled and drummed past their
 balcony, not thirty feet from their wedding bed. It was going to sea with only its running
 lights on. Its empty holds were resonant, made the song of the engines rich and loud.
 The wharf began to sing the same song, and then the honeymooners' headboard sang, too.
 And it continued to sing long after the dragger was gone.
  'Thank you,' said Valencia at last. The headboard was singing a mosquito song.
  'You're welcome.'
  'It was nice.'
  'I'm glad.'
  Then she began to cry.
  'What's the matter?'
  'I'm so happy.'
  'Good.'
  'I never thought anybody would marry me.'
  'Um,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  I'm going to lose weight for you,' she said.
  'What?'
  'I'm going to go on a diet. I'm going to become beautiful for you.'
  'I like you just the way you are.'
  'Do you really?'
  'Really,' said Billy Pilgrim. He had already seen a lot of their marriage, thanks to timetravel,
 knew that it was going to be at least bearable all the way.
  A great motor yacht named the Scheherezade now slid past the marriage bed. The
 song its engines sang was a very low organ note. All her lights were on.
  Two beautiful people, a young man and a young woman in evening clothes, were at the
 rail hi the stem, loving each other and their dreams and the wake. They were
 honeymooning, too. They were Lance Rumfoord., of Newport, Rhode Island, and his
 bride,, the former Cynthia Landry., who had been a childhood sweetheart of John F.
 Kennedy in Hyannis Port, Massachusetts.
  There was a slight coincidence here. Billy Pilgrim would later share a hospital room
 with Rumfoord's uncle, Professor Bertram Copeland Rumfoord of Harvard, official
 Historian of the United States Air Force.
  When the beautiful people were past, Valencia questioned her funny-looking husband
 about war. It was a simple-minded thing for a female Earthling to do, to associate sex
 and glamor with war.
  'Do you ever think about the war?' she said, laying a hand on his thigh.
  'Sometimes,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  'I look at you sometimes,' said Valencia, 'and I get a funny feeling that you're full of
 secrets.' 
  'I'm not,' said Billy. This was a lie, of course. He hadn't told anybody about all the
 time traveling he'd done, about Tralfamadore and so on.
  'You must have secrets about the war. Or, not secrets, I guess, but things you don't
 want to talk about.'
  'No.'
  'I'm proud you were a soldier. Do you know that?'
  'Good.'
  'Was it awful?'
  'Sometimes.' A crazy thought now occurred to Billy. The truth of it startled him. It
 would make a good epitaph for Billy Pilgrim-and for me, too.
  'Would you talk about the war now, if I wanted you to?' said Valencia. In a tiny cavity
 in her great body she was assembling the materials for a Green Beret.
  'It would sound like a dream,', said Billy. 'Other people's dreams aren't very interesting
 usually.'
  'I heard you tell Father one time about a German firing squad.' She was referring to the
 execution of poor old Edgar Derby.
  'Um.'
  'You had to bury him? '
  'Yes.'
  Did he see you with your shovels before he was shot?'
  'Yes.'
  'Did he say anything?'
 EVERYTHING WAS BEAUTIFUL, AND NOTHING HURT
  'No.'
  'Was he scared?'
  'They had him doped up. He was sort of glassy-eyed.'
  And they pinned a target to him?'
  A piece of paper,' said Billy. He got out of bed, said, 'Excuse me, ' went to the
 darkness of the bathroom to take a leak. He groped for the light, realized as he felt the
 rough wall that he had traveled back to 1944, to the prison hospital again.
  The candle in the hospital had gone out. Poor old Edgar Derby had fallen asleep on the
 cot next to Billy's. Billy was out of bed, groping along a wall, trying to find a way out
 because he had to take a leak so badly.
  He suddenly found a door, which opened, let him reel out into the prison night. Billy
 was loony with time-travel and morphine. He delivered himself to a barbed-wire fence
 which snagged him in a dozen places. Billy tried to back away from it but the barbs
 wouldn't let go. So Billy did a silly little dance with the fence, taking a step this way,
 then that way, then returning to the beginning again.
  A Russian, himself out in the night to take a leak, saw Billy dancing-from the other
 side of the fence. He came over to the curious scarecrow, tried to talk with it gently,
 asked it what country it was from. The scarecrow paid no attention, went on dancing. So 
 the Russian undid the snags one b y one, and the scarecrow danced off into the night
 again without a word of thanks.
  The Russian waved to him, and called after him in Russian, 'Good-bye.'
  Billy took his pecker out, there in the prison night, and peed and peed on the ground.
 Then he put it away again, more or less, and contemplated a new problem: Where had he
 come from, and where should he go now?
  Somewhere in the night there were cries of grief. With nothing better to do, Billy
 shuffled in their direction. He wondered what tragedy so many had found to lament out
 of doors.
  Billy was approaching, without knowing it, the back of the latrine. It consisted of a
 one-rail fence with twelve buckets underneath it. The fence was sheltered on three sides
 by a screen of scrap lumber and flattened tin cans. The open side faced the black tarpaper
 wall of the shed where the feast had, taken place.
  Billy moved along the screen and reached a point where he could see a message
 freshly painted on the tarpaper wall. The words were written with the same pink paint
 which had brightened the set for Cinderella. Billy's perceptions were so unreliable that
 he saw the words as hanging in air, painted on a transparent curtain, perhaps. And there
 were lovely silver dots on the curtain, too. These were really nailheads holding the
 tarpaper to the shed. Billy could not imagine how the curtain was supported in
 nothingness, and he supposed that the magic curtain and the theatrical grief were part of
 some religious ceremony he knew nothing about.
  Here is what the message said:
 PLEASE LEAVE
 THIS LATRINE AS
 TIDY AS YOU
 FOUND IT!
  Billy looked inside the latrine. The wailing was coming from in there. The place was
 crammed with Americans who had taken their pants down. The welcome feast had made
 them as sick as volcanoes. The buckets were full or had been kicked over.
  An American near Billy wailed that he had excreted everything but his brains.
 Moments later he said, 'There they go, there they go.' He meant his brains.
  That was I. That was me. That was the author of this book.
  Billy reeled away from his vision of Hell. He passed three Englishmen who were
 watching the excrement festival from a distance. They were catatonic with disgust.
  'Button your pants!' said one as Billy went by.
 So Billy buttoned his pants. He came to the door of the little hospital by accident. He
 went through the door,, and found himself honeymooning again, going from the
 bathroom back to bed with his bride on Cape Ann.
  'I missed you' said Valencia.
  'I missed you,' said Billy Pilgrim. 
  Billy and Valencia went to sleep nestled like spoons, and Billy traveled in time back to
 the train ride he had taken in 194 4 from maneuvers in South Carolina to his father's
 funeral in Ilium. He hadn't seen Europe or combat yet. This was still in the days of steam
 locomotives.
  Billy had to change trains a lot. All the trains were slow. The coaches stunk of coal
 smoke and rationed tobacco and rationed booze and the farts of people eating wartime
 food. The upholstery of the iron seats was bristly, and Billy couldn't sleep much. He got
 to sleep soundly when he was only three hours from Ilium, with his legs splayed toward
 the entrance of the busy dining car.
  The porter woke him up when the train reached Ilium. Billy staggered off with his
 duffel bag, and then he stood on the station platform next to the porter, trying to wake up.
  'Have a good nap, did you?' said the porter.
  'Yes,' said Billy.
  'Man,' said the porter, 'you sure had a hard-on.'
  At three in the morning on Bill's morphine night in prison, a new patient was carried
 into the hospital by two lusty Englishmen. He was tiny. He was Paul Lazzaro, the polkadotted
 car thief from Cicero, Illinois. He had been caught stealing cigarettes from under
 the pillow of an Englishman. The Englishman, half asleep, had broken Lazzaro's right
 arm and knocked him unconscious.
  The Englishman who had done this was helping to carry Lazzaro in now. He had fiery
 red hair and no eyebrows. He had been Cinderella's Blue Fairy Godmother in the play.
 Now he supported his half of Lazzaro with one hand while he closed the door behind
 himself with the other. 'Doesn't weigh as much as a chicken,' he said.
  The Englishman with Lazzaro's feet was the colonel who had given Billy his knock-out
 shot.
  The Blue Fairy Godmother was embarrassed, and angry, too. 'If I'd known I was
 fighting a chicken,' he said, 'I wouldn't have fought so hard.'
  'Um.'
  The Blue Fairy Godmother spoke frankly about how disgusting all the Americans
 were. 'Weak, smelly, self-pitying-a pack of sniveling, dirty, thieving bastards,' he said.
 'They're worse than the bleeding Russians.'
  'Do seem a scruffy lot,' the colonel agreed.
  A German major came in now. He considered the Englishmen as close friends. He
 visited them nearly every day, played games with them, lectured to them on German
 history, played their piano, gave them lessons in conversational German. He told them
 often that, if it weren't for their civilized company, he would go mad. His English was
 splendid.
  He was apologetic about the Englishmen's having to put up with the American enlisted
 men. He promised them that they would not be inconvenienced for more than a day or
 two, that the Americans would soon be shipped to Dresden as contract labor. He had a
 monograph with him, published by the German Association of Prison Officials. It was a
 report on the behavior in Germany of American enlisted men as prisoners of war. It was
 written by a former American who had risen high in the German Ministry of Propaganda. 
 His name was Howard W. Campbell, Jr. He would later hang himself while awaiting trial
 as a war criminal.
  So it goes.
  While the British colonel set Lazzaro's broken arm and mixed plaster for the cast, the
 German major translated out loud passages from Howard W. Campbell, Jr.'s monograph.
 Campbell had been a fairly well-known playwright at one time. His opening line was this
 one:
  America is the wealthiest nation on Earth, but its people are mainly poor, and poor
 Americans are urged to hate themselves To quote the American humorist Kin Hubbard,
 'It ain't no disgrace to be poor, but might as well be.' It is in fact a crime for an American
 to be poor, even though America is a nation of poor. Every other nation has folk
 traditions of men who were poor but extremely wise and virtuous, and therefore more
 estimable than anyone with power and gold. No such tales are told by the American
 poor. They mock themselves and glorify their betters. The meanest eating or drinking
 establishment, owned by a man who is himself poor, is very likely to have a sign on its
 wall asking this cruel question: 'If you're so smart, why ain't You rich? ' There will also
 be an American flag no larger than a child's hand-glued to a lollipop stick and, flying
 from the cash register.
  The author of the monograph, a native of Schenectady, New York, was said by some to
 have had the highest I.Q. of all the war criminals who were made to face a death by
 hanging. So it goes.
  Americans, like human beings everywhere, believe many things that are obviously
 untrue, the monograph went on. Their most destructive untruth is that it is very easy for
 any American to make money. They will not acknowledge how in fact hard money is to
 come by, and, therefore, those who have no money blame and blame and blame
 themselves. This inward blame has been a treasure for the rich and powerful, who have
 had to do less for their poor, publicly and privately, than any other ruling class since, say,
 Napoleonic times.
  Many novelties have come from America. The most startling of these, a thing without
 precedent, is a mass of undignified poor. They do not love one another because they do
 not love themselves. Once this is understood the disagreeable behavior of American
 enlisted men in German prisons ceases to be a mystery.
  Howard W. Cambell, Jr., now discussed the uniform of the American enlisted in the
 Second World War: Every other army in history, prosperous or not, has attempted to
 clothe even its lowliest soldiers so as to make them impressive to themselves and others
 as stylish experts in drinking and copulation and looting and sudden death. The American
 Army, however, sends its enlisted men out to fight and die in a modified business suit
 quite evidently made for another man, a sterilized but unpressed gift from a nose-holding
 charity which passes out clothing to drunks in the slums.
  When a dashingly-clad officer addresses such a frumpishly dressed bum, he scolds
 him, as an officer in an army must. But the officer's contempt is not, as in 'other armies,
 avuncular theatricality. It is a genuine expression of hatred for the poor, who have no one
 to blame for their misery but themselves. 
  A prison administrator dealing with captured American enlisted men for the first time
 should be warned: Expect no brotherly love, even between brothers. There will be no
 cohesion between the individuals. Each will be a sulky child who often wishes he were
 dead
  Campbell told what the German experience with captured American enlisted men had
 been. They were known everywhere to be the most self-pitying, least fraternal and dirtiest
 of all prisoners of war, said Campbell. They were incapable of concerted action on their
 own behalf. They despised any leader from among their own number, refused to follow
 or even listen to him, on the grounds that he was no better than they were, that he should
 stop putting on airs.
  And so on. Billy Pilgrim went to sleep, woke up as a widower in his empty home in
 Ilium. His daughter Barbara was reproaching him for writing ridiculous letters to the
 newspapers.
  'Did you hear what I said?' Barbara inquired. It was 1968 again.
  'Of course.' He had been dozing.
  'If you're going to act like a child, maybe we'll just have to treat you like a child.'
  'That isn't what happens next,' said Billy.
  'We'll see what happens next.' Big Barbara now embraced herself. 'It's awfully cold in
 here. Is the heat on?'
  'The heat? '
  'The furnace-the thing in the basement, the thing that makes hot air that comes out of
 these registers. I don't think it's working.'
  'Maybe not.'
  'Aren't you cold?'
  'I hadn't noticed.'
  'Oh my God, you are a child. If we leave you alone here, you'll freeze to death, you'll
 starve to death.' And so on. It was very exciting for her, taking his dignity away in the
 name of love.
  Barbara called the oil-burner man, and she made Billy go to bed, made him promise to
 stay under the electric blanket until the heat came on. She set the control of the blanket at
 the highest notch, which soon made Billy's bed hot enough to bake bread in.
  When Barbara left, slamming the door behind her, Billy traveled in time to the zoo on
 Tralfamadore again. A mate has just been brought to him from Earth. She was Montana
 Wildhack, a motion picture star.
  Montana was under heavy sedation. Tralfamadorians wearing gas masks brought her
 in, put her on Billy's yellow lounge chair; withdrew through his airlock. The vast crowd
 outside was delighted. All attendance records for the zoo were broken. Everybody on the
 planet wanted to see the Earthlings mate.
  Montana was naked, and so was Billy, of course. He had a tremendous wang,
 incidentally. You never know who'll get one. 
  Now she fluttered her eyelids. Her lashes were like buggy whips. 'Where am I?' she
 said.
  'Everything is all right,' said Billy gently. 'Please don't be afraid.
  Montana had been unconscious during her trip from Earth. The Tralfamadorians
 hadn't talked to her, hadn't shown themselves to her. The last thing she remembered was
 sunning herself by a swimming pool in Palm Springs, California. Montana was only
 twenty years old. Around her neck was a silver chain with a heart-shaped locket hanging
 from it-between her breasts.
  Now she turned her head to see the myriads of Tralfamadorians outside the dome.
 They were applauding her by opening and closing their little green hands quickly.
  Montana screamed and screamed.
  All the little green hands closed fight, because Montana's terror was so unpleasant to
 see. The head zoo keeper ordered a crane operator, who was standing by, to drop a navy
 blue canopy over the dome, thus simulating Earthling night inside. Real night came to the
 zoo for only one Earthling hour out of every sixty-two.
  Billy switched on a floor lamp. The light from the single source threw the baroque
 detailing of Montana's body into sharp relief. Billy was reminded of fantastic architecture
 in Dresden, before it was bombed.
  In time, Montana came to love and trust Billy Pilgrim. He did not touch her until she
 made it clear that she wanted him to. After she had been on Tralfamadore for what would
 have been an Earthling week, she asked him shyly if he wouldn't sleep with her. Which
 he did. It was heavenly.
  And Billy traveled in time from that delightful bed to a bed in 1968. It was his bed in
 Ilium, and the electric blanket was turned up high. He was drenched in sweat,
 remembered groggily that his daughter had put him to bed, had told him to stay there
 until the oil burner was repaired.
  Somebody was knocking on his bedroom door.
  'Yes?' said Billy.
  'Oil-burner man.'
  'Yes?'
  'It’s running good now. Heat's coming up.'
  'Good.'
  'Mouse ate through a wire from the thermostat'
  'I'll be darned.'
  Billy sniffed. His hot bed smelled like a mushroom cellar. He had had a wet dream
 about Montana Wildhack.
  On the morning after that wet dream, Billy decided to go back to work in his office in
 the shopping plaza. Business was booming as usual. His assistants were keeping up with
 it nicely. They were startled to see him. They had been told by his daughter that he might
 never practice again.
  But Billy went into his examining room briskly, asked that the first patient be sent in.
 So they sent him one-a twelve-year old boy who was accompanied by his-widowed 
 mother. They were strangers, new in town. Billy asked them a little about themselves,
 learned that the boy's father had been killed in Vietnam-in the famous five-day battle for
 Hill 875 near Dakto. So it goes.
  While he examined the boy's eyes, Billy told him matter-of-factly about his adventures
 on Tralfamadore, assured the fatherless boy that his father was very much alive still in
 moments the boy would see again and again.
  'Isn't that comforting?' Billy asked.
  And somewhere in there, the boy's mother went out and told the receptionist that Billy
 was evidently going crazy. Billy was taken home. His daughter asked him again, 'Father,
 Father, Father-what are we going to do with you?'
 Six
 Listen:
  Billy Pilgrim says he went to Dresden Germany, on the day after his morphine night in
 the British compound in the center of the extermination camp for Russian prisoners of
 war. Billy woke up at dawn on that day in January. There were no windows in the little
 hospital, and the ghostly candles had gone out. So the only light came from pin-prick
 holes in the walls, and from a sketchy rectangle that outlined the imperfectly fitted door.
 Little Paul Lazzaro, with a broken arm, snored on one bed. Edgar Derby, the high school
 teacher who would eventually he shot, snored on another.
  Billy sat up in bed. He had no idea what year it was or what planet he was on.
 Whatever the planet's name was, it was cold. But it wasn't the cold that had awakened
 Billy. It was animal magnetism which was making him shiver and itch. It gave him
 profound aches in his musculature, as though he had been exercising hard.
  The animal magnetism was coming from behind him. If Billy had had to guess as to
 the source, he would have said that there was a vampire bat hanging upside down on the
 wall behind him.
  Billy moved down toward the foot of his cot before turning to look at whatever it was.
 He didn't want the animal to drop into his face and maybe claw his eyes out or bite off his
 big nose. Then he turned. The source of the magnetism really did resemble a bat. It was
 Billy's impresario's coat with the fur collar. It was hanging from a nail.
  Billy now backed toward it again, looking at it over his shoulder, feeling the
 magnetism increase. Then he faced it, kneeling on his cot, dared to touch it here and
 there. He was seeking the exact source of the radiations.
  He found two small sources, two lumps an inch apart and hidden in the lining. One was
 shaped like a pea. The other was shaped like a tiny horseshoe. Billy received a message
 carried by the radiations. He was told not to find out what the lumps were. He was
 advised to be content with knowing that they could work miracles for him, provided he
 did not insist on learning their nature. That was all right with Billy Pilgrim. He was
 grateful. He was glad.
  Billy dozed, awakened in the prison hospital again. The sun was high. Outside were
 Golgotha sounds of strong men digging holes for upright timbers in hard, hard ground. 
 Englishmen were building themselves a new latrine. They had abandoned their old latrine
 to the American d their theater the place where the feast had been held, too.
  Six Englishmen staggered through a hospital with a pool table on which several
 mattresses were piled. They were transferring it to living quarters attached to the hospital.
 They were followed by an Englishman dragging his mattress and carrying a dartboard.
  The man with the dartboard was the Blue Fairy Godmother who had injured little Paul
 Lazzaro. He stopped by Lazzaro's bed, asked Lazzaro how he was.
  Lazzaro told him he was going to have him killed after the war.
  'Oh? '
  'You made a big mistake,' said Lazzaro. 'Anybody touches me, he better kill me, or I'm
 gonna have him killed.'
  The Blue Fairy Godmother knew something about killing. He gave Lazzaro a careful
 smile. 'There is still time for me to kill you,' he said, 'if you really persuade me that it's
 the sensible thing to do.'
  'Why don't you go fuck yourself?'
  'Don't think I haven't tried,' the Blue Fairy Godmother answered.
  The Blue Fairy Godmother left, amused and patronizing. When he was gone, Lazzaro
 promised Billy and poor old Edgar Derby that he was going to have revenge, and that
 revenge was sweet.
  'It's the sweetest thing there is,' said Lazzaro. 'People fuck with me,' he said, 'and Jesus
 Christ are they ever fucking sorry. I laugh like hell. I don't care if it's a guy or a dame. If
 the President of the United States fucked around with me, I'd fix him good. You should
 have seen what I did to a dog one time.'
  'A dog?' said Billy.
  'Son of a bitch bit me. So 1 got me some steak, and I got me the spring out of a clock. I
 cut that spring up in little pieces. I put points on the ends of the pieces. They were sharp
 as razor blades. I stuck 'em into the steak-way inside. And I went past where they had the
 dog tied up. He wanted to bite me again. I said to him, 'Come on., doggie-let's be friends.
 Let's not be enemies any more. I'm not mad." He believed me.'
  'He did?'
  'I threw him the steak. He swallowed it down in one big gulp. I waited around for ten
 minutes.' Now Lazzaro's eyes twinkled. 'Blood started coming out of his mouth. He
 started crying, and he rolled on the ground, as though the knives were on the outside of
 him instead of on the inside of him. Then he tried to bite out his own insides. I laughed,
 and I said to him, "You got the right idea now. Tear your own guts out, boy. That's me in
 there with all those knives."' So it goes.
  'Anybody ever asks you what the sweetest thing in life is-' said Lazzaro, 'it's revenge.'
  When Dresden was destroyed later on, incidentally, Lazzaro did not exult. He didn't
 have anything against the Germans, he said. Also, he said he liked to take his enemies
 one at a time. He was proud of never having hurt an innocent bystander. 'Nobody ever
 got it from Lazzaro,' he said, 'who didn't have it coming.'
  Poor old Edgar Derby, the high school teacher, got into the conversation now. He
 asked Lazzaro if he planned to feed the Blue Fairy Godmother clock springs and steak. 
  'Shit,' said Lazzaro.
  'He's a pretty big man,' said Derby, who, of course, was a pretty big man himself.
  'Size don't mean a thing.'
  'You're going to shoot him?'
  'I'm gonna have him shot,' said Lazzaro. 'He'll get home after the war. He'll be a big
 hero. The dames'll be climbing all over him. He'll settle down. A couple of years'll go by.
 And then one day there'll be a knock on his door. He'll answer the door, and there'll be a
 stranger out there. The stranger'll ask him if he's so-and-so. When he says he is, the
 stranger'll say, "Paul Lazzaro sent me." And he'll pull out a gun and shoot his pecker off.
 The stranger'll let him think a couple of seconds about who Paul Lazzaro is and what
 life's gonna be like without a pecker. Then he'll shoot him once in the guts and walk
 away.' So it goes.
  Lazzaro said that he could have anybody in the world killed for a thousand dollars plus
 traveling expenses. He had a list in his head, he said.
  Derby asked him who all was on the list, and Lazzaro said, 'Just make fucking sure you
 don't get on it. just don't cross me, that's all.' There was a silence, and then he added, 'And
 don't cross my friends.'
  'You have friends?' Derby wanted to know.
  'In the war?' said Lazzaro. 'Yeah-I had a friend in the war. He's dead.' So it goes.
  'That's too bad.'
  Lazzaro's eyes were twinkling again. 'Yeah. He was my buddy on the boxcar. His
 name was Roland Weary. He died in my arms.' Now he pointed to Billy with his one
 mobile hand. 'He died on account of this silly cocksucker here. So I promised him
 I'd have this silly cocksucker shot after the war.'
  Lazzaro erased with his hand anything Billy Pilgrim might be about to say. 'Just forget
 about it, kid,' he said. 'Enjoy life while you can. Nothing's gonna happen for maybe five,
 ten, fifteen, twenty years. But lemme give you a piece of advice: Whenever the doorbell
 rings, have somebody else answer the door.'
  Billy Pilgrim says now that this really is the way he is going to die, too. As a timetraveler,
 he has seen his own death many times, has described it to a tape recorder. The
 tape is locked up with his will and some other valuables in his safe-deposit box at the
 Ilium Merchants National Bank and Trust, he says.
  I, Billy Pilgrim, the tape begins, will die, have died and always will die on February
 thirteenth, 1976.
  At the time of his death, he says, he is in Chicago to address a large crowd on the
 subject of flying saucers and the true nature of time. His home is still in Ilium. He has had
 to cross three international boundaries in order to reach Chicago. The United States of
 America has been Balkanized, has been divided into twenty petty nations so that it will
 never again be a threat to world peace. Chicago has been hydrogen-bombed by Angry
 Chinamen. So it goes. It is all brand new.
  Billy is speaking before a capacity audience in a baseball park, which is covered by a
 geodesic dome. The flag of the country is behind him. It is a Hereford Bull on a field of
 green. Billy predicts his own death within an hour. He laughed about it, invites the crowd
 to laugh with him. 'It is high time I was dead..' he says. 'Many years ago.' he said, 'a 
 certain man promised to have me killed. He is an old man now, living not far from here.
 He has read all the publicity associated with my appearance in your fair city. He is
 insane. Tonight he will keep his promise.'
  There are protests from the crowd.
  Billy Pilgrim rebukes them. 'If you protest, if you think that death is a terrible thing,
 then you have not understood a word I've said.' Now he closes his speech as he closes
 every speech with these words: 'Farewell, hello, farewell, hello.'
  There are police around him as he leaves the stage. They are there to protect him from
 the crush of popularity. No threats on his life have been made since 1945. The police
 offer to stay with him. They are floridly willing to stand in a circle around him all night,
 with their zap guns drawn.
  'No, no,' says Billy serenely. 'It is time for you to go home to your wives and children,
 and it is time for me to be dead for a little while-and then live again.' At that moment,
 Billy's high forehead is in the cross hairs of a high-powered laser gun. It is aimed at him
 from the darkened press box. In the next moment, Billy Pilgrim is dead. So it goes.
  So Billy experiences death for a while. It is simply violet light and a hum. There isn't
 anybody else there. Not even Billy Pilgrim is there.
  Then he swings back into life again, all the way back to an hour after his life was
 threatened by Lazzaro-in 1945. He has been told to get out of his hospital bed and dress,
 that he is well. He and Lazzaro and poor old Edgar Derby are to join their fellows in the
 theater. There they will choose a leader for themselves by secret ballot in a free election.
  Billy and Lazzaro and poor old Edgar Derby crossed the prison yard to the theater
 now. Billy was carrying his little coat as though it were a lady's muff. It was wrapped
 around and round his hands. He was the central clown in an unconscious travesty of that
 famous oil painting, 'The Spirit of '76.'
  Edgar Derby was writing letters home in his head, telling his Wife that he was alive
 and well, that she shouldn't worry, that the war was. nearly over, that he would soon be
 home.
  Lazzaro was talking to himself about people he was going to have killed after the war,
 and rackets he was going to work, and women he was going to make fuck Mm, whether
 they wanted to or not. If he had been a dog in a city, a policeman would have shot him
 and sent his head to a laboratory, to see if he had rabies. So it goes.
  As they neared the theater, they came upon an Englishman who was hacking a groove
 in the Earth with the heel of his boot. He was marking the boundary between the
 American and English sections of the compound. Billy and Lazzaro and Derby didn't
 have to ask what the line meant. It was a familiar symbol from childhood.
  The theater was paved with American bodies that nestled like spoons. Most of the
 Americans were in stupors or asleep. Their guts were fluttering, dry.
  'Close the fucking door,' somebody said to Billy. 'Were you born I'm a barn?'
  Billy closed it., took a hand from his muff, touched a stove. It was as cold as ice. The
 stage was still set for Cinderella. Azure curtains hung from the arches which were
 shocking pink. There were golden thrones and the dummy clock, whose hands were set at 
 midnight. Cinderella's slippers, which were a man's boots painted silver, were capsized
 side by side under a golden throne.
  Billy and poor old Edgar Derby and Lazzaro had been in the hospital when the British
 passed out blankets and mattresses, so they had none. They had to improvise. The only
 space open to them was up on the stage, and they went up there, pulled the azure curtains
 down, made nests.
  Billy, curled in his azure nest., found himself staring at Cinderella's silver boots under
 a throne. And then he remembered that his shoes were ruined, that he needed boots. He
 hated to get out of his nest., but he forced himself to do it. He crawled to the boots on all
 fours, sat, tried them on.
  The boots fit perfectly. Billy Pilgrim was Cinderella, and Cinderella was Billy Pilgrim.
  Somewhere in there was a lecture on personal hygiene by the head Englishman., and
 then a free election. At least half the Americans went on snoozing through it all. The
 Englishman' got up on the stage, and he rapped on the arm of a throne with
 a swagger stick, called, 'Lads, lads, lad I have your attention, please?' And so on.
  What the Englishman. said about survival was this 'If you stop taking pride 'm your
 appearance, you will very soon die.' He said that he had seen several men die in the
 following way: They ceased to stand up straight, then ceased to shave or wash, then
 ceased to get out of bed, then ceased to talk, then died. There is this much to be said for
 it: it is evidently a very easy and painless way to go.' So it goes.
  The Englishman said that he, when captured, had made and kept the following vows to
 himself: To brush his teeth twice a day, to shave once a day, to wash his face and hands
 before every meal and after going to the latrine, to polish his shoes once a day, to
 exercise for at least half an hour each morning and then move his bowels, and to look into
 a mirror frequently, frankly evaluating his appearance, particularly with respect to
 posture.
  Billy Pilgrim heard all this while lying in his nest. He looked not at the Englishman's
 face but his ankles.
  'I envy you lads,' said the Englishman.
  Somebody laughed. Billy wondered what the joke was.
  'You lads are leaving this afternoon for Dresden-a beautiful city., I'm told. You won't
 be cooped up like us. You'll be out where the life is, and the food is certain to be more
 plentiful than here. If I may inject a personal note: It has been five years now since I have
 seen a tree or flower or woman or child-or a dog or a cat or a place of entertainment, or a
 human being doing useful work of any kind.
  'You needn't worry about bombs, by the way. Dresden is an open city. It is undefended,
 and contains no war industries or troop concentrations of any importance.'
  Somewhere in there, old Edgar Derby was elected head American. The Englishman
 called for nominations from the floor, and there weren't any. So he nominated Derby,
 praising him for his maturity and long experience in dealing with people. There were no
 further nominations, so the nominations were closed.
  'All in favor?' 
  Two or three people said, 'Aye.'
  Then poor old Derby made a speech. He thanked the Englishman for his good advice,
 said he meant to follow it exactly. He said he was sure that all the other Americans would
 do the mm. He said that his primary responsibility now was to make damn well sure that
 everybody got home safely.
  'Go take a flying fuck at a rolling doughnut,' murmured Paul Lazzaro in his azure nest.
 'Go take a flying fuck at the moon.'
  The temperature climbed startlingly that day. The noontime was balmy. The Germans
 brought soup and bread in two-wheeled carts which were pulled by Russians. The
 Englishmen sent over real coffee and sugar and marmalade and cigarettes and cigars, and
 the doors of the theater were left open, so the warmth could get in.
  The Americans began to feel much better. They were able to hold their food. And then
 it was time to go to Dresden. The Americans marched fairly stylishly out of the British
 compound. Billy Pilgrim again led the parade. He had silver boots now, and a muff, and a
 piece of azure curtain which he wore like a toga. Billy still had a beard. So did poor old
 Edgar Derby, who was beside him. Derby was imagining letters to home, his lips
 working tremulously.
  Dear Margaret-We are leaving for Dresden today. Don t worry. It will never be
 bombed. It is an open city. There was an election at noon, and guess what? And so on.
  They came to the prison railroad yard again. They had arrived on only two cars. They
 would depart far more comfortably on four. They saw the dead hobo again. He was
 frozen stiff in the weeds beside the track. He was in a fetal position, trying even in death
 to nestle like a spoon with others. There were no others now. He was nestling within thin
 air and cinders. Somebody had taken his boots. His bare feet were blue and ivory. It was
 all right, somehow, his being dead. So it goes.
  The trip to Dresden was a lark. It took only two hours. Shriveled little bellies were full.
 Sunlight and cold air came in through the ventilators. There were plenty of smokes from
 the Englishmen.
  The Americans arrived in Dresden at five in the afternoon. The boxcar doors were
 opened, and the doorways framed the loveliest city that most of the Americans had ever
 seen. The skyline was intricate and voluptuous and enchanted and absurd. It looked like a
 Sunday school picture of Heaven to Billy Pilgrim.
  Somebody behind him in the boxcar said, 'Oz.' That was I. That was me. The only
 other city I'd ever seen was Indianapolis, Indiana.
  Every other big city in Germany had been bombed and burned ferociously. Dresden
 had not suffered so much as a cracked windowpane. Sirens went off every day, screamed
 like hell, and people went down into cellars and listened to radios there. The planes were
 always bound for someplace else-Leipzig, Chemnitz, Plauen, places like that. So it goes.
  Steam radiators still whistled cheerily in Dresden. Street-cars clanged. Telephones rang
 and were answered. Lights went on and off when switches were clicked. There were 
 theaters and restaurants. There was a zoo. The principal enterprises of the city were
 medicine and food-processing and the making of cigarettes.
  People were going home from work now in the late afternoon. They were tired.
  Eight Dresdeners crossed the steel spaghetti of the railroad yard. They were wearing
 new uniforms. They had been sworn into the army the day before. They were boys and
 men past middle age, and two veterans who had been shot to pieces in Russia. Their
 assignment was to guard one hundred American prisoners of war, who would work as
 contract labor. A grandfather and his grandson were in the squad. The grandfather was an
 architect.
  The eight were grim as they approached the boxcars containing their wards. They
 knew what sick and foolish soldiers they themselves appeared to be. One of them actually
 had an artificial leg, and carried not only a loaded rifle but a cane. Still they were
 expected to earn obedience and respect from tall cocky, murderous American
 infantrymen who had just come from all the killing of the front.
  And then they saw bearded Billy Pilgrim in his blue toga and silver shoes, with his
 hands in a muff. He looked at least sixty years old. Next to Billy was little Paul Lazzaro
 with a broken arm. He was fizzing with rabies. Next to Lazzaro was the poor old high
 school teacher, Edgar Derby, mournfully pregnant with patriotism and middle age and
 imaginary wisdom. And so on.
  The eight ridiculous Dresdeners ascertained that these hundred ridiculous creatures
 really were American fighting men fresh from the front. They smiled, and then they
 laughed. Their terror evaporated. There was nothing to be afraid of. Here were more
 crippled human beings, more fools like themselves. Here was light opera.
  So out of the gate of the railroad yard and into the streets of Dresden marched the light
 opera. Billy Pilgrim was the star. He led the parade. Thousands of people were on the
 sidewalks, going home from work. They were watery and putty-colored, having eaten
 mostly potatoes during the past two years. They had expected no blessings beyond the
 mildness of the day. Suddenly-here was fun.
  Billy did not meet many of the eyes that found him so entertaining. He was enchanted
 by the architecture of the city. Merry amoretti wove garlands above windows. Roguish
 fauns and naked nymphs peeked down at Billy from festooned cornices. Stone monkeys
 frisked among scrolls and seashells and bamboo.
  Billy, with his memories of the future, knew that the city would be smashed to
 smithereens and then burned-in about thirty more days. He knew, too, that most of the
 people watching him would soon be dead. So it goes.
  And Billy worked his hands in his muff as he marched. His fingertips, working there in
 the hot darkness of the muff, wanted to know what the two lumps in the lining of the little
 impresario's coat were. The fingertips got inside the lining. They palpated the lumps, the
 pea-shaped thing and the horseshoe-shaped thing. The parade had to halt by a busy
 corner. The traffic light was red.
  There at the comer, in the front rank of pedestrians, was a surgeon who had been
 operating all day. He was a civilian, but his posture was military. He had served in two
 world wars. The sight of Billy offended him, especially after he learned from the guards 
 that Billy was an American. It seemed to Wm that Billy was in abominable taste,
 supposed that Billy had gone to a lot of silly trouble to costume himself just so.
  The surgeon spoke English, and he said to Billy, 'I take it you find war a very comical
 thing.'
  Billy looked at him vaguely. Billy had lost track momentarily of where he was or how
 he had gotten there. He had no idea that people thought he was clowning. It was Fate, of
 course, which had costumed him-Fate, and a feeble will to survive.
  'Did you expect us to laugh?' the surgeon asked him.
  The surgeon was demanding some sort of satisfaction. Billy was mystified. Billy
 wanted to be friendly, to help, if he could, but his resources were meager. His fingers
 now held the two objects from the lining of the coat. Billy decided to show the surgeon
 what they were.
  'You thought we would enjoy being mocked?' the surgeon said. 'And do you feel proud
 to represent America as you do?' Billy withdrew a hand from his muff, held it under the
 surgeon's nose. On his palm rested a two-carat diamond and a partial denture. The
 denture was an obscene little artifact-silver and pearl and tangerine. Billy smiled.
  The parade pranced, staggered and reeled to the gate of the Dresden slaughterhouse,
 and then it went inside. The slaughterhouse wasn't a busy place any more. Almost all the
 hooved animals in Germany had been killed and eaten and excreted by human beings,
 mostly soldiers. So it goes.
  The Americans were taken to the fifth building inside the gate. It was a one-story
 cement-block cube with sliding doors in front and back. It had been built as a shelter for
 pigs about to be butchered. Now it was going to serve as a home away from home for one
 hundred American prisoners of war. There were bunks in there, and two potbellied stoves
 and a water tap. Behind it was a latrine, which was a one-rail fence with buckets under it.
  There was a big number over the door of the building. The number was five. Before
 the Americans could go inside, their only English-speaking guard told them to memorize
 their simple address, in case they got lost in the big city. Their address was this:
 'Schlachthöf-funf.' Schlachthöf meant slaughterhouse. Funf was good old five.
 Seven
 Billy Pilgrim got onto a chartered airplane in Ilium twenty-five years after that. He knew
 he was going to crash, but he didn't want to make a fool of himself by saying so. It was
 supposed to carry Billy and twenty-eight other optometrists to a convention in Montreal.
  His wife, Valencia, was outside, and his father-in-law, Lionel Merble, was strapped to
 the seat beside him.
  Lionel Merble was a machine. Tralfamadorians, of course, say that every creature and
 plant in the Universe is a machine. It amuses them that so many Earthlings are offended
 by the idea of being machines.
  Outside the plane, the machine named Valencia Merble Pilgrim was eating a Peter Paul
 Mound Bar and waving bye-bye. 
  The plane took off without incident. The moment was structured that way. There was a
 barbershop quartet on board. They were optometrists, too. They called themselves 'The
 Febs,' which was an acronym for 'Four-eyed Bastards.'
  When the plane was safely aloft, the machine that was Bill's father-in-law asked the
 quartet to sing his favorite song. They knew what song he meant, and they sang it, and it
 went like this:
  In my prison cell I sit,
  With my britches full of shit,
  And my balls are bouncing gently on the floor.
  And I see the bloody snag
  When she bit me in the bag.
  Oh, I'll never fuck a Polack any more.
  Billy's father-in-law laughed and laughed at that, and he begged the quartet to sing the
 other Polish song he liked so much. So they sang a song from the Pennsylvania coal
 mines that began:
  Me, and Mike, ve vork in mine.
  Holy shit, ve have good time.
  Vunce a veek ve get our pay.
  Holy shit, no vork next day.
  Speaking of people from Poland: Billy- Pilgrim accidentally saw a Pole hanged in
 public, about three days after Billy got to Dresden. Billy just happened to be walking to
 work with some others shortly after sunrise, and they came to a gallows and a small
 crowd in front of a soccer stadium. The Pole was a farm laborer who was being hanged
 for having had sexual intercourse with a German woman. So it goes.
  Billy, knowing the plane was going to crash pretty soon, closed his eyes, traveled in
 time back to 1944. He was back in the forest in Luxembourg again-with the Three
 Musketeers. Roland Weary was shaking him, bonking his head against a tree. 'You guys
 go on without me,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  The barbershop quartet on the airplane was singing 'Wait Till the Sun Shines, Nelly,'
 when the plane smacked into the top of Sugarbush Mountain in Vermont. Everybody was
 killed but Billy and the copilot. So it goes.
  The people who first got to the crash scene were young Austrian ski instructors from
 the famous ski resort below. They spoke to each other in German as they went from body
 to body. They wore black wind masks with two holes for their eyes and a red topknot.
 They looked like golliwogs, like white people pretending to be black for the laughs they
 could get.
  Billy had a fractured skull, but he was still conscious. He didn't know where he was.
 His lips were working, and one of the golliwogs put his ear close to them to hear what
 might be his dying words. 
  Billy thought the golliwog had something to do with the Second World War, and he
 whispered to him his address: 'Schlachthöf-funf.'
  Billy was brought down Sugarbush Mountain on a toboggan. The golliwogs controlled
 it with ropes and yodeled melodiously for right-of-way. Near the bottom, the trail
 swooped around the pylons of a chair lift. Billy looked up at all the young people in
 bright elastic clothing and enormous boots and goggles, bombed out of their skulls with
 snow, swinging through the sky in yellow chairs. He supposed that they were part of an
 amazing new phase of the Second World War. It was all right with him. Everything was
 pretty much all right with Billy.
  He was taken to a small private hospital. A famous brain surgeon came up from Boston
 and operated on him for three hours. Billy was unconscious for two days after that, and
 he dreamed millions of things, some of them true. The true things were time-travel.
  One of the true things was his first evening in the slaughterhouse. He and poor old
 Edgar Derby were pushing an empty two-wheeled cart down a dirt lane between empty
 pens for animals. They were going to a communal kitchen for supper for all. They were
 guarded by a sixteen-year-old German named Werner Gluck. The axles of the cart were
 greased with the fat of dead animals. So it goes.
  The sun had just gone down, and its afterglow was backlighting the city, which formed
 low cliffs around the bucolic void to the idle stockyards. The city was blacked out
 because bombers might come, so Billy didn't get to see Dresden do one of the most
 cheerful things a city is capable of doing when the sun goes down, which is to wink its
 lights on one by one.
  There was a broad river to reflect those lights, which would have made their nighttime
 winkings very pretty indeed. It was the Elbe.
  Werner Gluck, the young guard, was a Dresden boy. He had never been in the
 slaughterhouse before, so he wasn't sure where the kitchen was. He was tall and weak
 like Billy, might have been a younger brother of his. They were, in fact, distant cousins,
 something they never found out. Gluck was armed with an incredibly heavy musket, a
 single-shot museum piece with an octagonal barrel and a smooth bore. He had fixed his
 bayonet. It was like a long knitting needle. It had no blood gutters.
  Gluck led the way to a building that he thought might contain the kitchen, and he
 opened the sliding doors in its side. There wasn't a kitchen in there, though. There was a
 dressing room adjacent to a communal shower, and there was a lot of steam. In the steam
 were about thirty teen-age girls with no clothes on. They were German refugees from
 Breslau, which had been tremendously bombed. They had just arrived in Dresden, too.
 Dresden was jammed with refugees.
  There those girls were with all their private parts bare, for anybody to see. And there in
 the doorway were Gluck and Derby and Pilgrim-the childish soldier and the poor old high
 school teacher and the clown in his toga and silver shoes-staring. The girls screamed.
 They covered themselves with their hands and turned their backs and so on, and made
 themselves utterly beautiful.
  Werner Gluck, who had never seen a naked woman before, closed the door. Bill had
 never seen one, either. It was nothing new to Derby. 
  When the three fools found the communal kitchen, whose main job was to make lunch
 for workers in the slaughterhouse, everybody had gone home but one woman who had
 been waiting for them impatiently. She was a war widow. So it goes. She had her hat and
 coat on. She wanted to go home, too, even though there wasn't anybody there. Her white
 gloves were laid out side by side on the zinc counter top.
  She had two big cans of soup for the Americans. It was simmering over low fires on
 the gas range. She had stacks of loaves of black bread, too.
  She asked Gluck if he wasn't awfully young to be in the army. He admitted that he
 was.
  She asked Edgar Derby if he wasn't awfully old to be in the army. He said he was.
  She asked Billy Pilgrim what he was supposed to be. Billy said he didn't know. He was
 just trying to keep warm.
  'All the real soldiers are dead,' she said. It was true. So it goes.
  Another true thing that Billy saw while he was unconscious in Vermont was the work
 that he and the others had to do in Dresden during the month before the city was
 destroyed. They washed windows and swept floors and cleaned lavatories and put jars
 into boxes and sealed cardboard boxes in a factory that made malt syrup. The syrup was
 enriched with vitamins and minerals. The syrup was for pregnant women.
  The syrup tasted like thin honey laced with hickory smoke, and everybody who
 worked in the factory secretly spooned it all day long. They weren't pregnant, but they
 needed vitamins and minerals, too. Billy didn't spoon syrup on his first day at work, but
 lots of other Americans did.
  Billy spooned it on his second day. There were spoons hidden all over the factory, on
 rafters, in drawers, behind radiators, and so on. They had been hidden in haste by persons
 who had been spooning syrup, who had heard somebody else coming. Spooning was a
 crime.
  On his second day, Billy was cleaning behind a radiator and he found a spoon. To his
 back was a vat of syrup that was cooling. The only other person who could see Billy and
 his spoon was poor old Edgar Derby, who was washing a window outside. The spoon
 was a tablespoon. Billy thrust it into the vat, turned it around and around, making a gooey
 lollipop. He thrust it into his mouth.
  A moment went by, and then every cell in Billy's body shook him with ravenous
 gratitude and applause.
  There were diffident raps at the factory window. Derby was out there, having seen all.
 He wanted some syrup, too.
  So Billy made a lollipop for him. He opened the window. He stuck the lollipop into
 poor old Derby's gaping mouth. A moment passed, and then Derby burst into tears. Billy
 closed the window and hid the sticky spoon. Somebody was coming.
 Eight
 The Americans in the slaughterhouse had a very interesting visitor two days before
 Dresden was destroyed. He was Howard W. Campbell, Jr., an American who had become
 a Nazi. Campbell was the one who had written the monograph about the shabby behavior 
 of American prisoners of war. He wasn't doing more research about prisoners now. He
 had come to the slaughter house to recruit men for a German military unit called 'The
 Free American Corps.' Campbell was the inventor and commander of the unit, which was
 supposed to fight only on the Russian front.
  Campbell was an ordinary looking man, but he was extravagantly costumed in a
 uniform of his own design. He wore a white ten-gallon hat and black cowboy boots
 decorated with swastikas and stars. He was sheathed in a blue body stocking which had
 yellow stripes running from his armpits to his ankles. His shoulder patch was a silhouette
 of Abraham Lincoln's profile on a field of pale green. He had a broad armband which was
 red, with a blue swastika in a circle of white.
  He was explaining this armband now in the cement-block hog barn.
  Billy Pilgrim had a boiling case of heartburn, since he had been spooning malt syrup
 all day long at work. The heartburn brought tears to his eves, so that his image of
 Campbell was distorted by jiggling lenses of salt water.
  'Blue is for the American sky,' Campbell was saying. 'White is for the race that
 pioneered the continent, drained the swamps and cleared the forests and built the roads
 and bridges. Red is for the blood of American patriots which was shed so gladly in years
 gone by.'
  Campbell's audience was sleepy. It had worked hard at the syrup factory, and then it
 had marched a long way home in the cold. It was skinny and hollow-eyed. Its skins were
 beginning to blossom with small sores. So were its mouths and throats and intestines. The
 malt syrup it spooned at the factory contained only a few of the vitamins and minerals
 every Earthling needs.
  Campbell offered the Americans food now, steaks and mashed potatoes and gravy and
 mince pie, if they would join the Free Corps. 'Once the Russians are defeated,' he went
 on, you will be repatriated through Switzerland.'
  There was no response.
  'You're going to have to fight the Communists sooner or later,' said Campbell. "Why
 not get it over with now?'
  And then it developed that Campbell was not going to go unanswered after all. Poor
 old Derby, the doomed high school teacher, lumbered to his feet for what was probably
 the finest moment in his life. 'Mere are almost no characters in this story, and almost no
 dramatic confrontations, because most of the people in it are so sick and so much the
 listless playthings of enormous forces. One of the main effects of war, after an, is that
 people are discouraged from being characters. But old Derby was a character now.
  His stance was that of a punch-drunk fighter. His head was down, his fists were out
 front, waiting for information and battle plan. Derby raised his head, called Campbell a
 snake. He corrected that. He said that snakes couldn't help being snakes, and that
 Campbell, who could help being what he was, was something much lower than a snake or
 a rat-or even a blood-filled tick.
  Campbell smiled. 
  Derby spoke movingly of the American form of government, with freedom and justice
 and opportunities and fair play for all. He said there wasn't a man there who wouldn't
 gladly die for those ideals.
  He spoke of the brotherhood between the American and the Russian people, and how
 those two nations were going to crush the disease of Nazism, which wanted to infect the
 whole world.
  The air-raid sirens of Dresden howled mournfully.
  The Americans and their guards and Campbell took shelter in an echoing meat locker
 which was hollowed in living rock under the slaughterhouse. There was an iron staircase
 with iron doors at the top and bottom.
  Down in the locker were a few cattle and sheep and pigs, and horses hanging from iron
 hooks. So it goes. The locker had empty hooks for thousands more. It was naturally cool.
 There was no refrigeration. There was candlelight. The locker was whitewashed and
 smelled of carbolic acid. There were benches along a wall. The Americans went to these,
 brushing away flakes of whitewash before they sat down.
  Howard W. Campbell. Jr., remained standing, like the guards. He talked to the guards
 in excellent German. He had written many popular German plays and poems in his time,
 and had married a famous German actress named Resi North. She was dead now, had
 been killed while entertaining troops in the Crimea. So it goes.
  Nothing happened that night. It was the next night that about one hundred and thirty
 thousand people in Dresden would die. So it goes. Billy dozed in the meat locker. He
 found himself engaged again, word for word, gesture for gesture, in the argument with
 his daughter with which this tale begun.
  'Father,' she said, 'What are we going to do with you?'
  And so on. 'You know who I could just kill?' she asked.
  'Who could you kill?' said Billy.
  'That Kilgore Trout.'
  Kilgore Trout was and is a science-fiction writer, of course. Billy has not only read
 dozens of books by Trout-he has also become a friend of Trout, who is a bitter man.
  Trout lives in a rented basement in Ilium, about two miles from Billy's nice white
 home. He himself has no idea how many novels he has written-possibly seventy-five of
 the things. Not one of them has made money. So Trout keeps body and soul together as a
 circulation man for the Ilium Gazette, manages newspaper delivery boys, bullies and
 flatters and cheats little kids.
  Billy met him for the first time in 1964. Billy drove his Cadillac down a back alley in
 Ilium and he found his way blocked by dozens of boys and their bicycles. A meeting was
 in progress. The boys were harangued by a man in a full beard. He was cowardly and
 dangerous, and obviously very good at his job. Trout was sixty-two years old back then.
 He was telling the kids to get off their dead butts and get their daily customers to
 subscribe to the fucking Sunday edition, too. He said that whoever sold the most Sunday
 subscriptions during the next two months would get a free trip for himself and his parents
 to 's fucking Vineyard for a week, all expenses paid.
  And so on. 
  One of the newspaper boys was actually a newspaper girl. She was electrified.
  Trout's paranoid face was terribly familiar to Billy, who had seen it on the jackets of so
 many books. But., coming upon that face suddenly in a home-town alley, Billy could not
 guess why the face was familiar. Billy thought maybe he had known this cracked messiah
 in Dresden somewhere. Trout certainly looked like a prisoner of war.
  And then the newspaper girl held up her hand. 'Mr. Trout,' she said, 'if I win, can I take
 my sister, too?'
  'Hell no,' said Kilgore Trout. 'You think money grows on trees?'
  Trout, incidentally, had written a book about a money tree. It had twenty-dollar bills
 for leaves. Its flowers were government bonds. Its fruit was diamonds. It attracted human
 beings who killed each other around the roots and made very good fertilizer.
  So it goes.
  Billy Pilgrim parked his Cadillac in the alley, and waited for the meeting to end. When
 the meeting broke up, there was still one boy Trout had to deal with. The boy wanted to
 quit because the work was so hard and the hours were so long and the pay was so small.
 Trout was concerned, because, if the boy really quit, Trout would have to deliver the
 boy's route himself, until he could find another sucker.
  'What are you?' Trout asked the boy scornfully. 'Some kind of gutless wonder?'
  This, too, was the title of a book by Trout, The Gutless Wonder. It was about a robot
 who had bad breath, who became popular after his halitosis was cured. But what made
 the story remarkable, since it was written in 1932, was that it predicted the widespread
 use of burning jellied gasoline on human beings.
  It was dropped on them from airplanes. Robots did the dropping. They had no
 conscience, and no circuits which would allow them to imagine what was happening to
 the people on the ground.
  Trout's leading robot looked like a human being, and could talk and dance and so on,
 and go out with girls. And nobody held it against him that he dropped jellied gasoline on
 people. But they found his halitosis unforgivable. But then he cleared that up, and he was
 welcomed to the human race.
  Trout lost his argument with the boy who wanted to quit. He told the boy about all the
 millionaires who had carried newspapers as boys, and the boy replied: 'Yeah-but I bet
 they quit after a week, it's such a royal screwing.'
  And the boy left his full newspaper bag at Trout's feet, with the customer book on top.
 It was up to Trout to deliver these papers. He didn't have a car. He didn't even have a
 bicycle, and he was scared to death of dogs.
  Somewhere a big dog barked.
  As Trout lugubriously slung the bag from his shoulder, Billy Pilgrim approached him.
  'Mr. Trout-'
  'Yes?'
  "Are-are you Kilgore Trout? 
  'Yes.' Trout supposed that Billy had some complaint about the way his newspapers
 were being delivered. He did not think of himself as a writer for the simple reason that
 the world had never allowed him to think of himself in this way.
  'The-the writer?' said Billy.
  'The what?'
  Billy was certain that he had made a mistake. 'There's a writer named Kilgore Trout.'
  'There is?' Trout looked foolish and dazed.
  'You never heard of him?'
  Trout shook his head. 'Nobody-nobody ever did.'
  Billy helped Trout deliver his papers, driving him from house to house in the Cadillac.
 Billy was the responsible one, finding the houses, checking them off. Trout's mind was
 blown. He had never met a fan before, and Billy was such an avid fan.
  Trout told him that he had never seen a book of his advertised, reviewed, or on sale.
 'All these years' he said, 'I've been opening the window and making love to the world.'
  'You must surely have gotten letters,' said Billy. 'I've felt like writing you letters many
 times.'
  Trout held up a single finger. 'One.'
  'Was it enthusiastic?'
  'It was insane. The writer said I should be President of the World.'
  It turned out that the person who had written this letter was Elliot Rosewater, Billy's
 friend in the veterans' hospital near Lake Placid. Billy told Trout about Rosewater.
  'My God-I thought he was about fourteen years old,' said Trout.
  "A full grown man-a captain in the war.'
  'The writes like a fourteen-year-old,' said Kilgore Trout.
  Billy invited Trout to his eighteenth wedding anniversary which was only two days
 hence. Now the party was in progress.
  Trout was in Billy's dining room, gobbling canapés. He was talking with a mouthful of
 Philadelphia cream cheese and salmon roe to an optometrist's wife. Everybody at the
 party was associated with optometry in some way, except Trout. And he alone was
 without glasses. He was making a great hit. Everybody was ed to have a real author at the
 party, even though they had never read his books.
  Trout was talking to a Maggie White, who had given up being a dental assistant to
 become a homemaker for an optometrist. She was very pretty. The last book she had read
 was Ivanhoe.
  Billy Pilgrim stood nearby, listening. He was palpating something in his pocket. It was
 a present he was about to give his Wife, a white satin box containing a star sapphire
 cocktail ring. The ring was worth eight hundred dollars.
  The adulation that Trout was receiving, mindless and illiterate as it was, affected Trout
 like marijuana. He was happy and loud and impudent.
  'I'm afraid I don't read as much as I ought to,' said Maggie.
  'We're all afraid of something,' Trout replied. 'I'm afraid of cancer and rats and
 Doberman pinschers.' 
  'I should know, but I don't, so I have to ask,' said Maggie, 'what's the most famous
 thing you ever wrote?'
  'It was about a funeral for a great French chef.'
  'That sounds interesting.'
  'All the great chefs in the world are there. It's a beautiful ceremony.' Trout was making
 this up as he went along. 'Just before the casket is closed, the mourners sprinkle parsley
 and paprika on the deceased.' So it goes.
  'Did that really happen?' said Maggie White. She was a dull person, but a sensational
 invitation to make babies. Men looked at her and wanted to fill her up with babies right
 away. She hadn't had even one baby yet. She used birth control.
  'Of course it happened,' Trout told her. 'If I wrote something that hadn't really
 happened, and I tried to sell it, I could go to jail. That's fraud!'
  Maggie believed him. 'I'd never thought about that before.'
  'Think about it now.'
  'It's like advertising. You have to tell the truth in advertising, or you get in trouble.'
  'Exactly. The same body of laws applies.'
  'Do you think you might put us in a book sometime?'
  'I put everything that happens to me in books.'
  'I guess I better be careful what I say.'
  'That's right. And I'm not the only one who's listening. God is listening, too. And on
 Judgment Day he's going to tell you all the things you said and did. If it turns out they're
 bad things instead of good things, that's too bad for you, because you'll bum forever and
 ever. The burning never stops hurting.'
  Poor Maggie turned gray. She believed that too, and was petrified.
  Kilgore Trout laughed uproariously. A salmon egg flew out of his mouth and landed in
 Maggie's cleavage.
  Now an optometrist called for attention. He proposed a toast to Billy and Valencia,
 whose anniversary it was. According to plan, the barbershop quartet of optometrists, 'The
 Febs,' sang while people drank and Billy and Valencia put their arms around each other,
 just glowed. Everybody's eyes were shining. The song was 'That Old Gang of Mine.'
  Gee, that song went, but I'd give the world to see that old gang of mine. And so on. A
 little later it said. So long forever, old fellows and gals, so long forever old sweethearts
 and pals-God bless 'em-And so on.
  Unexpectedly, Billy Pilgrim found himself upset by the song and the occasion. He had
 never had an old gang, old sweethearts and pals, but he missed one anyway, as the quartet
 made slow, agonized experiments with chords-chords intentionally sour, sourer still,
 unbearably sour, and then a chord that was suffocatingly sweet, and then some sour ones
 again. Billy had powerful psychosomatic responses to the changing chords. His mouth
 filled with the taste of lemonade, and his face became grotesque, as though he really were
 being stretched on the torture engine called the rack.
  He looked so peculiar that several people commented on it solicitously when the song
 was done. They thought he might have been having a heart attack, and Billy seemed to
 confirm this by going to a chair and sitting down haggardly. 
  There was silence.
  'Oh my God,' said Valencia, leaning over him, 'Billy-are you all right?'
  'Yes.'
  'You look so awful.'
  'Really-I'm O.K.' And he was, too, except that he could find no explanation for why the
 song had affected him so grotesquely. He had supposed for years that he had no secrets
 from himself. Here was proof that he had a great big secret somewhere inside, and he
 could not imagine what it was.
  People drifted away now, seeing the color return to Billy's cheeks, seeing him smile.
 Valencia stayed with him, and Kilgore Trout, who had been on the fringe of the crowd,
 came closer, interested, shrewd.
  'You looked as though you'd seen a ghost,' said Valencia.
  'No,' said Billy. He hadn't seen anything but what was really before him-the faces of
 the four singers, those four ordinary men, cow-eyed and mindless and anguished as they
 went from sweetness to sourness to sweetness again.
  'Can I make a guess?' said Kilgore Trout 'You saw through a time window.'
  'A what?' said Valencia.
  'He suddenly saw the past or the future. Am I right?'
  'No,' said Billy Pilgrim. He got up, put a hand into his pocket, found the box containing
 the ring in there. He took out the box, gave it absently to Valencia. He had meant to give
 it to her at the end of the song, while everybody was watching. Only Kilgore Trout was
 there to see.
  'For me?' said Valencia.
  'Yes'
  "Oh my God, she said. Then she said it louder, so other people heard. They gathered
 around, and she opened it, and she almost screamed when she saw the sapphire with a
 star in it. 'Oh my God,' she said. She gave Billy a big kiss. She said, 'Thank you, thank
 you, thank you.'
  There was a lot of talk about what wonderful jewelry Billy had given to Valencia over
 the years. 'My God,' said Maggie White, 'she's already got the biggest diamond I ever saw
 outside of a movie.' She was talking about the diamond Billy had brought back from the
 war.
  The partial denture he had found inside his little impresario's coat, incidentally, was in
 his cufflinks box in his dresser drawer. Billy had a wonderful collection of cufflinks. It
 was the custom of the family to give him cufflinks on every Father's Day. He was
 wearing Father's Day cufflinks now. They had cost over one hundred dollars. They were
 made out of ancient Roman coins. He had one pair of cufflinks upstairs which were little
 roulette wheels that really worked. He had another pair which had a real thermometer in
 one and a real compass in the other.
  Billy now moved about the party-outwardly normal. Kilgore Trout was shadowing
 him, keen to know what Billy had suspected or seen. Most of Trout's novels, after all,
 dealt with time warps and extrasensory perception and other unexpected things. Trout
 believed in things like that, was greedy to have their existence proved. 
  'You ever put a full-length mirror on the floor, and then have a dog stand on it?' Trout
 asked Billy.
  'No.'
  'The dog will look down, and all of a sudden he'll realize there's nothing under him. He
 thinks he's standing on thin air. He'll jump a mile.'
  'He will?'
  That's how you looked-as though you all of a sudden realized you were standing on
 thin air.'
  The barbershop quartet sang again. Billy was emotionally racked again. The
 experience was definitely associated with those four men and not what they sang.
  Here is what they sang, while Billy was pulled apart inside:
  'Leven cent cotton, forty cent meat,
  How in the world can a poor man eat?
  Pray for the sunshine, 'cause it will rain.
  Things gettin' worse, drivin' all insane;
  Built a nice bar, painted it brown
  Lightnin' came along and burnt it down:
  No use talkin' any man's beat,
  With 'leven cent cotton and forty cent meat.
  'Leven cent cotton, a car-load of tax,
  The load's too heavy for our poor backs…
  And so on.
  Billy fled upstairs in his nice white home.
  Trout would have come upstairs with him if Billy hadn't told him not to. Then Billy
 went into the upstairs bathroom, which was dark He closed and locked the door. He left it
 dark, and gradually became aware that he was not alone. His son was in there.
  'Dad?' his son said in the dark. Robert, the future Green Beret, was seventeen then.
 Billy liked him, but didn't know him very well. Billy couldn't help suspecting that there
 wasn't much to know about Robert.
  Billy flicked on the light. Robert was sitting on the toilet with his pajama bottoms
 around his ankles. He was wearing an electric guitar, slung around his neck on a strap. He
 had just bought the guitar that day. He couldn't play it yet and, in fact, never learned to
 play it. It was a nacreous pink.
  'Hello, son,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  Billy went into his bedroom, even though there were guests to be entertained
 downstairs. He lay down on his bed, turned on the Magic Fingers. The mattress trembled,
 drove a dog out from under the bed. The dog was Spot. Good old Spot was still alive in
 those days. Spot lay down again in a corner.
  Billy thought hard about the effect the quartet had had on him, and then found an
 association with an experience he had had long ago. He did not travel in time to the
 experience. He remembered it shimmeringly-as follows: 
  He was down in the meat locker on the night that Dresden was destroyed. There were
 sounds like giant footsteps above. Those were sticks of high-explosive bombs. The giants
 walked and walked. The meat locker was a very safe shelter. All that happened down
 there was an occasional shower of calcimine. The Americans and four of their guards and
 a few dressed carcasses were down there, and nobody else. The rest of the guards had,
 before the raid began, gone to the comforts of their own homes in Dresden. They were all
 being killed with their families.
  So it goes.
  The girls that Billy had seen naked were all being killed, too, in a much shallower
 shelter in another part of the stockyards.
  So it goes.
  A guard would go to the head of the stairs every so often to see what it was like
 outside, then he would come down and whisper to the other guards. There was a firestorm
 out there. Dresden was one big flame. The one flame ate everything organic,
 everything that would burn.
  It wasn't safe to come out of the shelter until noon the next day. When the Americans
 and their guards did come out, the sky was black with smoke. The sun was an angry little
 pinhead. Dresden was like the moon now nothing but minerals. The stones were hot.
 Everybody else in the neighborhood was dead.
  So it goes.
  The guards drew together instinctively, rolled their eyes. They experimented with one
 expression and then another, said nothing, though their mouths were often open. They
 looked like a silent film of a barbershop quartet.
  'So long forever,' they might have been singing, 'old fellows and pals; So long forever,
 old sweethearts and pals-God bless 'em-'
  'Tell me a story,' Montana Wildhack said to Billy Pilgrim in the Tralfamadorian zoo
 one time. They were in bed side by side. They had privacy. The canopy covered the
 dome. Montana was six months pregnant now, big and rosy, lazily demanding small
 favors from Billy from time to time. She couldn't send Billy out for ice cream or
 strawberries, since the atmosphere outside the dome was cyanide, and the nearest
 strawberries and ice cream were millions of light years away.
  She could send him to the refrigerator, which was decorated with the blank couple on
 the bicycle built for two-or, as now she could wheedle, 'Tell me a story, Billy boy.'
  'Dresden was destroyed on the night of February 13, 1945,' Billy Pilgrim began. 'We
 came out of our shelter the next day.' He told Montana about the four guards who, in their
 astonishment and grief, resembled a barber-shop quartet. He told her about the stockyards
 with all the fenceposts gone, with roofs and windows gone-told her about seeing little
 logs lying around. These were people who had been caught in the firestorm. So it goes.
  Billy told her what had happened to the buildings that used to form cliffs around the
 stockyards. They had collapsed. Their wood had been consumed, and their stones had
 crashed down, had tumbled against one another until they locked at last in low and
 graceful curves.
  'It was like the moon,' said Billy Pilgrim. 
  The guards told the Americans to form in ranks of four, which they did. Then they had
 them march back to the hog barn which had, been their home. Its wars still stood, but its
 windows and roof were gone, and there was nothing inside but ashes and dollops of
 melted glass. It was realized then that there was no food or water, and that the survivors,
 if they were going to continue to survive, were going to have to climb over curve after
 curve on the face of the moon.
  Which they did.
  The curves were smooth only when seen from a distance. The people climbing them
 learned that they were treacherous, jagged things-hot to the touch, often unstable eager,
 should certain important rocks be disturbed, to tumble some more, to form lower, more
 solid curves.
  Nobody talked much as the expedition crossed the moon. There was nothing
 appropriate to say. One thing was clear: Absolutely everybody in the city was supposed
 to be dead, regardless of what they were, and that anybody that moved in it represented a
 flaw in the design. There were to be no moon men at all.
  American fighter planes came in under the smoke to see if anything was moving. They
 saw Billy and the rest moving down there. The planes sprayed them with machine-gun
 bullets, but the bullets missed. Then they saw some other people moving down by the
 riverside and they shot at them. They hit some of them. So it goes.
  The idea was to hasten the end of the war.
  Billy's story ended very curiously in a suburb untouched by fire and explosions. The
 guards and the Americans came at nightfall to an inn which was open for business. There
 was candlelight. There were fires in three fireplaces downstairs. There were empty tables
 and chairs waiting for anyone who might come, and empty beds with covers turned down
 upstairs.
  There was a blind innkeeper and his sighted wife, who was the cook, and their two
 young daughters, who worked as waitresses and maids. This family knew that Dresden
 was gone. Those with eyes had seen it bum and bum, understood that they were on the
 edge of a desert now. Still-they had opened for business, had polished the glasses and
 wound the clocks and stirred the fires, and waited and waited to see who would come.
  There was no great flow of refugees from Dresden. The clocks ticked on, the crackled,
 the translucent candles dripped. And then there was a knock on the door, and in came
 four guards and one hundred American prisoners of war.
  The innkeeper asked the guards if they had come from the city.
  'Yes.'
  Are there more people coming?'
  And the guards said that, on the difficult route they had chosen, they had not seen
 another living soul.
  The blind innkeeper said that the Americans could sleep in his stable that night, and he
 gave them soup and ersatz coffee and a little beer. Then he came out to the stable to listen
 to them bedding down in the straw.
  'Good night, Americans,' he said in German. 'Sleep well.' 
 Nine
 Here is how Billy Pilgrim lost his wife, Valencia.
  He was unconscious in the hospital in Vermont, after the airplane crash on Sugarbush
 Mountain, and Valencia, having heard about the crash, was driving from Ilium to the
 hospital in the family Cadillac El Dorado Coupe de Ville. Valencia was hysterical,
 because she had been told frankly that Billy might die, or that, if he lived, he might be a
 vegetable.
  Valencia adored Billy. She was crying and yelping so hard as she drove that she
 missed the correct turnoff from the throughway. She applied her power brakes, and a
 Mercedes slammed into her from behind. Nobody was hurt, thank God, because both
 drivers were wearing seat belts. Thank God, thank God. The Mercedes lost only a
 headlight. But the rear end of the Cadillac was a body-and-fender man's wet dream. The
 trunk and fenders were collapsed. The gaping trunk looked like the mouth of a village
 idiot who 'was explaining that he didn't know anything about anything. The fenders
 shrugged. The bumper was at a high port arms. 'Reagan for President!' a sticker on the
 bumper said. The back window was veined with cracks. The exhaust system rested on the
 pavement.
  The driver of the Mercedes got out and went to Valencia, to find out if she was all
 right. She blabbed hysterically about Billy and the airplane crash, and then she put her car
 in gear and crossed the median divider, leaving her exhaust system behind.
  When she arrived at the hospital, people rushed to the windows to see what all the
 noise was. The Cadillac, with both mufflers gone, sounded like a heavy bomber coming
 in on a wing and a prayer. Valencia turned off the engine, but then she slumped against
 the steering wheel, and the horn brayed steadily. A doctor and a nurse ran out to find out
 what the trouble was. Poor Valencia was unconscious, overcome by carbon monoxide.
 She was a heavenly azure.
  One hour later she was dead. So it goes.
  Billy knew nothing about it. He, dreamed on, and traveled in time and so forth. The
 hospital was so crowded that Billy couldn't have a room to himself. He shared a room
 with a Harvard history professor named Bertram Copeland Rumfoord. Rumfoord didn't
 have to look at Billy, because Billy was surrounded by white linen screens on rubber
 wheels. But Rumfoord could hear Billy talking to himself from time to time.
  Rumfoord's left leg was in traction. He had broken it while skiing. He was seventy
 years old, but had the body and spirit of a man half that age. He had been honeymooning
 with his fifth wife when he broke his leg. Her name was Lily. Lily was twenty-three.
  Just about the time poor Valencia was pronounced dead, Lily came into Billy's and
 Rumfoord's room with an armload of books. Rumfoord had sent her down to Boston to
 get them. He was working on a one-volume history of the United States Army Air Corps
 in the Second World War. The books were about bombings and sky battles that had
 happened before Lily was even born. 
  'You guys go on without me,' said Billy Pilgrim deliriously, as pretty little Lily came
 in. She had been an a-go-go girl when Rumfoord saw her and resolved to make her his
 own. She was a high school dropout. Her I.Q. was 103. 'He scares me,' she whispered to
 her husband about Billy Pilgrim.
  'He bores the hell out of me!' Rumfoord replied boomingly. 'All he does in his sleep is
 quit and surrender and apologize and ask to be left alone.' Rumfoord was a retired
 brigadier general in the Air Force Reserve, the official Air Force Historian, a fun
 professor, the author of twenty-six books, a multimillionaire since birth, and one of the
 great competitive sailors of all time. His most popular book was about sex and strenuous
 athletics for men over sixty-five. Now he quoted Theodore Roosevelt whom he
 resembled a lot:
  "'I could carve a better man out of a banana."'
  One of the things Rumfoord had told Lily to get in Boston was a copy of President
 Harry S. Truman's announcement to the world that an atomic bomb had been dropped on
 Hiroshima. She had a Xerox of it, and Rumfoord asked her if she had read it.
  'No.' She didn't read well, which was one of the reasons she had dropped out of high
 school.
  Rumfoord ordered her to sit down and read the Truman statement now. He didn't know
 that she couldn't read much. He knew very little about her, except that she was one more
 public demonstration that he was a superman.
  So Lily sat down and pretended to read the Truman thing, which went like this:
  Sixteen hours ago an American airplane dropped one bomb on Hiroshima, an
 important Japanese Army base. That bomb had more power than 20,000 tons of T.N.T. It
 had more than two thousand times the blast power of the British 'Grand Slam' which is
 the largest bomb ever yet used in the history of warfare.
  The Japanese began the war from the air at Pearl Harbor. They have been repaid manyfold.
 And the end is not yet. With this bomb we have now added a new and revolutionary
 increase in destruction to supplement the growing power of our armed forces. In their
 present form these bombs are now in production, and even more powerful forms are in
 development.
  It is an atomic bomb. It is a harnessing of the basic power of the universe. The force
 from which the sun draws its power has been loosed against those who brought war to the
 Far East.
  Before 1939, it was the accepted belief of scientists that it was theoretically possible to
 release atomic energy. But nobody knew any practical method of doing it. By 1942,
 however, we knew that the Germans were working feverishly to find a way to add atomic
 energy to all the other engines of war with which they hoped to enslave the world. But
 they failed. We may be grateful to Providence that the Germans got the V-1's and V-2's
 late and in limited quantities and even more grateful that they did not get the atomic
 bomb at all.
  The battle of the laboratories held-fateful risks for us as well as the battles of the air,
 land and sea, and we have now won the battle of the laboratories as we have won the
 other battles.
  We are now prepared to obliterate more rapidly and completely every productive
 enterprise the Japanese have above ground in any city, said Harry Truman. We shall 
 destroy their docks, their factories and their communications. Let there be no mistake; we
 shall completely destroy Japan's power to make war. It was to spare-
  And so on.
  One of the books that Lily had brought Rumfoord was The Destruction of Dresden by
 an Englishman named David Irving. It was an American edition, published by Holt.,
 Rinehart and Winston in 1964. What Rumfoord wanted from it were. portions of the
 forewords by his friends Ira C. Eaker, Lieutenant General, U.S.A.F., retired, and British
 Air Marshal Sir Robert Saundby, K.C.B., K.B.E., M.C., D.F.C., A.F.C.
  I find it difficult to understand Englishmen or Americans .who weep about enemy
 civilians who were killed but who have not shed a tear for our gallant crews lost in
 combat with a cruel enemy, wrote his friend General Eaker in part. I think it would have
 been well for Mr. Irving to have remembered, when he was drawing the frightful picture
 of the civilian killed at Dresden, that V-1's and V-2's were at that very time failing on
 England, killing civilian men, women and children indiscriminately, as they were
 designed and launched to do. It might be well to remember Buchenwald and Coventry,
 too
  Eaker's foreword ended this way
  I deeply regret that British and U.S. bombers killed 135,000 people in the attack on
 Dresden, but I remember who started the last war and I regret even more the -loss of
 more than 5,000,000, Allied lives in the necessary effort to completely defeat and utterly
 destroy nazism.
  So it goes.
  What Air Marshal Saundby said, among other things, was this
  That the bombing of Dresden was a great tragedy none can deny. That it was really a
 military necessity few, after reading this book, will believe. It was one of those terrible
 things that sometimes happen in wartime, brought about by an unfortunate combination
 of circumstances. Those who approved it were neither wicked no?, cruel, though it may
 well be that they were too remote from the harsh realities of war to understand fully the
 appalling destructive power of air bombardment in the spring of 1945
  The advocates of nuclear disarmament seem to believe that, if they could achieve their
 aim., war would become tolerable and decent. They would do well to read this book and
 ponder the fate of Dresden, where 135,000 people died as the result of an at attack with
 conventional weapons. On the night of March 9th, 1945, an air attack on Tokyo by
 American heavy bombers, using incendiary and high explosive bombs, caused the death
 of 83,793 people. The atom bomb dropped on Hiroshima killed 71,379 people.
  So it goes.
  'If you're ever in Cody, Wyoming,' said Billy Pilgrim behind his white linen screens,
 'just ask for Wild Bob.'
  Lily Rumfoord shuddered, went on pretending to read the Harry Truman thing.
  Billy's daughter Barbara came in later that day. She was all doped up, had the same
 glassy-eyed look that poor old Edgar Derby wore just before he was shot in Dresden.
 Doctors had given her pills so she could continue to function, even though her father was
 broken and her mother was dead.
  So it goes. 
  She was accompanied by a doctor and a nurse. Her brother Robert was flying home
 from a battlefield in Vietnam. 'Daddy,' she said tentatively. 'Daddy? '
  But Billy was ten years away, back in 1958. He was examining the eyes of a young
 male Mongolian idiot in order to prescribe corrective lenses. The idiot's mother was
 there, acting as an interpreter.
  'How many dots do you see?' Billy Pilgrim asked him.
  And then Billy traveled in time to when he was sixteen years old, in the waiting room
 of a doctor. Billy had an infected thumb. There was only one other patient waiting-an old,
 old man. The old man was in agony because of gas. He farted tremendously, and then he
 belched.
  'Excuse me,' he said to Billy. Then he did it again. 'Oh God he said, 'I knew it was
 going to be bad getting old.' He shook his head. 'I didn't know it was going to be this bad.'
  Billy Pilgrim opened his eyes in the hospital in Vermont, did not know where he was.
 Watching him was his son Robert. Robert was wearing the uniform of the famous Green
 Berets. Robert's hair was short, was wheat-colored bristles. Robert was clean and neat.
 He was decorated with a Purple Heart and a Silver Star and a Bronze Star with two
 clusters.
  This was a boy who had flunked out of high school, who had been an alcoholic at
 sixteen, who had run with a rotten bunch of kids, who had been arrested for tipping over
 hundreds of tombstones in a Catholic cemetery one time. He was all straightened out
 now. His posture was wonderful and his shoes were shined and his trousers were pressed,
 and he was a leader of men.
  'Dad?'
  Billy Pilgrim closed his eyes again.
  Billy had to miss his wife's funeral because he was still so sick. He was conscious,
 though, while Valencia was being put into the ground in Ilium. Billy hadn't said much
 since regaining consciousness, hadn't responded very elaborately to the news of
 Valencia's death and Robert's coming home from the war and so on-so it was generally
 believed that he was a vegetable. There was talk of performing an operation on him later,
 one which might improve the circulation of blood to his brain.
  Actually, Billy's outward listlessness was a screen. The listlessness concealed a mind
 which was fizzing and flashing thrillingly. It was preparing letters and lectures about the
 flying saucers, the negligibility of death and the true nature of time.
  Professor Rumfoord said frightful things about Billy within Billy's hearing, confident
 that Billy no longer had any brain at all. 'Why don't they let him die?' he asked Lily.
  'I don't know, she said.
  'That's not a human being anymore. Doctors are for human beings. They should turn
 him over to a veterinarian or a tree surgeon. They'd know what to do. Look at him! That's
 life, according to the medical profession. Isn't life wonderful?'
  'I don't know,' said Lily. 
  Rumfoord talked to Lily about the bombing of Dresden one time, and Billy heard it all.
 Rumfoord had a problem about Dresden. His one-volume history of the Army Air Force
 in the Second World War was supposed to be a readable condensation of the twentyseven-volume
 Official History of the Army Air Force in World War Two. The thing was,
 though, there was almost nothing in the twenty-seven volumes about the Dresden raid,
 even though it had been such a howling success. The extent of the success had been kept
 a secret for many years after the war-a secret from the American people. It was no secret
 from the Germans, of course, or from the Russians, who occupied Dresden after the war,
 who are in Dresden still.
  'Americans have finally heard about Dresden.,' said Rumfoord, twenty-three years after
 the raid. 'A lot of them know now how much worse it was than Hiroshima. So I've got to
 put something about it in my book. From the official Air Force standpoint., it'll all be
 new.'
  'Why would they keep it a secret so long?' said Lily.
  'For fear that a lot of bleeding hearts' said Rumfoord, 'might not think it was such a
 wonderful thing to do.'
  It was now that Billy Pilgrim spoke up intelligently. 'I was there' he said.
  It was difficult for Rumfoord to take Billy seriously, since Rumfoord, had so long
 considered Billy a repulsive non-person who would be much better off dead. Now, with
 Billy speaking clearly and to the point, Rumfoord's ears wanted to treat the words as a
 foreign language that was not worth learning. did he say?' said Rumfoord.
  Lily had to serve as an 'interpreter. 'He said he was there.' she explained.
  'He was where?
  'I don't know,' said Lily. 'Where were you?' she asked Billy.
  'Dresden' said Billy.
  'Dresden,' Lily told Rumfoord.
  'He's simply echoing things we say,' said Rumfoord.
  'Oh, ' said Lily.
  'He's got echolalia now.'
  'Oh.'
  Echolalia is a mental disease which makes people immediately repeat things that well
 people around them say. But Billy didn't really have it. Rumfoord simply insisted, for his
 own comfort, that Billy had it. Rumfoord was thinking in a military manner: that an
 inconvenient person, one whose death he wished for very much, for practical reasons,
 was suffering from a repulsive disease.
  Rumfoord went on insisting for several hours that Billy had echolalia-told nurses and a
 doctor that Billy had echolalia now. Some experiments were performed on Billy. Doctors
 and nurses tried to get Billy to echo something, but Billy wouldn't make a sound for
 them.
  'He isn't doing it now,' said Rumfoord peevishly. 'The minute you go away, he'll start
 doing it again.'
  Nobody took Rumfoord's diagnosis seriously. The staff thought Rumfoord was a
 hateful old man, conceited and cruel. He often said to them, in one way or another, that 
 people who were weak deserved to die. Whereas the staff, of course, was devoted to the
 idea that weak people should be helped as much as possible, that nobody should die.
  There in the hospital, Billy was having an adventure very common among people
 without power in time of war: He was trying to prove to a wilfully deaf and blind enemy
 that he was interesting to hear and see. He kept silent until the lights went' out at night,
 and then, when there had been a long silence containing nothing to echo, he said to
 Rumfoord, 'I was in Dresden when it was bombed. I was a prisoner of war.' Rumfoord
 sighed impatiently.
  'Word of honor.,' said Billy Pilgrim. 'Do you believe me?'
  'Must we talk about it now?' said Rumfoord. He had heard. He didn't believe.
  'We don't ever have to talk about it,' said Billy. 'I just want you to know: I was there.'
  Nothing more was said about Dresden that night, and Billy closed his eyes, traveled in
 time to a May afternoon, two days after the end of the Second World War in Europe.
 Billy and five other American prisoners were riding in a coffin-shaped green wagon,
 which they had found abandoned complete with two horses, in a suburb of Dresden. Now
 they were being drawn by the clop-clop-clopping horses down narrow lanes which had
 been cleared through the moonlike ruins. They were going back to the slaughterhouse for
 souvenirs of the war. Billy was reminded of the sounds of milkmen's horses early in the
 morning in Ilium, when he was a boy.
  Billy sat in the back of the jiggling coffin. His head was tilted back and his nostrils
 were flaring. He was happy. He was warm. There was food in the wagon, and wine-and a
 camera, and a stamp collection, and a stuffed owl, and a mantel clock that ran on changes
 of barometric pressure. The Americans had gone into empty houses in the suburb where
 they had been imprisoned, and they had taken these and many other things.
  The owners, hearing that the Russians were coming, killing and robbing and raping
 and burning, had fled.
  But the Russians hadn't come yet, even two days after the war. It was peaceful in the
 ruins. Billy saw only one other person on the way to the slaughterhouse. It was an old
 man pushing a baby buggy. In the buggy were pots and cups and an umbrella frame, and
 other things he had found.
  Billy stayed in the wagon when it reached the slaughterhouse, sunning himself. The
 others went looking for souvenirs. Later on in life, the Tralfamadorians would advise
 Billy to concentrate on the happy moments of his life, and to ignore the unhappy ones-to
 stare only at pretty things as eternity failed to go by. If this sort of selectivity had been
 possible for Billy, he might have chosen as his happiest moment his sun-drenched snooze
 in the back of the wagon.
  Billy Pilgrim was armed as he snoozed. It was the first time he had been armed since
 basic training. His companions had insisted that he arm himself, since God only knew
 what sorts of killers might be in burrows on the face of the moon-wild dogs, packs of rats
 fattened on corpses, escaped maniacs and murderers, soldiers who would never quit
 killing until they themselves were killed. 
  Billy had a tremendous cavalry pistol in his belt. It was a relic of the First World War.
 It had a ring in its butt. It was loaded with bullets the size of robins' eggs. Billy had found
 it in the bedside table in a house. That was one of the things about the end of the war:
 Absolutely anybody who wanted a weapon could have one. They were lying all around.
 Billy had a saber, too. It was a Luftwaffe ceremonial saber. Its hilt was stamped with a
 screaming eagle. The eagle was carrying a swastika and looking down. Billy found it
 stuck into a telephone pole. He had pulled it out of the pole as the wagon went by.
  Now his snoozing became shallower as be heard a man and a woman speaking German
 in pitying tones. The speakers were commiserating with somebody lyrically. Before Billy
 opened his eyes, it seemed to him that the tones might have been those used by the
 friends of Jesus when they took His ruined body down from His cross. So it goes.
  Billy opened his eyes. A middle-aged man and wife were crooning to the horses. They
 were noticing what the Americans had not noticed-that the horses' mouths were bleeding,
 gashed by the bits, that the horses' hooves were broken, so that every step meant agony,
 that the horses were insane with thirst. The Americans had treated their form of
 transportation as though it were no more sensitive than a six-cylinder Chevrolet.
  These two horse pitiers moved back along the wagon to where they could gaze in
 patronizing reproach at Billy-at Billy Pilgrim, who was so long and weak, so ridiculous in
 his azure toga and silver shoes. They weren't afraid of him. They weren't afraid of
 anything. They were doctors, both obstetricians. They had been delivering babies until
 the hospitals were all burned down. Now they were picnicking near where their
 apartment used to be.
  The woman was softly beautiful, translucent from having eaten potatoes for so long.
 The man wore a business suit, necktie and all. Potatoes had made him gaunt. He was as
 tall as Billy, wore steel-rimmed tri-focals. This couple, so involved with babies, had
 never reproduced themselves, though they could have. This was an interesting comment
 on the whole idea of reproduction.
  They had nine languages between them. They tried Polish on Billy Pilgrim first, since
 he was dressed so clownishly, since the wretched Poles were the involuntary clowns of
 the Second World War.
  Billy asked them in English what it was they wanted, and they at once scolded him in
 English for the condition of the horses. They made Billy get out of the wagon and come
 look at the horses. When Billy saw the condition of his means of transportation, he burst
 into tears. He hadn't cried about anything else in the war.
  Later on, as a middle-aged optometrist, he would weep quietly and privately
 sometimes, but never make loud boo-hoo-ing noises.
  Which is why the epigraph of this book is the quatrain from the famous Christmas
 carol. Billy cried very little, though he often saw things worth crying about, and in that
 respect, at least, he resembled the Christ of the Carol:
  The cattle are lowing,
  The Baby awakes.
  But the little Lord Jesus
  No crying He makes. 
  Billy traveled in time back to the hospital in Vermont. Breakfast had been eaten and
 cleared away and Professor Rumfoord was reluctantly becoming interested in Billy as a
 human being. Rumfoord questioned Billy gruffly, satisfied himself that Billy really had
 been in Dresden. He asked Billy what it had been like, and Billy told him about the
 horses and the couple picnicking on the moon.
  The story ended this way,. Billy and the doctors unharnessed the horses, but the horses
 wouldn't go anywhere. Their feet hurt too much. And then Russians came on
 motorcycles, and they arrested everybody but the horses.
  Two days after that, Billy was turned over to the Americans, who shipped him home
 on a very slow freighter called the Lucretia A. Mott. Lucretia A. Mott was a famous
 American suffragette. She was dead. So it goes.
  'It had to be done,' Rumfoord told Billy, speaking of the destruction of Dresden.
  'I know,' said Billy.
  'That's war.'
  'I know. I'm not complaining.'
  'It must have been hell on the ground.'
  'It was,' said Billy Pilgrim.
  Pity the men who had to do it.'
  "I do.'
  'You must have had mixed feelings, there on the ground.'
  "It was all right.,' said Billy. 'Everything is all right, and everybody has to do exactly
 what he does. -I learned that on Tralfamadore.'
  Billy Pilgrim's daughter took him home later that day, put him to bed in his house,
 turned the Magic Fingers on. There was a practical nurse there. Billy wasn't supposed to
 work or even leave the house for a while, at least. He was under observation.
  But Billy sneaked out while the nurse wasn't watching and he drove to New York City,
 where he hoped to appear on television. He was going to tell the world about the lessons
 of Tralfamadore.
  Billy Pilgrim checked into the Royalton Hotel on Forty-fourth Street in New York. He
 by chance was given a room which had once been the home of George Jean Nathan, the
 critic and editor. Nathan, according to the Earthling concept of time, had died back in
 1958. According to the Tralfamadorian concept, of course. Nathan was still alive
 somewhere and always would be.
  The room was small and simple, except that it was on the top floor, and had French
 doors which opened onto a terrace as large as the room. And beyond the parapet of the
 terrace was the air space over Forty-fourth Street. Billy now leaned over that parapet,
 looked down at all the people moving hither and yon. They were jerky little scissors.
 They were a lot of fun.
  It was a chilly night, and Billy came indoors after a while, closed the French doors.
 Closing those doors reminded him of his honeymoon. There had been French doors on
 the Cape Ann love nest of his honeymoon, still were, always would be.
  Billy turned on his television set checking its channel selector around and around. He
 was looking for programs on which he might be allowed to appear. But it was too early in 
 the evening for programs that allowed people with peculiar opinions to speak out. It was
 only a little after eight o'clock, so all the shows were about silliness or murder. So it goes.
  Billy left his room, went down the slow elevator, walked over to Times Square, looked
 into the window of a tawdry bookstore. In the window were hundreds of books about
 fucking and buggery and murder, and a street guide to New York City, and a model of
 the Statue of Liberty with a thermometer on it. Also in the window, speckled with soot
 and fly shit, were four paperback novels by Billy's friend, Kilgore Trout.
  The news of the day, meanwhile, was being written in a ribbon of lights on a building
 to Billy's back. The window reflected the news. It was about power and sports and anger
 and death. So it goes.
  Billy went into the bookstore.
  A sign in there said that adults only were allowed in the back. There were peep shows
 in the back that showed movies of young women and men with no clothes on. It cost a
 quarter to look into a machine for one minute. There were still photographs of naked
 young people for sale back there, too. You could take those home. The stills were a lot
 more Tralfamadorian than the movies, since you could look at them whenever you
 wanted to, and they wouldn't change. Twenty years in the future, those girls would still
 be young, would still be smiling or smoldering or simply looking stupid, with their legs
 wide open. Some of them were eating lollipops or bananas. They would still be eating
 those. And the peckers of the young men would still be semi-erect, and their muscles
 would be bulging like cannonballs.
  But Billy Pilgrim wasn't beguiled by the back of the store. He was thrilled by the
 Kilgore Trout novels in the front. The tides were all new to him, or he thought they were.
 Now he opened one. It seemed all right for him to do that. Everybody else in the store
 was pawing things. The name of the book was The Big Board. He got a few paragraphs
 into it, and then realized that he had read it before-years ago, in the veterans' hospital. It
 was about an Earthling man and woman who were kidnapped by extra-terrestrials. They
 were put on display in a zoo on a planet called Zircon-212.
  These fictitious people in the zoo had a big board supposedly showing stock market,
 quotations and commodity prices along one wall of their habitat, and a news ticker, and a
 telephone that was supposedly connected to a brokerage on Earth. The creatures on
 Zircon-212 told their captives that they had invested a million dollars for them back on
 Earth, and that it was up to the captives to manage it so that they would be fabulously
 wealthy when they returned to Earth.
  The telephone and the big board and the ticker were all fakes, of -course. They were
 simply stimulants to make the Earthlings perform vividly for the crowds at the zoo- to
 make them jump up and down and cheer, or gloat, or sulk, or tear their hair, to be scared
 shitless or to feel as contented as babies in their mothers' arms.
  The Earthlings did very well on paper. That was part of the rigging, of course. And
 religion got mixed up in it, too. The news ticker reminded them that the President of the
 United States had declared National Prayer Week, and that everybody should pray. The
 Earthlings had had a bad week on the market before that. They had lost a small fortune in
 olive oil futures. So they gave praying a whirl. 
  It worked. Olive oil went up.
  Another Kilgore Trout book there in the window was about a man who built a time
 machine so he could go back and see Jesus. It worked, and he saw Jesus when Jesus was
 only twelve years old. Jesus was learning the carpentry trade from his father.
  Two Roman soldiers came into the shop with a mechanical drawing on papyrus of a
 device they wanted built by sunrise the next morning. It was a cross to be used in the
 execution of a rabble-rouser.
  Jesus and his father built it. They were glad to have the work. And the rabble-rouser
 was executed on it.
  So it goes.
  The bookstore was run by seeming quintuplets, by five short, bald men chewing unfit
 cigars that were sopping wet. They never smiled, and each one had a stool to perch on.
 They were making money running a paper-and-celluloid whorehouse.
  They didn't have hard-ons. Neither did Billy Pilgrim. Everybody else did. It was a
 ridiculous store, all about love and babies.
  The clerks occasionally told somebody to buy or get out, not to just look and look and
 look and paw and paw. Some of the people were looking at each other instead of the
 merchandise.
  A clerk came up to Billy and told him the good stuff was in the back, that the books
 Billy was reading were window dressing. 'That ain't what you want, for Christ's sake,' he
 told Billy 'What you want's in back.'
  So Billy moved a little farther back, but not as far as the part for adults only. He moved
 because of absentminded politeness, taking a Trout book with him-the one about Jesus
 and the time machine.
  The time-traveler in the book went back to Bible times to find out one thing in
 particular: Whether or not Jesus had really died on the cross, or whether he had been
 taken down while still alive, whether he had really gone on living. The hero had a
 stethoscope along.
  Billy skipped to the end of the book, where the hero mingled with the people who were
 taking Jesus down from the cross. The time-traveler was the first one up the ladder,
 dressed in clothes of the period, and he leaned close to Jesus so people couldn't see him
 use the stethoscope, and he listened.
  There wasn't a sound inside the emaciated chest cavity. The Son of God was as dead as
 a doornail.
  So it goes.
  The time-traveler, whose name was Lance Corwin, also got to measure the length of
 Jesus, but not to weigh him. Jesus was five feet and three and a half inches long.
  Another clerk came up to Billy and asked him if he was going to buy the book or not,
 and Billy said that he wanted to buy it, please. He had his back to a rack of paperback
 books about oral-genital contacts from ancient Egypt to the present and so on, and the
 clerk supposed Billy was reading one of these. So he was startled when he saw what
 Billy's book was. He said, 'Jesus Christ, where did you find this thing?' and so on, and he 
 had to tell the other clerks about the pervert who wanted to buy the window dressing. The
 other clerks already knew about Billy. They had been watching him, too.
  The cash register where Billy waited for his change was near a bin of old girly
 magazines. Billy looked at one out of the corner of his eye, and he saw this question on
 its cover: What really became of Montana Wildhack?
  So Billy read it. He knew where Montana Wildhack really was, of course. She was
 back on Tralfamadore, taking care of the baby, but the magazine, which was called
 Midnight Pussycats, promised that she was wearing a cement overcoat under fathoms of
 saltwater in San Pedro Bay.
  So it goes.
  Billy wanted to laugh. The magazine., which was published for lonesome men to jerk
 off to, ran the story so it could print pictures taken from blue movies which Montana had
 made as a teenagers Billy did not look closely at these. They were grainy things, soot and
 chalk. They could have been anybody.
  Billy was again directed to the back of the store and he went this time. A jaded sailor
 stepped away from a movie machine while the film was still running. Billy looked in, and
 there was Montana Wildhack alone on a bed, peeling a banana. The picture clicked off.
 Billy did not want to see what happened next, and a clerk importuned him to come over
 and see some really hot stuff they kept under the counter for connoisseurs.
  Billy was mildly curious as to what could possibly have been kept hidden in such a
 place. The clerk leered and showed him. It was a photograph of a woman and a Shetland
 pony. They were attempting to have sexual intercourse between two Doric columns, in
 front of velvet draperies which were fringed with deedlee-balls.
  Billy didn't get onto television in New York that night., but he did get onto a radio talk
 show. There was a radio station right next to Billy's hotel. He saw its call letters over the
 entrance of an office building, so he went in. He went up to the studio on an automatic
 elevator, and there were other people up there, waiting to go in. They were literary critics,
 and they thought Billy was one, too. They were going to discuss whether the novel was
 dead or not. So it goes.
  Billy took his seat with the others around a golden oak table, with a microphone all his
 own. The master of ceremonies asked him his name and what paper he was from. Billy
 said he was from the Ilium Gazette.
  He was nervous and happy. 'If you're ever in Cody, Wyoming,' he told himself, 'just
 ask for Wild Bob.'
  Billy put his hand up at the very first part of the program but he wasn't called on right
 away. Others got in ahead of him. One of them said that it would be a nice time to bury
 the novel, now that a Virginian, one hundred years after Appomattox, had written Uncle
 Tom's Cabin. Another one said that people couldn't read well enough anymore to turn
 print into exciting situations in their skulls, so that authors had to do what Norman Mailer
 did, which was to perform in public what he had written. The master of ceremonies asked
 people to say what they thought the function of the novel might be in modem society, and
 one critic said, 'To provide touches of color in rooms with all-white wars.' Another one 
 said, 'To describe blow-jobs artistically.' Another one said, 'To teach wives of junior
 executives what to buy next and how to act in a French restaurant.'
  And then Billy was allowed to speak. Off he went, in that beautifully trained voice of
 his, telling about the flying saucers and Montana Wildhack and so on.
  He was gently expelled from the studio during a commercial. He went back to his hotel
 room, put a quarter into the Magic Fingers machine connected to his bed, and he went to
 sleep. He traveled in time back to Tralfamadore.
  'Time-traveling again?' said Montana. It was artificial evening in the dome. She was
 breast-feeding their child.
  'Hmm?' said Billy.
  'You've been time-traveling again. I can always tell.'
  'Um.'
  'Where did you go this time? It wasn't the war. I can tell that, too. '
  'New York.'
  'The Big Apple.'
  'Hm?'
  'That's what they used to call New York.'
  "Oh.'
  'You see any plays or movies?'
  'No-I walked around Times Square some, bought a book by Kilgore Trout.'
  'Lucky you.' She did not share his enthusiasm for Kilgore Trout.
  Billy mentioned casually that he had seen part of a blue movie she had made. Her
 response was no less casual. It was Tralfamadorian and guilt-free:
  'Yes-' she said, 'and I've heard about you in the war, about what a clown you were. And
 I've heard about the high school teacher who was shot. He made a blue movie with a
 firing squad.' She moved the baby from one breast to the other, because the moment was
 so structured that she had to do so.
  There was a silence.
  'They're playing with the clocks again,' said Montana, rising, preparing to put the baby
 into its crib. She meant that their keepers were making the electric clocks in the dome go
 fast, then slow, then fast again., and watching the little Earthling family through
 peepholes.
  There was a silver chain around Montana Wildhack's neck. Hanging from it, between
 her breasts, was a locket containing a photograph of her alcoholic mother-grainy thing,
 soot and chalk. It could have been anybody. Engraved on the outside of the locket were
 these words:
 GOD GRANT ME THE SERENITY
 TO ACCEPT THE THINGS I
 CANNOT CHANGE, COURAGE
 TO CHANGE THE THINGS
 I CAN, AND WISDOM
 ALWAYS TO TELL THE
 DIFFERENCE.
 Ten 
 Robert Kennedy, whose summer home is eight miles from the home I live in all year
 round, was shot two nights ago. He died last night. So it goes.
  Martin Luther King was shot a month ago. He died, too. So it goes.
  And every day my Government gives me a count of corpses created by military science
 in Vietnam. So it goes.
  My father died many years ago now-of natural causes. So it goes. He was a sweet man.
 He was a gun nut, too. He left me his guns. They rust.
  On Tralfamadore, says Billy Pilgrim, there isn't much interest in Jesus Christ. The
 Earthling figure who is most engaging to the Tralfamadorian mind, he says, is Charles
 Darwin-who taught that those who die are meant to die, that corpses are improvements.
 So it goes.
  The same general idea appears in The Big Board by Kilgore Trout. The flying saucer
 creatures who capture Trout's hem ask him about Darwin. They also ask him about golf.
  If what Billy Pilgrim learned from the Tralfamadorians is true, that we will all live
 forever, no matter how dead we may sometimes seem to be, I am not overjoyed. Still-if I
 am going to spend eternity visiting this moment and that, I'm grateful that so many of
 those moments are nice.
  One of the nicest ones in recent times was on my trip back to Dresden with my old war
 buddy, O'Hare.
  We took a Hungarian Airlines plane from East Berlin. The pilot had a handlebar
 mustache. He looked like Adolph Menjou. He smoked a Cuban cigar while the plane was
 being fueled. When we took off, there was no talk of fastening seat belts.
  When we were up in the air, a young steward served us rye bread and salami and butter
 and cheese and white wine. The folding tray in front of me would not open out. The
 steward went into the cockpit for a tool, came back with a beer-can opener. He used it to
 pry out the tray.
  There were only six other passengers. They spoke many languages. They were having
 nice times, too. East Germany was down below, and the lights were on. I imagined
 dropping bombs on those lights, those villages and cities and towns.
  O'Hare and I had never expected to make any money-and here we were now,
 extremely well-to-do.
  'If you're ever in Cody, Wyoming,' I said to him lazily, 'just ask for Wild Bob.'
  O'Hare had a little notebook with him, and printed in the back of it were postal rates
 and airline distances and the altitudes of famous mountains and other key facts about the
 world. He was looking up the population of Dresden, which wasn't in the notebook, when
 he came across this, which he gave me to read:
  On an average, 324,000 new babies are born into the world every day. During that
 same day, 10,000 persons, in an average, will have starved to death or died from
 malnutrition. So it goes. In addition, 123,000 persons will die for other reasons. So it
 goes. This leaves a net gain of about 191,000 each day in the world. The Population 
 Reference Bureau predicts that the world's total population will double to 7,000,000,000
 before the year 2000.
  'I suppose they will all want dignity,' I said.
  'I suppose,' said O'Hare.
  Billy Pilgrim was meanwhile traveling back to Dresden, too, but not in the present. He
 was going back there in 1945, two days after the city was destroyed. Now Billy and the
 rest were being marched into the ruins by their guards. I was there. O'Hare was there. We
 had spent the past two nights in the blind innkeeper's stable. Authorities had found us
 there. They told us what to do. We were to borrow picks and shovels and crowbars and
 wheelbarrows from our neighbors. We were to march with these implements to such and
 such a place in the ruins, ready to go to work.
  There were cades on the main roads leading into the ruins. Germans were stopped
 there. They were not permitted to explore the moon.
  Prisoners of war from many lands came together that morning at such and such a place
 in Dresden. It had been decreed that here was where the digging for bodies was to begin.
 So the digging began.
  Billy found himself paired as a digger with a Maori, who had been captured at Tobruk.
 The Maori was chocolate brown. He had whirlpools tattooed on his forehead and his
 cheeks. Billy and the Maori dug into the inert, unpromising gravel of the moon. The
 materials were loose, so there were constant little avalanches.
  Many holes were dug at once. Nobody knew yet what there was to find. Most holes
 came to nothing-to pavement, or to boulders so huge they would not move. There was no
 machinery. Not even horses or mules or oxen could cross the moonscape.
  And Billy and the Maori and others helping them with their particular hole came at last
 to a membrane of timbers laced over rocks which had wedged together to form an
 accidental dome. They made a hole in the membrane. There was darkness and space
 under there.
  A German soldier with a flashlight went down into the darkness, was gone a long time.
 When he finally came back, he told a superior on the rim of the hole that there were
 dozens of bodies down there. They were sitting on benches. They were unmarked.
  So it goes.
  The superior said that the opening in the membrane should be enlarged, and that a
 ladder should be put in the hole, so that bodies could be carried out. Thus began the first
 corpse mine in Dresden.
  There were hundreds of corpse mines operating by and by. They didn't smell bad at
 first, were wax museums. But then the bodies rotted and liquefied, and the stink was like
 roses and mustard gas.
  So it goes.
  The Maori Billy had worked with died of the dry heaves, after having been ordered to
 go down in that stink and work. He tore himself to pieces, throwing up and throwing up.
  So it goes. 
  So a new technique was devised. Bodies weren't brought up any more. They were
 cremated by soldiers with flamethrowers right where they were. The soldiers. stood
 outside the shelters, simply sent the fire in.
  Somewhere in there the poor old high school teacher, Edgar Derby, was caught with a
 teapot he had taken from the catacombs. He was arrested for plundering. He was tried
 and shot.
  So it goes.
 And somewhere in there was springtime. The corpse mines were closed down. The
 soldiers all left to fight the Russians. In the suburbs, the women and children dug rifle
 pits. Billy and the rest of his group were locked up in the stable in the suburbs. And then,
 one morning, they got up to discover that the door was unlocked. The Second World War
 in Europe was over.
  Billy and the rest wandered out onto the shady street. The trees were leafing out. There
 was nothing going on out there, no traffic of any kind. There was only one vehicle, an
 abandoned wagon drawn by two horses. The wagon was green and coffin-shaped.
 Birds were talking.

 
 
 
 By
 Author: Kurt Vonnegut
 
 with drawing by the author
 Delacorte Press / Seymour Lawrence
 
 
 
 In Memory o£ Phoebe Hurty,
 who comforted me in Indianapolis—
 during the Great Depression.
 When he hath tried me,
 I shall come forth as gold.
 —JOB
 Breakfast of Champions ·
 Preface
 The expression "Breakfast of Champions" is a registered trademark of General Mills,
 Inc., for use on a breakfast cereal product. The use of the identical expression as the
 title for this book is not intended to indicate an association with or sponsorship by
 General Mills, nor is it intended to disparage their fine products.
 · The person to whom this book is dedicated, Phoebe Hurty, is no longer among the
 living, as they say. She was an Indianapolis widow when I met her late in the Great
 Depression. I was sixteen or so. She was about forty.
 She was rich, but she had gone to work every weekday of her adult life, so she went
 on doing that. She wrote a sane and funny advice-to-the-lovelorn column for the Indianapolis
 Times, a good paper which is now defunct.
 Defunct.
 She wrote ads for the William H. Block Company, a department store which still
 flourishes in a building my father designed. She wrote this ad for an end-of-the-summer
 sale on straw hats: "For prices like this, you can run them through your horse and put
 them on your roses."
 · Phoebe Hurty hired me to write copy for ads about teen-age clothes. I had to wear the
 clothes I praised. That was part of the job. And I became friends with her two sons, who
 were my age. I was over at their house all the time.
 She would talk bawdily to me and her sons, and to our girlfriends when we brought
 them around. She was funny. She was liberating. She taught us to be impolite in con
 versation not only about sexual matters, but about American history and famous heroes,
 about the distribution of wealth, about school, about everything.
 I now make my living by being impolite. I am clumsy at it. I keep trying to imitate the
 impoliteness which was so graceful in Phoebe Hurty. I think now that grace was easier
 for her than it is for me because of the mood of the Great Depression. She believed
 what so many Americans believed then: that the nation would be happy and just and
 rational when prosperity came.
 I never hear that word anymore: Prosperity. It used to be a synonym for Paradise.
 And Phoebe Hurty was able to believe that the impoliteness she recommended would
 give shape to an American paradise.
 Now her sort of impoliteness is fashionable. But nobody believes anymore in a new
 American paradise. I sure miss Phoebe Hurty.
 · As for the suspicion I express in this book, that human beings are robots, are
 machines: It should be noted that people, mostly men, suffering from the last stages of
 syphilis, from locomotor ataxia, were common spectacles in downtown Indianapolis and
 in circus crowds when I was a boy.
 Those people were infested with carnivorous little corkscrews which could be seen
 only with a microscope. The victims' vertebrae were welded together after the corkscrews
 got through with the meat between. The syphilitics seemed tremendously
 dignified—erect, eyes straight ahead.
 I saw one stand on a curb at the corner of Meridian and Washington Streets one
 time, underneath an overhanging clock which my father designed. The intersection was
 known locally as "The Crossroads of America"
 This syphilitic man was thinking hard there, at the Crossroads of America, about how
 to get his legs to step off the curb and carry him across Washington Street. He
 shuddered gently, as though he had a small motor which was idling inside. Here was his
 problem: his brains, where the instructions to his legs originated, were being eaten alive
 by corkscrews. The wires which had to carry the instructions weren't insulated anymore,
 or were eaten clear through. Switches along the way were welded open or shut.
 This man looked like an old, old man, although he might have been only thirty years old.
 He thought and thought. And then he kicked two times like a chorus girl. He certainly
 looked like a machine to me when I was a boy.
 · I tend to think of human beings as huge, rubbery test tubes, too, with chemical
 reactions seething inside. When I was a boy, I saw a lot of people with goiters. So did
 Dwayne Hoover, the Pontiac dealer who is the hero of this book. Those unhappy
 Earthlings had such swollen thyroid glands that they seemed to have zucchini squash
 growing from their throats.
 All they had to do in order to have ordinary lives, it turned out, was to consume less
 than one-millionth of an ounce of iodine every day.
 My own mother wrecked her brains with chemicals, which were supposed to make
 her sleep.
 When I get depressed, I take a little pill, and I cheer up again.
 And so on.
 So it is a big temptation to me, when I create a character for a novel, to say that he is
 what he is because of faulty wiring, or because of microscopic amounts of chemicals
 which he ate or failed to eat on that particular day.
 · What do I myself think of this particular book? I feel lousy about it, but I always feel
 lousy about my books. My friend Knox Burger said one time that a certain cumbersome
 novel ". . . read as though it had been written by Philboyd Studge." That's who I think I
 am when I write what I am seemingly programmed to write.
 · This book is my fiftieth birthday present to myself. I feel as though I am crossing the
 spine of a roof—having ascended one slope.
 I am programmed at fifty to perform childishly—to insult "The Star-Spangled Banner,"
 to scrawl pictures of a Nazi flag and an asshole and a lot of other things with a felttipped
 pen. To give an idea of the maturity of my illustrations for this book, here is my
 picture of an asshole:
 · I think I am trying to clear my head of all the junk in there—the assholes, the flags, the
 underpants. Yes—there is a picture in this book of underpants. I'm throwing out
 characters from my other books, too. I'm not going to put on any more puppet shows.
 I think I am trying to make my head as empty as it was when I was born onto this
 damaged planet fifty years ago.
 I suspect that this is something most white Americans, and nonwhite Americans who
 imitate white Americans, should do. The things other people have put into my head, at
 any rate, do not fit together nicely, are often useless and ugly, are out of proportion with
 one another, are out of proportion with life as it really is outside my head.
 I have no culture, no humane harmony in my brains. I can't live without a culture
 anymore.
 · So this book is a sidewalk strewn with junk, trash which I throw over my shoulders as
 I travel in time back to November eleventh, nineteen hundred and twenty-two.
 I will come to a time in my backwards trip when November eleventh, accidentally my
 birthday, was a sacred day called Armistice Day. When I was a boy, and when Dwayne
 Hoover was a boy, all the people of all the nations which had fought in the First World
 War were silent during the eleventh minute of the eleventh hour of Armistice Day, which
 was the eleventh day of the eleventh month.
 It was during that minute in nineteen hundred and eighteen, that millions upon
 millions of human beings stopped butchering one another. I have talked to old men who
 were on battlefields during that minute. They have told me in one way or another that
 the sudden silence was the Voice of God. So we still have among us some men who
 can remember when God spoke clearly to mankind.
 · Armistice Day has become Veterans' Day. Armistice Day was sacred. Veterans' Day
 is not.
 So I will throw Veterans' Day over my shoulder. Armistice Day I will keep. I don't want
 to throw away any sacred things.
 What else is sacred? Oh, Romeo and Juliet, for instance.
 And all music is.
 —PHILBOYD STUDGE
 Chapter 1
 This is a tale of a meeting of two lonesome, skinny, fairly old white men on a planet
 which was dying fast.
 One of them was a science-fiction writer named Kilgore Trout. He was a nobody at
 the time, and he supposed his life was over. He was mistaken. As a consequence of the
 meeting, he became one of the most beloved and respected human beings in history.
 The man he met was an automobile dealer, a Pontiac dealer named Dwayne Hoover.
 Dwayne Hoover was on the brink of going insane.
 · Listen:
 Trout and Hoover were citizens of the United States of America, a country which was
 called America for short.
 This was their national anthem, which was pure balderdash, like so much they were
 expected to take seriously:
 O, say can you see by the dawn's early light
 What so proudly we hailed at the twilight's
 last gleaming,
 Whose broad stripes and bright stars,
 thru the perilous fight
 O'er the ramparts we watched were so
 gallantly streaming?
 And the rockets' red glare, the bombs
 bursting in air,
 Gave proof through the night that our
 flag was still there. 
 O, say does that star-spangled banner
 yet wave
 O'er the land of the free and the home
 of the brave?
 · There were one quadrillion nations in the Universe, but the nation Dwayne Hoover
 and Kilgore Trout belonged to was the only one with a national anthem which was
 gibberish sprinkled with question marks.
 Here is what their flag looked like:
 It was the law of their nation, a law no other nation on the planet had about its flag,
 which said this: "The flag shall not be dipped to any person or thing."
 Flag-dipping was a form of friendly and respectful salute, which consisted of bringing
 the flag on a stick closer to the ground, then raising it up again.
 · The motto of Dwayne Hoover's and Kilgore Trout's nation was this, which meant in a
 language nobody spoke anymore, Out of Many, One: "E pluribus unum."
 The undippable flag was a beauty, and the anthem and the vacant motto might not
 have mattered much, if it weren't for this: a lot of citizens were so ignored and cheated
 and insulted that they thought they might be in the wrong country, or even on the wrong
 planet, that some terrible mistake had been made. It might have comforted them some if
 their anthem and their motto had mentioned fairness or brotherhood or hope or
 happiness, had somehow welcomed them to the society and its real estate.
 If they studied their paper money for clues as to what their country was all about, they
 found, among a lot of other baroque trash, a picture of a truncated pyramid with a
 radiant eye on top of it, like this:
 Not even the President of the United States knew what that was all about. It was as
 though the country were saying to its citizens, "In nonsense is strength"
 · A lot of the nonsense was the innocent result of playfulness on the part of the
 founding fathers of the nation of Dwayne Hoover and Kilgore Trout. The founders were
 aristocrats, and they wished to show off their useless education, which consisted of the
 study of hocus-pocus from ancient times. They were bum poets as well.
 But some of the nonsense was evil, since it concealed great crimes. For example,
 teachers of children in the United States of America wrote this date on blackboards
 again and again, and asked the children to memorize it with pride and joy:
 The teachers told the children that this was when their continent was discovered by
 human beings. Actually, millions of human beings were already living full and imaginative
 lives on the continent in 1492. That was simply the year in which sea pirates
 began to cheat and rob and kill them.
 Here was another piece of evil nonsense which children were taught: that the sea
 pirates eventually created a government which became a beacon of freedom to human
 beings everywhere else. There were pictures and statues of this supposed imaginary
 beacon for children to see. It was sort of an ice-cream cone on fire. It looked like this:
 Actually, the sea pirates who had the most to do with the creation of the new
 government owned human slaves. They used human beings for machinery, and, even
 after slavery was eliminated, because it was so embarrassing, they and their
 descendants continued to think of ordinary human beings as machines.
 · The sea pirates were white. The people who were already on the continent when the
 pirates arrived were copper-colored. When slavery was introduced onto the continent,
 the slaves were black. Color was everything.
 · Here is how the pirates were able to take whatever they wanted from anybody else:
 they had the best boats in the world, and they were meaner than anybody else, and
 they had gunpowder, which was a mixture of potassium nitrate, charcoal, and sulphur.
 They touched this seemingly listless powder with fire, and it turned violently into gas.
 This gas blew projectiles out of metal tubes at terrific velocities. The projectiles cut
 through meat and bone very easily, so the pirates could wreck the wiring or the bellows
 or the plumbing of a stubborn human being, even when he was far, far away.
 The chief weapon of the sea pirates, however, was their capacity to astonish. Nobody
 else could believe, until it was much too late, how heartless and greedy they were.
 · When Dwayne Hoover and Kilgore Trout met each other, their country was by far the
 richest and most powerful country on the planet. It had most of the food and minerals
 and machinery, and it disciplined other countries by threatening to shoot big rockets at
 them or to drop things on them from airplanes.
 Most other countries didn't have doodley-squat. Many of them weren't even
 inhabitable anymore. They had too many people and not enough space. They had sold
 everything that was any good, and there wasn't anything to eat anymore, and still the
 people went on fucking all the time.
 Fucking was how babies were made.
 · A lot of the people on the wrecked planet were Communists. They had a theory that
 what was left of the planet should be shared more or less equally among all the people,
 who hadn't asked to come to a wrecked planet in the first place. Meanwhile, more
 babies were arriving all the time—kicking and screaming, yelling for milk.
 In some places people would actually try to eat mud or suck on gravel while babies
 were being born just a few feet away.
 And so on.
 · Dwayne Hoover's and Kilgore Trout's country, where there was still plenty of
 everything, was opposed to Communism. It didn't think that Earthlings who had a lot
 should share it with others unless they really wanted to, and most of them didn't want to.
 So they didn't have to.
 · Everybody in America was supposed to grab whatever he could and hold onto it.
 Some Americans were very good at grabbing and holding, were fabulously well-to-do.
 Others couldn't get their hands on doodley-squat.
 Dwayne Hoover was fabulously well-to-do when he met Kilgore Trout. A man
 whispered those exact words to a friend one morning as Dwayne walked by: "Fabulously
 well-to-do."
 And here's how much of the planet Kilgore Trout owned in those days: doodleysquat.
 And Kilgore Trout and Dwayne Hoover met in Midland City, which was Dwayne's
 home town, during an Arts Festival there in autumn of 1972.
 As has already been said: Dwayne was a Pontiac dealer who was going insane.
 Dwayne's incipient insanity was mainly a matter of chemicals, of course. Dwayne
 Hoover's body was manufacturing certain chemicals which unbalanced his mind. But
 Dwayne, like all novice lunatics, needed some bad ideas, too, so that his craziness
 could have shape and direction.
 Bad chemicals and bad ideas were the Yin and Yang of madness. Yin and Yang
 were Chinese symbols of harmony. They looked like this:
 The bad ideas were delivered to Dwayne by Kilgore Trout. Trout considered himself
 not only harmless but invisible. The world had paid so little attention to him that he
 supposed he was dead.
 He hoped he was dead.
 But he learned from his encounter with Dwayne that he was alive enough to give a
 fellow human being ideas which would turn him into a monster.
 Here was the core of the bad ideas which Trout gave to Dwayne: Everybody on Earth
 was a robot, with one exception—Dwayne Hoover.
 Of all the creatures in the Universe, only Dwayne was thinking and feeling and worrying
 and planning and so on. Nobody else knew what pain was. Nobody else had any
 choices to make. Everybody else was a fully automatic machine, whose purpose was to
 stimulate Dwayne. Dwayne was a new type of creature being tested by the
 Only Dwayne Hoover had free will.
 · Trout did not expect to be believed. He put the bad ideas into a science-fiction novel,
 and that was where Dwayne found them. The book wasn't addressed to Dwayne alone.
 Trout had never heard of Dwayne when he wrote it. It was addressed to anybody who
 happened to open it up. It said to simply anybody, in effect, "Hey— guess what: You're
 the only creature with free will. How does that make you feel?" And so on.
 It was a tour de force. It was a jeu d'esprit.
 But it was mind poison to Dwayne.
 · It shook up Trout to realize that even he could bring evil into the world—in the form of
 bad ideas. And, after Dwayne was carted off to a lunatic asylum in a canvas camisole,
 Trout became a fanatic on the importance of ideas as causes and cures for diseases.
 But nobody would listen to him. He was a dirty old man in the wilderness, crying out
 among the trees and underbrush, "Ideas or the lack of them can cause disease!"
 | Kilgore Trout became a pioneer in the field of mental health. He advanced his theories
 disguised as science-fiction. He died in 1981, almost twenty years after he made
 Dwayne Hoover so sick.
 He was by then recognized as a great artist and scientist. The American Academy of
 Arts and Sciences caused a monument to be erected over his ashes. Carved in its
 face was a quotation from his last novel, his two-hundred-and-ninth novel, which was
 unfinished when he died. The monument looked like this:
 Chapter 2
 Dwayne was a widower. He lived alone at night in a dream house in Fairchild
 Heights, which was the most desirable residential area in the city. Every house there
 cost at least one hundred thousand dollars to build. Every house was on at least four
 acres of land.
 Dwayne's only companion at night was a Labrador retriever named Sparky. Sparky
 could not wag his tail— because of an automobile accident many years ago, so he had
 no way of telling other dogs how friendly he was. He had to fight all the time. His ears
 were in tatters. He was lumpy with scars.
 · Dwayne had a black servant named Lottie Davis. She cleaned his house every day.
 Then she cooked his supper for him and served it. Then she went home. She was descended
 from slaves.
 Lottie Davis and Dwayne didn't talk much, even though they liked each other a lot.
 Dwayne reserved most of his conversation for the dog. He would get down on the floor
 and roll around with Sparky, and he would say things like, "You and me, Spark," and
 "How's my old buddy?" and so on.
 And that routine went on unrevised, even after Dwayne started to go crazy, so Lottie
 had nothing unusual to notice.
 · Kilgore Trout owned a parakeet named Bill. Like Dwayne Hoover, Trout was all alone
 at night, except for his pet. Trout, too, talked to his pet.
 But while Dwayne babbled to his Labrador retriever about love, Trout sneered and
 muttered to his parakeet about the end of the world.
 "Any time now," he would say. "And high time, too."
 It was Trout's theory that the atmosphere would become unbreathable soon.
 Trout supposed that when the atmosphere became poisonous, Bill would keel over a
 few minutes before Trout did. He would kid Bill about that. "How's the old respiration,
 Bill?" he'd say, or, "Seems like you've got a touch of the old emphysema, Bill," or, "We
 never discussed what kind of a funeral you want, Bill. You never even told me what your
 religion is." And so on.
 He told Bill that humanity deserved to die horribly, since it had behaved so cruelly
 and wastefully on a planet so sweet. "We're all Heliogabalus, Bill," he would say. This
 was the name of a Roman emperor who had a sculptor make a hollow, life-size iron bull
 with a door on it. The door could be locked from the outside. The bull's mouth was open.
 That was the only other opening to the outside.
 Heliogabalus would have a human being put into the bull through the door, and the
 door would be locked. Any sounds the human being made in there would come out of
 the mouth of the bull. Heliogabalus would have guests in for a nice party, with plenty of
 food and wine and beautiful women and pretty boys—and Heliogabalus would have a
 servant light kindling. The kindling was under dry firewood—which was under the bull.
 · Trout did another thing which some people might have considered eccentric: he
 called mirrors leaks. It amused him to pretend that mirrors were holes between two universes.
 If he saw a child near a mirror, he might wag his finger at a child warningly, and say
 with great solemnity, "Don't get too near that leak. You wouldn't want to wind up in the
 other universe, would you?"
 Sometimes somebody would say in his presence, "Excuse me, I have to take a leak."
 This was a way of saying that the speaker intended to drain liquid wastes from his body
 through a valve in his lower abdomen.
 And Trout would reply waggishly, "Where I come from, that means you're about to
 steal a mirror."
 And so on.
 By the time of Trout's death, of course, everybody called mirrors leaks. That was how
 respectable even his jokes had become.
 · In 1972, Trout lived in a basement apartment in Cohoes, New York. He made his
 living as an installer of aluminum combination storm windows and screens. He had
 nothing to do with the sales end of the business—because he had no charm. Charm
 was a scheme for making strangers like and trust a person immediately, no matter what
 the charmer had in mind.
 · Dwayne Hoover had oodles of charm.
 · I can have oodles of charm when I want to.
 · A lot of people have oodles of charm.
 · Trout's employer and co-workers had no idea that he was a writer. No reputable
 publisher had ever heard of him, for that matter, even though he had written one
 hundred and seventeen novels and two thousand short stories by the time he met
 Dwayne.
 He made carbon copies of nothing he wrote. He mailed off manuscripts without
 enclosing stamped, self-addressed envelopes for their safe return. Sometimes he didn't
 even include a return address. He got names and addresses of publishers from
 magazines devoted to the writing business, which he read avidly in the periodical rooms
 of public libraries. He thus got in touch with a firm called World Classics Library, which
 published hard-core pornography in Los Angeles, California. They used his stories,
 which usually didn't even have women in them, to give bulk to books and magazines of
 salacious pictures.
 They never told him where or when he might expect to find himself in print. Here is
 what they paid him: doodley-squat.
 · They didn't even send him complimentary copies of the books and magazines in
 which he appeared, so he had to search them out in pornography stores. And the titles
 he gave to his stories were often changed. "Pan Galactic Straw-boss," for instance,
 became "Mouth Crazy."
 Most distracting to Trout, however, were the illustrations his publishers selected,
 which had nothing to do with his tales. He wrote a novel,/for instance, about an
 Earthling named Delmore Skag, a bachelor in a neighborhood where everybody else
 had enormous families. And Skag was a scientist, and he found a way to reproduce
 himself in chicken soup. He would shave living cells from the palm of his right hand, mix
 them with the soup, and expose the soup to cosmic rays. The cells turned into babies
 which looked exactly like Delmore Skag.
 Pretty soon, Delmore was having several babies a day, and inviting his neighbors to
 share his pride and happiness. He had mass baptisms of as many as a hundred babies
 at a time. He became famous as a family man.
 And so on.
 · Skag hoped to force his country into making laws against excessively large families,
 but the legislatures and the courts declined to meet the problem head-on. They passed
 stern laws instead against the possession by unmarried persons of chicken soup.
 And so on.
 The illustrations for this book were murky photographs of several white women giving
 blow jobs to the same black man, who, for some reason, wore a Mexican sombrero.
 At the time he met Dwayne Hoover, Trout's most widely-distributed book was Plague
 on Wheels. The publisher didn't change the title, but he obliterated most of it and all of
 Trout's name with a lurid banner which made this promise:
 · A wide-open beaver was a photograph of a woman not wearing underpants, and with
 her legs far apart, so that the mouth of her vagina could be seen. The expression was
 first used by news photographers, who often got to see up women's skirts at accidents
 and sporting events and from underneath fire escapes and so on. They needed a code
 word to yell to other newsmen and friendly policemen and firemen and so on, to let
 them know what could be seen, in case they wanted to see it. The word was this:
 "Beaver!"
 A beaver was actually a large rodent. It loved water, so it built dams. It looked like
 this:
 The sort of beaver which excited news photographers so much looked like this:
 This was where babies came from.
 · When Dwayne was a boy, when Kilgore Trout was a boy, when I was a boy, and even
 when we became middle-aged men and older, it was the duty of the police and the
 courts to keep representations of such ordinary apertures from being examined and
 discussed by persons not engaged in the practice of medicine. It was somehow decided
 that wide-open beavers, which were ten thousand times as common as real beavers,
 should be the most massively defended secret under law.
 So there was a madness about wide-open beavers. There was also a madness about
 a soft, weak metal, an element, which had somehow been declared the most desirable
 of all elements, which was gold.
 · And the madness about wide-open beavers was extended to underpants when
 Dwayne and Trout and I were boys. Girls concealed their underpants at all costs, and
 boys tried to see their underpants at all costs. Female underpants looked like this:
 One of the first things Dwayne learned in school as a little boy, in fact, was a poem
 he was supposed to scream in case he saw a girl's underpants by accident in the playground.
 Other students taught it to him. This was it:
 I see England,
 I see France;
 I see a little girl's
 Underpants!
 When Kilgore Trout accepted the Nobel Prize for Medicine in 1979, he declared:
 "Some people say there is no such thing as progress. The fact that human beings are
 now the only animals left on Earth, I confess, seems a confusing sort of victory. Those
 of you familiar with the nature of my earlier published works will understand why I
 mourned especially when the last beaver died.
 "There were two monsters sharing this planet with us when I was a boy, however,
 and I celebrate their extinction today. They were determined to kill us, or at least to
 make our lives meaningless. They came close to success. They were cruel adversaries,
 which my little friends the beavers were not. Lions? No. Tigers? No. Lions and tigers
 snoozed most of the time. The monsters I will name never snoozed. They inhabited our
 heads. They were the arbitrary lusts for gold, and, God help us, for a glimpse of a little
 girl's underpants.
 "I thank those lusts for being so ridiculous, for they taught us that it was possible for a
 human being to believe anything, and to behave passionately in keeping with that
 belief—any belief.
 "So now we can build an unselfish society by devoting to unselfishness the frenzy we
 once devoted to gold and to underpants."
 He paused, and then he recited with wry mournfulness the beginning of a poem he
 had learned to scream in Bermuda, when he was a little boy. The poem was all the
 more poignant, since it mentioned two nations which no longer existed as such. "I see
 England," he said, "I see France—"
 · Actually, women's underpants had been drastically devalued by the time of the
 historic meeting between Dwayne Hoover and Trout. The price of gold was still on the
 rise.
 Photographs of women's underpants weren't worth the paper they were printed on,
 and even high quality color motion pictures of wide-open beavers were going begging in
 the marketplace.
 There had been a time when a copy of Trout's most popular book to date, Plague on
 Wheels, had brought as much as twelve dollars, because of the illustrations. It was now
 being offered for a dollar, and people who paid even that much did so not because of
 the pictures. They paid for the words.
 · The words in the book, incidentally, were about life on a dying planet named LingoThree,
 whose inhabitants resembled American automobiles. They had wheels. They
 were powered by internal combustion engines. They ate fossil fuels. They weren't
 manufactured, though. They reproduced. They laid eggs containing baby automobiles,
 and the babies matured in pools of oil drained from adult crankcases.
 Lingo-Three was visited by space travelers, who learned that the creatures were
 becoming extinct for this reason: they had destroyed their planet's resources, including
 its atmosphere.
 The space travelers weren't able to offer much in the way of material assistance. The
 automobile creatures hoped to borrow some oxygen, and to have the visitors carry at
 least one of their eggs to another planet, where it might hatch, where an automobile
 civilization could begin again. But the smallest egg they had was/a forty-eight pounder,
 and the space travelers themselves were only an inch high, and their space ship wasn't
 even as big as an Earthling shoebox. They were from Zeltoldimar.
 The spokesman for the Zeltoldimarians was Kago. Kago said that all he could do was to
 tell others in the Universe about how wonderful the automobile creatures had been.
 Here is what he said to all those rusting junkers who were out of gas: "You will be gone,
 but not forgotten."
 The illustration for the story at this point showed two Chinese girls, seemingly
 identical twins, seated on a couch with their legs wide open.
 · So Kago and his brave little Zeltoldimarian crew, which was all homosexual, roamed
 the Universe, keeping the memory of the automobile creatures alive. They came at last
 to the planet Earth. In all innocence, Kago told the Earthlings about the automobiles.
 Kago did not know that human beings could be as easily felled by a single idea as by
 cholera or the bubonic plague. There was no immunity to cuckoo ideas on Earth.
 · And here, according to Trout, was the reason human beings could not reject ideas
 because they were bad: "Ideas on Earth were badges of friendship or enmity. Their
 content did not matter. Friends agreed with friends, in order to express friendliness.
 Enemies disagreed with enemies, in order to express enmity.
 "The ideas Earthlings held didn't matter for hundreds of thousands of years, since
 they couldn't do much about them anyway. Ideas might as well be badges as anything.
 "They even had a saying about the futility of ideas: 'If wishes were horses, beggars
 would ride.'
 "And then Earthlings discovered tools. Suddenly agreeing with friends could be a
 form of suicide or worse. But agreements went on, not for the sake of common sense or
 decency or self-preservation, but for friendliness.
 "Earthlings went on being friendly, when they should have been thinking instead. And
 even when they built computers to do some thinking for them, they designed them not
 so much for wisdom as for friendliness. So they were doomed. Homicidal beggars could
 ride."
 Chapter 3
 Within a century of little Kago's arrival on Earth, according to Trout's novel, every form
 of life on that once peaceful and moist and nourishing blue-green ball was dying or
 dead. Everywhere were the shells of the great beetles which men had made and
 worshipped. They were automobiles. They had killed everything.
 Little Kago himself died long before the planet did. He was attempting to lecture on
 the evils of the automobile in a bar in Detroit. But he was so tiny that nobody paid any
 attention to him. He lay down to rest for a moment, and a drunk automobile worker
 mistook him for a kitchen match. He killed Kago by trying to strike him repeatedly on the
 underside of the bar.
 · Trout received only one fan letter before 1972. It was from an eccentric millionaire,
 who hired a private detective agency to discover who and where he was. Trout was so
 invisible that the search cost eighteen thousand dollars.
 The fan letter reached him in his basement in Cohoes. It was hand-written, and Trout
 concluded that the writer might be fourteen years old or so. The letter said that Plague
 on Wheels was the greatest novel in the English language, and that Trout should be
 President of the United States.
 Trout read the letter out loud to his parakeet. "Things are looking up, Bill," he said.
 "Always knew they would. Get a load of this." And then he read the letter. There was no
 indication in the letter that the writer, whose name was Eliot Rosewater, was a grownup,
 was fabulously well-to-do.
 · Kilgore Trout, incidentally, could never be President of the United States without a
 Constitutional amendment. He hadn't been born inside the country. His birthplace was
 Bermuda. His father, Leo Trout, while remaining an American citizen, worked there for
 many years for the Royal Ornithological Society—guarding the only nesting place in the
 world for Bermuda Erns. These great green sea eagles eventually became extinct,
 despite anything anyone could do.
 · As a child, Trout had seen those Erns die, one by one. His father had assigned him
 the melancholy task of measuring wingspreads of the corpses. These were the largest
 creatures ever to fly under their own power on the planet. And the last corpse had the
 greatest wingspread of all, which was nineteen feet, two and three-quarters inches.
 After all the Erns were dead, it was discovered what had killed them. It was a fungus,
 which attacked their eyes and brains. Men had brought the fungus to their rookery in the
 innocent form of athlete's foot.
 Here is what the flag of Kilgore Trout's native island looked like:
 · So Kilgore Trout had a depressing childhood, despite all of the sunshine and fresh air.
 The pessimism that overwhelmed him in later life, which destroyed his three marriages,
 which drove his only son, Leo, from home at the age of fourteen, very likely had its roots
 in the bittersweet mulch of rotting Erns.
 Kurt Vonnegut, Jr.
 · The fan letter came much too late. It wasn't good news. It was perceived as an
 invasion of privacy by Kilgore Trout. The letter from Rosewater promised that he would
 make Trout famous. This is what Trout had to say about that, with only his parakeet
 listening: "Keep the hell out of my body bag."
 A body bag was a large plastic envelope for a freshly killed American soldier. It was a
 new invention.
 · I do not know who invented the body bag. I do know who invented Kilgore Trout. I did.
 I made him snaggle-toothed. I gave him hair, but I turned it white. I wouldn't let him
 comb it or go to a barber. I made him grow it long and tangled.
 I gave him the same legs the Creator of the Universe gave to my father when my
 father was a pitiful old man. They were pale white broomsticks. They were hairless.
 They were embossed fantastically with varicose veins.
 And, two months after Trout received his first fan letter, I had him find in his mailbox
 an invitation to be a speaker at an arts festival in the American Middle West.
 · The letter was from the Festival's chairman, Fred T. Barry. He was respectful, almost
 reverent about Kilgore Trout. He beseeched him to be one of several distinguished outof-town
 participants in the Festival, which would last for five days. It would celebrate the
 opening of the Mildred Barry Memorial Center for the Arts in Midland City.
 The letter did not say so, but Mildred Barry was the late mother of the Chairman, the
 wealthiest man in Midland City. Fred T. Barry had paid for the new Center of the Arts,
 which was a translucent sphere on stilts. It had no windows. When illuminated inside at
 night, it resembled a rising harvest moon.
 Fred T. Barry, incidentally, was exactly the same age as Trout. They had the same
 birthday. But they certainly didn't look anything alike. Fred T. Barry didn't even look like
 a white man anymore, even though he was of pure English stock. As he grew older and
 older and happier and happier, and all his hair fell out everywhere, he came to look like
 an ecstatic old Chinaman.
 He looked so much like a Chinaman that he had taken to dressing like a Chinaman.
 Real Chinamen often mistook him for a real Chinaman.
 · Fred T. Barry confessed in his letter that he had not read the works of Kilgore Trout,
 but that he would joyfully do so before the Festival began. "You come highly
 recommended by Eliot Rosewater," he said, "who assures me that you are perhaps the
 greatest living American novelist. There can be no higher praise than that."
 Clipped to the letter was a check for one thousand dollars. Fred T. Barry explained
 that this was for travel expenses and an honorarium.
 It was a lot of money. Trout was suddenly fabulously well-to-do.
 · Here is how Trout happened to be invited: Fred T. Barry wanted to have a fabulously
 valuable oil painting as a focal point for the Midland City Festival of the Arts.
 As rich as he was, he couldn't afford to buy one, so he looked for one to borrow.
 The first person he went to was Eliot Rosewater, who owned an El Greco worth three
 million dollars or more. Rosewater said the Festival could have the picture on one
 condition: that it hire as a speaker the greatest living writer in the English language, who
 was Kilgore Trout.
 Trout laughed at the flattering invitation, but he felt fear after that. Once again, a
 stranger was tampering with the privacy of his body bag. He put this question to his
 parakeet haggardly, and he rolled his eyes: "Why all this sudden interest in Kilgore
 Trout?"
 He read the letter again. "They not only want Kilgore Trout," he said, "they want him
 in a tuxedo, Bill. Some mistake has been made."
 He shrugged. "Maybe they invited me because they know I have a tuxedo," he said.
 He really did own a tuxedo. It was in a steamer trunk which he had lugged from place to
 place for more than forty years. It contained toys from childhood, the bones of a
 Bermuda Em, and many other curiosities—including the tuxedo he had worn to a senior
 dance just prior to his graduation from Thomas Jefferson High School in Dayton, Ohio,
 in 1924. Trout was born in Bermuda, and attended grammar school there. But then his
 family moved to Dayton.
 His high school was named after a slave owner who was also one of the world's
 greatest theoreticians on the subject of human liberty.
 · Trout got his tuxedo out of the trunk and he put it on. It was a lot like a tuxedo I'd seen
 my father put on when he was an old, old man. It had a greenish patina of mold. Some
 of the growths it supported resembled patches of fine rabbit fur. 'This will do nicely for
 the evenings," said Trout. "But tell me, Bill—what does one wear in Midland/ City in
 October before the sun goes down?" He hauled lip his pants legs so that his
 grotesquely ornamental ships were exposed. "Bermuda shorts and bobby socks, eh,
 Bill? After all—I am from Bermuda."
 He dabbed at his tuxedo with a damp rag, and the fungi came away easily. "Hate to
 do this, Bill," he said of the fungi he was murdering. "Fungi have as much right to life as
 I do. They know what they want, Bill. Damned if 7 do anymore."
 Then he thought about what Bill himself might want. It was easy to guess. "Bill," he said,
 "I like you so much, and I am such a big shot in the Universe, that I will make your three
 biggest wishes come true." He opened the door of the cage, something Bill couldn't
 have done in a thousand years.
 Bill flew over to a windowsill. He put his little shoulder against the glass. There was
 just one layer of glass between Bill and the great out-of-doors. Although Trout was in
 the storm window business, he had no storm windows on his own abode.
 "Your second wish is about to come true," said Trout, and he again did something which
 Bill could never have done. He opened the window. But the opening of the window was
 such an alarming business to the parakeet that he flew back to his cage and hopped
 inside.
 Trout closed the door of the cage and latched it. "That's the most intelligent use of
 three wishes I ever heard of," he told the bird. "You made sure you'd still have something
 worth wishing for—to get out of the cage."
 · Trout made the connection between his lone fan letter and the invitation, but he
 couldn't believe that Eliot Rosewater was a grownup. Rosewater's handwriting looked
 like this:
 "Bill," said Trout tentatively, "some' teen-ager named Rosewater got me this job. His
 parents must be friends of the Chairman of the Arts Festival, and they don't know
 anything about books out that way. So when he said I was good, they believed him."
 Trout shook his head. "I'm not going, Bill. I don't want out of my cage. I'm too smart
 for that. Even if I did want out, though, I wouldn't go to Midland City to make a laughing
 stock of myself—and my only fan."
 · He left it at that. But he reread the invitation from time to time, got to know it by heart.
 And then one of the subtler messages on the paper got through to him. It was
 in the letterhead, which displayed two masks intended to represent comedy and
 tragedy:
 One mask looked like this:
 The other one looked like this:
 "They don't want anything but smilers out there," Trout said to his parakeet.
 "Unhappy failures need not apply." But his mind wouldn't leave it alone at that. He got
 an idea which he found very tangy: "But maybe an unhappy failure is exactly what they
 need to see."
 He became energetic after that. "Bill, Bill—" he said, "listen, I'm leaving the cage, but
 I'm coming back. I'm going out there to show them what nobody has ever seen at an
 arts festival before: a representative of all the thousands of artists who devoted their
 entire lives to a search for truth and beauty—and didn't find doodley-squat!"
 · Trout accepted the invitation after all. Two days before the Festival was to begin, he
 delivered Bill into the care of his landlady upstairs, and he hitchhiked to New York
 City—with five hundred dollars pinned to the inside of his underpants. The rest of the
 money he had put in a bank.
 He went to New York first—because he hoped to find some of his books in
 pornography stores there. He had no copies at home. He despised them, but now he
 wanted to read out loud from them in Midland City—as a demonstration of a tragedy
 which was ludicrous as well.
 He planned to tell the people out there what he hoped to have in the way of a
 tombstone.
 This was it:
 Chapter 4
 Dwayne was meanwhile getting crazier all the time. He saw eleven moons in the sky
 over the new Mildred Barry Memorial Center for the Arts one night. The next morning,
 he saw a huge duck directing traffic at the intersection of Arsenal Avenue and Old
 County Road. He didn't tell anybody what he saw. He maintained secrecy.
 And the bad chemicals in his head were fed up with secrecy. They were no longer
 content with making him feel and see queer things. They wanted him to do queer things,
 also, and make a lot of noise.
 They wanted Dwayne Hoover to be proud of his disease.
 · People said later that they were furious with themselves for not noticing the danger
 signals in Dwayne's behavior, for ignoring his obvious cries for help. After Dwayne ran
 amok, the local paper ran a deeply sympathetic editorial about it, begging people to
 watch each other for danger signals. Here was its title:
 A CRY FOR HELP
 But Dwayne wasn't all that weird before he met Kilgore Trout. His behavior in public
 kept him well within the limits of acceptable acts and beliefs and conversations in
 Midland City. The person closest to him, Francine Pefko, his white secretary and
 mistress, said that Dwayne seemed to be getting happier and happier all the time during
 the month before Dwayne went public as a maniac.
 "I kept thinking," she told a newspaper reporter from her hospital bed, "'He is finally
 getting over his wife's suicide.'"
 · Francine worked at Dwayne's principal place of business, which was Dwayne
 Hoover's Exit Eleven Pontiac Village, just off the Interstate, next door to the new Holiday
 Inn.
 Here is what made Francine think he was becoming happier: Dwayne began to sing
 songs which had been popular in his youth, such as "The Old Lamp Lighter," and
 "Tippy-Tippy-Tin," and "Hold Tight," and "Blue Moon," and so on. Dwayne had never
 sung before. Now he did it loudly as he sat at his desk, when he took a customer for a
 ride in a demonstrator, when he watched a mechanic service a car. One day he sang
 loudly as he crossed the lobby of the new Holiday Inn, smiling and gesturing at people
 as though he had been hired to sing for their pleasure. But nobody thought that was
 necessarily a hint of derangement, either—especially since Dwayne owned a piece of
 the Inn.
 A black bus boy and a black waiter discussed this singing. "Listen at him sing," said
 the bus boy.
 "If I owned what he owns, I'd sing, too," the waiter replied.
 · The only person who said out loud that Dwayne was going crazy was Dwayne's white
 sales manager at the Pontiac agency, who was Harry LeSabre. A full week before
 Dwayne went off his rocker, Harry said to Francine Pefko, "Something has come over
 Dwayne. He used to be so charming. I don't find him so charming any more."
 Harry knew Dwayne better than did any other man. He had been with Dwayne for
 twenty years. He came to work for him when the agency was right on the edge of the
 Nigger part of town. A Nigger was a human being who was black.
 "I know him the way a combat soldier knows his buddy," said Harry. "We used to put
 our lives on the line every day, when the agency was down on Jefferson Street. We got
 held up on the average of fourteen times a year. And I tell you that the Dwayne of today
 is a Dwayne I never saw before."
 · It was true about the holdups. That was how Dwayne bought a Pontiac agency so
 cheaply. White people were the only people with money enough to buy new
 automobiles, except for a few black criminals, who always wanted Cadillacs. And white
 people were scared to go anywhere on Jefferson Street any more.
 · Here is where Dwayne got the money to buy the agency: He borrowed it from the
 Midland County National Bank. For collateral, he put up stock he owned in a company
 which was then called The Midland City Ordnance Company. It later became Barrytron,
 Limited. When Dwayne first got the stock, in the depths of the Great Depression, the
 company was called The Robo-Magic Corporation of America.
 The name of the company kept changing through the years because the nature of its
 business changed so much. But its management hung on to the company's original
 motto—for old time's sake. The motto was this:
 GOODBYE, BLUE MONDAY.
 · Listen:
 Harry LeSabre said to Francine, "When a man has been in combat with another man,
 he gets so he can sense the slightest change in his buddy's personality, and Dwayne
 has changed. You ask Vernon Garr."
 Vernon Garr was a white mechanic who was the only other employee who had been
 with Dwayne before Dwayne moved the agency out to the Interstate. As it happened,
 Vernon was having trouble at home. His wife, Mary, was a schizophrenic, so Vernon
 hadn't noticed whether Dwayne had changed or not. Vernon's wife believed that Vernon
 was trying to turn her brains into plutonium.
 · Harry LeSabre was entitled to talk about combat. He had been in actual combat in a
 war. Dwayne hadn't been in combat. He was a civilian employee of the United States
 Army Air Corps during the Second World War, though. One time he got to paint a
 message on a five-hundred-pound bomb which was going to be dropped on Hamburg,
 Germany. This was it:
 · "Harry," said Francine, "everybody is entitled to a few bad days. Dwayne has fewer
 than anybody I know, so when he does have one like today, some people are hurt and
 surprised. They shouldn't be. He's human like anybody else."
 "But why should he single out me?" Harry wanted to know. He was right: Dwayne
 had singled him out for astonishing insults and abuse that day. Everybody else still
 found Dwayne nothing but charming.
 Later on, of course, Dwayne would assault all sorts of people, even three strangers
 from Erie, Pennsylvania,
 who had never been to Midland City before. But Harry was an isolated victim now.
 · "Why me?" said Harry. This was a common question in Midland City. People were
 always asking that as they were loaded into ambulances after accidents of various
 kinds, or arrested for disorderly conduct, or burglarized, or socked in the nose and so
 on: "Why me?"
 "Probably because he felt that you were man enough and friend enough to put up
 with him on one of his few bad days," said Francine.
 "How would you like it if he insulted your clothes?" said Harry. This is what Dwayne
 had done to him: insulted his clothes.
 "I would remember that he was the best employer in town," said Francine. This was
 true. Dwayne paid high wages. He had profit-sharing and Christmas bonuses at the end
 of every year. He was the first automobile dealer in his part of the State to offer his
 employees Blue Cross-Blue Shield, which was health insurance. He had a retirement
 plan which was superior to every retirement plan in the city with the exception of the one
 at Barrytron. His office door was always open to any employee who had troubles to
 discuss, whether they had to do with the automobile business or not.
 For instance, on the day he insulted Harry's clothing, he also spent two hours with
 Vernon Garr, discussing the hallucinations Vernon's wife was having. "She sees things
 that aren't there," said Vernon.
 "She needs rest, Vern," said Dwayne.
 "Maybe I'm going crazy, too," said Vernon. "Christ, I go home and I talk for hours to
 my fucking dog."
 "That makes two of us," said Dwayne.
 · Here is the scene between Harry and Dwayne which upset Harry so much:
 Harry went into Dwayne's office right after Vernon left. He expected no trouble,
 because he had never had any serious trouble with Dwayne.
 "How's my old combat buddy today?" he said to Dwayne. 1
 "As good as can be expected," said Dwayne. "Anything special bothering you?"
 "No," said Harry.
 "Vern's wife thinks Vern is trying to turn her brains into plutonium," said Dwayne.
 "What's plutonium?" said Harry, and so on. They rambled along, and Harry made up
 a problem for himself just to keep the conversation lively. He said he was sad sometimes
 that he had no children. "But I'm glad in a way, too," he went on. "I mean, why
 should I contribute to overpopulation?"
 Dwayne didn't say anything.
 "Maybe we should have adopted one," said Harry, 'Taut it's too late now. And the old
 lady and me—we have a good time just horsing around with ourselves. What do we
 need a kid for?"
 It was after the mention of adoption that Dwayne blew up. He himself had been
 adopted—by a couple who had moved to Midland City from West Virginia in order to
 make big money as factory workers in the First World War. Dwayne's real mother was a
 spinster school teacher who wrote sentimental poetry and claimed to be descended
 from Richard the Lion-Hearted, who was a king. His real father was an itinerant
 typesetter, who seduced his mother by setting her poems in type. He didn't sneak them
 into a newspaper or anything. It was enough for her that they were set in type.
 She was a defective child-bearing machine. She destroyed herself automatically
 while giving birth to Dwayne. The printer disappeared. He was a disappearing machine.
 · It may be that the subject of adoption caused an unfortunate chemical reaction in
 Dwayne's head. At any rate, Dwayne suddenly snarled this at Harry: "Harry, why don't
 you get a bunch of cotton waste from Vern Garr, soak it in Blue Sunoco, and burn up
 your fucking wardrobe? You make me feel like I'm at Watson Brothers." Watson
 Brothers was the name of the funeral parlor for white people who were at least
 moderately well-to-do. Blue Sunoco was a brand of gasoline.
 Harry was startled, and then pain set in. Dwayne had never said anything about his
 clothes in all the years he'd known him. The clothes were conservative and neat, in
 Harry's opinion. His shirts were white. His ties were black or navy blue. His suits were
 gray or dark blue. His shoes and socks were black.
 "Listen, Harry," said Dwayne, and his expression was mean, "Hawaiian Week is
 coming up, and I'm absolutely serious: burn your clothes and get new ones, or apply for
 work at Watson Brothers. Have yourself embalmed while you're at it."
 · Harry couldn't do anything but let his mouth hang open. The Hawaiian Week Dwayne
 had mentioned was a sales promotion scheme which involved making the agency look
 as much like the Hawaiian Islands as possible. People who bought new or used cars, or
 had repairs done in excess of five hundred dollars during the week would be entered
 automatically in a lottery. Three lucky people would each win a free, all-expenses-paid
 trip to Las Vegas and San Francisco and then Hawaii for a party of two. 1
 "I don't mind that you have the name of a Buick, Harry, when you're supposed to be
 selling Pontiacs—" Dwayne went on. He was referring to the fact that the Buick division
 of General Motors put out a model called the Le Sabre. "You can't help that." Dwayne
 now patted the top of his desk softly. This was somehow more menacing than if he had
 pounded the desk with his fist. "But there are a hell of a lot of things you can change,
 Harry. There's a long weekend coming up. I expect to see some big changes in you
 when I come to work on Tuesday morning."
 The weekend was extra-long because the coming Monday was a national holiday,
 Veterans' Day. It was in honor of people who had served their country in uniform.
 · "When we started selling Pontiacs, Harry," said Dwayne, "the car was sensible
 transportation for school teachers and grandmothers and maiden aunts." This was true.
 "Perhaps you haven't noticed, Harry, but the Pontiac has now become a glamorous,
 youthful adventure for people who want a kick out of life! And you dress and act like this
 was a mortuary! Look at yourself in a mirror, Harry, and ask yourself, Who could ever
 associate a man like this with a Pontiac?'"
 Harry LeSabre was too choked up to point out to Dwayne that, no matter what he
 looked like, he was generally acknowledged to be one of the most effective sales
 managers for Pontiac not only in the State, but in the entire Middle West. Pontiac was
 the best-selling automobile in the Midland City area, despite the fact that it was not a
 low-price car. It was a medium-price car.
 · Dwayne Hoover told poor Harry LeSabre that the Hawaiian Festival, only a long
 weekend away, was Harry's golden opportunity to loosen up, to have some fun, to encourage
 other people to have some fun, too.
 "Harry," said Dwayne. "I have some news for you: modern science has given us a
 whole lot of wonderful new colors, with strange, exciting names like red!, orange!,
 green!, and pink!, Harry. We're not stuck any more with just black, gray and white! Isn't
 that good news, Harry? And the State Legislature has just announced that it is no longer
 a crime to smile during working hours, Harry, and I have the personal promise of the
 Governor that never again will anybody be sent to the Sexual Offenders' Wing of the
 Adult Correctional Institution for telling a joke!"
 · Harry LeSabre might have weathered all this with only minor damage, if only Harry
 hadn't been a secret transvestite. On weekends he liked to dress up in women's
 clothing, and not drab clothing, either. Harry and his wife would pull down the window
 blinds, and Harry would turn into a bird of paradise.
 Nobody but Harry's wife knew his secret.
 When Dwayne razzed him about the clothes he wore to work, and then mentioned
 the Sexual Offenders' Wing of the Adult Correctional Institution at Shepherdstown,
 Harry had to suspect that his secret was out. And it wasn't merely a comical secret,
 either. Harry could be arrested for what he did on weekends. He could be fined up to
 three thousand dollars and sentenced to as much as five years at hard labor in the
 Sexual Offenders' Wing of the Adult Correctional Institution at Shepherdstown.
 · So poor Harry spent a wretched Veterans' Day weekend after that. But Dwayne spent
 a worse one.
 Here is what the last night of that weekend was like for Dwayne: his bad chemicals
 rolled him out of bed. They made him dress as though there were some sort of
 emergency with which he had to deal. This was in the wee hours. Veterans' Day had
 ended at the stroke of twelve.
 Dwayne's bad chemicals made him take a loaded thirty-eight caliber revolver from
 under his pillow and stick it in his mouth. This was a tool whose only purpose was to
 make holes in human beings. It looked like this:
 In Dwayne's part of the planet, anybody who wanted one could get one down at his
 local hardware store. Policemen all had them. So did the criminals. So did the people
 caught in between.
 Criminals would point guns at people and say, "Give me all your money," and the
 people usually would. And policemen would point their guns at criminals and say, "Stop"
 or whatever the situation called for, and the criminals usually would. Sometimes they
 wouldn't. Sometimes a wife would get so mad at her husband that she would put a hole
 in him with a gun. Sometimes a husband would get so mad at his wife that he would put
 a hole in her. And so on.
 In the same week Dwayne Hoover ran amok, a fourteen-year-old Midland City boy
 put holes in his mother and father because he didn't want to show them the bad report
 card he had brought home. His lawyer planned to enter a plea of temporary insanity,
 which meant that at the time of the shooting the boy was unable to distinguish the
 difference between right and wrong.
 · Sometimes people would put holes in famous people so they could be at least fairly
 famous, too. Sometimes people would get on airplanes which were supposed to fly to
 someplace, and they would offer to put holes in the pilot and co-pilot unless they flew
 the airplane to someplace else.
 · Dwayne held the muzzle of his gun in his mouth for a while. He tasted oil. The gun
 was loaded and cocked. There were neat little metal packages containing charcoal,
 potassium nitrate and sulphur only inches from his brains. He had only to trip a lever,
 and the powder would turn to gas. The gas would blow a chunk of lead down a tube and
 through Dwayne's brains.
 But Dwayne elected to shoot up one of his tiled bathrooms instead. He put chunks of
 lead through his toilet and a washbasin and a bathtub enclosure. There was a picture of
 a flamingo sandblasted on the glass of the bathtub enclosure. It looked like this:
 Dwayne shot the flamingo.
 He snarled at his recollection of it afterwards. Here is what he snarled: "Dumb fucking
 bird."
 · Nobody heard the shots. All the houses in the neighborhood were too well insulated
 for sound ever to get in or out. A sound wanting in or out of Dwayne's dream-house, for
 instance, had to go through an inch and a half of plasterboard, a polystyrene vapor
 barrier, a sheet of aluminum foil, a three-inch airspace, another sheet of aluminum foil, a
 three-inch blanket of glass wool, another sheet of aluminum foil, one inch of insulating
 board made of pressed sawdust, tarpaper, one inch of wood sheathing, more tarpaper,
 and then aluminum siding which was hollow. The space in the siding was filled with a
 miracle insulating material developed for use on rockets to the Moon.
 · Dwayne turned on the floodlights around his house, and he played basketball on the
 blacktop apron outside his five-car garage.
 Dwayne's dog Sparky hid in the basement when Dwayne shot up the bathroom. But
 he came out now. Sparky watched Dwayne play basketball.
 "You and me, Sparky," said Dwayne. And so on. He sure loved that dog.
 Nobody saw him playing basketball. He was screened from his neighbors by trees
 and shrubs and a high cedar fence.
 · He put the basketball away, and he climbed into a black Plymouth Fury he had taken
 in trade the day before. The Plymouth was a Chrysler product, and Dwayne himself sold
 General Motors products. He had decided to drive the Plymouth for a day or two in
 order to keep abreast of the competition.
 As he backed out of his driveway, he thought it important to explain to his neighbors
 why he was in a Plymouth Fury, so he yelled out the window: "Keeping abreast of the
 competition!" He blew his horn.
 · Dwayne zoomed down Old County Road and onto the Interstate, which he had all to
 himself. He swerved into Exit Ten at a high rate of speed, slammed into a guardrail,
 spun around and around. He came out onto Union Avenue going backwards, jumped a
 curb, and came to a stop in a vacant lot. Dwayne owned the lot.
 Nobody saw or heard anything. Nobody lived in the area. A policeman was supposed
 to cruise by about once every hour or so, but he was cooping in an alley behind a
 Western Electric warehouse about two miles away. Cooping was police slang for
 sleeping on the job.
 · Dwayne stayed in his vacant lot for a while. He played the radio. All the Midland City
 stations were asleep for the night, but Dwayne picked up a country music station in
 West Virginia, which offered him ten different kinds of flowering shrubs and five fruit
 trees for six dollars, C.O.D.
 "Sounds good to me," said Dwayne. He meant it. Almost all the messages which
 were sent and received in his country, even the telepathic ones, had to do with buying
 or selling some damn thing. They were like lullabies to Dwayne.
 Chapter 5
 While Dwayne Hoover listened to West Virginia, Kilgore Trout tried to fall asleep in a
 movie theater in New York City. It was much cheaper than a night in a hotel. Trout had
 never done it before, but he knew sleeping in movie houses was the sort of thing really
 dirty old men did. He wished to arrive in Midland City as the dirtiest of all old men. He
 was supposed to take part in a symposium out there entitled "The Future of the
 American Novel in the Age of McLuhan." He wished to say at that symposium, "I don't
 know who McLuhan is, but I know what it's like to spend the night with a lot of other dirty
 old men in a movie theater in New York City. Could we talk about that?"
 He wished to say, too, "Does this McLuhan, whoever he is, have anything to say
 about the relationship between wide-open beavers and the sales of books?"
 · Trout had come down from Cohoes late that afternoon. He had since visited many
 pornography shops and a shirt store. He had bought two of his own books, Plague on
 Wheels and Now It Can Be Told, a magazine containing a short story of his, and a
 tuxedo shirt. The name of the magazine was Black Garterbelt. The tuxedo shirt had a
 cascade of ruffles down its bosom. On the shirt salesman's advice, Trout had also
 bought a packaged ensemble consisting of a cumberbund, a boutonniere, and a bow
 tie. They were all the color of tangerines.
 These goodies were all in his lap, along with a crackling brown paper parcel
 containing his tuxedo, six new pairs of jockey shorts, six new pairs of socks, his razor
 and a new toothbrush. Trout hadn't owned a toothbrush for years.
 · The jackets of Plague on Wheels and Now It Can Be Told both promised plenty of
 wide-open beavers inside. The picture on the cover of Now It Can Be Told, which was
 the book which would turn Dwayne Hoover into a homocidal maniac, showed a college
 professor being undressed by a group of naked sorority girls. A library tower could be
 seen through a window in the sorority house. It was daytime outside, and there was a
 clock in the tower. The clock looked like this:
 The professor was stripped down to his candy-striped underwear shorts and his
 socks and garters and his mortarboard, which was a hat which looked like this:
 There was absolutely nothing about a professor or a sorority or a university anywhere
 in the body of the book.
 The book was in the form of a long letter from the Creator of the Universe to the only
 creature in the Universe who had free will.
 · As for the story in Black Garterbelt magazine: Trout had no idea that it had been
 accepted for publication. It had been accepted years ago, apparently, for the date on
 the magazine was April, 1962. Trout found it by chance in a bin of tame old magazines
 near the front of the store. They were underpants magazines.
 When he bought the magazine, the cashier supposed Trout was drunk or feebleminded.
 All he was getting, the cashier thought, was pictures of women in their underpants.
 Their legs were apart, all right, but they had on underpants, so they were
 certainly no competition for the wide-open beavers on sale in the back of the store.
 "I hope you enjoy it," said the cashier to Trout. He meant that he hoped Trout would
 find some pictures he could masturbate to, since that was the only point of all the books
 and magazines.
 It's for an arts festival," said Trout.
 · As for the story itself, it was entitled "The Dancing Fool." Like so many Trout stories, it
 was about a tragic failure to communicate.
 Here was the plot: A flying saucer creature named Zog arrived on Earth to explain
 how wars could be prevented and how cancer could be cured. He brought the
 information from Margo, a planet where the natives conversed by means of farts and
 tap dancing.
 Zog landed at night in Connecticut. He had no sooner touched down than he saw a
 house on fire. He rushed into the house, farting and tap dancing, warning the people
 about the terrible danger they were in. The head of the house brained Zog with a
 golfclub.
 · The movie theater where Trout sat with all his parcels in his lap showed nothing but
 dirty movies. The music was soothing. Phantasms of a young man and a young woman
 sucked harmlessly on one another's soft apertures on the silver screen.
 And Trout made up a new novel while he sat there. It was about an Earthling
 astronaut who arrived on a planet where all the animal and plant life had been killed by
 pollution, except for humanoids. The humanoids ate food made from petroleum and
 coal.
 They gave a feast for the astronaut, whose name was Don. The food was terrible.
 The big topic of conversation was censorship. The cities were blighted with motion picture
 theaters which showed nothing but dirty movies. The humanoids wished they could
 put them out of business somehow, but without interfering with free speech.
 They asked Don if dirty movies were a problem on Earth, too, and Don said, "Yes."
 They asked him if the movies were really dirty, and Don replied, "As dirty as movies
 could get."
 This was a challenge to the humanoids, who were sure then: dirty movies could beat
 anything on Earth. So everybody piled into air-cushion vehicles, and they floated to a
 dirty movie house downtown.
 It was intermission time when they got there, so Don had some time to think about
 what could possibly be dirtier than what he had already seen on Earth. He became
 sexually excited even before the house lights went down. The women in his party
 were all twittery and squirmy.
 So the theater went dark and the curtains opened. At first there wasn't any picture.
 There were slurps and moans from loudspeakers. Then the picture itself appeared. It
 was a high quality film of a male humanoid eating what looked like a pear. The camera
 zoomed in on his lips and tongue and teeth, which glistened with saliva. He took his
 time about eating the pear. When the last of it had disappeared into his slurpy mouth,
 the camera focussed on his Adam's apple. His Adam's apple bobbed obscenely. He
 belched contentedly, and then these words appeared on the screen, but in the language
 of the planet:
 THE END
 · It was all faked, of course. There weren't any pears anymore. And the eating of a
 pear wasn't the main event of the evening anyway. It was a short subject, which gave
 the members of the audience time to settle down.
 Then the main feature began. It was about a male and a female and their two
 children, and their dog and their cat. They ate steadily for an hour and a half—soup,
 meat, biscuits, butter, vegetables, mashed potatoes and gravy, fruit, candy, cake, pie.
 The camera rarely strayed more than a foot from their glistening lips and their bobbing
 Adam's apples. And then the father put the cat and dog on the table, so they could take
 part in the orgy, too.
 After a while, the actors couldn't eat any more. They were so stuffed that they were
 goggle-eyed. They could hardly move. They said they didn't think they could eat again
 for a week, and so on. They cleared the table slowly. They went waddling out into the
 kitchen, and they dumped about thirty pounds of leftovers into a garbage can.
 The audience went wild.
 · When Don and his friends left the theater, they were accosted by humanoid whores,
 who offered them eggs and oranges and milk and butter and peanuts and so on. The
 whores couldn't actually deliver these goodies, of course.
 The humanoids told Don that if he went home with a whore, she would cook him a
 meal of petroleum and coal products at fancy prices.
 And then, while he ate them, she would talk dirty about how fresh and full of natural
 juices the food was, even though the food was fake.
 Chapter 6
 Dwayne Hoover sat in the used Plymouth Fury in his own vacant lot for an hour,
 listening to West Virginia. He was told about health insurance for pennies a day, about
 how to get better performance from his car. He was told what to do about constipation.
 He was offered a Bible which had everything that God or Jesus had actually said out
 loud printed in red capital letters. He was offered a plant which would attract and eat
 disease-carrying insects in his home.
 All this was stored away in Dwayne's memory, in case he should need it later on. He
 had all kinds of stuff in there.
 · While Dwayne sat there so alone, the oldest inhabitant of Midland City was dying in
 the County Hospital, at the foot of Fairchild Boulevard, which was nine miles away. She
 was Mary Young. She was one hundred and eight years old. She was black. Mary
 Young's parents had been human slaves in Kentucky.
 There was a tiny connection between Mary Young and Dwayne Hoover. She did the
 laundry for Dwayne's family for a few months, back when Dwayne was a little boy. She
 told Bible stories and stories about slavery to little Dwayne. She told him about a public
 hanging of a white man she had seen in Cincinnati, when she was a little girl.
 · A black intern at the County Hospital now watched Mary Young die of pneumonia.
 The intern did not know her. He had been in Midland City for only a week. He wasn't
 even a fellow-American, although he had taken his medical degree at Harvard. He was
 an Indaro. He was a Nigerian. His name was Cyprian Ukwende. He felt no kinship with
 Mary or with any American blacks. He felt kinship only with Indaros.
 As she died, Mary was as alone on the planet as were Dwayne Hoover or Kilgore
 Trout. She had never reproduced. There were no friends or relatives to watch her die.
 So she spoke her very last words on the planet to Cyprian Ukwende. She did not have
 enough breath left to make her vocal chords buzz. She could only move her lips
 noiselessly.
 Here is all she had to say about death: "Oh my, oh my."
 · Like all Earthlings at the point of death, Mary Young sent faint reminders of herself to
 those who had known her. She released a small cloud of telepathic butterflies, and one
 of these brushed the cheek of Dwayne Hoover, nine miles away.
 Dwayne heard a tired voice from somewhere behind his head, even though no one
 was back there. It said this to Dwayne: "Oh my, oh my."
 · Dwayne's bad chemicals now made him put his car in gear. He drove out of the
 vacant lot, proceeded sedately down Union Avenue, which paralleled the Interstate.
 He went past his principal place of business, which was Dwayne Hoover's Exit
 Eleven Pontiac Village, and he turned into the parking lot of the new Holiday Inn next
 door. Dwayne owned a third of the Inn—in partnership with Midland City's leading
 orthodontist, Dr. Alfred Maritimo, and Bill Miller, who was Chairman of the Parole Board
 at the Adult Correctional Institution at Shepherdstown, among other things.
 Dwayne went up the Inn's back steps to the roof without meeting anybody. There
 was a full moon. There were two full moons. The new Mildred Barry Memorial Center for
 the Arts was a translucent sphere on stilts, and it was illuminated from the inside now—
 and it looked like a moon.
 · Dwayne gazed over the sleeping city. He had been born there. He had spent the first
 three years of his life in an orphanage only two miles from where he stood. He had been
 adopted and educated there.
 He owned not only the Pontiac agency and a piece of the new Holiday Inn. He owned
 three Burger Chefs, too, and five coin-operated car washes, and pieces of the Sugar
 Creek Drive-In Theatre, Radio Station WMCY, the Three Maples Par-Three Golf
 Course, and seventeen hundred shares of common stock in Barrytron, Limited, a local
 electronics firm. He owned dozens of vacant lots. He was on the Board of Directors of
 the Midland County National Bank.
 But now Midland City looked unfamiliar and frightening to Dwayne. "Where am I?" he
 said.
 He even forgot that his wife Celia had committed suicide, for instance, by eating
 Drano—a mixture of sodium hydroxide and aluminum flakes, which was meant to clear
 drains. Celia became a small volcano, since she was composed of the same sorts of
 substances which commonly clogged drains.
 Dwayne even forgot that his only child, a son, had grown up to be a notorious
 homosexual. His name was George, but everybody called him "Bunny." He played
 piano in the cocktail lounge of the new Holiday Inn.
 "Where am I?" said Dwayne.
 Chapter 7
 Kilgore Trout took a leak in the men's room of the New York City movie house. There
 was a sign on the wall next to the roller towel. It advertised a massage parlor called The
 Sultans Harem. Massage parlors were something new and exciting in New York. Men
 could go in there and photograph naked women, or they could paint the women's naked
 bodies with water-soluble paints. Men could be rubbed all over by a woman until their
 penises squirted jism into Turkish towels.
 "It's a full life and a merry one," said Kilgore Trout.
 There was a message written in pencil on the tiles by the roller towel. This was it:
 Trout plundered his pockets for a pen or pencil. He had an answer to the question.
 But he had nothing to write with, not even a burnt match. So he left the question
 unanswered, but here is what he would have written, if he had found anything to write
 with:
 To be
 the eyes
 and ears
 and conscience
 of the Creator of the Universe,
 you fool.
 · When Trout headed back for his seat in the theater, he played at being the eyes and
 ears and conscience of the Creator of the Universe. He sent messages by telepathy to
 the Creator, wherever He was. He reported that the men's room had been clean as a
 whistle. "The carpeting under my feet," he signaled from the lobby, "is springy and new.
 I think it must be some miracle fiber. It's blue. You know what I mean by blue?" And so
 on.
 When he got to the auditorium itself, the house lights were on. Nobody was there but
 the manager, who was also the ticket-taker and the bouncer and the janitor. He was
 sweeping filth from between the seats. He was a middle-aged white man. "No more fun
 tonight, grandfather," he said to Trout. "Time to go home."
 Trout didn't protest. Neither did he leave immediately. He examined a green
 enameled steel box in the back of the auditorium. It contained the projector and the
 sound system and the films. There was a wire that led from the box to a plug in the wall.
 There was a hole in the front of the box. That was how the pictures got out. On the side
 of the box was a simple switch. It looked like this:
 · It intrigued Trout to know that he had only to flick the switch, and the people would
 start fucking and sucking again.
 "Good night, Grandfather," said the manager pointedly.
 Trout took his leave of the machine reluctantly. He said this about it to the manager:
 "It fills such a need, this machine, and it's so easy to operate."
 · As Trout departed, he sent this telepathic message to the Creator of the Universe,
 serving as His eyes and ears and conscience: "Am headed for Forty-second Street now.
 How much do you already know about Forty-second Street?"
 Chapter 8
 Trout wandered out onto the sidewalk of Forty-second Street. It was a dangerous
 place to be. The whole city was dangerous—because of chemicals and the uneven distribution
 of wealth and so on. A lot of people were like Dwayne: they created chemicals
 in their own bodies which were bad for their heads. But there were thousands upon
 thousands of other people in the city who bought bad chemicals and ate them or sniffed
 them—or injected them into their veins with devices which looked like this:
 Sometimes they even stuffed bad chemicals up their assholes. Their assholes looked
 like this:
 · People took such awful chances with chemicals and their bodies because they
 wanted the quality of their lives to improve. They lived in ugly places where there were
 only ugly things to do. They didn't own doodley-squat, so they couldn't improve their
 surroundings. So they did their best to make their insides beautiful instead.
 The results had been catastrophic so far—suicide, theft, murder, and insanity and so
 on. But new chemicals were coming onto the market all the time. Twenty feet away from
 Trout there on Forty-second Street, a fourteen-year-old white boy lay unconscious in the
 doorway of a pornography store. He had swallowed a half pint of a new type of paint
 remover which had gone on sale for the first time only the day before. He had also
 swallowed two pills which were intended to prevent contagious abortion in cattle, which
 was called Bang's disease.
 · Trout was petrified there on Forty-second Street. I had given him a life not worth
 living, but I had also given him an iron will to live. This was a common combination on
 the planet Earth.
 The theater manager came out and locked the door behind him.
 And two young black prostitutes materialized from nowhere. They asked Trout and
 the manager if they would like to have some fun. They were cheerful and unafraid—
 because of a tube of Norwegian hemorrhoid remedy which they had eaten about half an
 hour before. The manufacturer had never intended the stuff to be eaten. People were
 supposed to squirt it up their assholes.
 These were country girls. They had grown up in the rural south of the nation, where
 their ancestors had been used as agricultural machinery. The white farmers down there
 weren't using machines made out of meat anymore, though, because machines made
 out of metal were cheaper and more reliable, and required simpler homes.
 So the black machines had to get out of there, or starve to death. They came to cities
 because everyplace else had signs like this on the fences and trees:
 · Kilgore Trout once wrote a story called "This Means You." It was set in the Hawaiian
 Islands, the place where the lucky winners of Dwayne Hoover's contest in Midland City
 were supposed to go. Every bit of land on the islands was owned by only about forty
 people, and, in the story, Trout had those people decide to exercise their property rights
 to the full. They put up no trespassing signs on everything.
 This created terrible problems for the million other people on the islands. The law of
 gravity required that they stick somewhere on the surface. Either that, or they could go
 out into the water and bob offshore.
 But then the Federal Government came through with an emergency program. It gave
 a big balloon full of helium to every man, woman and child who didn't own property.
 · There was a cable with a harness on it dangling from each balloon. With the help of
 the balloons, Hawaiians could go on inhabiting the islands without always sticking to
 things other people owned.
 · The prostitutes worked for a pimp now. He was splendid and cruel. He was a god to
 them. He took their free will away from them, which was perfectly all right. They didn't
 want it anyway. It was as though they had surrendered themselves to Jesus, for
 instance, so they could live unselfishly and trustingly—except that they had surrendered
 to a pimp instead.
 Their childhoods were over. They were dying now. Earth was a tinhorn planet as far
 as they were concerned.
 When Trout and the theater manager, two tinhorns, said they didn't want any tinhorn
 fun, the dying children sauntered off, their feet sticking to the planet, coming unstuck,
 then sticking again. They disappeared around a corner. Trout, the eyes and ears of the
 Creator of the Universe, sneezed.
 · God bless you," said the manager. This was a fully automatic response many
 Americans had to hearing a person sneeze.
 Thank you," said Trout. Thus a temporary friendship was formed.
 Trout said he hoped to get safely to a cheap hotel. The manager said he hoped to
 get to the subway station on Times Square. So they walked together, encouraged by
 the echoes of their footsteps from the building facades.
 The manager told Trout a little about what the planet looked like to him. It was a
 place where he had a wife and two kids, he said. They didn't know he ran a theater
 which showed blue movies. They thought he was doing consulting work as an engineer
 so late at night. He said that the planet didn't have much use for engineers his age
 anymore. It had adored them once.
 "Hard times," said Trout.
 The manager told of being in on the development of a miraculous insulating material,
 which had been used on rocket ships to the Moon. This was, in fact, the same material
 which gave the aluminum siding of Dwayne Hoover's dreamhouse in Midland City its
 miraculous insulating qualities.
 The manager reminded Trout of what the first man to set foot on the Moon had said:
 "One small step for man, one great leap for mankind.''
 "Thrilling words," said Trout. He looked over his shoulder, perceived that they were
 being followed by a white Oldsmobile Toronado with a black vinyl roof. This four
 hundred horsepower, front-wheel drive vehicle was burbling along at about three miles
 an hour, ten feet behind them and close to the curb.
 That was the last thing Trout remembered—seeing the Oldsmobile back there.
 · The next thing he knew, he was on his hands and knees on a handball court
 underneath the Queensboro Bridge at Fifty-ninth Street, with the East River nearby. His
 trousers and underpants were around his ankles. His money was gone. His parcels
 were scattered around him —the tuxedo, the new shirt, the books. Blood seeped from
 one ear.
 The police caught him in the act of pulling up his trousers. They dazzled him with a
 spotlight as he leaned against the backboard of the handball court and fumbled foolishly
 with his belt and the buttons on his fly. The police supposed that they had caught him
 committing some public nuisance, had caught him working with an old man's limited
 palette of excrement and alcohol.
 He wasn't quite penniless. There was a ten-dollar bill in the watch pocket of his
 pants.
 · It was determined at a hospital that Trout was not seriously hurt. He was taken to a
 police station, where he was questioned. All he could say was that he had been
 kidnapped by pure evil in a white Oldsmobile. The police wanted to know how many
 people were in the car, their ages, their sexes, the colors of their skins, their manners of
 speech.
 "For all I know, they may not even have been Earth-lings,'' said Trout. 'For all I know,
 that car may have been occupied by an intelligent gas from Pluto."
 · Trout said this so innocently, but his comment turned out to be the first germ in an
 epidemic of mind-poisoning. Here is how the disease was spread: a reporter wrote a
 story for the New York Post the next day, and he led off with the quotation from Trout.
 The story appeared under this headline:
 PLUTO BANDITS
 KIDNAP PAIR
 Trout's name was given as Kilmer Trotter, incidentally, address unknown. His age
 was given as eighty-two.
 Other papers copied the story, rewrote it some. They all hung onto the joke about
 Pluto, spoke knowingly of The Pluto Gang. And reporters asked police for any new
 information on The Pluto Gang, so police went looking for information on The Pluto
 Gang.
 · So New Yorkers, who had so many nameless terrors, were easily taught to fear
 something seemingly specific —The Pluto Gang. They bought new locks for their doors
 and gratings for their windows, to keep out The Pluto Gang. They stopped going to
 theaters at night, for fear of The Pluto Gang.
 Foreign newspapers spread the terror, ran articles on how persons thinking of visiting
 New York might keep to a certain few streets in Manhattan and stand a fair chance of
 avoiding The Pluto Gang.
 · In one of New York City's many ghettos for dark-skinned people, a group of Puerto
 Rican boys gathered together in the basement of an abandoned building. They were
 small, but they were numerous and volatile. They wished to become frightening, in order
 to defend themselves and their friends and families, something the police wouldn't do.
 They also wanted to drive the drug peddlers out of the neighborhood, and to get
 enough publicity, which was very important, to catch the attention of the Government,
 so that the Government would do a better job of picking up the garbage and so on.
 One of them, Jose Mendoza, was a fairly good painter. So he painted the emblem of
 their new gang on the backs of the members' jackets. This was it:
 Chapter 9
 While Kilgore Trout was inadvertently poisoning the collective mind of New York City,
 Dwayne Hoover, the demented Pontiac dealer, was coming down from the roof of his
 own Holiday Inn in the Middle West.
 Dwayne went into the carpeted lobby of the place not long before sunrise, to ask for
 a room. As queer as the hour was, there was a man ahead of him, and a black one at
 that. This was Cyprian Ukwende, the Indaro, the physician from Nigeria, who was
 staying at the Inn until he could find a suitable apartment.
 Dwayne awaited his turn humbly. He had forgotten that he was a co-owner of the Inn.
 As for staying at a place where black men stayed, Dwayne was philosophical. He
 experienced a sort of bittersweet happiness as he told himself, "Times change. Times
 change."
 · The night clerk was new. He did not know Dwayne. He had Dwayne fill out a
 registration in full. Dwayne, for his part, apologized for not knowing what the number of
 his license plate was. He felt guilty about that, even though he knew he had done
 nothing he should feel guilty about.
 He was elated when the clerk let him have a room key. He had passed the test. And
 he adored his room. It was so new and cool and clean. It was so neutral! It was the
 brother of thousands upon thousands of rooms in Holiday Inns all over the world.
 Dwayne Hoover might be confused as to what his Me was all about, or what he
 should do with it next. But this much he has done correctly: He had delivered himself to
 an irreproachable container for a human being.
 It awaited anybody. It awaited Dwayne.
 Around the toilet seat was a band of paper like this, which he would have to remove
 before he used the toilet:
 This loop of paper guaranteed Dwayne that he need have no fear that corkscrewshaped
 little animals would crawl up his asshole and eat up his wiring. That was one
 less worry for Dwayne.
 · There was a sign hanging on the inside doorknob, which Dwayne now hung on the
 outside doorknob. It looked like this:
 Dwayne pulled open his floor-to-ceiling draperies for a moment. He saw the sign
 which announced the presence of the Inn to weary travelers on the Interstate. Here is
 what it looked like:
 
 He closed his draperies. He adjusted the heating and ventilating system. He slept like
 a lamb.
 A lamb was a young animal which was legendary for sleeping well on the planet
 Earth. It looked like this:
 Chapter 10
 Kilgore Trout was released by the Police Department of the City of New York like a
 weightless thing—at two hours before dawn on the day after Veterans' Day. He crossed
 the island of Manhattan from east to west in the company of Kleenex tissues and
 newspapers and soot.
 He got a ride in a truck. It was hauling seventy-eight thousand pounds of Spanish
 olives. It picked him up at the mouth of the Lincoln Tunnel, which was named in honor
 of a man who had had the courage and imagination to make human slavery against the
 law in the United States of America. This was a recent innovation.
 The slaves were simply turned loose without any property. They were easily
 recognizable. They were black. They were suddenly free to go exploring.
 · The driver, who was white, told Trout that he would have to lie on the floor of the cab
 until they reached open country, since it was against the law for him to pick up
 hitchhikers.
 · It was still dark when he told Trout he could sit up. They were crossing the poisoned
 marshes and meadows of New Jersey. The truck was a General Motors Astro-95 Diesel
 tractor, hooked up to a trailer forty feet long. It was so enormous that it made Trout feel
 that his head was about the size of a piece of bee-bee shot.
 The driver said he used to be a hunter and a fisherman, long ago. It broke his heart
 when he imagined what the marshes and meadows had been like only a hundred years
 before. "And when you think of the shit that most of these factories make—wash day
 products, catfood, pop—"
 · He had a point. The planet was being destroyed by manufacturing processes, and
 what was being manufactured was lousy, by and large.
 Then Trout made a good point, too. "Well," he said, "I used to be a conservationist. I
 used to weep and wail about people shooting bald eagles with automatic shotguns from
 helicopters and all that, but I gave it up. There's a river in Cleveland which is so polluted
 that it catches fire about once a year. That used to make me sick, but I laugh about it
 now. When some tanker accidently dumps its load in the ocean, and kills millions of
 birds and billions of fish, I say, 'More power to Standard Oil,' or whoever it was that
 dumped it." Trout raised his arms in celebration. "'Up your ass with Mobil gas,'" he said.
 The driver was upset by this. "You're kidding," he said.
 "I realized," said Trout, "that God wasn't any conservationist, so for anybody else to
 be one was sacrilegious and a waste of time. You ever see one of His volcanoes or
 tornadoes or tidal waves? Anybody ever tell you about the Ice Ages he arranges for
 every half-million years? How about Dutch Elm disease? There's a nice conservation
 measure for you. That's God, not man. Just about the time we got our rivers cleaned up,
 he'd probably have the whole galaxy go up like a celluloid collar. That's what the Star of
 Bethlehem was, you know."
 "What was the Star of Bethlehem?" said the driver.
 "A whole galaxy going up like a celluloid collar," said Trout.
 · The driver was impressed. "Come to think about it," he said, "I don't think there's
 anything about conservation anywhere in the Bible."
 "Unless you want to count the story about the Flood," said Trout.
 · They rode in silence for a while, and then the driver made another good point. He said
 he knew that his truck was turning the atmosphere into poison gas, and that the planet
 was being turned into pavement so his truck could go anywhere. "So I'm committing
 suicide," he said.
 "Don't worry about it," said Trout.
 "My brother is even worse," the driver went on. "He works in a factory that makes
 chemicals for killing plants and trees in Viet Nam." Viet Nam was a country where
 America was trying to make people stop being communists by dropping things on them
 from airplanes. The chemicals he mentioned were intended to kill all the foliage, so it
 would be harder for communists to hide from airplanes.
 "Don't worry about it," said Trout.
 "In the long run, he's committing suicide," said the driver. "Seems like the only kind of
 job an American can get these days is committing suicide in some way."
 "Good point," said Trout.
 · "I can't tell if you're serious or not," said the driver.
 "I won't know myself until I find out whether life is serious or not," said Trout. "It's
 dangerous, I know, and it can hurt a lot. That doesn't necessarily mean it's serious, too."
 · After Trout became famous, of course, one of the biggest mysteries about him was
 whether he was kidding or not. He told one persistent questioner that he always crossed
 his fingers when he was kidding.
 "And please note," he went on, "that when I gave you that priceless piece of
 information, my fingers were crossed."
 And so on.
 He was a pain in the neck in a lot of ways. The truck driver got sick of him after an
 hour or two. Trout used the silence to make up an anticonservation story he called
 "Gilgongo!"
 "Gilgongo!" was about a planet which was unpleasant because there was too much
 creation going on.
 The story began with a big party in honor of a man who had wiped out an entire
 species of darling little panda bears. He had devoted his life to this. Special plates were
 made for the party, and the guests got to take them home as souvenirs. There was a
 picture of a little bear on each one, and the date of the party. Underneath the picture
 was the word:
 GILGONGO!
 In the language of the planet, that meant "Extinct!"
 · People were glad that the bears were gilgongo, because there were too many species
 on the planet already, and new ones were coming into being almost every hour. There
 was no way anybody could prepare for the bewildering diversity of creatures and plants
 he was likely to encounter.
 The people were doing their best to cut down on the number of species, so that life
 could be more predictable. But Nature was too creative for them. All life on the planet
 was suffocated at last by a living blanket one hundred feet thick. The blanket was
 composed of passenger pigeons and eagles and Bermuda Erns and whooping cranes.
 · "At least it's olives," the driver said. "What?" said Trout.
 "Lots worse things we could be hauling than olives." "Right," said Trout. He had
 forgotten that the main thing they were doing was moving seventy-eight thousand
 pounds of olives to Tulsa, Oklahoma.
 · The driver talked about politics some.
 Trout couldn't tell one politician from another one. They were all formlessly
 enthusiastic chimpanzees to him. He wrote a story one time about an optimistic chimpanzee
 who became President of the United States. He called it "Hail to the Chief."
 The chimpanzee wore a little blue blazer with brass buttons, and with the seal of the
 President of the United States sewed to the breast pocket. It looked like this:
 Everywhere he went, bands would play "Hail to the Chief." The chimpanzee loved it.
 He would bounce up and down.
 · They stopped at a diner. Here is what the sign in front of the diner said:
 So they ate.
 Trout spotted an idiot who was eating, too. The idiot was a white male adult—in the
 care of a white female nurse. The idiot couldn't talk much, and he had a lot of trouble
 feeding himself. The nurse put a bib around his neck.
 But he certainly had a wonderful appetite. Trout watched him shovel waffles and pork
 sausage into his mouth, watched him guzzle orange juice and milk. Trout marveled at
 what a big animal the idiot was. The idiot's happiness was fascinating, too, as he stoked
 himself with calories which would get him through yet another day.
 Trout said this to himself: "Stoking up for another day."
 · "Excuse me," said the truck driver to Trout, "I've got to take a leak."
 Kurt Vonnegut, Jr.
 "Back where I come from," said Trout, "that means you're going to steal a mirror. We
 call mirrors leaks."
 "I never heard that before," said the driver. He repeated the word: "Leaks." He
 pointed to a mirror on a cigarette machine. "You call that a leak?"
 "Doesn't it look like a leak to you?" said Trout.
 "No," said the driver. "Where did you say you were from?"
 "I was born in Bermuda," said Trout.
 About a week later, the driver would tell his wife that mirrors were called leaks in
 Bermuda, and she would tell her friends.
 · When Trout followed the driver back to the truck, he took his first good look at their
 form of transportation from a distance, saw it whole. There was a message written on
 the side of it in bright orange letters which were eight feet high. This was it:
 Trout wondered what a child who was just learning to read would make of a message
 like that. The child would suppose that the message was terrifically important, since
 somebody had gone to the trouble of writing it in letters so big.
 And then, pretending to be a child by the roadside, he read the message on the side
 of another truck. This was it:
 Chapter 11
 Dwayne Hoover slept until ten at the new Holiday Inn. He was much refreshed. He
 had a Number Five Breakfast in the popular restaurant of the Inn, which was the TallyHo
 Room. The drapes were drawn at night. They were wide open now. They let the
 sunshine in.
 At the next table, also alone, was Cyprian Ukwende, the Indaro, the Nigerian. He was
 reading the classified ads in the Midland City Bugle-Observer. He needed a cheap
 place to live. The Midland County General Hospital was footing his bills at the Inn while
 he looked around, and they were getting restless about that.
 He needed a woman, too, or a bunch of women who would fuck him hundreds of
 times a week, because he was so full of lust and jism all the time. And he ached to
 be with his Indaro relatives. Back home, he had six hundred relatives he knew by name.
 Ukwende's face was impassive as he ordered the Number Three Breakfast with
 whole-wheat toast. Behind his mask was a young man in the terminal stages of
 nostalgia and lover's nuts.
 · Dwayne Hoover, six feet away, gazed out at the busy, sunny Interstate Highway. He
 knew where he was. There was a familiar moat between the parking lot of the Inn and
 the Interstate, a concrete trough which the engineers had built to contain Sugar Creek.
 Next came a familiar resilient steel barrier which prevented cars and trucks from
 tumbling into Sugar Creek. Next came the three familiar west-bound lanes, and then the
 familiar grassy median divider. After that came the three familiar east-bound lanes, and
 then another familiar steel barrier. After that came the familiar Will Fairchild Memorial
 Airport— and then the familiar farmlands beyond.
 · It was certainly flat out there—flat city, flat township, flat county, flat state. When
 Dwayne was a little boy, he had supposed that almost everybody lived in places that
 were treeless and flat. He imagined that oceans and mountains and forests were mainly
 sequestered in state and national parks. In the third grade, little Dwayne scrawled an
 essay which argued in favor of creating a national park at a bend in Sugar Creek, the
 only significant surface water within eight miles of Midland City.
 Dwayne said the name of that familiar surface water to himself now, silently: "Sugar
 Creek."
 · Sugar Creek was only two inches deep and fifty yards wide at the bend, where little
 Dwayne thought the park should be. Now they had put the Mildred Barry Memorial
 Center for the Arts there instead. It was beautiful.
 Dwayne fiddled with his lapel for a moment, felt a badge pinned there. He unpinned
 it, having no recollection of what it said. It was a boost for the Arts Festival, which would
 begin that evening. All over town people were wearing badges like Dwayne's. Here is
 what the badges said:
 · Sugar Creek flooded now and then. Dwayne remembered about that. In a land so flat,
 flooding was a queerly pretty thing for water to do. Sugar Creek brimmed over silently,
 formed a vast mirror in which children might safely play.
 The mirror showed the citizens the shape of the valley they lived in, demonstrated
 that they were hill people who inhabited slopes rising one inch for every mile that
 separated them from Sugar Creek.
 Dwayne silently said the name of the water again: "Sugar Creek."
 · Dwayne finished his breakfast, and he dared to suppose that he was no longer
 mentally diseased, that he had been cured by a simple change of residence, by a good
 night's sleep.
 His bad chemicals let him cross the lobby and then the cocktail lounge, which wasn't
 open yet, without experiencing anything strange. But when he stepped out of the side
 door of the cocktail lounge, and onto the asphalt prairie which surrounded both his Inn
 and his Pontiac agency, he discovered that someone had turned the asphalt into a sort
 of trampoline.
 It sank beneath Dwayne's weight. It dropped Dwayne to well below street level, then
 slowly brought him only part way up again. He was in a shallow, rubbery dimple.
 Dwayne took another step in the direction of his automobile agency. He sank down
 again, came up again, and stood in a brand new dimple.
 He gawked around for witnesses. There was only one. Cyprian Ukwende stood on
 the rim of the dimple, not sinking in. This was all Ukwende had to say, even though
 Dwayne's situation was extraordinary:
 "Nice day."
 · Dwayne progressed from dimple to dimple.
 He blooped across the used car lot now.
 He stopped in a dimple, looked up at another young black man. This one was
 polishing a maroon 1970 Buick Skylark convertible with a rag. The man wasn't dressed
 for that sort of work. He wore a cheap blue suit and a white shirt and a black necktie.
 Also: he wasn't merely polishing the car—he was burnishing it.
 The young man did some more burnishing. Then he smiled at Dwayne blindingly,
 then he burnished the car again.
 Here was the explanation: this young black man had just been paroled from the Adult
 Correctional Institution at Shepherdstown. He needed work right away, or he would
 starve to death. So he was showing Dwayne how hard a worker he was.
 He had been in orphanages and youth shelters and prisons of one sort or another in
 the Midland City area since he was nine years old. He was now twenty-six.
 · He was free at last!
 · Dwayne thought the young man was an hallucination.
 · The young man went back to burnishing the automobile. His Me was not worth living.
 He had a feeble will to survive. He thought the planet was terrible, that he never should
 have been sent there. Some mistake had been made. He had no friends or relatives. He
 was put in cages all the time.
 He had a name for a better world, and he often saw it in dreams. Its name was a
 secret. He would have been ridiculed, if he had said its name out loud. It was such a
 childish name.
 The young black jailbird could see the name any time he wanted to, written in lights
 on the inside of his skull. This is what it looked like:
 · He had a photograph of Dwayne in his wallet. He used to have photographs of
 Dwayne on the walls of his cell at Shepherdstown. They were easy to get, because
 Dwayne's smiling face, with his motto underneath, was a part of every ad he ran in the
 Bugle-Observer. The picture was changed every six months. The motto hadn't varied in
 twenty-five years.
 Here was the motto:
 ASK ANYBODYYOU
 CAN TRUST
 DWAYNE.
 · The young ex-convict smiled yet again at Dwayne. His teeth were in perfect repair.
 The dental program at Shepherdstown was excellent. So was the food.
 "Good morning, sir," said the young man to Dwayne. He was dismayingly innocent.
 There was so much he had to learn. He didn't know anything about women, for instance.
 Francine Pefko was the first woman he had spoken to in eleven years.
 "Good morning," said Dwayne. He said it softly, so his voice wouldn't carry very far,
 in case he was conversing with an hallucination.
 "Sir—I have read your ads in the newspapers with great interest, and I have found
 pleasure in your radio advertising, too," the parolee said. During the last year in prison,
 he had been obsessed by one idea: that he would work for Dwayne someday, and live
 happily ever after. It would be like Fairyland.
 Dwayne made no reply to this, so the young man went on: 'I am a very hard worker,
 sir, as you can see. I hear nothing but good things about you. I think the good Lord
 meant for me to work for you."
 "Oh? said Dwayne.
 "Our names are so close," said the young man, "it's the good Lord telling us both
 what to do."
 Dwayne Hoover didn't ask him what his name was, but the young man told him
 anyway, radiantly: "My name, sir, is Wayne Hoobler."
 All around Midland City, Hoobler was a common Nigger name.
 · Dwayne Hoover broke Wayne Hoobler's heart by shaking his head vaguely, then
 walking away.
 · Dwayne entered his showroom. The ground wasn't blooping underneath him
 anymore, but now he saw something else for which there could be no explanation: A
 palm tree was growing out of the showroom floor. Dwayne's bad chemicals made him
 forget all about Hawaiian Week. Actually, Dwayne had designed the palm tree himself.
 It was a sawed-off telephone pole-swaddled in burlap. It had real coconuts nailed to the
 top of it. Sheets of green plastic had been cut to resemble leaves.
 The tree so bewildered Dwayne that he almost swooned. Then he looked around and
 saw pineapples and ukuleles scattered everywhere.
 And then he saw the most unbelievable thing of all: His sales manager, Harry
 LeSabre, came toward him leeringly, wearing a lettuce-green leotard, straw sandals, a
 grass skirt, and a pink T-shirt which looked like this:
 · Harry and his wife had spent all weekend arguing about whether or not Dwayne
 suspected that Harry was a transvestite. They concluded that Dwayne had no reason to
 suspect it. Harry never talked about women's clothes to Dwayne. He had never entered
 a transvestite beauty contest or done what a lot of transvestites in Midland City did,
 which was join a big transvestite club over in Cincinnati. He never went into the city's
 transvestite bar, which was Ye Old Rathskeller, in the basement of the Fairchild Hotel.
 He had never exchanged Polaroid pictures with any other transvestites, had never
 subscribed to a transvestite magazine.
 Harry and his wife concluded that Dwayne had meant nothing more than what he
 said, that Harry had better put on some wild clothes for Hawaiian Week, or Dwayne
 would can him.
 So here was the new Harry now, rosy with fear and excitement. He felt uninhibited
 and beautiful and lovable and suddenly free.
 He greeted Dwayne with the Hawaiian word which meant both hello and goodbye.
 "Aloha," he said.
 Chapter 12
 Kilgore Trout was far away, but he was steadily closing the distance between himself
 and Dwayne. He was still in the truck named Pyramid. It was crossing a bridge named
 in honor of the poet Walt Whitman. The bridge was veiled in smoke. The truck was
 about to become a part of Philadelphia now. A sign at the foot of the bridge said this:
 · As a younger man, Trout would have sneered at the sign about brotherhood—posted
 on the rim of a bomb crater, as anyone could see. But his head no longer sheltered
 ideas of how things could be and should be on the planet, as opposed to how they
 really were. There was only one way for the Earth to be, he thought: the way it was.
 Everything was necessary. He saw an old white woman fishing through a garbage
 can. That was necessary. He saw a bathtub toy, a little rubber duck, lying on its side on
 the grating over a storm sewer. It had to be there.
 And so on.
 · The driver mentioned that the day before had been Veterans' Day.
 "Urn," said Trout.
 "You a veteran?" said the driver.
 "No," said Trout. "Are you?"
 "No," said the driver.
 Neither one of them was a veteran.
 · The driver got onto the subject of friends. He said it was hard for him to maintain
 friendships that meant anything because he was on the road most of the time. He joked
 about the time when he used to talk about his "best friends." He guessed people
 stopped talking about best friends after they got out of junior high school.
 He suggested that Trout, since Trout was in the combination aluminum storm window
 and screen business, had opportunities to build many lasting friendships in the course
 of his work. "I mean," he said, "you get men working together day after day, putting up
 those windows, they get to know each other pretty well."
 "I work alone," said Trout.
 The driver was disappointed. "I assumed it would take two men to do the job."
 "Just one," said Trout. "A weak little kid could do it without any help."
 The driver wanted Trout to have a rich social life so that he could enjoy it vicariously.
 "All the same," he insisted, "you've got buddies you see after work. You have a few
 beers. You play some cards. You have some laughs."
 Trout shrugged.
 "You walk down the same streets every day," the driver told him. "You know a lot of
 people, and they know you, because it's the same streets for you, day after day. You
 say, 'Hello,' and they say 'Hello,' back. You call them by name. They call you by name.
 If you're in a real jam, they'll help you, because you're one of 'em. You belong. They see
 you every day."
 Trout didn't want to argue about it.
 · Trout had forgotten the driver's name.
 Trout had a mental defect which I, too, used to suffer from. He couldn't remember
 what different people in his life looked like—unless their bodies or faces were strikingly
 unusual.
 When he lived on Cape Cod, for instance, the only person he could greet warmly and
 by name was Alfy Bearse, who was a one-armed albino. "Hot enough for you, Alfy?"
 he would say. "Where you been keeping yourself, Alfy?" he'd say. "You're a sight for
 sore eyes, Alfy," he'd say.
 And so on.
 · Now that Trout lived in Cohoes, the only person he called by name was a red-headed
 Cockney midget, Durling Heath. He worked in a shoe repair shop. Heath had an
 executive-type nameplate on his workbench, in case anybody wished to address him by
 name. The nameplate looked like this:
 Trout would drop into the shop from time to time, and say such things as, "Who's
 gonna win the World Series this year, Durling?" and "You have any idea what all the
 sirens were blowing about last night, Durling?" and, "You're looking good today,
 Durling—where'd you get that shirt?" And so on.
 Trout wondered now if his friendship with Heath was over. The last time Trout had
 been in the shoe repair place, saying this and that to Durling, the midget had
 unexpectedly screamed at him.
 This is what he had screamed in his Cockney accent: "Stop bloody hounding me!"
 · The Governor of New York, Nelson Rockefeller, shook Trout's hand in a Cohoes
 grocery store one time. Trout had no idea who he was. As a science-fiction writer, he
 should have been flabbergasted to come so close to such a man. Rockefeller wasn't
 merely Governor. Because of the peculiar laws in that part of the planet, Rockefeller
 was allowed to own vast areas of Earth's surface, and the petroleum and other valuable
 minerals underneath the surface, as well. He owned or controlled more of the planet
 than many nations. This had been his destiny since infancy. He had been born into that
 cockamamie proprietorship.
 "How's it going, fella?" Governor Rockefeller asked him.
 "About the same," said Kilgore Trout.
 · After insisting that Trout had a rich social life, the driver pretended, again for his own
 gratification, that Trout had begged to know what the sex life of a transcontinental truck
 driver was like. Trout had begged no such thing.
 "You want to know how truck drivers make out with women, right?" the driver said.
 "You have this idea that every driver you see is fucking up a storm from coast to coast,
 right?"
 Trout shrugged.
 The truck driver became embittered by Trout, scolded him for being so salaciously
 misinformed. "Let me tell you, Kilgore—" he hesitated. "That's your name, right?"
 "Yes," said Trout. He had forgotten the driver's name a hundred times. Every time
 Trout looked away from him, Trout forgot not only his name but his face, too.
 "Kilgore, God damn it—" the driver said, "if I was to have my rig break down in
 Cohoes, for instance, and I was to have to stay there for two days while it was worked
 on, how easy you think it would be for me to get laid while I was there—a stranger,
 looking the way I do?"
 "It would depend on how determined you were," said Trout.
 The driver sighed. "Yeah, God—" he said, and he despaired for himself, "that's
 probably the story of my life: not enough determination."
 · They talked about aluminum siding as a technique for making old houses look new
 again. From a distance, these sheets, which never needed painting, looked like freshly
 painted wood.
 The driver wanted to talk about Perma-Stone, too, which was a competitive scheme.
 It involved plastering the sides of old houses with colored cement, so that, from a
 distance, they looked as though they were made of stone.
 "If you're in aluminum storm windows," the driver said to Trout, "you must be in
 aluminum siding, too." All over the country, the two businesses went hand-in-hand.
 "My company sells it," said Trout, "and I've seen a lot of it. I've never actually worked
 on an installation."
 The driver was thinking seriously of buying aluminum siding for his home in Little
 Rock, and he begged Trout to give him an honest answer to this question: "From what
 you've seen and heard—the people who get aluminum siding, are they happy with what
 they get?"
 "Around Cohoes," said Trout. "I think those were about the only really happy people I
 ever saw."
 · "I know what you mean," said the driver. "One time I saw a whole family standing
 outside their house. They couldn't believe how nice their house looked after the
 aluminum siding went on. My question to you, and you can give me an honest answer,
 on account of well never have to do business, you and me: Kilgore, how long will that
 happiness last?"
 "About fifteen years," said Trout. "Our salesmen say you can easily afford to have the
 job redone with all the money you've saved on paint and heat."
 "Perma-Stone looks a lot richer, and I suppose it lasts a lot longer, too," said the
 driver. "On the other hand, it costs a lot more."
 "You get what you pay for," said Kilgore Trout.
 · The truck driver told Trout about a gas hot-water heater he had bought thirty years
 ago, and it hadn't given him a speck of trouble in all that tune. "I'll be damned," said
 Kilgore Trout.
 · Trout asked about the truck, and the driver said it was the greatest truck hi the world.
 The tractor alone cost twenty-eight thousand dollars. It was powered by a three hundred
 and twenty-four horsepower Cummins Diesel engine, which was turbo-charged, so it
 would function well at high altitudes. It had hydraulic steering, air brakes, a thirteenspeed
 transmission, and was owned by his brother-in-law.
 His brother-in-law, he said, owned twenty-eight trucks, and was President of the
 Pyramid Trucking Company.
 "Why did he name his company Pyramid?" asked Trout. "I mean—this thing can go a
 hundred miles an hour, if it has to. It's fast and useful and unornamental. It's as up-todate
 as a rocket ship. I never saw anything that was less like a pyramid than this truck."
 · A pyramid was a sort of huge stone tomb which Egyptians had built thousands and
 thousands of years before. The Egyptians didn't build them anymore. The tombs looked
 like this, and tourists would come from far away to gaze at them:
 "Why would anybody in the business of highspeed transportation name his business
 and his trucks after buildings which haven't moved an eighth of an inch since Christ was
 born?"
 The driver's answer was prompt. It was peevish, too, as though he thought Trout was
 stupid to have to ask a question like that. "He liked the sound of it," he said. "Don't you
 like the sound of it?"
 Trout nodded in order to keep things friendly. "Yes," he said, "it's a very nice sound."
 · Trout sat back and thought about the conversation. He shaped it into a story, which
 he never got around to writing until he was an old, old man. It was about a planet where
 the language kept turning into pure music, because the creatures there were so
 enchanted by sounds. Words became musical notes. Sentences became melodies.
 They were useless as conveyors of information, because nobody knew or cared what
 the meanings of words were anymore.
 So leaders in government and commerce, in order to function, had to invent new and
 much uglier vocabularies and sentence structures all the time, which would resist being
 transmuted to music.
 · "You married, Kilgore?" the driver asked.
 "Three times," said Trout. It was true. Not only that, but each of his wives had been
 extraordinarily patient and loving and beautiful. Each had been shriveled by his
 pessimism.
 "Any kids?"
 "One," said Trout. Somewhere in the past, tumbling among all the wives and stories
 lost in the mails was a son named Leo. "He's a man now," said Trout.
 · Leo left home forever at the age of fourteen. He lied about his age, and he joined the
 Marines. He sent a note to his father from boot camp. It said this: "I pity you. You've
 crawled up your own asshole and died."
 That was the last Trout heard from Leo, directly or indirectly, until he was visited by
 two agents from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Leo had deserted from his division
 in Viet Nam, they said. He had committed high treason. He had joined the Viet Gong.
 Here was the F.B.I. evaluation of Leo's situation on the planet at that time: Tour boy's
 in bad trouble," they said.
 Chapter 13
 When Dwayne Hoover saw Harry LeSabre, his sales manager, in leaf-green leotards
 and a grass skirt and all that, he could not believe it. So he made himself not see it. He
 went into his office, which was also cluttered with ukuleles and pineapples.
 Francine Pefko, his secretary, looked normal, except that she had a rope of flowers
 around her neck and a flower behind one ear. She smiled. This was a war widow with
 lips like sofa pillows and bright red hair. She adored Dwayne. She adored Hawaiian
 Week, too.
 "Aloha," she said.
 · Harry LeSabre, meanwhile, had been destroyed by Dwayne.
 When Harry presented himself to Dwayne so ridiculously, every molecule in his body
 awaited Dwayne's reaction. Each molecule ceased its business for a moment, put some
 distance between itself and its neighbors. Each molecule waited to learn whether its
 galaxy, which was called Harry LeSabre, would or would not be dissolved.
 When Dwayne treated Harry as though he were invisible, Harry thought he had
 revealed himself as a revolting transvestite, and that he was fired on that account.
 Harry closed his eyes. He never wanted to open them again. His heart sent this
 message to his molecules: "For reasons obvious to us all, this galaxy is dissolved!"
 · Dwayne didn't know anything about that. He leaned on Francine Pefko's desk. He
 came close to telling her how sick he was. He warned her: "This is a very tough day, for
 some reason. So no jokes, no surprises. Keep everything simple. Keep anybody the
 least bit nutty out of here. No telephone calls."
 Francine told Dwayne that the twins were waiting for him in the inner office.
 "Something bad is happening to the cave, I think," she told him.
 Dwayne was grateful for a message that simple and clear. The twins were his
 younger stepbrothers, Lyle and Kyle Hoover. The cave was Sacred Miracle Cave, a
 tourist trap just south of Shepherdstown, which Dwayne owned in partnership with Lyle
 and Kyle. It was the sole source of income for Lyle and Kyle, who lived in identical yellow
 ranch houses on either side of the gift shop which sheltered the entrance to the
 cave.
 All over the State, nailed to trees and fence posts, were arrow-shaped signs, which
 pointed in the direction of the cave and said how far away it was—for example:
 · Before Dwayne entered his inner office, he read one of many comical signs which
 Francine had put up on the wall in order to amuse people, to remind them of what they
 so easily forgot: that people didn't have to be serious all the time.
 Here was the text of the sign Dwayne read:
 YOU DON'T HAVE TO BE CRAZY
 TO WORK HERE, BUT IT SURE HELPS!
 There was a picture of a crazy person to go with the text. This was it:
 Francine wore a button on her bosom which showed a creature in a healthier, more
 enviable frame of mind. This was the button:
 · Lyle and Kyle sat side-by-side on the black leather couch in Dwayne Hoover's inner
 office. They looked so much alike that Dwayne had not been able to tell them apart until
 1954, when Lyle got in a fight over a woman at the Roller Derby. After that, Lyle was the
 one with the broken nose. As babies in crib, Dwayne remembered now, they used to
 suck each other's thumbs.
 · Here is how Dwayne happened to have stepbrothers, incidentally, even though he
 had been adopted by people who couldn't have children of their own. Their adopting him
 triggered something to their bodies which made it possible for them to have children
 after all. This was a common phenomenon. A lot of couples seemed to be programmed
 that way.
 · Dwayne was so glad to see them now—these two little men in overalls and
 workshoes, each wearing a pork-pie hat. They were familiar, they were real. Dwayne
 closed his door on the chaos outside. "All right—" he said, "what's happened at the
 cave?"
 Ever since Lyle had had his nose broken, the twins agreed that Lyle should do the
 talking for the two. Kyle hadn't said a thousand words since 1954.
 "Them bubbles is halfway up to the Cathedral now," said Lyle. "The way they're
 coming, they'll be up to Moby Dick in a week or two."
 Dwayne understood him perfectly. The underground stream which passed through
 the bowels of Sacred Miracle Cave was polluted by some sort of industrial waste which
 formed bubbles as tough as ping-pong balls. These bubbles were shouldering one
 another up a passage which led to a big boulder which had been painted white to
 resemble Moby Dick, the Great White Whale. The bubbles would soon engulf Moby
 Dick and invade the Cathedral of Whispers, which was the main attraction at the cave.
 Thousands of people had been married in the Cathedral of Whispers—including
 Dwayne and Lyle and Kyle. Harry LeSabre, too.
 · Lyle told Dwayne about an experiment he and Kyle had performed the night before.
 They had gone into the cave with their identical Browning Automatic Shotguns, and they
 had opened fire on the advancing wall of bubbles.
 "They let loose a stink you wouldn't believe," said Lyle. He said it smelled like
 athlete's foot. "It drove me and Kyle right out of there. We run the ventilating system for
 an hour, and then we went back in. The paint was blistered on Moby Dick. He ain't even
 got eyes anymore." Moby Dick used to have long-lashed blue eyes as big as dinner
 plates.
 · "The organ turned black, and the ceiling turned a kind of dirty yellow," said Lyle. "You
 can't hardly see the Sacred Miracle no more."
 The organ was the Pipe Organ of the Gods, a thicket of stalactites and stalagmites
 which had grown together in one corner of the Cathedral. There was a loudspeaker in
 back of it, through which music for weddings and funerals was played. It was illuminated
 by electric lights, which changed colors all the time.
 The Sacred Miracle was a cross on the ceiling of the Cathedral. It was formed by the
 intersection of two cracks. "It never was real easy to see," said Lyle, speaking of the
 cross. "I ain't even sure it's there anymore." He asked Dwayne's permission to order a
 load of cement. He wanted to plug up the passage between the stream and the
 Cathedral.
 "Just forget about Moby Dick and Jesse James and the slaves and all that," said
 Lyle, "and save the Cathedral."
 Jesse James was a skeleton which Dwayne's stepfather had bought from the estate
 of a doctor back during the Great Depression. The bones of its right hand mingled with
 the rusted parts of a .45 caliber revolver. Tourists were told that it had been found that
 way, that it probably belonged to some railroad robber who had been trapped in the
 cave by a rockslide.
 As for the slaves: these were plaster statues of black men in a chamber fifty feet
 down the corridor from Jesse James. The statues were removing one another's chains
 with hammers and hacksaws. Tourists were told that real
 slaves had at one time used the cave after escaping to freedom across the Ohio River.
 · The story about the slaves was as fake as the one about Jesse James. The cave
 wasn't discovered until 1937, when a small earthquake opened it up a crack. Dwayne
 Hoover himself discovered the crack, and then he and his stepfather opened it with
 crowbars and dynamite. Before that, not even small animals had been in there.
 The only connection the cave had with slavery was this: the farm on which it was
 discovered was started by an ex-slave, Josephus Hoobler. He was freed by his master,
 and he came north and started the farm. Then he went back and bought his mother and
 a woman who became his wife.
 Their descendants continued to run the farm until the Great Depression, when the
 Midland County Merchants Bank foreclosed on the mortgage. And then Dwayne's
 stepfather was hit by an automobile driven by a white man who had bought the farm. In
 an out-of-court settlement for his injuries, Dwayne's stepfather was given what he called
 contemptuously "... a God damn Nigger farm."
 Dwayne remembered the first trip the family took to see it. His father ripped a Nigger
 sign off the Nigger mailbox, and he threw it into a ditch. Here is what it said:
 
 Chapter 14
 The truck carrying Kilgore Trout was in West Virginia now. The surface of the State
 had been demolished by men and machinery and explosives in order to make it yield up
 its coal. The coal was mostly gone now. It had been turned into heat.
 The surface of West Virginia, with its coal and trees and topsoil gone, was
 rearranging what was left of itself in conformity with the laws of gravity. It was collapsing
 into all the holes which had been dug into it. Its mountains, which had once found it
 easy to stand by themselves, were sliding into valleys now.
 The demolition of West Virginia had taken place with the approval of the executive,
 legislative, and judicial branches of the State Government, which drew their power from
 the people.
 Here and there an inhabited dwelling still stood.
 · Trout saw a broken guardrail ahead. He gazed into a gully below it, saw a 1968
 Cadillac El Dorado capsized in a brook. It had Alabama license plates. There were also
 several old home appliances in the brook—stoves, a washing machine, a couple of
 refrigerators.
 An angel-faced white child, with flaxen hair, stood by the brook. She waved up at
 Trout. She clasped an eighteen-ounce bottle of Pepsi-Cola to her breast.
 · Trout asked himself out loud what the people did for amusement, and the driver told
 him a queer story about a night he spent in West Virginia, in the cab of his truck, near a
 windowless building which droned monotonously.
 I'd see folks go in, and I'd see folks come out," he said, "but I couldn't figure out what
 kind of a machine it was that made the drone. The building was a cheap old frame thing
 set up on cement blocks, and it was out in the middle of nowhere. Cars came and went,
 and the folks sure seemed to like whatever was doing the droning," he said.
 So he had a look inside. "It was full of folks on roller-skates," he said. "They went
 around and around. Nobody smiled. They just went around and around."
 · He told Trout about people he'd heard of in the area who grabbed live copperheads
 and rattlesnakes during church services, to show how much they believed that Jesus
 would protect them.
 "Takes all kinds of people to make up a world," said Trout.
 · Trout marveled at how recently white men had arrived in West Virginia, and how
 quickly they had demolished it—for heat.
 Now the heat was all gone, too—into outer space, Trout supposed. It had boiled
 water, and the steam had made steel windmills whiz around and around. The windmills
 had made rotors in generators whiz around and around. America was jazzed with
 electricity for a while. Coal had also powered old-fashioned steamboats and choo-choo
 trains.
 · Choo-choo trains and steamboats and factories had whistles which were blown by
 steam when Dwayne Hoover and Kilgore Trout and I were boys-when our fathers were
 boys, when our grandfathers were boys. The whistles looked like this:
 Steam from water boiled by burning coal was sent raging through the whistles, which
 made harshly beautiful laments, as though they were the voice boxes of mating or dying
 dinosaurs—cries such as tvoooooooo-uh, wooooo-uh, and
 tormrrrrrnrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrrnnnnnnnnnnnn, and so on.
 · A dinosaur was a reptile as big as a choo-choo train. It looked like this:
 It had two brains, one for its front end and one for its rear end. It was extinct. Both
 brains combined were smaller than a pea. A pea was a legume which looked like this:
 Coal was a highly compressed mixture of rotten trees and flowers and bushes and
 grasses and so on, and dinosaur excrement.
 · Kilgore Trout thought about the cries of steam whistles he had known, and about the
 destruction of West Virginia, which made their songs possible. He supposed that the
 heart-rending cries had fled into outer space, along with the heat. He was mistaken.
 Like most science-fiction writers, Trout knew almost nothing about science, was
 bored stiff by technical details. But no cry from a whistle had got very far from Earth for
 this reason: sound could only travel in an atmosphere, and the atmosphere of Earth
 relative to the planet wasn't even as thick as the skin of an apple. Beyond that lay an allbut-perfect
 vacuum.
 An apple was a popular fruit which looked like this:
 · The driver was a big eater. He pulled into a Mao Donald's Hamburger establishment.
 There were many different chains of hamburger establishments in the country.
 MacDonald's was one. Burger Chef was another. Dwayne Hoover, as has already been
 said, owned franchises for several Burger Chefs.
 · A hamburger was made out of an animal which looked like this:
 The animal was killed and ground up into little bits, then shaped into patties and fried,
 and put between two pieces of bread. The finished product looked like this:
 · And Trout, who had so little money left, ordered a cup of coffee. He asked an old, old
 man on a stool next to him at the table if he had worked in the coal mines.
 The old man said this: "From the time I was ten till I was sixty-two."
 "You glad to be out of 'em?" said Trout.
 "Oh, God," said the man, "you never get out of 'em-even when you sleep. I dream
 mines."
 Trout asked him what it had felt like to work for an industry whose business was to
 destroy the countryside, and the old man said he was usually too tired to care.
 · "Don't matter if you care," the old miner said, "if you don't own what you care about."
 He pointed out that the mineral rights to the entire county in which they sat were owned
 by the Rosewater Coal and Iron Company, which had acquired these rights soon after
 the end of the Civil War. "The law says," he went on, "when a man owns something
 under the ground and he wants to get at it, you got to let him tear up anything between
 the surface and what he owns."
 Trout did not make the connection between the Rose-water Coal and Iron Company
 and Eliot Rosewater, his only fan. He still thought Eliot Rosewater was a teenager.
 The truth was that Rosewater's ancestors had been among the principal destroyers
 of the surface and the people of West Virginia.
 · It don't seem right, though," the old miner said to Trout, "that a man can own what's
 underneath another man's farm or woods or house. And any time the man wants to get
 what's underneath all that, he's got a right to wreck what's on top to get at it. The rights
 of the people on top of the ground don't amount to nothing compared to the rights of the
 man who owns what's underneath."
 He remembered out loud when he and other miners used to try to force the
 Rosewater Coal and Iron Company to treat them like human beings. They would fight
 small wars with the company's private police and the State Police and the National
 Guard.
 "I never saw a Rosewater," he said, "but Rosewater always won. I walked on
 Rosewater. I dug holes for Rose-water in Rosewater. I lived in Rosewater houses. I ate
 Rosewater food. I'd fight Rosewater, whatever Rosewater is, and Rosewater would beat
 me and leave me for dead. You ask people around here and they'll tell you: this whole
 world is Rosewater as far as they're concerned."
 · The driver knew Trout was bound for Midland City. He didn't know Trout was a writer
 on his way to an arts festival. Trout understood that honest working people had no use
 for the arts.
 "Why would anybody in his right mind go to Midland City?" the driver wanted to know.
 They were riding along again.
 "My sister is sick," said Trout.
 "Midland City is the asshole of the Universe," said the driver.
 "I've often wondered where the asshole was," said
 Trout.
 "If it isn't in Midland City," said the driver, "it's in Libertyville, Georgia. You ever see
 Libertyville?"
 "No," said Trout.
 "I was arrested for speeding down there. They had a speed trap, where you all of a
 sudden had to go from fifty down to fifteen miles an hour. It made me mad. I had some
 words with the policeman, and he put me in jail.
 "The main industry there was pulping up old newspapers and magazines and books,
 and making new paper out of 'em," said the driver. "Trucks and trains were bringing in
 hundreds of tons of unwanted printed material every day."
 "Um," said Trout.
 "And the unloading process was sloppy, so there were pieces of books and
 magazines and so on blowing all over town. If you wanted to start a library, you could
 just go over to the freight yard, and carry away all the books you wanted."
 "Um," said Trout. Up ahead was a white man hitchhiking with his pregnant wife and
 nine children.
 "Looks like Gary Cooper, don't he?" said the truck driver of the hitchhiking man.
 "Yes, he does," said Trout. Gary Cooper was a movie star.
 · "Anyway," said the driver, "they had so many books in Libertyville, they used books
 for toilet paper in the jail. They got me on a Friday, late in the afternoon, so I couldn't
 have a hearing in court until Monday. So I sat there in the calaboose for two days, with
 nothing to do but read my toilet paper. I can still remember one of the stories I read."
 "Urn," said Trout.
 "That was the last story I ever read," said the driver. "My God—that must be all of
 fifteen years ago. The story was about another planet. It was a crazy story. They had
 museums full of paintings all over the place, and the government used a kind of roulette
 wheel to decide what to put in the museums, and what to throw out."
 Kilgore Trout was suddenly woozy with deja vu. The truck driver was reminding him
 of the premise of a book he hadn't thought about for years. The driver's toilet paper in
 Libertyville, Georgia, had been The Barring-gaffner of Bagnialto, or This Year's
 Masterpiece, by Kilgore Trout.
 · The name of the planet where Trout's book took place was Bagnialto, and a "Barringgaffner"
 there was a government official who spun a wheel of chance once a year.
 Citizens submitted works of art to the government, and these were given numbers, and
 then they were assigned cash values according to the Barring-gaffner's spins of the
 wheel.
 The viewpoint of character of the tale was not the Barring-gaffner, but a humble
 cobbler named Gooz. Gooz lived alone, and he painted a picture of his cat. It was the
 only picture he had ever painted. He took it to the Barring-gaffner, who numbered it and
 put it in a warehouse crammed with works of art.
 The painting by Gooz had an unprecedented gush of luck on the wheel. It became
 worth eighteen thousand lambos, the equivalent of one billion dollars on Earth. The
 Barring-gaffner awarded Gooz a check for that amount, most of which was taken back
 at once by the tax collector. The picture was given a place of honor in the National
 Gallery, and people lined up for miles for a chance to see a painting worth a billion
 dollars.
 There was also a huge bonfire of all the paintings and statues and books and so on
 which the wheel had said were worthless. And then it was discovered that the wheel
 was rigged, and the Barring-gaffner committed suicide.
 · It was an amazing coincidence that the truck driver had read a book by Kilgore Trout.
 Trout had never met a reader before, and his response now was interesting: He did not
 admit that he was the father of the book.
 · The driver pointed out that all the mailboxes in the area had the same last name
 painted on them.
 "There's another one," he said, indicating a mailbox which looked like this:
 The truck was passing through the area where Dwayne Hoover's stepparents had
 come from. They had trekked from West Virginia to Midland City during the First World
 War, to make big money at the Keedsler Automobile Company, which was
 manufacturing airplanes and trucks. When they got to Midland City, they had their name
 changed legally from Hoobler to Hoover, because there were so many black people in
 Midland City named Hoobler.
 As Dwayne Hoover's stepfather explained to him one time, "It was embarrassing.
 Everybody up here naturally assumed Hoobler was a Nigger name."
 Chapter 15
 Dwayne Hoover got through lunch all right that day. He remembered now about
 Hawaiian Week. The ukuleles and so on were no longer mysterious. The pavement between
 his automobile agency and the new Holiday Inn was no longer a trampoline.
 He drove to lunch alone in an air-conditioned demonstrator, a blue Pontiac Le Mans
 with a cream interior, with his radio on. He heard several of his own radio commercials,
 which drove home the point: "You can always trust Dwayne."
 Though his mental health had improved remarkably since breakfast, a new symptom
 of illness made itself known. It was incipient echolalia. Dwayne found himself wanting to
 repeat out loud whatever had just been said.
 So when the radio told him, "You can always trust Dwayne," he echoed the last word.
 "Dwayne," he said.
 When the radio said there had been a tornado in Texas, Dwayne said this out loud:
 "Texas."
 Then he heard that husbands of women who had been raped during the war between
 India and Pakistan wouldn't have anything to do with their wives anymore. The women,
 in the eyes of their husbands, had become unclean, said the radio.
 "Unclean," said Dwayne.
 · As for Wayne Hoobler, the black ex-convict whose only dream was to work for
 Dwayne Hoover: he had learned to play hide-and-seek with Dwayne's employees. He
 did not wish to be ordered off the property for hanging around the used cars. So, when
 an employee came near, Wayne would wander off to the garbage and trash area behind
 the Holiday Inn, and gravely study the remains of club sandwiches and empty packs of
 Salem cigarettes and so on in the cans back there, as though he were a health
 inspector or some such thing.
 When the employee went away, Wayne would drift back to the used cars, keeping
 the boiled eggs of his eyes peeled for the real Dwayne Hoover.
 The real Dwayne Hoover, of course, had in effect denied that he was Dwayne. So,
 when the real Dwayne came out at lunch time, Wayne, who had nobody to talk to but
 himself, said this to himself: "That ain't Mr. Hoover. Sure look like Mr. Hoover, though.
 Maybe Mr. Hoover sick today." And so on.
 · Dwayne had a hamburger and French fries and a Coke at his newest Burger Chef,
 which was out on Crestview Avenue, across the street from where the new John F.
 Kennedy High School was going up. John F. Kennedy had never been in Midland City,
 but he was a President of the United States who was shot to death. Presidents of the
 country were often shot to death. The assassins were confused by some of the same
 bad chemicals which troubled Dwayne.
 · Dwayne certainly wasn't alone, as far as having bad chemicals inside of him was
 concerned. He had plenty of company throughout all history. In his own lifetime, for
 instance, the people in a country called Germany were so full of bad chemicals for a
 while that they actually built factories whose only purpose was to kill people by the
 millions. The people were delivered by railroad trains.
 When the Germans were full of bad chemicals, their flag looked like this:
 Here is what their flag looked like after they got well again:
 After they got well again, they manufactured a cheap and durable automobile which
 became popular all over the world, especially among young people. It looked like this:
 People called it "the beetle." A real beetle looked like this:
 The mechanical beetle was made by Germans. The real beetle was made by the
 Creator of the Universe.
 · Dwayne's waitress at the Burger Chef was a seventeen-year-old white girl named
 Patty Keene. Her hair was yellow. Her eyes were blue. She was very old for a mammal.
 Most mammals were senile or dead by the time they were seventeen. But Patty was a
 sort of mammal which developed very slowly, so the body she rode around in was only
 now mature.
 She was a brand-new adult, who was working in order to pay off the tremendous
 doctors' and hospital bills her father had run up in the process of dying of cancer of the
 colon and then cancer of the everything.
 This was in a country where everybody was expected to pay his own bills for
 everything, and one of the most expensive things a person could do was get sick. Patty
 Keene's father's sickness cost ten times as much as all the trips to Hawaii which
 Dwayne was going to give away at the end of Hawaiian Week.
 · Dwayne appreciated Patty Keene's brand-newness, even though he was not sexually
 attracted to women that young. She was like a new automobile, which hadn't even had
 its radio turned on yet, and Dwayne was reminded of a ditty his father would sing
 sometimes when his father was drunk. It went like this:
 Roses are red,
 And ready for plucking.
 You're sixteen,
 And ready for high school.
 · Patty Keene was stupid on purpose, which was the case with most women in Midland
 City. The women all had big minds because they were big animals, but they did not use
 them much for this reason: unusual ideas could make enemies, and the women, if they
 were going to achieve any sort of comfort and safety, needed all the friends they could
 get.
 So, in the interests of survival, they trained themselves to be agreeing machines
 instead of thinking machines. All their minds had to do was to discover what other
 people were thi nking, and then they thought that, too.
 · Patty knew who Dwayne was. Dwayne didn't know who Patty was. Patty's heart beat
 faster when she waited on him—because Dwayne could solve so many of her
 problems with the money and power he had. He could give her a fine house and new
 automobiles and nice clothes and a Me of leisure, and he could pay all the medical
 bills—as easily as she had given him his hamburger and his French fries and his Coke.
 Dwayne could do for her what the Fairy Godmother did for Cinderella, if he wanted
 to, and Patty had never been so close to such a magical person before. She was in the
 presence of the supernatural. And she knew enough about Midland City and herself to
 understand that she might never be this close to the supernatural ever again.
 Patty Keene actually imagined Dwayne's waving a magic wand at her troubles and
 dreams. It looked like this:
 She spoke up bravely, to learn if supernatural assistance was possible in her case.
 She was willing to do without it, expected to do without it—to work hard all her life, to
 get not much in return, and to associate with other men and women who were poor and
 powerless, and in debt. She said this to Dwayne:
 "Excuse me for calling you by name, Mr. Hoover, but I can't help knowing who you
 are, with your picture in all your ads and everything. Besides—everybody else who
 works here told me who you were. When you came in, they just buzzed and buzzed."
 "Buzzed," said Dwayne. This was his echolalia again.
 · "I guess that isn't the right word," she said. She was used to apologizing for her use of
 language. She had been encouraged to do a lot of that in school. Most white people in
 Midland City were insecure when they spoke, so they kept their sentences short and
 their words simple, in order to keep embarrassing mistakes to a minimum. Dwayne
 certainly did that. Patty certainly did that.
 This was because their English teachers would wince and cover their ears and give
 them flunking grades and so on whenever they failed to speak like English aristocrats
 before the First World War. Also: they were told that they were unworthy to speak or
 write their language if they couldn't love or understand incomprehensible novels and
 poems and plays about people long ago and far away, such as Ivanhoe.
 · The black people would not put up with this. They went on talking English every which
 way. They refused to read books they couldn't understand—on the grounds they
 couldn't understand them. They would ask such impudent questions as, "Whuffo I want
 to read no Tale of Two Cities? Whuffo?"
 · Patty Keene flunked English during the semester when she had to read and
 appreciate Ivanhoe, which was about men in iron suits and the women who loved them.
 And she was put in a remedial reading class, where they made her read The Good
 Earth, which was about Chinamen.
 It was during this same semester that she lost her virginity. She was raped by a white
 gas-conversion unit installer named Don Breedlove in the parking lot outside the
 Bannister Memorial Fieldhouse at the County Fairgrounds after the Regional High
 School Basketball Play-offs. She never reported it to the police. She never reported it to
 anybody, since her father was dying at the time.
 There was enough trouble already.
 · The Bannister Memorial Fieldhouse was named in honor of George Hickman
 Bannister, a seventeen-year-old boy who was killed while playing high school football in
 1924. George Hickman Bannister had the largest tombstone in Calvary Cemetery, a
 sixty-two-foot obelisk with a marble football on top.
 The marble football looked like this:
 Football was a war game. Two opposing teams fought over the ball while wearing
 armor made out of leather and cloth and plastic.
 George Hickman Bannister was killed while trying to get a hold of the ball on
 Thanksgiving Day. Thanksgiving Day was a holiday when everybody in the country was
 expected to express gratitude to the Creator of the Universe, mainly for food.
 · George Hickman Bannister's obelisk was paid for by public subscription, with the
 Chamber of Commerce matching every two dollars raised with a dollar of its own. It was
 for many years the tallest structure in Midland City. A city ordinance was passed which
 made it illegal to erect anything taller than that, and it was called The George Hickman
 Bannister Law.
 The ordinance was junked later on to allow radio towers to go up.
 · The two largest monuments in town, until the new Mildred Barry Memorial Arts Center
 went up in Sugar Creek, were constructed supposedly so that George Hickman
 Bannister would never be forgotten. But nobody ever thought about him anymore by the
 time Dwayne Hoover met Kilgore Trout. There wasn't much to think about him, actually,
 even at the time of his death, except that he was young.
 And he didn't have any relatives in town anymore. There weren't any Bannisters in
 the phone book, except for The Bannister, which was a motion picture theater. Actually,
 there wouldn't even be a Bannister Theater in there after the new phonebooks came
 out. The Bannister had been turned into a cut-rate furniture store.
 George Hickman Bannister's father and mother and sister, Lucy, moved away from
 town before either the tombstone or the fieldhouse was completed, and they couldn't be
 located for the dedication ceremonies.
 · It was a very restless country, with people tearing around all the time. Every so often,
 somebody would stop to put up a monument.
 There were monuments all over the country. But it was certainly unusual for
 somebody from the common people to have not one but two monuments in his honor,
 as was the case with George Hickman Bannister.
 Technically, though, only the tombstone had been erected specifically for him. The
 fieldhouse would have gone up anyway. The money was appropriated for the fieldhouse
 two years before George Hickman Bannister was cut down in his prime. It didn't cost
 anything extra to name it after him.
 · Calvary Cemetery, where George Hickman Bannister was at rest, was named in
 honor of a hill in Jerusalem, thousands of miles away. Many people believed that the
 son of the Creator of the Universe had been killed on that hill thousands of years ago.
 Dwayne Hoover didn't know whether to believe that or not. Neither did Patty Keene.
 · And they certainly weren't worrying about it now. They had other fish to fry. Dwayne
 was wondering how long his attack of echolalia was likely to last, and Patty Keene had
 to find out if her brand-newness and prettiness and outgoing personality were worth a
 lot to a sweet, sort of sexy, middle-aged old Pontiac dealer like Dwayne.
 "Anyway," she said, "it certainly is an honor to have you visit us, and those aren't the
 right words, either, but I hope you know what I mean."
 "Mean," said Dwayne.
 "Is the food all right?" she said.
 "All right," said Dwayne.
 "It's what everybody else gets," she said. "We didn't do anything special for you."
 "You," said Dwayne.
 · It didn't matter much what Dwayne said. It hadn't mattered much for years. It didn't
 matter much what most people in Midland City said out loud, except when they were
 talking about money or structures or travel or machinery—or other measurable things.
 Every person had a clearly defined part to play—as a black person, a female high
 school drop-out, a Pontiac dealer, a gynecologist, a gas-conversion burner installer. If a
 person stopped living up to expectations, because of bad chemicals or one thing or
 another, everybody went on imagining that the person was living up to expectations
 anyway.
 That was the main reason the people in Midland City were so slow to detect insanity
 in their associates. Their imaginations insisted that nobody changed much from day to
 day. Their imaginations were flywheels on the ramshackle machinery of the awful truth.
 · When Dwayne left Patty Keene and his Burger Chef, when he got into his
 demonstrator and drove away, Patty Keene was persuaded that she could make him
 happy with her young body, with her bravery and cheerfulness. She wanted to cry about
 the lines in his face, and the fact that his wife had eaten Drano, and that his dog had to
 fight all the time because it couldn't wag its tail, about the fact that his son was a
 homosexual. She knew all those things about Dwayne. Everybody knew those things
 about Dwayne.
 She gazed at the tower of radio station WMCY, which Dwayne Hoover owned. It was
 the tallest structure in Midland City. It was eight times as tall as the tombstone of
 George Hickman Bannister. It had a red light on top of it—to keep airplanes away.
 She thought about all the new and used cars Dwayne owned.
 · Earth scientists had just discovered something fascinating about the continent Patty
 Keene was standing on, incidentally. It was riding on a slab about forty miles thick, and
 the slab was drifting around on molten glurp. And all the other continents had slabs of
 their own. When one slab crashed into another one, mountains were made.
 · The mountains of West Virginia, for instance, were heaved up when a huge chunk of
 Africa crashed into North America. And the coal in the state was formed from forests
 which were buried by the crash.
 Patty Keene hadn't heard the big news yet. Neither had Dwayne. Neither had Kilgore
 Trout. I only found out about it day before yesterday. I was reading a magazine, and I
 also had the television on. A group of scientists was on television, saying that the theory
 of floating, crashing, grinding slabs was more than a theory. They could prove it was
 true now, and that Japan and San Francisco, for instance, were in hideous danger,
 because that was where some of the most violent crashing and grinding was going on.
 They said, too, that ice ages would continue to occur. Mile-thick glaciers would,
 geologically speaking, continue to go down and up like window blinds.
 · Dwayne Hoover, incidentally, had an unusually large penis, and didn't even know it.
 The few women he had had anything to do with weren't sufficiently experienced to know
 whether he was average or not. The world average was five and seven-eighths inches
 long, and one and one-half inches in diameter when engorged with blood. Dwayne's
 was seven inches long and two and one-eighth inches in diameter when engorged with
 blood.
 Dwayne's son Bunny had a penis that was exactly average.
 Kilgore Trout had a penis seven inches long, but only one and one-quarter inches in
 diameter.
 This was an inch:
 Harry LeSabre, Dwayne's sales manager, had a penis five inches long and two and
 one-eighth inches in diameter.
 Cyprian Ukwende, the black physician from Nigeria, had a penis six and seveneighths
 inches long and one and three-quarters inches in diameter.
 Don Breedlove, the gas-conversion unit installer who raped Patty Keene, had a penis
 five and seven-eighths inches long and one and seven-eighths inches in diameter.
 · Patty Keene had thirty-four-inch hips, a twenty-six-inch waist, and a thirty-four-inch
 bosom.
 Dwayne's late wife had thirty-six-inch hips, a twenty-eight-inch waist, and a thirtyeight-inch
 bosom when he married her. She had thirty-nine-inch hips, a thirty-one-inch
 waist, and a thirty-eight-inch bosom when she ate Drano.
 His mistress and secretary, Francine Pefko, had thirty-seven-inch hips, a thirty-inch
 waist, and a thirty-nine-inch bosom.
 His stepmother at the time of her death had thirty-four-inch hips, a twenty-four-inch
 waist, and a thirty-three-inch bosom.
 · So Dwayne went from the Burger Chef to the construction site of the new high school.
 He was in no hurry to get back to his automobile agency, particularly since he had
 developed echolalia. Francine was perfectly capable of running the place herself,
 without any advice from Dwayne. He had trained her well.
 So he kicked a little dirt down into the cellar hole. He spat down into it. He stepped
 into mud. It sucked off his right shoe. He dug the shoe out with his hands, and he wiped
 it. Then he leaned against an old apple tree while he put the shoe back on. This had all
 been farmland when Dwayne was a boy. There had been an apple orchard here.
 · Dwayne forgot all about Patty Keene, but she certainly hadn't forgotten him. She
 would get up enough nerve that night to call him on the telephone, but Dwayne wouldn't
 be home to answer. He would be in a padded cell in the County Hospital by then.
 And Dwayne wandered over to admire a tremendous earth-moving machine which
 had cleared the site and dug the cellar hole. The machine was idle now, caked with
 mud. Dwayne asked a white workman how many horsepower drove the machine. All
 the workmen were white.
 The workman said this: "I don't know how many horsepower, but I know what we call
 it."
 "What do you call it?" said Dwayne, relieved to find his echolalia was subsiding.
 "We call it The Hundred-Nigger Machine," said the workman. This had reference to a
 time when black men had done most of the heavy digging in Midland City.
 · The largest human penis in the United States was fourteen inches long and two and a
 half inches in diameter.
 The largest human penis in the world was sixteen and seven-eighths inches long and
 two and one-quarter inches in diameter.
 The blue whale, a sea mammal, had a penis ninety-six inches long and fourteen
 inches in diameter.
 · One time Dwayne Hoover got an advertisement through the mail for a penis-extender,
 made out of rubber. He could slip it over the end of his real penis, according to the ad,
 and thrill his wife or sweetheart with extra inches. They also wanted to sell him a lifelike
 rubber vagina for when he was lonesome.
 · Dwayne went back to work at about two in the afternoon, and he avoided
 everybody—because of his echolalia. He went into his inner office, and he ransacked
 his desk drawers for something to read or think about. He came across the brochure
 which offered him the penis-extender and the rubber vagina for lonesomeness. He had
 received it two months before. He still hadn't thrown it away.
 The brochure also offered him motion pictures such as the ones Kilgore Trout had
 seen in New York. There were still photographs taken from the movies, and these
 caused the sex excitation center in Dwayne's brain to send nerve impulses down to an
 erection center in his spine.
 The erection center caused the dorsal vein in his penis to tighten up, so blood could
 get in all right, but it couldn't get out again. It also relaxed the tiny arteries in his penis,
 so they filled up the spongy tissue of which Dwayne's penis was mainly composed, so
 that the penis got hard and stiff—like a plugged-up garden hose.
 So Dwayne called Francine Pefko on the telephone, even though she was only
 eleven feet away. "Francine—?" he said.
 "Yes?" she said.
 Dwayne fought down his echolalia. "I am going to ask you to do something I have
 never asked you to do before. Promise me you'll say yes."
 "I promise," she said.
 "I want you to walk out of here with me this very moment," he said, "and come with
 me to the Quality Motor Court at Shepherdstown."
 · Francine Pefko was willing to go to the Quality Motor Court with Dwayne. It was her
 duty to go, she thought— especially since Dwayne seemed so depressed and jangled.
 But she couldn't simply walk away from her desk for the afternoon, since her desk was
 the nerve center of Dwayne Hoover's Exit Eleven Pontiac Village.
 "You ought to have some crazy young teen-ager, who can rush off whenever you
 want her to," Francine told Dwayne.
 "I don't want a crazy teen-ager," said Dwayne. "I want you."
 "Then you're going to have to be patient," said Francine. She went back to the
 Service Department, to beg. Gloria Browning, the white cashier back there/to man her
 desk for a little while.
 Gloria didn't want to do it. She had had a hysterectomy only a month before, at the
 age of twenty-five—after a botched abortion at the Ramada Inn down in Green County,
 on Route 53, across from the entrance to Pioneer Village State Park.
 There was a mildly amazing coincidence here: the father of the destroyed fetus was
 Don Breedlove, the white gas-conversion unit installer who had raped Patty Keene in
 the parking lot of the Bannister Memorial Field-house.
 This was a man with a wife and three kids.
 · Francine had a sign on the wall over her desk, which had been given to her as a joke
 at the automobile agency's Christmas party at the new Holiday Inn the year before.
 It spelled out the truth of her situation. This was it:
 Gloria said she didn't want to man the nerve center. "I don't want to man anything,"
 she said.
 · But Gloria took over Francine's desk anyway. "I don't have nerve enough to commit
 suicide," she said, "so I might as well do anything anybody says—in the service of
 mankind."
 · Dwayne and Francine headed for Shepherdstown in separate cars, so as not to call
 attention to their love affair. Dwayne was in a demonstrator again. Francine was in her
 own red GTO. GTO stood for Gran Turismo Omologato. She had a sticker on her
 bumper which said this:
 It was certainly loyal of her to put that sticker on her car. she was always doing loyal
 things like that, always rooting for her man, always rooting for Dwayne.
 And Dwayne tried to reciprocate in little ways. For instance, he had been reading
 articles and books on sexual intercourse recently. There was a sexual revolution going
 on in the country, and women were demanding that men pay more attention to women's
 pleasure during sexual intercourse, and not just think of themselves. The key to their
 pleasure, they said, and scientists backed them up, was the clitoris, a tiny meat cylinder
 which was right above the hole in women where men were supposed to stick their much
 larger cylinders.
 Men were supposed to pay more attention to the clitoris, and Dwayne had been
 paying a lot more attention to Francine's, to the point where she said he was paying too
 much attention to it. This did not surprise him. The things he had read about the clitoris
 had said that this was a danger—that a man could pay too much attention to it.
 So, driving out to the Quality Motor Court that day, Dwayne was hoping that he would
 pay exactly the right amount of attention to Francine's clitoris.
 · Kilgore Trout once wrote a short novel about the importance of the clitoris in lovemaking.
 This was in response to a suggestion by his second wife, Darlene, that he
 could make a fortune with a dirty book. She told him that the hero should understand
 women so well that he could seduce anyone he wanted. So Trout wrote The Son of
 Jimmy Valentine.
 Jimmy Valentine was a famous made-up person in another writer's books, just as
 Kilgore Trout was a famous made-up person in my books. Jimmy Valentine in the other
 writer's books sandpapered his fingertips, so they were extrasensitive. He was a safecracker.
 His sense of feel was so delicate that he could open any safe in the world by
 feeling the tumblers fall.
 Kilgore Trout invented a son for Jimmy Valentine, named Ralston Valentine. Ralston
 Valentine also sandpapered his fingertips. But he wasn't a safe-cracker. Ralston was so
 good at touching women the way they wanted to be touched, that tens of thousands of
 them became his willing slaves. They abandoned their husbands or lovers for him, in
 Trout's story, and Ralston Valentine became President of the United States, thanks to
 the votes of women.
 · Dwayne and Francine made love in the Quality Motor Court. Then they stayed in bed
 for a while. It was a water bed. Francine had a beautiful body. So did Dwayne. "We
 never made love in the afternoon before," said Francine.
 "I felt so tense," said Dwayne.
 "I know," said Francine. "Are you better now?"
 "Yes." He was lying on his back. His ankles were crossed. His hands were folded
 behind his head. His great wang lay across his thigh like a salami. It slumbered now.
 "I love you so much," said Francine. She corrected herself. "I know I promised not to
 say that, but that's a promise I can't help breaking all the time." The thing was: Dwayne
 had made a pact with her that neither one of them was ever to mention love. Since
 Dwayne's wife had eaten Drano, Dwayne never wanted to hear about love ever again.
 The subject was too painful.
 Dwayne snuffled. It was customary for him to communicate by means of snuffles
 after sexual intercourse. The snuffles all had meanings which were bland: "That's all
 right . . . forget it... who could blame you?" And so on.
 "On Judgment Day," said Francine, "when they ask me what bad things I did down
 here, I'm going to have to tell them, "Well—there was a promise I made to a man I
 loved, and I broke it all the time. I promised him never to say I loved him.'"
 This generous, voluptuous woman, who had only ninety-six dollars and eleven cents
 a week in take-home pay, had lost her husband, Robert Pefko, in a war in Viet Nam. He
 was a career officer in the Army. He had a penis six and one-half inches long and one
 and seven-eighths inches in diameter.
 He was a graduate of West Point, a military academy which turned young men into
 homicidal maniacs for use in war.
 · Francine followed Robert from West Point to Parachute School at Fort Bragg, and
 then to South Korea, where Robert managed a Post Exchange, which was a
 department store for soldiers, and then to the University of Pennsylvania, where Robert
 took a Master's Degree in Anthropology, at Army expense, and then back to West Point,
 where Robert was an Assistant Professor of Social Sciences for three years.
 After that, Francine followed Robert to Midland City, where Robert oversaw the
 manufacture of a new sort of booby trap. A booby trap was an easily hidden explosive
 device, which blew up when it was accidentally twiddled in some way. One of the virtues
 of the new type of booby trap was that it could not be smelled by dogs. Various armies
 at that time were training dogs to sniff out booby traps.
 · When Robert and Francine were in Midland City, there weren't any other military
 people around, so they made their first civilian friends. And Francine took a job with
 Dwayne Hoover, in order to augment her husband's salary and fill her days.
 But then Robert was sent to Viet Nam.
 Shortly after that, Dwayne's wife ate Drano and Robert was shipped home in a plastic
 body bag.
 · "I pity men," said Francine, there in the Quality Motor Court. She was sincere. "I
 wouldn't want to be a man— they take such chances, they work so hard." They were on
 the second floor of the motel. Their sliding glass doors gave them a view of an iron
 railing and a concrete terrace outside—and then Route 103, and then the wall and the
 rooftops of the Adult Correctional Institution beyond that
 "I don't wonder you're tired and nervous," Francine went on. "If I was a man, I'd be
 tired and nervous, too. I guess God made women so men could relax and be treated
 like little babies from time to time." She was more than satisfied with this arrangement.
 Dwayne snuffled. The air was rich with the smell of raspberries, which was the
 perfume in the disinfectant and roach-killer the motel used.
 Francine mused about the prison, where the guards were all white and most of the
 prisoners were black. "Is it true," she said, "that nobody ever escaped from there?"
 It's true," said Dwayne.
 · "When was the last time they used the electric chair?" said Francine. She was asking
 about a device in the basement of the prison, which looked like this:
 The purpose of it was to kill people by jazzing them with more electricity than their
 bodies could stand. Dwayne Hoover had seen it twice-once during a tour of
 the prison by members of the Chamber of Commerce years ago, and then again when it
 was actually used on a black human being he knew.
 · Dwayne tried to remember when the last execution took place at Shepherdstown.
 Executions had become unpopular. There were signs that they might become popular
 again. Dwayne and Francine tried to remember the most recent electrocution anywhere
 in the country which had stuck in their minds.
 They remembered the double execution of a man and wife for treason. The couple
 had supposedly given secrets about how to make a hydrogen bomb to another country.
 They remembered the double execution of a man and woman who were lovers. The
 man was good-looking and sexy, and he used to seduce ugly old women who had
 money, and then he and the woman he really loved would kill the women for their
 money. The woman he really loved was young, but she certainly wasn't pretty in the
 conventional sense. She weighed two hundred and forty pounds.
 Francine wondered out loud why a thin, good-looking young man would love a
 woman that heavy.
 "It takes all kinds," said Dwayne.
 · "You know what I keep thinking?" said Francine.
 Dwayne snuffled.
 "This would be a very good location for a Colonel Sanders Kentucky Fried Chicken
 franchise."
 Dwayne's relaxed body contracted as though each muscle in it had been stung by a
 drop of lemon juice.
 Here was the problem: Dwayne wanted Francine to love him for his body and soul,
 not for what his money could buy. He thought Francine was hinting that he should buy
 her a Colonel Sanders Kentucky Fried Chicken franchise, which was a scheme for
 selling fried chicken.
 A chicken was a flightless bird which looked like this:
 The idea was to kill it and pull out all its feathers, and cut off its head and feet and
 scoop out its internal organs —and then chop it into pieces and fry the pieces, and put
 the pieces in a waxed paper bucket with a lid on it, so it looked like this:
 · Francine, who had been so proud of her capacity to make Dwayne relax, was now
 ashamed to have made him tighten up again. He was as rigid as an ironing board. "Oh
 my God—" she said, "what's the matter now?"
 "If you're going to ask me for presents," said Dwayne, "just do me a favor—and don't
 hint around right after we've made love. Let's keep love-making and presents separate.
 O.K.?"
 "I don't even know what you think I asked for," said Francine.
 Dwayne mimicked her cruelly in a falsetto voice: "I don't even know what you think I
 asked you for,'" he said. He looked about as pleasant and relaxed as a coiled
 rattlesnake now. It was his bad chemicals, of course, which were compelling him to look
 like that. A real rattlesnake looked like this:
 The Creator of the Universe had put a rattle on its tail. The Creator had also given it
 front teeth which were hypodermic syringes filled with deadly poison.
 · Sometimes I wonder about the Creator of the Universe.
 · Another animal invented by the Creator of the Universe was a Mexican beetle which
 could make a blank-cartridge gun out of its rear end. It could detonate its own farts and
 knock over other bugs with shock waves. Word of Honor—I read about it in an article on
 strange animals in Diners' Club Magazine.
 · So Francine got off the bed in order not to share it with the seeming rattlesnake. She
 was aghast. All she could say over and over again was, "You're my man. You're my
 man." This meant that she was willing to agree about anything with Dwayne, to do
 anything for him, no matter how difficult or disgusting, to think up nice things to do for
 him that he didn't even notice, to die for him, if necessary, and so on.
 She honestly tried to live that way. She couldn't imagine anything better to do. So she
 fell apart when Dwayne persisted in his nastiness. He told her that every woman was a
 whore, and every whore had her price, and Francine's price was what a Colonel
 Sanders Kentucky Fried Chicken franchise would cost, which would be well over one
 hundred thousand dollars by the time adequate parking and exterior lighting and all that
 was taken into consideration, and so on.
 Francine replied in blubbering gibberish that she had never wanted the franchise for
 herself, that she had wanted it for Dwayne, that everything she wanted was for Dwayne.
 Some of the words came through. "I thought of all the people who come out here to visit
 their relatives in prison, and I realized how most of them were black, and I thought how
 much black people liked fried chicken," she said.
 "So you want me to open a Nigger joint?" said Dwayne. And so on. So Francine now
 had the distinction of being the second close associate of Dwayne's who discovered
 how vile he could be.
 "Harry LeSabre was right," said Francine. She was backed up against the cement
 block wall of the motel room now, with her fingers spread over her mouth. Harry
 LeSabre, of course, was Dwayne's transvestite sales manager. "He said you'd
 changed," said Francine. She made a cage of fingers around her mouth. "Oh, God,
 Dwayne—" she said, "you've changed, you've changed."
 "Maybe it was time!" said Dwayne. "I never felt better in my life!" And so on.
 · Harry LeSabre was at that moment crying, too. He was at home—in bed. He had a
 purple velvet sheet over his head. He was well-to-do. He had invested in the stock
 market very intelligently and luckily over the years. He had bought one hundred shares
 of Xerox, for instance, for eight dollars a share. With the passage of time, his shares
 had become one hundred times as valuable, simply lying in the total darkness and
 silence of a safe-deposit box.
 There was a lot of money magic like that going on. It was almost as though some
 blue fairy were flitting about that part of the dying planet, waving her magic wand over
 certain deeds and bonds and stock certificates.
 · Harry's wife, Grace, was stretched out on a chaise longue at some distance from the
 bed. She was smoking a small cigar in a long holder made from the legbone of a stork.
 A stork was a large European bird, about half the size of a Bermuda Ern. Children who
 wanted to know where babies came from were sometimes told that they were brought
 by storks. People who told their children such a thing felt that their children were too
 young to think intelligently about wide-open beavers and all that.
 And there were actually pictures of storks delivering babies on birth announcements
 and in cartoons and so on, for children to see. A typical one might look like this:
 Dwayne Hoover and Harry LeSabre saw pictures like that when they were very little
 boys. They believed them, too.
 · Grace LeSabre expressed her contempt for the good opinion of Dwayne Hoover,
 which her husband felt he had lost. "Fuck Dwayne Hoover," she said. "Fuck Midland
 City. Let's sell the God damn Xerox stock and buy a condominium on Maui." Maui was
 one of the Hawaiian Islands. It was widely believed to be a paradise.
 "Listen," said Grace, "we're the only white people hi Midland City with any kind of sex
 life, as nearly as I can tell. You're not a freak. Dwayne Hoover's the freak! How many
 orgasms do you think he has a month?"
 "I don't know," said Harry from his humid tent.
 Dwayne's monthly orgasm rate on the average over the past ten years, which
 included the last years of his marriage, was two and one-quarter. Grace's guess was
 close. "One point five," she said. Her own monthly average over the same period was
 eighty-seven. Her husband's average was thirty-six. He had been slowing up in recent
 years, which was one of many reasons he had for feeling panicky.
 Grace now spoke loudly and scornfully about Dwayne's marriage. "He was so scared
 of sex," she said, "he married a woman who had never heard of the subject, who was
 guaranteed to destroy herself, if she ever did hear about it." And so on. "Which she
 finally did," she said.
 · "Can the reindeer hear you?" said Harry.
 "Fuck the reindeer," said Grace. Then she added, "No, the reindeer cannot hear."
 Reindeer was their code word for the black maid, who was far away in the kitchen at the
 time. It was their code word for black people in general. It allowed them to speak of the
 black problem in the city, which was a big one, without giving offense to any black
 person who might overhear.
 "The reindeer's asleep—or reading the Black Panther Digest," she said.
 · The reindeer problem was essentially this: Nobody white had much use for black
 people anymore—except for the gangsters who sold the black people used cars and
 dope and furniture. Still, the reindeer went on reproducing. There were these useless,
 big black animals everywhere, and a lot of them had very bad dispositions. They were
 given small amounts of money every month, so they wouldn't have to steal. There was
 talk of giving them very cheap dope, too—to keep them listless and cheerful, and
 uninterested in reproduction.
 The Midland City Police Department, and the Midland County Sheriffs Department,
 were composed mainly of white men. They had racks and racks of submachine guns
 and twelve-gauge automatic shotguns for an open season on reindeer, which was
 bound to come.
 "Listen—I'm serious," said Grace to Harry. "This is the asshole of the Universe. Let's
 split to a condominium on Maui and live for a change."
 So they did.
 · Dwayne's bad chemicals meanwhile changed his manner toward Francine from
 nastiness to pitiful dependency. He apologized to her for ever thinking that she wanted
 a Colonel Sanders Kentucky Fried Chicken franchise. He gave her full credit for
 unflagging unselfishness. He begged her to just hold him for a while, which she did.
 "I'm so confused," he said.
 "We all are," she said. She cradled his head against her breasts.
 "I've got to talk to somebody," said Dwayne.
 "You can talk to Mommy, if you want," said Francine. She meant that she was
 Mommy.
 "Tell me what life is all about," Dwayne begged her fragrant bosom.
 "Only God knows that," said Francine.
 · Dwayne was silent for a while. And then he told her haltingly about a trip he had made
 to the headquarters of the Pontiac Division of General Motors at Pontiac, Michigan, only
 three months after his wife ate Drano.
 "We were given a tour of all the research facilities," he said. The thing that impressed
 him most, he said, was a series of laboratories and out-of-doors test areas where
 various parts of automobiles and even entire automobiles were destroyed. Pontiac
 scientists set upholstery on fire, threw gravel at windshields, snapped crankshafts and
 driveshafts, staged head-on collisions, tore gearshift levers out by the roots, ran engines
 at high speeds with almost no lubrication, opened and closed glove compartment doors
 a hundred times a minute for days, cooled dashboard clocks to within a few degrees of
 absolute zero, and so on.
 "Everything you're not supposed to do to a car, they did to a car," Dwayne said to
 Francine. "And I'll never forget the sign on the front door of the building where all that
 torture went on." Here was the sign Dwayne described to Francine:
 "I saw that sign," said Dwayne, "and I couldn't help wondering if that was what God
 put me on Earth for-to find out how much a man could take without breaking."
 · "I've lost my way," said Dwayne. 1 need somebody to take me by the hand and lead
 me out of the woods."
 "You're tired," she said. "Why wouldn't you be tired? You work so hard. I feel sorry for
 men, they work so hard. You want to sleep for a while?"
 "I can't sleep," said Dwayne, "until I get some answers."
 "You want to go to a doctor?" said Francine.
 "I don't want to hear the kinds of things doctors say," said Dwayne. "I want to talk to
 somebody brand new. Francine," he said, and he dug his fingers into her soft arm, "I
 want to hear new things from new people. I've heard everything anybody in Midland City
 ever said, ever will say. It's got to be somebody new."
 "Like who?" said Francine.
 "I don't know," said Dwayne. "Somebody from Mars, maybe."
 "We could go to some other city," said Francine.
 "They're all like here. They're all the same," said Dwayne.
 Francine had an idea. "What about all these painters and writers and composers
 coming to town?" she said. "You never talked to anybody like that before. Maybe you
 should talk to one of them. They don't think like other people."
 "I've tried everything else," said Dwayne. He brightened. He nodded. "You're right!
 The Festival could give me a brand new viewpoint on life!" he said.
 "That's what it's for," said Francine. "Use it!"
 "I will" said Dwayne. This was a bad mistake.
 · Kilgore Trout, hitchhiking westward, ever westward, had meanwhile become a
 passenger in a Ford Galaxie. The man at the controls of the Galaxie was a traveling
 salesman for a device which engulfed the rear ends of trucks at loading docks. It was a
 telescoping tunnel of rubberized canvas, and it looked like this in action:
 The idea of the gadget was to allow people in a building to load or unload trucks
 without losing cold air in the summertime or hot air in the wintertime to the out-of-doors.
 The man in control of the Galaxie also sold large spools for wire and cable and rope.
 He also sold fire extinguishers. He was a manufacturer's representative, he explained.
 He was his own boss, in that he represented products whose manufacturers couldn't
 afford salesmen of their own.
 "I make my own hours, and I pick the products I sell. The products don't sell me," he
 said. His name was Andy Lieber. He was thirty-two. He was white. He was a good deal
 overweight like so many people in the country. He was obviously a happy man. He
 drove like a maniac. The Galaxie was going ninety-two miles an hour now. "I'm one of
 the few remaining free men in America," he said.
 He had a penis one inch in diameter and seven and a half inches long. During the
 past year, he had averaged twenty-two orgasms per month. This was far above the
 national average. His income and the value of his life insurance policies at maturity
 were also far above average.
 · Trout wrote a novel one time which he called How You Doin'? and it was about
 national averages for this and that. An advertising agency on another planet had a suc
 cessful campaign for the local equivalent of Earthling peanut butter. The eye-catching
 part of each ad was the statement of some sort of average—the average number of
 children, the average size of the male sex organ on that particular planet—which was
 two inches long, with an inside diameter of three inches and an outside diameter of four
 and a quarter inches—and so on. The ads invited the readers to discover whether they
 were superior or inferior to the majority, in this respect or that one—whatever the
 respect was for that particular ad.
 The ad went on to say that superior and inferior people alike ate such and such
 brand of peanut butter. Except that it wasn't really peanut butter on that planet. It was
 Shazzbutter.
 And so on.
 Chapter 16
 And the peanut butter-eaters on Earth were preparing to conquer the shazzbuttereaters
 on the planet in the book by Kilgore Trout. By this time, the Earthlings hadn't just
 demolished West Virginia and Southeast Asia. They had demolished everything. So
 they were ready to go pioneering again.
 They studied the shazzbutter-eaters by means of electronic snooping, and
 determined that they were too numerous and proud and resourceful ever to allow themselves
 to be pioneered.
 So the Earthlings infiltrated the ad agency which had the shazzbutter account, and
 they buggered the statistics in the ads. They made the average for everything so high
 that everybody on the planet felt inferior to the majority in every respect.
 · And then the Earthling armored space ships came in and discovered the planet. Only
 token resistance was offered here and there, because the natives felt so below average.
 And then the pioneering began.
 · Trout asked the happy manufacturer's representative what it felt like to drive a
 Galaxie, which was the name of the car. The driver didn't hear him, and Trout let it go. It
 was a dumb play on words, so that Trout was asking simultaneously what it was like to
 drive the car and what it was like to steer something like the Milky Way, which was one
 hundred thousand light-years in diameter and ten thousand light-years thick. It revolved
 once every two hundred million years. It contained about one hundred billion stars.
 And then Trout saw that a simple fire extinguisher in the Galaxie had this brand
 name:
 As far as Trout knew, this word meant higher in a dead language. It was also a thing
 a fictitious mountain climber in a famous poem kept yelling as he disappeared into a
 blizzard up above. And it was also the trade name for wood shavings which were used
 to protect fragile objects inside packages.
 "Why would anybody name a fire extinguisher Excelsior?" Trout asked the driver.
 The driver shrugged. "Somebody must have liked the sound of it," he said.
 · Trout looked out at the countryside, which was smeared by high velocity. He saw this
 sign:
 So he was getting really close to Dwayne Hoover. And, as though the Creator of the
 Universe or some other supernatural power were preparing him for the meeting, Trout
 felt the urge to thumb through his own book, Now It Can Be Told. This was the book
 which would soon turn Dwayne into a homicidal maniac.
 The premise of the book was this: Life was an experiment by the Creator of the
 Universe, Who wanted to test a new sort of creature He was thinking of introducing into
 the Universe. It was a creature with the ability to make up its own mind. All the other
 creatures were fully-programmed robots.
 The book was in the form of a long letter from The Creator of the Universe to the
 experimental creature. The Creator congratulated the creature and apologized for all the
 discomfort he had endured. The Creator invited him to a banquet in his honor in the
 Empire Room of the Waldorf Astoria Hotel in New York City, where a black robot named
 Sammy Davis, Jr., would sing and dance.
 · And the experimental creature wasn't killed after the banquet. He was transferred to a
 virgin planet instead. Living cells were sliced from the palms of his hands, while he was
 unconscious. The operation didn't hurt at all.
 And then the cells were stirred into a soupy sea on the virgin planet. They would
 evolve into ever more complicated life forms as the eons went by. Whatever shapes
 they assumed, they would have free will.
 Trout didn't give the experimental creature a proper name. He simply called him The
 Man.
 On the virgin planet, The Man was Adam and the sea was Eve.
 · The Man often sauntered by the sea. Sometimes he waded in his Eve. Sometimes he
 swam in her, but she was too soupy for an invigorating swim. She made her Adam feel
 sleepy and sticky afterwards, so he would dive into an icy stream that had just jumped
 off a mountain.
 He screamed when he dived into the icy water, screamed again when he came up for
 air. He bloodied his shins and laughed about it when he scrambled up rocks to get out
 of the water.
 He panted and laughed some more, and he thought of something amazing to yell.
 The Creator never knew what he was going to yell, since The Creator had no control
 over him. The Man himself got to decide what he was going to do next—and why. After
 a dip one day, for instance, The Man yelled this: "Cheese!"
 Another time he yelled, "Wouldn't you really rather drive a Buick?"
 · The only other big animal on the virgin planet was an angel who visited The Man
 occasionally. He was a messenger and an investigator for the Creator of the Universe.
 He took the form of an eight hundred pound male cinnamon bear. He was a robot, too,
 and so was The Creator, according to Kilgore Trout.
 The bear was attempting to get a line on why The Man did what he did. He would
 ask, for instance, "Why did you yell, 'Cheese'?"
 And The Man would tell him mockingly, "Because I felt like it, you stupid machine."
 · Here is what The Man's tombstone on the virgin planet looked like at the end of the
 book by Kilgore Trout:
 
 Chapter 17
 Bunny Hoover, Dwayne's homosexual son, was dressing for work now. He was the
 piano player in the cocktail lounge of the new Holiday Inn. He was poor. He lived alone
 in a room without bath in the old Fairchild Hotel, which used to be fashionable. It was a
 flophouse now—in the most dangerous part of Midland City.
 Very soon, Bunny Hoover would be seriously injured by Dwayne, would soon share
 an ambulance with Kilgore Trout.
 · Bunny was pale, the same unhealthy color of the blind fish that used to live in the
 bowels of Sacred Miracle Cave. Those fish were extinct. They had all turned belly-up
 years ago, had been flushed from the cave and into the Ohio River—to turn belly-up, to
 go bang in the noonday sun.
 Bunny avoided the sunshine, too. And the water from the taps of Midland City was
 becoming more poisonous every day. He ate very little. He prepared his own food in his
 room. The preparation was simple, since vegetables and fruits were all he ate, and he
 munched them raw.
 He not only did without dead meat—he did without living meat, too, without friends or
 lovers or pets. He had once been highly popular. When he was at Prairie Military
 Academy, for instance, the student body was unanimous in electing him Cadet Colonel,
 the highest rank possible, in his senior year.
 · When Bunny played the piano bar at the Holiday Inn, he had many, many secrets.
 One of them was this: he wasn't really there. He was able to absent himself from the
 cocktail lounge, and from the planet itself, for that matter, by means of Transcendental
 Meditation. He learned this technique from Maharishi Mahesh Yogi, who once stopped
 off in Midland City during a world-wide lecture tour.
 Maharishi Mahesh Yogi, in exchange for a new handkerchief, a piece of fruit, a bunch
 of flowers, and thirty-five dollars, taught Bunny to close his eyes, and to say this
 euphonious nonsense word to himself over and over again: "Aye-eeeeem, aye-eeeeem,
 aye-eeeeem." Bunny sat on the edge of his bed in the hotel room now, and he did it.
 "Aye-eeeeem, aye-eeeeem," he said to himself— internally. The rhythm of the chant
 matched one syllable \with each two beats in his heart. He closed his eyes. He became
 a skin diver in the depths of his mind. The depths were seldom used.
 His heart slowed. His respiration nearly stopped. A single word floated by in the
 depths. It had somehow escaped from the busier parts of his mind. It wasn't connected
 to anything. It floated by lazily, a translucent, scarf-like fish. The word was untroubling.
 Here was the word: "Blue." Here is what it looked like to Bunny Hoover:
 And then another lovely scarf swam by. It looked like this:
 · Fifteen minutes later, Bunny's awareness bobbed to the surface of its own accord.
 Bunny was refreshed. He got up from the bed, and he brushed his hair with the military
 brushes his mother had given him when he was elected Cadet Colonel so long ago.
 · Bunny was sent away to military school, an institution devoted to homicide and
 absolutely humorless obedience, when he was only ten years old. Here is why: He told
 Dwayne that he wished he were a woman instead of a man, because what men did was
 so often cruel and ugly.
 · Listen: Bunny Hoover went to Prairie Military Academy for eight years of uninterrupted
 sports, buggery and Fascism. Buggery consisted of sticking one's penis in somebody
 else's asshole or mouth, or having it done to one by somebody else. Fascism was a
 fairly popular political philosophy which made sacred whatever nation and race the
 philosopher happened to belong to. It called for an autocratic, centralized government,
 headed up by a dictator. The dictator had to be obeyed, no matter what he told
 somebody to do.
 And Bunny would bring new medals with him every time he came home for vacation.
 He could fence and box and wrestle and swim, he could shoot a rifle and a pistol, fight
 with bayonets, ride a horse, creep and crawl through shrubbery, peek around corners
 without being seen.
 He would show off his medals, and his mother would tell him when his father was out
 of hearing that she was becoming unhappier with each passing day. She would hint that
 Dwayne was a monster. It wasn't true. It was all in her head.
 She would begin to tell Bunny what was so vile about Dwayne, but she always
 stopped short. "You're too young to hear about such things," she'd say, even when
 Bunny was sixteen years old. "There's nothing you or anybody could do about them
 anyway." She would pretend to lock her lips with a key, and then whisper to Bunny,
 "These are secrets I will carry to my grave."
 Her biggest secret, of course, was one that Bunny didn't detect until she knocked
 herself off with Drano: Celia Hoover was crazy as a bedbug.
 My mother was, too.
 · Listen: Bunny's mother and my mother were different sorts of human beings, but they
 were both beautiful in exotic ways, and they both boiled over with chaotic talk about love
 and peace and wars and evil and desperation, of better days coming by and by, of
 worse days coming by and by. And both our mothers committed suicide. Bunny's
 mother ate Drano. My mother ate sleeping pills, which wasn't nearly as horrible.
 · And Bunny's mother and my mother had one really bizarre symptom in common:
 neither one could stand to have her picture taken. They were usually fine in the daytime.
 They usually concealed their frenzies until late at night. But, if somebody aimed a
 camera at either one of them during the daytime, the mother who was aimed at would
 crash down on her knees and protect her head with her arms, as though somebody was
 about to club her to death. It was a scary and pitiful thing to see.
 · At least Bunny's mother taught him how to control a piano, which was a music
 machine. At least Bunny Hoover's mother taught him a trade. A good piano controller
 could get a job making music in cocktail lounges almost anywhere in the world, and
 Bunny was a good one. His military training was useless, despite all the medals he won.
 The armed forces knew he was a homosexual, that he was certain to fall in love with
 other fighting men, and the armed forces didn't want to put up with such love affairs.
 · So Bunny Hoover now got ready to practice his trade. He slipped a black velvet
 dinner jacket over a black turtleneck sweater now. Bunny looked out his only window at
 the alleyway. The better rooms afforded views of Fairchild Park, where there had been
 fifty-six murders in the past two years. Bunny's room was on the second floor, so his
 window framed a piece of the blank brick side of what used to be the Keedsler Opera
 House.
 There was an historical marker on the front of the former opera house. Not many
 people could understand it, but this is what it said:
 The Opera House used to be the home of the Midland City Symphony Orchestra,
 which was an amateur group of music enthusiasts. But they became homeless in 1927,
 when the Opera House became a motion picture house, The Bannister. The orchestra
 remained homeless, too, until the Mildred Barry Memorial Center for the Arts went up.
 And The Bannister was the city's leading movie house for many years, until it was
 engulfed by the high crime district, which was moving north all the time. So it wasn't a
 theater anymore, even though there were still busts of Shakespeare and Mozart and so
 on gazing down from niches in the walls inside.
 The stage was still in there, too, but it was crowded with dinette sets now. The
 Empire Furniture Company had taken over the premises now. It was gangstercontrolled.
 · The nickname for Bunny's neighborhood was Skid Row. Every American town of any
 size had a neighborhood with the same nickname: Skid Row. It was a place where
 people who didn't have any friends or relatives or property or usefulness or ambition
 were supposed to go.
 People like that would be treated with disgust in other neighborhoods, and policemen
 would keep them moving. They were as easy to move, usually, as toy balloons.
 And they would drift hither and yon, like balloons filled with some gas slightly heavier
 than air, until they came to rest in Skid Row, against the foundations of the old Fairchild
 Hotel.
 They could snooze and mumble to each other all day long. They could beg. They
 could get drunk. The basic scheme was this one: they were to stay there and not bother
 anybody anywhere else—until they were murdered for thrills, or until they were frozen to
 death by the wintertime.
 · Kilgore Trout wrote a story one time about a town which decided to tell derelicts
 where they were and what was about to happen to them by putting up actual street
 signs like this:
 Bunny now smiled at himself in the mirror, in the leak.
 He called himself to attention for a moment, became again the insufferably brainless,
 humorless, heartless soldier he had learned to be in military school. He murmured the
 motto of the school, a motto he used to have to shout about a hundred times a day—at
 dawn, at meals, at the start of every class, at games, at bayonet practice, at sunset, at
 bedtime: "Can do," he said. "Can do."
 Chapter 18
 The Galaxie in which Kilgore Trout was a passenger was on the Interstate now, close
 to Midland City. It was creeping. It was trapped in rush hour traffic from Barrytron and
 Western Electric and Prairie Mutual. Trout looked up from his reading, saw a billboard
 which said this:
 So Sacred Miracle Cave had become a part of the past.
 · As an old, old man, Trout would be asked by Dr. Thor Lembrig, the Secretary-General
 of the United Nations, if he feared the future. He would give this reply:
 "Mr. Secretary-General, it is the past which scares the bejesus out of me."
 · Dwayne Hoover was only four miles away. He was sitting alone on a zebra-skin
 banquette in the cocktail lounge of the new Holiday Inn. It was dark in there, and quiet,
 too. The glare and uproar of rush hour traffic on the Interstate was blocked out by thick
 drapes of crimson velvet. On each table was a hurricane lamp with a candle inside,
 although the air was still.
 On each table was a bowl of dry-roasted peanuts, too, and a sign which allowed the
 staff to refuse service to anyone who was inharmonious with the mood of the lounge.
 Here is what it said:
 · Bunny Hoover was controlling the piano. He had not looked up when his father came
 in. Neither had his father glanced in his direction. They had not exchanged greetings for
 many years.
 Bunny went on playing his white man's blues. They were slow and tinkling, with
 capricious silences here and there. Bunny's blues had some of the qualities of a music
 box, a tired music box. They tinkled, stopped, then reluctantly, torpidly, they managed a
 few tinkles more.
 Bunny's mother used to collect tinkling music boxes, among other things.
 · Listen: Francine Pefko was at Dwayne's automobile agency next door. She was
 catching up on all the work she should have done that afternoon. Dwayne would beat
 her up very soon.
 And the only other person on the property with her as she typed and filed was Wayne
 Hoobler, the black parolee, who still lurked among the used cars. Dwayne would try to
 beat him up, too, but Wayne was a genius at dodging blows.
 Francine was pure machinery at the moment, a machine made of meat—a typing
 machine, a filing machine.
 Wayne Hoobler, on the other hand, had nothing machine-like to do. He ached to be a
 useful machine. The used cars were all locked up tight for the night. Now and then
 aluminum propellers on a wire overhead would be turned by a lazy breeze, and Wayne
 would respond to them as best he could. "Go," he would say to them. "Spin 'roun."
 · He established a sort of relationship with the traffic on the Interstate, too, appreciating
 its changing moods. "Everybody goin' home," he said during the rush hour jam.
 "Everybody home now," he said later on, when the traffic thinned out. Now the sun was
 going down.
 "Sun goin' down," said Wayne Hoobler. He had no clues as to where to go next. He
 supposed without minding much that he might die of exposure that night. He had never
 seen death by exposure, had never been threatened by it, since he had so seldom been
 out-of-doors. He knew of death by exposure because the papery voice of the little radio
 in his cell told of people's dying of exposure from time to time.
 He missed that papery voice. He missed the clash of steel doors. He missed the
 bread and the stew and the pitchers of milk and coffee. He missed fucking other men in
 the mouth and the asshole, and being fucked in the mouth and the asshole, and jerking
 off—and fucking cows in the prison dairy, all events in a normal sex Me on the planet,
 as far as he knew.
 Here would be a good tombstone for Wayne Hoobler when he died:
 · The dairy at the prison provided milk and cream and butter and cheese and ice cream
 not only for the prison and the County Hospital. It sold its products to the outside world,
 too. Its trademark didn't mention prison. This was it:
 · Wayne couldn't read very well. The words Hawaii and Hawaiian, for instance,
 appeared in combination with more familiar words and symbols in signs painted on the
 windows of the showroom and on the windshields of some used cars. Wayne tried to
 decode the mysterious words phonetically, without any satisfaction. "Wahee-io," he
 would say, and "Hoo-he-woo-hi," and so on.
 · Wayne Hoobler smiled now, not because he was happy but because, with so little to
 do, he thought he might as well show off his teeth. They were excellent teeth. The Adult
 Correctional Institution at Shepherdstown was proud of its dentistry program.
 It was such a famous dental program, in fact, that it had been written up in medical
 journals and in the Reader's Digest, which was the dying planet's most popular
 magazine. The theory behind the program was that many ex-convicts could not or
 would not get jobs because of their appearances, and good looks began with good
 teeth.
 The program was so famous, in fact, that police even in neighboring states, when
 they picked up a poor man with expensively maintained teeth, fillings and bridgework
 and all that, were likely to ask him, "All right, boy—how many years you spend in
 Shepherdstown?"
 · Wayne Hoobler heard some of the orders which a waitress called to the bartender in
 the cocktail lounge. Wayne heard her call, "Gilbey's and quinine, with a twist." He had
 no idea what that was—or a Manhattan or a brandy Alexander or a sloe gin fizz. "Give
 me a Johnny Walker Rob Roy," she called, "and a Southern Comfort on the rocks, and
 a Bloody Mary with Wolfschmidt's."
 Wayne's only experiences with alcohol had had to do with drinking cleaning fluids and
 eating shoepolish and so on. He had no fondness for alcohol.
 · "Give me a Black and White and water," he heard the waitress say, and Wayne
 should have pricked up his ears at that. That particular drink wasn't for any ordinary person.
 That drink was for the person who had created all Wayne's misery to date, who
 could kill him or make him a millionaire or send him back to prison or do whatever he
 damn pleased with Wayne. That drink was for me.
 · I had come to the Arts Festival incognito. I was there to watch a confrontation
 between two human beings I had created: Dwayne Hoover and Kilgore Trout. I was not
 eager to be recognized. The waitress lit the hurricane lamp on my table. I pinched out
 the flame with my fingers. I had bought a pair of sunglasses at a Holiday Inn outside of
 Ashtabula, Ohio, where I spent the night before. I wore them in the darkness now. They
 looked like this:
 The lenses were silvered, were mirrors to anyone looking my way. Anyone wanting to
 know what my eyes were like was confronted with his or her own twin reflections.
 Where other people in the cocktail lounge had eyes, I had two holes into another
 universe. I had leaks.
 · There was a book of matches on my table, next to my Pall Mall cigarettes.
 Here is the message on the book of matches, which I read an hour and a half later,
 while Dwayne was beating the daylights out of Francine Pefko:
 "It's easy to make $100 a week in your spare time by showing comfortable, latest
 style Mason shoes to your friends. EVERYBODY goes for Mason shoes with their many
 special comfort features 1 We'll send FREE money-making kit so you can run your
 business from home. Well even tell you how you can earn shoes FREE OF COST as a
 bonus for taking profitable orders!"
 And so on.
 · This is a very bad book you're writing," I said to myself behind my leaks.
 "I know," I said.
 "You're afraid you'll kill yourself the way your mother did," I said.
 "I know," I said.
 · There in the cocktail lounge, peering out through my leaks at a world of my own
 invention, I mouthed this word: schizophrenia.
 The sound and appearance of the word had fascinated me for many years. It
 sounded and looked to me like a human being sneezing in a blizzard of soap flakes.
 I did not and do not know for certain that I have that disease. This much I knew and
 know: I was making myself hideously uncomfortable by not narrowing my attention to
 details of life which were immediately important, and by refusing to believe what my
 neighbors believed.
 · I am better now.
 Word of honor: I am better now.
 · I was really sick for a while, though. I sat there in a cocktail lounge of my own
 invention, and I stared through my leaks at a white cocktail waitress of my own
 invention. I named her Bonnie MacMahon. I had her bring Dwayne Hoover his
 customary drink, which was a House of Lords martini with a twist of lemon peel. She
 was a longtime acquaintance of Dwayne's. Her husband was a guard in the Sexual
 Offenders' Wing of the Adult Correctional Institution. Bonnie had to work as a waitress
 because her husband lost all their money by investing it in a car wash in
 Shepherdstown.
 Dwayne had advised them not to do it. Here is how Dwayne knew her and her
 husband Ralph: They had bought nine Pontiacs from him over the past sixteen years.
 "We're a Pontiac family," they'd say.
 Bonnie made a joke now as she served him his martini. She made the same joke
 every time she served anybody a martini. "Breakfast of Champions," she said.
 · The expression "Breakfast of Champions" is a registered trademark of General Mills,
 Inc., for use on a breakfast cereal product. The use of the identical expression as the
 title for this book as well as throughout the book is not intended to indicate an
 association with or sponsorship by General Mills, nor is it intended to disparage their
 fine products.
 · Dwayne was hoping that some of the distinguished visitors to the Arts Festival, who
 were all staying at the Inn, would come into the cocktail lounge. He wanted to talk to
 them, if he could, to discover whether they had truths about life which he had never
 heard before. Here is what he hoped new truths might do for him: enable him to laugh at
 his troubles, to go on living, and to keep out of the North Wing of the Midland County
 General Hospital, which was for lunatics.
 While he waited for an artist to appear, he consoled himself with the only artistic
 creation of any depth and mystery which was stored in his head. It was a poem he had
 been forced to learn by heart during his sophomore year in Sugar Creek High School,
 the elite white high school at the time. Sugar Creek High was a Nigger high school now.
 Here was the poem:
 The Moving Finger writes; and, having writ,
 Moves on: nor all your Piety nor Wit
 Shall lure it back to cancel half a Line
 Nor all your Tears wash out a Word of it.
 Some poem!
 · And Dwayne was so open to new suggestions about the meaning of life that he was
 easily hypnotized. So, when he looked down into his martini, he was put into a trance by
 dancing myriads of winking eyes on the surface of his drink. The eyes were beads of
 lemon oil.
 Dwayne missed it when two distinguished visitors to the Arts Festival came in and sat
 down on barstools next to Bunny's piano. They were white. They were Beatrice
 Keedsler, the Gothic novelist, and Rabo Karabekian, the minimal painter.
 Bunny's piano, a Steinway baby grand, was armored with pumpkin-colored Formica
 and ringed with stools. People could eat and drink from the piano. On the previous
 Thanksgiving, a family of eleven had had Thanksgiving dinner served on the piano.
 Bunny played.
 · "This has to be the asshole of the Universe," said Rabo Karabekian, the minimal
 painter.
 Beatrice Keedsler, the Gothic novelist, had grown up in Midland City. "I was petrified
 about coming home after all these years," she said to Karabekian.
 "Americans are always afraid of coming home," said Karabekian, "with good reason,
 may I say."
 "They used to have good reason," said Beatrice, "but not anymore. The past has
 been rendered harmless. I would tell any wandering American now, 'Of course you can
 go home again, and as often as you please. It's just a motel.'"
 · Traffic on the westbound barrel of the Interstate had come to a halt a mile east of the
 new Holiday Inn—because of a fatal accident on Exit 10A. Drivers and passengers got
 out of their cars—to stretch their legs and find out, if they could, what the trouble was up
 ahead.
 Kilgore Trout was among those who got out. He learned from others that the new
 Holiday Inn was within easy walking distance. So he gathered up his parcels from the
 front seat of the Galaxie. He thanked the driver, whose name he had forgotten, and he
 began to trudge.
 He also began to assemble in his mind a system of beliefs which would be
 appropriate to his narrow mission in Midland City, which was to show provincials, who
 were bent on exalting creativity, a would-be creator who had failed and failed. He
 paused in his trudge to examine himself in the rearview mirror, the rearview leak, of a
 truck locked up in traffic. The tractor was pulling two trailers instead of one. Here was
 the message the owners of the rig saw fit to shriek at human beings wherever it went:
 Trout's image in the leak was as shocking as he had hoped it would be. He had not
 washed up after his drubbing by The Pluto Gang, so there was caked blood on one
 earlobe, and more under his left nostril. There was dog shit on a shoulder of his coat.
 He had collapsed into dog shit on the handball court under the Queensboro Bridge after
 the robbery.
 By an unbelievable coincidence, that shit came from the wretched greyhound
 belonging to a girl I knew.
 · The girl with the greyhound was an assistant lighting director for a musical comedy
 about American history, and she kept her poor greyhound, who was named Lancer, in a
 one-room apartment fourteen feet wide and twenty-six feet long, and six flights of stairs
 above street level. His entire life was devoted to unloading his excrement at the proper
 time and place. There were two proper places to put it: in the gutter outside the door
 seventy-two steps below, with the traffic whizzing by, or in a roasting pan his mistress
 kept in front of the Westinghouse refrigerator.
 Lancer had a very small brain, but he must have suspected from time to time, just as
 Wayne Hoobler did, that some kind of terrible mistake had been made.
 · Trout trudged onward, a stranger in a strange land. His pilgrimage was rewarded with
 new wisdom, which would never have been his had he remained in his basement in
 Cohoes. He learned the answer to a question many human beings were asking
 themselves so frantically: "What's blocking traffic on the westbound barrel of the
 Midland City stretch of the Interstate?"
 The scales fell from the eyes of Kilgore Trout. He saw the explanation: a Queen of
 the Prairies milk truck was lying on its side, blocking the flow. It had been hit hard by a
 ferocious 1971 Chevrolet Caprice two-door. The Chevy had jumped the median divider
 strip. The Chevy's passenger hadn't used his seat belt. He had shot right through the
 shatterproof windshield. He was lying dead now in the concrete trough containing Sugar
 Creek. The Chevy's driver was also dead. He had been skewered by the post of his
 steering wheel. The Chevy's passenger was bleeding blood as he lay dead in Sugar
 Creek. The milk truck was bleeding milk. Milk and blood were about to be added to the
 composition of the stinking ping-pong balls which were being manufactured in the
 bowels of Sacred Miracle Cave.
 Chapter 19
 I was on a par with the Creator of the Universe there in the dark in the cocktail
 lounge. I shrunk the Universe to a ball exactly one light-year in diameter. I had it explode.
 I had it disperse itself again.
 Ask me a question, any question. How old is the Universe? It is one half-second old,
 but that half-second has lasted one quintillion years so far. Who created it? Nobody
 created it. It has always been here.
 What is time? It is a serpent which eats its tail, like this:
 This is the snake which uncoiled itself long enough to offer Eve the apple, which
 looked like this:
 What was the apple which Eve and Adam ate? It was the Creator of the Universe.
 And so on. Symbols can be so beautiful, sometimes.
 · Listen:
 The waitress brought me another drink. She wanted to light my hurricane lamp again.
 I wouldn't let her. "Can you see anything in the dark, with your sunglasses on?" she
 asked me.
 "The big show is inside my head," I said.
 "Oh," she said.
 "I can tell fortunes," I said. "You want your fortune told?"
 "Not right now," she said. She went back to the bar, and she and the bartender had
 some sort of conversation about me, I think. The bartender took several anxious looks
 in my direction. All he could see were the leaks over my eyes. I did not worry about his
 asking me to leave the establishment. I had created him, after all. I gave him a name:
 Harold Newcomb Wilbur. I awarded him the Silver Star, the Bronze Star, the Soldier's
 Medal, the Good Conduct Medal, and a Purple Heart with two Oak-Leaf Clusters, which
 made him the second most decorated veteran in Midland City. I put all his medals under
 his handkerchiefs in a dresser drawer.
 He won all those medals in the Second World War, which was staged by robots so
 that Dwayne Hoover could give a free-willed reaction to such a holocaust. The war was
 such an extravaganza that there was scarcely a robot anywhere who didn't have a part
 to play. Harold New-comb Wilbur got his medals for killing Japanese, who were yellow
 robots. They were fueled by rice.
 And he went on staring at me, even though I wanted to stop him now. Here was the
 thing about my control over the characters I created: I could only guide their movements
 approximately, since they were such big animals. There was inertia to overcome. It
 wasn't as though I was connected to them by steel wires. It was more as though I was
 connected to them by stale rubberbands.
 So I made the green telephone in back of the bar ring. Harold Newcomb Wilbur
 answered it, but he kept his eyes on me. I had to think fast about who was on the other
 end of the telephone. I put the first most decorated veteran in Midland City on the other
 end. He had a penis eight hundred miles long and two hundred and ten miles in
 diameter, but practically all of it was in the fourth dimension. He got his medals in the
 war in Viet Nam. He had also fought yellow robots who ran on rice.
 "Cocktail lounge," said Harold Newcomb Wilbur.
 "Hal-?"
 "Yes?"
 "This is Ned Lingamon."
 "I'm busy."
 "Don't hang up. The cops got me down at City Jail. They only let me have one call, so
 I called you."
 "Why me?"
 "You're the only friend I got left."
 "What they got you in for?"
 "They say I killed my baby."
 And so on.
 This man, who was white, had all the medals Harold Newcomb Wilbur had, plus the
 highest decoration for heroism which an American soldier could receive, which looked
 like this:
 He had now also committed the lowest crime which an American could commit,
 which was to kill his own child. Her name was Cynthia Anne, and she certainly didn't live
 very long before she was made dead again. She got killed for crying and crying. She
 wouldn't shut up.
 First she drove her seventeen-year-old mother away with all her demands, and then
 her father killed her.
 And so on.
 · As for the fortune I might have told for the waitress, this was it: "You will be swindled
 by termite exterminators and not even know it. You will buy steel-belted radial tires for
 the front wheels of your car. Your cat will be killed by a motorcyclist named Headley
 Thomas, and you will get another cat Arthur, your brother in Atlanta, will find eleven
 dollars in a taxicab."
 · I might have told Bunny Hoover's fortune, too: "Your father will become extremely ill,
 and you will respond so grotesquely that there will be talk of putting you in the booby
 hatch, too. You will stage scenes in the hospital waiting room, telling doctors and nurses
 that you are to blame for your father's disease. You will blame yourself for trying for so
 many years to kill him with hatred. You will redirect your hatred. You will hate your
 mom."
 And so on.
 And I had Wayne Hoobler, the black ex-convict, stand bleakly among the garbage
 cans outside the back door of the Inn, and examine the currency which had been given
 to him at the prison gate that morning. He had nothing else to do.
 He studied the pyramid with the blazing eye on top. He wished he had more
 information about the pyramid and the eye. There was so much to learn!
 Wayne didn't even know the Earth revolved around the Sun. He thought the Sun
 revolved around the Earth, because it certainly looked that way.
 A truck sizzled by on the Interstate, seemed to cry out in pain to Wayne, because he
 read the message on the side of it phonetically. The message told Wayne that the truck
 was in agony, as it hauled things from here to there. This was the message, and Wayne
 said it out loud:
 · Here was what was going to happen to Wayne in about four days—because I wanted
 it to happen to him: He would be picked up and questioned by policemen, because he
 was behaving suspiciously outside the back gate of Barrytron, Ltd., which was involved
 in super-secret weapons work. They thought at first that he might be pretending to be
 stupid and ignorant, that he might, in fact, be a cunning spy for the Communists.
 A check of his fingerprints and his wonderful dental work proved that he was who he
 said he was. But there was still something else he had to explain: What was he doing
 with a membership card in the Playboy Club of America, made out in the name of Paulo
 di Capistrano? He had found it in a garbage can in back of the new Holiday Inn.
 And so on.
 · And it was time now for me to have Rabo Karabekian, the minimalist painter, and
 Beatrice Keedsler, the novelist, say and do some more stuff for the sake of this book. I
 did not want to spook them by staring at them as I worked their controls, so I pretended
 to be absorbed in drawing pictures on my tabletop with a damp fingertip.
 I drew the Earthling symbol for nothingness, which was this:
 I drew the Earthling symbol for everything, which was this:
 Dwayne Hoover and Wayne Hoobler knew the first one, but not the second one. And
 now I drew a symbol in vanishing mist which was bitterly familiar to Dwayne but not to
 Wayne. This was it:
 And now I drew a symbol whose meaning Dwayne had known for a few years in
 school, a meaning which had since eluded him. The symbol would have looked like the
 end of a table in a prison dining hall to Wayne. It represented the ratio of the
 circumference of a circle to its diameter. This ratio could also be expressed as a
 number, and even as Dwayne and Wayne and Karabekian and Beatrice Keedsler and
 all the rest of us went about our business, Earthling scientists were monotonously
 radioing that number into outer space. The idea was to show other inhabited planets, in
 case they were listening, how intelligent we were. We had tortured circles until they
 coughed up this symbol of their secret lives:
 · And I made an invisible duplicate on my Formica table-top of a painting by Rabo
 Karabekian, entitled The Temptation of Saint Anthony. My duplicate was a miniature of
 the real thing, and mine was not in color, but I had captured the picture's form and the
 spirit, too. This is what I drew:
 The original was twenty feet wide and sixteen feet high. The field was Hawaiian
 Avocado, a green wall paint manufactured by the O'Hare Paint and Varnish Company in
 Hellertown, Pennsylvania. The vertical stripe was dayglo orange reflecting tape. This
 was the most expensive piece of art, not counting buildings and tombstones, and not
 counting the statue of Abraham Lincoln in front of the old Nigger high school.
 It was a scandal what the painting cost. It was the first purchase for the permanent
 collection of the Mildred Barry Memorial Center for the Arts. Fred T. Barry, the
 Chairman of the Board of Barrytron, Ltd., had coughed up fifty thousand dollars of his
 own for the picture.
 Midland City was outraged. So was I.
 · So was Beatrice Keedsler, but she kept her dismay to herself as she sat at the piano
 bar with Karabekian. Karabekian, who wore a sweatshirt imprinted with the likeness of
 Beethoven, knew he was surrounded by people who hated him for getting so much
 money for so little work. He was amused.
 Like everybody else in the cocktail lounge, he was softening his brain with alcohol.
 This was a substance produced by a tiny creature called yeast. Yeast organisms ate
 sugar and excreted alcohol. They killed themselves by destroying their own
 environment with yeast shit.
 · Kilgore Trout once wrote a short story which was a dialogue between two pieces of
 yeast. They were discussing the possible purposes of life as they ate sugar and suffocated
 in their own excrement. Because of their limited intelligence, they never came
 close to guessing that they were making champagne.
 · So I had Beatrice Keedsler say to Rabo Karabekian there at the piano bar, "This is a
 dreadful confession, but I don't even know who Saint Anthony was. Who was he, and
 why should anybody have wanted to tempt him?"
 "I don't know, and I would hate to find out," said Karabekian.
 "You have no use for truth?" said Beatrice.
 "You know what truth is?" said Karabekian. "It's some crazy thing my neighbor
 believes. If I want to make friends with him, I ask him what he believes. He tells me, and
 I say, 'Yeah, yeah-ain't it the truth?'"
 · I had no respect whatsoever for the creative works of either the painter or the novelist.
 I thought Karabekian with his meaningless pictures had entered into a conspiracy with
 millionaires to make poor people feel stupid. I thought Beatrice Keedsler had joined
 hands with other old-fashioned storytellers to make people believe that life had leading
 characters, minor characters, significant details, insignificant details, that it had lessons
 to be learned, tests to be passed, and a beginning, a middle, and an end.
 As I approached my fiftieth birthday, I had become more and more enraged and
 mystified by the idiot decisions made by my countrymen. And then I had come suddenly
 to pity them, for I understood how innocent and natural it was for them to behave so
 abominably, and with such abominable results: They were doing their best to live like
 people invented in story books. This was the reason Americans shot each other so
 often: It was a convenient literary device for ending short stories and books.
 Why were so many Americans treated by their government as though their lives were
 as disposable as paper facial tissues? Because that was the way authors customarily
 treated bit-part players in their made-up tales.
 And so on.
 Once I understood what was making America such a dangerous, unhappy nation of
 people who had nothing to do with real life, I resolved to shun storytelling. I would write
 about life. Every person would be exactly as important as any other. All facts would also
 be given equal weightiness. Nothing would be left out. Let others bring order to chaos. I
 would bring chaos to order, instead, which I think I have done.
 If all writers would do that, then perhaps citizens not in the literary trades will
 understand that there is no order in the world around us, that we must adapt ourselves
 to the requirements of chaos instead.
 It is hard to adapt to chaos, but it can be done. I am living proof of that: It can be
 done.
 · Adapting to chaos there in the cocktail lounge, I now had Bonnie MacMahon, who
 was exactly as important as anybody else in the Universe, bring more yeast excrement
 to Beatrice Keedsler and Karabekian. Karabekian's drink was a Beefeater's dry martini
 with a twist of lemon peel, so Bonnie said to him, "Breakfast of Champions."
 "That's what you said when you brought me my first martini," said Karabekian.
 "I say it every time I give anybody a martini," said Bonnie.
 "Doesn't that get tiresome," said Karabeldan. "Or maybe that's why people found
 cities in Godforsaken places like this—so they can make the same jokes over and over
 again, until the Bright Angel of Death stops their mouths with ashes."
 "I just try to cheer people up," said Bonnie. "If that's a crime, I never heard about it till
 now. I'll stop saying it from now on. I beg your pardon. I did not mean to give offense."
 Bonnie detested Karabekian, but she was as sweet as pie to him. She had a policy of
 never showing her anger about anything there in the cocktail lounge. The largest part of
 her income by far came from tips, and the way to get big tips was to smile, smile, smile,
 no matter what. Bonnie had only two goals in life now. She meant to recoup all the
 money her husband had lost in the car wash in Shepherdstown, and she ached to have
 steel-belted radial tires for the front wheels of her automobile.
 Her husband, meanwhile, was at home watching professional golfers on television,
 and getting smashed on yeast excrement.
 · Saint Anthony, incidentally, was an Egyptian who founded the very first monastery,
 which was a place where men could live simple lives and pray often to the Creator of
 the Universe, without the distractions of ambition and sex and yeast excrement. Saint
 Anthony himself sold everything he had when he was young, and he went out into the
 wilderness and lived alone for twenty years.
 He was often tempted during all those years of perfect solitude by visions of good
 times he might have had with food and men and women and children and the marketplace
 and so on.
 His biographer was another Egyptian, Saint Athanasius, whose theories on the
 Trinity, the Incarnation, and the divinity of the Holy Spirit, set down three hundred years
 after the murder of Christ, were considered valid by Catholics even in Dwayne Hoover's
 time.
 The Catholic high school in Midland City, in fact, was named in honor of Saint
 Athanasius. It was named in honor of Saint Christopher at first, but then the Pope, who
 was head of Catholic churches everywhere, announced that there probably never had
 been a Saint Christopher, so people shouldn't honor him anymore.
 · A black male dishwasher stepped out of the kitchen of the Inn now for a Pall Mall
 cigarette and some fresh air. He wore a large button on his sweat-soaked white T-shirt
 which said this:
 There were bowls of such buttons around the Inn, for anybody to help himself to, and
 the dishwasher had taken one in a spirit of levity. He had no use for works of art, except
 for cheap and simple ones which weren't meant to live very long. His name was Eldon
 Bobbins, and he had a penis nine inches long and two inches in diameter.
 Eldon Robbins, too, had spent time in the Adult Correctional Institution, so it was
 easy for him to recognize Wayne Hoobler, out among the garbage cans, as a new
 parolee. "Welcome to the real world, Brother," he said gently and with wry lovingness to
 Wayne. "When was the last time you ate? This mornin'?"
 Wayne shyly acknowledged that this was true. So Eldon took him through a kitchen
 to a long table where the kitchen staff ate. There was a television set back there, and it
 was on, and it showed Wayne the beheading of Queen Mary of Scotland. Everybody
 was all dressed up, and Queen Mary put her head on the block of her own accord.
 Eldon arranged for Wayne to get a free steak and mashed potatoes and gravy and
 anything else he wanted, all prepared by other black men in the kitchen. There was a
 bowl of Arts Festival buttons on the table, and Eldon made Wayne put one on before he
 ate. "Wear this at all times," he told Wayne gravely, "and no harm can come to you."
 · Eldon revealed to Wayne a peephole, which kitchen workers had drilled through the
 wall and into the cocktail lounge. "When you get tarred of watchin' television," he said,
 "you can watch the animals in the zoo."
 Eldon himself had a look through the peephole, told Wayne that there was a man
 seated at the piano bar who had been paid fifty thousand dollars for sticking a piece of
 yellow tape to a green piece of canvas. He insisted that Wayne take a good look at
 Karabekian. Wayne obeyed.
 And Wayne wanted to remove his eye from the peephole after a few seconds,
 because he didn't have nearly enough background information for any sort of understanding
 of what was going on in the cocktail lounge. The candles puzzled him, for
 instance. He supposed that the electricity in there had failed, and that somebody had
 gone to change a fuse. Also, he did not know what to make of Bonnie MacMahon's
 costume, which consisted of white cowboy boots and black net stockings with crimson
 garters plainly showing across several inches of bare thigh, and a tight sequin sort of
 bathing suit with a puff of pink cotton pinned to its rear.
 Bonnie's back was to Wayne, so he could not see that she wore octagonal, rimless
 trifocals, and was a horse-faced woman forty-two years old. He could not see, either,
 that she was smiling, smiling, smiling, no matter how insulting Karabekian became. He
 could read Karabekian's lips, however. He was good at reading lips, as was anyone
 who had spent any time in Shepherdstown. The rule of silence was enforced in the
 corridors and at meals in Shepherdstown.
 · Karabekian was saying this to Bonnie, indicating Beatrice Keedsler with a wave of his
 hand: "This distinguished lady is a famous storyteller, and also a native of this railroad
 junction. Perhaps you could tell her some recent true stories about her birthplace."
 "I don't know any," said Bonnie.
 "Oh come now," said Karabekian. "Every human being in this room must be worth a
 great novel." He pointed at Dwayne Hoover. "What is the life story of that man?"
 Bonnie limited herself to telling about Dwayne's dog, Sparky, who couldn't wag his
 tail. "So he has to fight all the time," she said.
 "Wonderful," said Karabekian. He turned to Beatrice. *Tm sure you can use that
 somewhere."
 "As a matter of fact, I can," said Beatrice. "That's an enchanting detail."
 "The more details the better," said Karabekian. "Thank God for novelists. Thank God
 there are people willing to write everything down. Otherwise, so much would be
 forgotten!" He begged Bonnie for more true stories.
 Bonnie was deceived by his enthusiasm and energized by the idea that Beatrice
 Keedsler honestly needed true stories for her books. "Well—" she said, "would you consider
 Shepherdstown part of Midland City, more or less?"
 "Of course," said Karabekian, who had never heard of Shepherdstown. "What would
 Midland City be without Shepherdstown? And what would Shepherdstown be without
 Midland City?"
 "Well—" said Bonnie, and she thought she had what was maybe a really good story
 to tell, "my husband is a guard at the Shepherdstown Adult Correctional Institution, and
 he used to have to keep people who were going to be electrocuted company—back
 when they used to electrocute people all the time. He'd play cards with them, or read
 parts of the Bible out loud to them, or whatever they wanted to do, and he had to keep a
 white man named Leroy Joyce company."
 Bonnie's costume gave off a faint, fishy, queer glow as she spoke. This was because
 her garments were heavily impregnated with fluorescent chemicals. So was the bartender's
 jacket. So were the African masks on the walls. The chemicals would shine like
 electric signs when ultraviolet lights in the ceiling were energized. The lights weren't on
 just now. The bartender turned them on at random times, at his own whim, in order to
 give the customers a delightful and mystifying surprise.
 The power for the lights and for everything electrical in Midland City, incidentally, was
 generated by coal from strip mines in West Virginia, through which Kilgore Trout had
 passed not many hours before.
 · "Leroy Joyce was so dumb," Bonnie went on, "he couldn't play cards. He couldn't
 understand the Bible. He could hardly talk. He ate his last supper, and then he sat still.
 He was going to be electrocuted for rape. So my husband sat out in the corridor outside
 the cell, and he read to himself. He heard Leroy moving around in his cell, but he didn't
 worry about it. And then Leroy rattled his tin cup on the bars. My husband thought Leroy
 wanted some more coffee. So he got up and went over and took the cup. Leroy was
 smiling as though everything was all right now. He wouldn't have to go to the electric
 chair after all. He'd cut off his whatchamacallit and put it in the cup."
 · This book is made up, of course, but the story I had Bonnie tell actually happened in
 real life—in the death house of a penitentiary in Arkansas.
 As for Dwayne Hoover's dog Sparky, who couldn't wag his tail: Sparky is modeled
 after a dog my brother owns, who has to fight all the time, because he can't wag his tail.
 There really is such a dog.
 · Rabo Karabekian asked Bonnie MacMahon to tell him something about the teen-age
 girl on the cover of the program for the Festival of the Arts. This was the only
 internationally famous human being in Midland City. She was Mary Alice Miller, the
 Women's Two Hundred Meter Breast Stroke Champion of the World. She was only fifteen,
 said Bonnie.
 Mary Alice was also the Queen of the Festival of the Arts. The cover of the program
 showed her in a white bathing suit, with her Olympic Gold Medal hanging around her
 neck. The medal looked like this:
 Mary Alice was smiling at a picture of Saint Sebastian, by the Spanish painter El
 Greco. It had been loaned to the Festival by Eliot Rosewater, the patron of Kilgore
 Trout. Saint Sebastian was a Roman soldier who had lived seventeen hundred years
 before me and Mary Alice Miller and Wayne and Dwayne and all the rest of us. He had
 secretly become a Christian when Christianity was against the law.
 And somebody squealed on him. The Emperor Diocletian had him shot by archers.
 The picture Mary Alice smiled at with such uncritical bliss showed a human being who
 was so full of arrows that he looked like a porcupine.
 Something almost nobody knew about Saint Sebastian, incidentally, since painters
 liked to put so many arrows into him, was that he survived the incident. He actually got
 well.
 He walked around Rome praising Christianity and bad-mouthing the Emperor, so he
 was sentenced to death a second time. He was beaten to death by rods.
 And so on.
 And Bonnie MacMahon told Beatrice and Karabekian that Mary Alice's father, who
 was a member of the Parole Board out at Shepherdstown, had taught Mary Alice to
 swim when she was eight months old, and that he had made her swim at least four
 hours a day, every day, since she was three.
 Rabo Karabekian thought this over, and then he said loudly, so a lot of people could
 hear him, "What kind of a man would turn his daughter into an outboard motor?"
 · And now comes the spiritual climax of this book, for it is at this point that I, the author,
 am suddenly transformed by what I have done so far. This is why I had gone to Midland
 City: to be born again. And Chaos announced that it was about to give birth to a new me
 by putting these words in the mouth of Rabo Karabekian: "What kind of a man would
 turn his daughter into an outboard motor?"
 Such a small remark was able to have such thundering consequences because the
 spiritual matrix of the cocktail lounge was in what I choose to call a pre-earthquake condition.
 Terrific forces were at work on our souls, but they could do no work, because
 they balanced one another so nicely.
 But then a grain of sand crumbled. One force had a sudden advantage over another,
 and spiritual continents began to shrug and heave.
 One force, surely, was the lust for money which infested so many people in the
 cocktail lounge. They knew what Rabo Karabekian had been paid for his painting, and
 they wanted fifty thousand dollars, too. They could have a lot of fun with fifty thousand
 dollars, or so they believed. But they had to earn money the hard way, just a few dollars
 at a time, instead. It wasn't right.
 Another force was the fear in these same people that their lives might be ridiculous,
 that their entire city might be ridiculous. Now the worst had happened: Mary Alice Miller,
 the one thing about their city which they had supposed was ridicule-proof had just been
 lazily ridiculed by a man from out-of-town.
 And my own pre-earthquake condition must be taken into consideration, too, since I
 was the one who was being reborn. Nobody else in the cocktail lounge was reborn, as
 far as I know. The rest got their minds changed, some of them, about the value of
 modern art.
 As for myself: I had come to the conclusion that there was nothing sacred about
 myself or about any human being, that we were all machines, doomed to collide and
 collide and collide. For want of anything better to do, we became fans of collisions.
 Sometimes I wrote well about collisions, which meant I was a writing machine in good
 repair. Sometimes I wrote badly, which meant I was a writing machine in bad repair. I no
 more harbored sacredness than did a Pontiac, a mousetrap, or a South Bend Lathe.
 I did not expect Rabo Karabekian to rescue me. I had created him, and he was in my
 opinion a vain and weak and trashy man, no artist at all. But it is Rabo Karabekian who
 made me the serene Earthling which I am this day.
 Listen:
 "What kind of a man would turn his daughter into an outboard motor?" he said to
 Bonnie MacMahon.
 Bonnie MacMahon blew up. This was the first time she had blown up since she had
 come to work in the cocktail lounge. Her voice became as unpleasant as the noise of a
 bandsaw's cutting galvanized tin. It was loud, too. "Oh yeah?" she said. "Oh yeah?"
 Everybody froze. Bunny Hoover stopped playing the piano. Nobody wanted to miss a
 word.
 "You don't think much of Mary Alice Miller?" she said. "Well, we don't think much of
 your painting. I've seen better pictures done by a five-year-old."
 Karabekian slid off his barstool so he could face all those enemies standing up. He
 certainly surprised me. I expected him to retreat in a hail of olives, maraschino cherries
 and lemon rinds. But he was majestic up there. "Listen—" he said so calmly, "I have
 read the editorials against my painting in your wonderful newspaper. I have read every
 word of the hate mail you have been thoughtful enough to send to New York."
 This embarrassed people some.
 "The painting did not exist until I made it," Karabekian went on. "Now that it does
 exist, nothing would make me happier than to have it reproduced again and again, and
 vastly improved upon, by all the five-year-olds in town. I would love for your children to
 find pleasantly and playfully what it took me many angry years to find.
 "I now give you my word of honor," he went on, "that the picture your city owns
 shows everything about life which truly matters, with nothing left out. It is a picture of the
 awareness of every animal. It is the immaterial core of every animal—the 1 am' to which
 all messages are sent. It is all that is alive in any of us—in a mouse, in a deer, in a
 cocktail waitress. It is unwavering and pure, no matter what preposterous adventure
 may befall us. A sacred picture of Saint Anthony alone is one vertical, unwavering band
 of light. If a cockroach were near him, or a cocktail waitress, the picture would show two
 such bands of light. Our awareness is all that is alive and maybe sacred in any of us.
 Everything else about us is dead machinery.
 "I have just heard from this cocktail waitress here, this vertical band of light, a story
 about her husband and an idiot who was about to be executed at Shepherdstown. Very
 well—let a five-year-old paint a sacred interpretation of that encounter. Let that fiveyear-old
 strip away the idiocy, the bars, the waiting electric chair, the uniform of the
 guard, the gun of the guard, the bones and meat of the guard. What is that perfect
 picture which any five-year-old can paint? Two unwavering bands of light."
 Ecstasy bloomed on the barbaric face of Rabo Karabekian. "Citizens of Midland City,
 I salute you," he said. "You have given a home to a masterpiece!"
 · Dwayne Hoover, incidentally, wasn't taking any of this in. He was still hypnotized,
 turned inward. He was thinking about moving fingers writing and moving on, and so
 forth. He had bats in his bell tower. He was off his rocker. He wasn't playing with a full
 deck of cards.
 Chapter 20
 While my life was being renewed by the words of Rabo Karabekian, Kilgore Trout
 found himself standing on the shoulder of the Interstate, gazing across Sugar Creek in
 its concrete trough at the new Holiday Inn. There were no bridges across the creek. He
 would have to wade.
 So he sat down on a guardrail, removed his shoes and socks, rolled his pantlegs to
 his knees. His bared shins were rococo with varicose veins and scars. So were the
 shins of my father when he was an old, old man.
 Kilgore Trout had my father's shins. They were a present from me. I gave him my
 father's feet, too, which were long and narrow and sensitive. They were azure. They
 were artistic feet.
 · Trout lowered his artistic feet into the concrete trough containing Sugar Creek. They
 were coated at once with a clear plastic substance from the surface of the creek. When,
 in some surprise, Trout lifted one coated foot from the water, the plastic substance dried
 in air instantly, sheathed his foot in a thin, skin-tight bootie resembling mother-of-pearl.
 He repeated the process with his other foot
 The substance was coming from the Barrytron plant. The company was
 manufacturing a new anti-personnel bomb for the Air Force. The bomb scattered plastic
 pellets instead of steel pellets, because the plastic pellets were cheaper. They were
 also impossible to locate in the bodies of wounded enemies by means of x-ray
 machines.
 Barrytron had no idea it was dumping this waste into Sugar Creek. They had hired
 the Maritimo Brothers Construction Company, which was gangster-controlled, to build a
 system which would get rid of the waste. They knew the company was gangstercontrolled.
 Everybody knew that. But the Maritimo Brothers were usually the best
 builders in town. They had built Dwayne Hoover's house, for instance, which was a solid
 house.
 But every so often they would do something amazingly criminal. The Barrytron
 disposal system was a case in point. It was expensive, and it appeared to be complicated
 and busy. Actually, though, it was old junk hooked up every which way,
 concealing a straight run of stolen sewer pipe running directly from Barrytron to Sugar
 Creek.
 Barrytron would be absolutely sick when it learned what a polluter it had become.
 Throughout its history, it had attempted to be a perfect model of corporate good
 citizenship, no matter what it cost
 · Trout now crossed Sugar Creek on my father's legs and feet, and those appendages
 became more nacreous with every wading stride. He carried his parcels and his shoes
 and socks on his head, although the water scarcely reached his kneecaps.
 He knew how ridiculous he looked. He expected to be received abominably, dreamed
 of embarrassing the Festival to death. He had come all this distance for an orgy of
 masochism. He wanted to be treated like a cockroach.
 · His situation, insofar as he was a machine, was complex, tragic, and laughable. But
 the sacred part of him, his awareness, remained an unwavering band of light.
 And this book is being written by a meat machine in cooperation with a machine
 made of metal and plastic. The plastic, incidentally, is a close relative of the gunk in
 Sugar Creek. And at the core of the writing meat machine is something sacred, which is
 an unwavering band of light.
 At the core of each person who reads this book is a band of unwavering light.
 My doorbell has just rung in my New York apartment. And I know what I will find
 when I open my front door: an unwavering band of light.
 God bless Rabo Karabekian!
 · Listen: Kilgore Trout climbed out of the trough and onto the asphalt desert which was
 the parking lot. It was his plan to enter the lobby of the Inn on wet bare feet, to leave
 footprints on the carpet—like this:
 It was Trout's fantasy that somebody would be outraged by the footprints. This would
 give him the opportunity to reply grandly, "What is it that offends you so? I am simply
 using man's first printing press. You are reading a bold and universal headline which
 says, 'I am here, I am here, I am here."
 · But Trout was no walking printing press. His feet left no marks on the carpet, because
 they were sheathed in plastic and the plastic was dry. Here was the structure of the
 plastic molecule:
 The molecule went on and on and on, repeating itself forever to form a sheet both
 tough and poreless.
 This molecule was the monster Dwayne's twin stepbrothers, Lyle and Kyle, had
 attacked with their automatic shotguns. This was the same stuff which was fucking up
 Sacred Miracle Cave.
 · The man who told me how to diagram a segment of a molecule of plastic was
 Professor Walter H. Stockmayer of Dartmouth College. He is a distinguished physical
 chemist, and an amusing and useful friend of mine. I did not make him up. I would like
 to be Professor Walter H. Stockmayer. He is a brilliant pianist. He skis like a dream.
 And when he sketched a plausible molecule, he indicated points where it would go
 on and on just as I have indicated them—with an abbreviation which means sameness
 without end.
 The proper ending for any story about people it seems to me, since life is now a
 polymer in which the Earth is wrapped so tightly, should be that same abbreviation,
 which I now write large because I feel like it, which is this one:
 · And it is in order to acknowledge the continuity of this polymer that I begin so many
 sentences with "And" and "So," and end so many paragraphs with ". . . and so on."
 And so on.
 "It's all like an ocean!" cried Dostoevski. I say it's all like cellophane.
 · So Trout entered the lobby as an inkless printing press, but he was still the most
 grotesque human being who had ever come in there.
 All around him were what other people called mirrors, which he called leaks. The
 entire wall which separated the lobby from the cocktail lounge was a leak ten feet high
 and thirty-feet long. There was another leak on the cigarette machine and yet another
 on the candy machine. And when Trout looked through them to see what was going on
 in the other universe, he saw a red-eyed, filthy old creature who was barefoot, who had
 his pants rolled up to his knees.
 As it happened, the only other person in the lobby at the time was the beautiful young
 desk clerk, Milo Maritime. Milo's clothing and skin and eyes were all the colors that
 olives can be. He was a graduate of the Cornell Hotel School. He was the homosexual
 grandson of Guillermo "Little Willie" Maritime, a bodyguard of the notorious Chicago
 gangster, Al Capone.
 Trout presented himself to this harmless man, stood before his desk with his bare
 feet far apart and his arms outspread. "The Abominable Snowman has arrived," he said
 to Milo. "If I'm not as clean as most abominable snowmen are, it is because I was
 kidnapped as a child from the slopes of Mount Everest, and taken as a slave to a
 bordello in Rio de Janeiro, where I have been cleaning the unspeakably filthy toilets for
 the past fifty years. A visitor to our whipping room there screamed in a transport of
 agony and ecstasy that there was to be an arts festival in Midland City. I escaped down
 a rope of sheets taken from a reeking hamper. I have come to Midland City to have
 myself acknowledged, before I die, as the great artist I believe myself to be."
 Milo Maritimo greeted Trout with luminous adoration. "Mr. Trout," he said in rapture,
 I'd know you anywhere. Welcome to Midland City. We need you sol"
 "How do you know who I am?" said Kilgore Trout. Nobody had ever known who he
 was before.
 "You had to be you," said Milo.
 Trout was deflated—neutralized. He dropped his arms, became child-like now.
 "Nobody ever knew who I was before," he said.
 "I know," said Milo. "We have discovered you, and we hope you will discover us. No
 longer will Midland City be known merely as the home of Mary Alice Miller, the Women's
 Two Hundred Meter Breast Stroke Champion of the World. It will also be the city which
 first acknowledged the greatness of Kilgore Trout."
 Trout simply walked away from the desk and sat down on a brocaded Spanish-style
 settee. The entire lobby, except for the vending machines, was done in Spanish style.
 Milo now used a line from a television show which had been popular a few years
 back. The show wasn't on the air anymore, but most people still remembered the line.
 Much of the conversation in the country consisted of lines from television shows, both
 present and past. The show Milo's line was from consisted of taking some old person,
 usually fairly famous, into what looked like an ordinary room, only it was actually a
 stage, with an audience out front and television cameras hidden all around. There were
 also people who had known the person in the older days hidden around. They would
 come out and tell anecdotes about the person later on.
 Milo now said what the master of ceremonies would have said to Trout, if Trout had
 been on the show and the curtain was going up: "Kilgore Trout! This is your life!"
 · Only there wasn't any audience or curtain or any of that. And the truth was that Milo
 Maritimo was the only person in Midland City who knew anything about Kilgore Trout. It
 was wishful thinking on his part that the upper crust of Midland City was about to be as
 ga-ga as he was about the works of Kilgore Trout.
 "We are so ready for a Renaissance, Mr. Trout! You will be our Leonardo!"
 "How could you possibly have heard of me?" said Trout dazedly.
 "In getting ready for the Midland City Renaissance," said Milo, "I made it my business
 to read everything I could by and about every artist who was on his way here."
 "There isn't anything by me or about me anywhere," protested Trout.
 Milo came from behind his desk. He brought with him what appeared to be a lopsided
 old softball, swaddled in many different sorts of tape. "When I couldn't find out anything
 about you," he said, "I wrote to Eliot Rosewater, the man who said we had to bring you
 here. He has a private collection of forty-one of your novels and sixty-three of your short
 stories, Mr. Trout. He let me read them all." He held out the seeming baseball, which
 was actually a book from Rosewater's collection. Rosewater used his science-fiction
 library hard. "This is the only book I haven't finished, and 111 finish it before the sun
 comes up tomorrow," said Milo.
 · The novel in question, incidentally, was The Smart Bunny. The leading character was
 a rabbit who lived like all the other wild rabbits, but who was as intelligent as Albert
 Einstein or William Shakespeare. It was a female rabbit. She was the only female
 leading character in any novel or story by Kilgore Trout.
 She led a normal female rabbit's life, despite her ballooning intellect. She concluded
 that her mind was useless, that it was a sort of tumor, that it had no usefulness within
 the rabbit scheme of things.
 So she went hippity-hop, hippity-hop toward the city, to have the tumor removed. But
 a hunter named Dudley Farrow shot and killed her before she got there. Farrow skinned
 her and took out her guts, but then he and his wife Grace decided that they had better
 not eat her because of her unusually large head. They thought what she had thought
 when she was alive—that she must be diseased.
 And so on.
 · Kilgore Trout had to change into his only other garments, his high school tuxedo and
 his new evening shirt and all, right away. The lower parts of his rolled-up trousers had
 become impregnated with the plastic substance from the creek, so he couldn't roll them
 down again. They were as stiff as flanges on sewer pipes.
 So Milo Marithno showed him to his suite, which was two ordinary Holiday Inn rooms
 with a door between them open. Trout and every distinguished visitor had a suite, with
 two color television sets, two tile baths, four double beds equipped with Magic Fingers.
 Magic Fingers were electric vibrators attached to the mattress springs of a bed. If a
 guest put a quarter into a little box on his bedside table, the Magic Fingers would jiggle
 his bed.
 There were enough flowers in Trout's room for a Catholic gangster's funeral. They
 were from Fred T. Barry, the Chairman of the Arts Festival, and from the Midland City
 Association of Women's Clubs, and from the Chamber of Commerce, and on and on.
 Trout read a few of the cards on the flowers, and he commented, "The town certainly
 seems to be getting behind the arts in a great big way."
 Milo closed his olive eyes tight, wincing with a tangy agony. "It's time. Oh God, Mr.
 Trout, we were starving for so long, without even knowing what we were hungering for,"
 he said. This young man was not only a descendant of master criminals, he was a close
 relative of felons operating in Midland City at the present time. The partners in the
 Maritime Brothers Construction Company, for instance, were his uncles. Gino Maritime,
 Milo's first cousin once removed, was the dope king of the city.
 · "Oh, Mr. Trout," nice Milo went on, there in Trout's suite, "teach us to sing and dance
 and laugh and cry. We've tried to survive so long on money and sex and envy and real
 estate and football and basketball and automobiles and television and alcohol—on
 sawdust and broken glass!"
 "Open your eyes!" said Trout bitterly. "Do I look like a dancer, a singer, a man of
 joy?" He was wearing his tuxedo now. It was a size too large for him. He had lost much
 weight since high school. His pockets were crammed with mothballs. They bulged like
 saddlebags.
 "Open your eyes!" said Trout. "Would a man nourished by beauty look like this? You
 have nothing but desolation and desperation here, you say? I bring you more of the
 same!"
 "My eyes are open," said Milo warmly, "and I see exactly what I expect to see. I see a
 man who is terribly wounded—because he has dared to pass through the fires of truth
 to the other side, which we have never seen. And then he has come back again—to tell
 us about the other side."
 · And I sat there in the new Holiday Inn, and made it disappear, then appear again,
 then disappear, then appear again. Actually, there was nothing but a big open field
 there. A farmer had put it into rye.
 It was high time, I thought, for Trout to meet Dwayne Hoover, for Dwayne to run
 amok.
 I knew how this book would end. Dwayne would hurt a lot of people. He would bite off
 one joint of the right index finger of Kilgore Trout.
 And then Trout, with his wound dressed, would walk out into the unfamiliar city. He
 would meet his Creator, who would explain everything.
 Chapter 21
 Kilgore Trout entered the cocktail lounge. His feet were fiery hot. They were encased
 not only in shoes and socks, but in clear plastic, too. They could not sweat, they could
 not breathe.
 Rabo Karabekian and Beatrice Keedsler did not see him come in. They were
 surrounded by new affectionate friends at the piano bar. Karabekian's speech had been
 splendidly received. Everybody agreed now that Midland City had one of the greatest
 paintings in the world.
 "All you had to do was explain," said Bonnie MacMahon. "I understand now."
 "I didn't think there was anything to explain," said Carlo Maritime, the builder,
 wonderingly. "But there was, by God."
 Abe Cohen, the jeweler, said to Karabekian, "If artists would explain more, people
 would like art more. You realize that?"
 And so on.
 Trout was feeling spooky. He thought maybe a lot of people were going to greet him
 as effusively as Milo Maritime had done, and he had had no experience with
 celebrations like that. But nobody got in his way. His old friend Anonymity was by his
 side again, and the two of them chose a table near Dwayne Hoover and me. All he
 could see of me was the reflection of candle flames in my mirrored glasses, in my leaks.
 Dwayne Hoover was still mentally absent from activities in the cocktail lounge. He sat
 like a lump of nose putty, staring at something long ago and far away.
 Dwayne moved his lips as Trout sat down. He was saying this soundlessly, and it had
 nothing to do with Trout or me: "Goodbye, Blue Monday."
 · Trout had a fat manila envelope with him. Milo Maritimo had given it to him. It
 contained a program for the Festival of the Arts, a letter of welcome to Trout from Fred
 T. Barry, the Chairman of the Festival, a timetable of events during the coming week—
 and some other things.
 Trout also carried a copy of his novel Now It Can Be Told. This was the wide-open
 beaver book which Dwayne Hoover would soon take so seriously.
 So there the three of us were. Dwayne and Trout and I could have been included in
 an equilateral triangle about twelve feet on a side.
 As three unwavering bands of light, we were simple and separate and beautiful. As
 machines, we were flabby bags of ancient plumbing and wiring, of rusty hinges and
 feeble springs. And our interrelationships were Byzantine.
 After all, I had created both Dwayne and Trout, and now Trout was about to drive
 Dwayne into full-blown insanity, and Dwayne would soon bite off the tip of Trout's finger.
 · Wayne Hoobler was watching us through a peephole in the kitchen. There was a tap
 on his shoulder. The man who had fed him now told him to leave.
 So he wandered outdoors, and he found himself among Dwayne's used cars again.
 He resumed his conversation with the traffic on the Interstate.
 · The bartender in the cocktail lounge now flicked on the ultraviolet lights in the ceiling.
 Bonnie MacMahon's uniform, since it was impregnated with fluorescent materials, lit up
 like an electric sign.
 So did the bartender's jacket and the African masks on the walls.
 So did Dwayne Hoover's shirt, and the shirts of several other men. The reason was
 this: Those shirts had been laundered in washday products which contained fluorescent
 materials. The idea was to make clothes look brighter in sunlight by making them
 actually fluorescent.
 When the same clothes were viewed in a dark room under ultraviolet light, however,
 they became ridiculously bright.
 Bunny Hoover's teeth also lit up, since he used a toothpaste containing fluorescent
 materials, which was supposed to make his smile look brighter in daylight. He grinned
 now, and he appeared to have a mouthful of little
 Christmas tree lights.
 But the brightest new light in the room by far was the bosom of Kilgore Trout's new
 evening shirt. Its brilliance twinkled and had depth. It might have been the top of a
 slumping, open sack of radioactive diamonds.
 But then Trout hunched forward involuntarily, buckling the starched shirt bosom,
 forming it into a parabolic dish. This made a searchlight of the shirt. Its beam was aimed
 at Dwayne Hoover.
 The sudden light roused Dwayne from his trance. He thought perhaps he had died.
 At any rate, something painless and supernatural was going on. Dwayne smiled
 trustingly at the holy light. He was ready for anything.
 · Trout had no explanation for the fantastic transformation of certain garments around
 the room. Like most science-fiction writers, he knew almost nothing about science. He
 had no more use for solid information than did Rabo Karabekian. So now he could only
 be flabbergasted.
 My own shirt, being an old one which had been washed many times in a Chinese
 laundry which used ordinary soap, did not fluoresce.
 Dwayne Hoover now lost himself in the bosom of Trout's shirt, just as he had earlier
 lost himself in twinkling beads of lemon oil. He remembered now a thing his stepfather
 had told him when he was only ten years old, which was this: Why there were no
 Niggers in Shepherdstown.
 This was not a completely irrelevant recollection. Dwayne had, after all, been talking
 to Bonnie MacMahon, whose husband had lost so much money in a car wash in
 Shepherdstown. And the main reason the car wash had failed was that successful car
 washes needed cheap and plentiful labor, which meant black labor—and there were no
 Niggers in Shepherdstown.
 "Years ago," Dwayne's stepfather told Dwayne when Dwayne was ten, "Niggers was
 coming up north by the millions—to Chicago, to Midland City, to Indianapolis, to Detroit.
 The World War was going on. There was such a labor shortage that even Niggers who
 couldn't read or write could get good factory jobs. Niggers had money like they never
 had before.
 "Over at Shepherdstown, though," he went on, "the white people got smart quick.
 They didn't want Niggers in their town, so they put up signs on the main roads at the city
 limits and in the railroad yard." Dwayne's stepfather described the signs, which looked
 like this:
 "One night—" Dwayne's stepfather said, "a Nigger family got off a boxcar in
 Shepherdstown. Maybe they didn't see the sign. Maybe they couldn't read it. Maybe
 they couldn't believe it." Dwayne's stepfather was out of work when he told the story so
 gleefully. The Great Depression had just begun. He and Dwayne were on a weekly
 expedition in the family car, hauling garbage and trash out into the country, where they
 dumped it all in Sugar Creek.
 "Anyway, they moved into an empty shack that night," Dwayne's stepfather went on.
 "They got a fire going in the stove and all. So a mob went down there at midnight. They
 took out the man, and they sawed him in two on the top strand of a barbed-wire fence."
 Dwayne remembered clearly that a rainbow of oil from the trash was spreading prettily
 over the surface of Sugar Creek when he heard that.
 "Since that night, which was a long time ago now," his stepfather said, "there ain't
 been a Nigger even spend the night in Shepherdstown."
 · Trout was itchingly aware that Dwayne was staring at his bosom so loonily. Dwayne's
 eyes swam, and Trout supposed they were swimming in alcohol. He could not know
 that Dwayne was seeing an oil slick on Sugar Creek which had made rainbows forty
 long years ago.
 Trout was aware of me, too, what little he could see of me. I made him even more
 uneasy than Dwayne did. The thing was: Trout was the only character I ever created
 who had enough imagination to suspect that he might be the creation of another human
 being. He had spoken of this possibility several times to his parakeet. He had said, for
 instance, "Honest to God, Bill, the way things are going, all I can think of is that I'm a
 character in a book by somebody who wants to write about somebody who suffers all
 the time."
 Now Trout was beginning to catch on that he was sitting very close to the person who
 had created him. He was embarrassed. It was hard for him to know how to respond,
 particularly since his responses were going to be anything I said they were.
 I went easy on him, didn't wave, didn't stare. I kept my glasses on. I wrote again on
 my tabletop, scrawled the symbols for the interrelationship between matter and energy
 as it was understood in my day:
 It was a flawed equation, as far as I was concerned. There should have been an "A"
 in there somewhere for Awareness—without which the "E" and the "M" and the "c,"
 which was a mathematical constant, could not exist.
 · All of us were stuck to the surface of a ball, incidentally. The planet was ball-shaped.
 Nobody knew why we didn't fall off, even though everybody pretended to kind of understand
 it.
 The really smart people understood that one of the best ways to get rich was to own
 a part of the surface people had to stick to.
 · Trout dreaded eye contact with either Dwayne or me, so he went through the contents
 of the manila envelope which had been waiting for him in his suite.
 The first thing he examined was a letter from Fred T. Barry, the Chairman of the
 Festival of the Arts, the donor of the Mildred Barry Memorial Center for the Arts, and the
 founder and Chairman of the Board of Directors of Barrytron, Ltd.
 Clipped to the letter was one share of common stock in Barrytron, made out in the
 name of Kilgore Trout. Here was the letter:
 "Dear Mr. Trout:" it said, "It is a pleasure and an honor to have such a distinguished
 and creative person give his precious time to Midland City's first Festival of the Arts. It is
 our wish that you feel like a member of our family while you are here. To give you and
 other distinguished visitors a deeper sense of participation in the life of our community, I
 am making a gift to each of you of one share in the company which I founded, the
 company of which I am now Chairman of the Board. It is not only my company now, but
 yours as well.
 "Our company began as The Robo-Magic Corporation of America in 1934. It had
 three employees in the beginning, and its mission was to design and manufacture the
 first fully automatic washing machine for use in the home. You will find the motto of that
 washing machine on the corporate emblem at the top of the stock certificate."
 The emblem consisted of a Greek goddess on an ornate chaise longue. She held a
 flagstaff from which a long pennant streamed. Here is what the pennant said:
 · The motto of the old Robo-Magic washing machine cleverly confused two separate
 ideas people had about Monday. One idea was that women traditionally did their
 laundry on Monday. Monday was simply washday, and not an especially depressing
 day on that account.
 People who had horrible jobs during the week used to call Monday "Blue Monday"
 sometimes, though, because they hated to return to work after a day of rest. When Fred
 T. Barry made up the Robo-Magic motto as a young man, he pretended that Monday
 was called "Blue Monday" because doing the laundry disgusted and exhausted women.
 The Robo-Magic was going to cheer them up.
 · It wasn't true, incidentally, that most women did their laundry on Monday at the time
 the Robo-Magic was invented. They did it any time they felt like it. One of Dwayne
 Hoover's clearest recollections from the Great Depression, for instance, was when his
 stepmother decided to do the laundry on Christmas Eve. She was bitter about the low
 estate to which the family had fallen, and she suddenly clumped down into the
 basement, down among the black beetles and the millipedes, and did the laundry.
 "Time to do the Nigger work," she said.
 · Fred T. Barry began advertising the Robo-Magic in 1933, long before there was a
 reliable machine to sell. And he was one of the few persons in Midland City who could
 afford billboard advertising during the Great Depression, so the Robo-Magic sales
 message did not have to jostle and shriek for attention. It was practically the only
 symbol in town.
 One of Fred's ads was on a billboard outside the main gate of the defunct Keedsler
 Automobile Company, which the Robo-Magic Corporation had taken over. It showed a
 high society woman in a fur coat and pearls. She was leaving her mansion for a
 pleasant afternoon of idleness, and a balloon was coming out of her mouth. These were
 the words in the balloon:
 Another ad, which was painted on a billboard by the railroad depot, showed two white
 deliverymen who were bringing a Robo-Magic into a house. A black maid was watching
 them. Her eyes were popping out in a comical way. There was a balloon coming out of
 her mouth, too, and she was saying this:
 · Fred T. Barry wrote these ads himself, and he predicted at the time that Robo-Magic
 appliances of various sorts would eventually do what he called "all the Nigger work of
 the world," which was lifting and cleaning and cooking and washing and ironing and
 tending children and dealing with filth.
 Dwayne Hoover's stepmother wasn't the only white woman who was a terrible sport
 about doing work like that. My own mother was that way, too, and so was my sister,
 may she rest in peace. They both flatly refused to do Nigger work.
 The white men wouldn't do it either, of course. They called it women's work, and the
 women called it Nigger work.
 · I am going to make a wild guess now: I think that the end of the Civil War in my
 country frustrated the white people in the North, who won it, in a way which has never
 been acknowledged before. Their descendants inherited that frustration, I think, without
 ever knowing what it was.
 The victors in that war were cheated out of the most desirable spoils of that war,
 which were human slaves.
 · The Robo-Magic dream was interrupted by World War Two. The old Keedsler
 Automobile Works became an armory instead of an appliance factory. All that survived
 of the Robo-Magic itself was its brain, which had told the rest of the machine when to let
 the water in, when to let the water out, when to slosh, when to rinse, when to spin dry,
 and so on.
 That brain became the nerve center of the so-called "BLINC System" during the
 Second World War. It was installed on heavy bombers, and it did the actual dropping of
 bombs after a bombardier pressed his bright red "bombs away" button. The button
 activated the BLINC System, which then released the bombs in such a way as to
 achieve a desired pattern of explosions on the planet below. "BLINC" was an
 abbreviation of "Blast Interval Normalization Computer."
 Chapter 22
 And I sat there in the cocktail lounge of the new Holiday Inn, watching Dwayne
 Hoover stare into the bosom of the shirt of Kilgore Trout. I was wearing a bracelet which
 looked like this:
 WO1 stood for Warrant Officer First Class, which was the rank of Jon Sparks.
 The bracelet had cost me two dollars and a half. It was a way of expressing my pity
 for the hundreds of Americans who had been taken prisoner during the war in Viet Nam.
 Such bracelets were becoming popular. Each one bore the name of an actual prisoner
 of war, his rank, and the date of his capture.
 Wearers of the bracelets weren't supposed to take them off until the prisoners came
 home or were reported dead or missing.
 I wondered how I might fit my bracelet into my story, and hit on the good idea of
 dropping it somewhere for Wayne Hoobler to find.
 Wayne would assume that it belonged to a woman who loved somebody named
 WO1 Jon Sparks, and that the woman and WO1 had become engaged or married or
 something important on March 19th, 1971.
 Wayne would mouth the unusual first name tentatively. "Woo-ee?" he would say.
 "Woe-ee? Woe-eye? Woy?"
 · There in the cocktail lounge, I gave Dwayne Hoover credit for having taken a course
 in speed-reading at night at the Young Men's Christian Association. This would enable
 him to read Kilgore Trout's novel in minutes instead of hours.
 · There in the cocktail lounge, I took a white pill which a doctor said I could take in
 moderation, two a day, in order not to feel blue.
 · There In the cocktail lounge, the pill and the alcohol gave me a terrific sense of
 urgency about explaining all the things I hadn't explained yet, and then hurtling on with
 my tale.
 · Let's see: I have already explained Dwayne's uncharacteristic ability to read so fast.
 Kilgore Trout probably couldn't have made his trip from New York City in the time I
 allotted, but it's too late to bugger around with that. Let it stand, let it stand!
 · Let's see, let's see. Oh, yes—I have to explain a jacket Trout will see at the hospital. It
 will look like this from the back:
 Here is the explanation: There used to be only one Nigger high school in Midland
 City, and it was an all-Nigger high school still. It was named after Crispus Attucks, a
 black man who was shot by British troops in Boston in 1770. There was an oil painting
 of this event in the main corridor of the school. Several white people were stopping
 bullets, too. Crispus Attucks himself had a hole in his forehead which looked like the
 front door of a birdhouse.
 But the black people didn't call the school Crispins Attucks High School anymore.
 They called it Innocent Bystander High.
 And when another Nigger high school was built after the Second World War, it was
 named after George Washington Carver, a black man who was born into slavery, but
 who became a famous chemist anyway. He discovered many remarkable new uses for
 peanuts.
 But the black people wouldn't call that school by its proper name, either. On the day it
 opened, there were already young black people wearing jackets which looked like this
 from the back:
 · I have to explain, too, see, why so many black people in Midland City were able to
 imitate birds from various parts of what used to be the British Empire. The thing was,
 see, that Fred T. Barry and his mother and father were almost the only people in
 Midland City who could afford to hire Niggers to do the Nigger work during the Great
 Depression. They took over the old Keedsler Mansion, where Beatrice Keedsler, the
 novelist, had been born. They had as many as twenty servants working there, all at one
 time.
 Fred's father got so much money during the prosperity of the twenties as a
 bootlegger and as a swindler in stocks and bonds. He kept all his money in cash, which
 turned out to be a bright thing to do, since so many banks failed during the Great
 Depression. Also: Fred's father was an agent for Chicago gangsters who wanted to buy
 legitimate businesses for their children and grandchildren. Through Fred's father, those
 gangsters bought almost every desirable property in Midland City for anything from a
 tenth to a hundredth of what it was really worth.
 And before Fred's mother and father came to the United States after the First World
 War, they were music hall entertainers in England. Fred's father played the musical
 saw. His mother imitated birds from various parts of what was still the British Empire.
 She went on imitating them for her own amusement, well into the Great Depression.
 "The Bulbul of Malaysia," she would say, for instance, and then she would imitate that
 bird.
 "The Morepark Owl of New Zealand," she would say, and then she would imitate that
 bird.
 And all the black people who worked for her thought her act was the funniest thing
 they had ever seen, though they never laughed out loud when she did it. And, in order
 to double up their friends and relatives with laughter, they, too, learned how to imitate
 the birds.
 The craze spread. Black people who had never been near the Keedsler mansion
 could imitate the Lyre Bird and the Willy Wagtail of Australia, the Golden Oriole of India,
 the Nightingale and the Chaffinch and the Wren and the Chiffchaff of England itself.
 They could even imitate the happy screech of the extinct companion of Kilgore
 Trout's island childhood, which was the Bermuda Ern.
 When Kilgore Trout hit town, the black people could still imitate those birds, and say
 word for word what Fred's mother had said before each imitation. If one of them imitated
 a Nightingale, for instance, he or she would say this first: "What adds peculiar beauty to
 the call of the Nightingale, much beloved by poets, is the fact that it will only sing by
 moonlight."
 And so on.
 · There in the cocktail lounge, Dwayne Hoover's bad chemicals suddenly decided that
 it was time for Dwayne to demand from Kilgore Trout the secrets of life.
 "Give me the message," cried Dwayne. He tottered up from his own banquette,
 crashed down again next to Trout, throwing off heat like a steam radiator. "The message,
 please."
 And here Dwayne did something extraordinarily unnatural. He did it because I wanted
 him to. It was something I had ached to have a character do for years and years.
 Dwayne did to Trout what the Duchess did to Alice in Lewis Carroll's Alice's Adventures
 in Wonderland. He rested his chin on poor Trout's shoulder, dug in with his chin.
 "The message?" he said, digging in his chin, digging in his chin.
 Trout made no reply. He had hoped to get through what little remained of his life
 without ever having to touch another human being again. Dwayne's chin on his shoulder
 was as shattering as buggery to Trout.
 "Is this it? Is this it?" said Dwayne, snatching up Trout's novel, Now It Can Be Told.
 "Yes—that's it," croaked Trout. To his tremendous relief, Dwayne removed his chin
 from his shoulder.
 Dwayne now began to read hungrily, as though starved for print. And the speedreading
 course he had taken at the Young Men's Christian Association allowed him to
 make a perfect pig of himself with pages and words.
 "Dear Sir, poor sir, brave sir:" he read, "You are an experiment by the Creator of the
 Universe. You are the only creature in the entire Universe who has free will. You are the
 only one who has to figure out what to do next—and why. Everybody else is a robot, a
 machine.
 "Some persons seem to like you, and others seem to hate you, and you must wonder
 why. They are simply liking machines and hating machines.
 "You are pooped and demoralized," read Dwayne. "Why wouldn't you be? Of course
 it is exhausting, having to reason all the time in a universe which wasn't meant to be
 reasonable."
 Chapter 23
 Dwayne Hoover read on: "You are surrounded by loving machines, hating machines,
 greedy machines, unselfish machines, brave machines, cowardly machines, truthful
 machines, lying machines, funny machines, solemn machines," he read. "Their only
 purpose is to stir you up in every conceivable way, so the Creator of the Universe can
 watch your reactions. They can no more feel or reason than grandfather clocks.
 "The Creator of the Universe would now like to apologize not only for the capricious,
 jostling companionship he provided during the test, but for the trashy, stinking condition
 of the planet itself. The Creator programmed robots to abuse it for millions of years, so it
 would be a poisonous, festering cheese when you got here. Also, He made sure it
 would be desperately crowded by programming robots, regardless of their living conditions,
 to crave sexual intercourse and adore infants more than almost anything."
 · Mary Alice Miller, incidentally, the Women's Breast Stroke Champion of the World and
 Queen of the Arts Festival, now passed through the cocktail lounge. She made a
 shortcut to the lobby from the side parking lot, where her father was waiting for her in
 his avocado 1970 Plymouth Barracuda fastback, which he had bought as a used car
 from Dwayne. It had a new car guarantee.
 Mary Alice's father, Don Miller, was, among other things, Chairman of the Parole
 Board at Shepherdstown. It was he who had decided that Wayne Hoobler, lurking
 among Dwayne's used cars again, was fit to take his place in society.
 Mary Alice went into the lobby to get a crown and scepter for her performance as
 Queen at the Arts Festival banquet that night. Milo Maritime, the desk clerk, the
 gangster's grandson, had made them with his own two hands. Her eyes were
 permanently inflamed. They looked like maraschino cherries.
 Only one person noticed her sufficiently to comment out loud. He was Abe Cohen,
 the jeweler. He said this about Mary Alice, despising her sexlessness and innocence
 and empty mind: "Pure tuna fish!"
 · Kilgore Trout heard him say that—about pure tuna fish. His mind tried to make sense
 of it. His mind was swamped with mysteries. He might as well have been Wayne
 Hoobler, adrift among Dwayne's used cars during Hawaiian Week.
 His feet, which were sheathed in plastic, were meanwhile getting hotter all the time.
 The heat was painful now. His feet were curling and twisting, begging to be plunged into
 cold water or waved in the air.
 And Dwayne read on about himself and the Creator of the Universe, to wit:
 "He also programmed robots to write books and magazines and newspapers for you,
 and television and radio shows, and stage shows, and films. They wrote songs for you.
 The Creator of the Universe had them invent hundreds of religions, so you would have
 plenty to choose among. He had them kill each other by the millions, for this purpose
 only: that you be amazed. They have committed every possible atrocity and every
 possible kindness unfeelingly, automatically, inevitably, to get a reaction from Y-O-U."
 This last word was set in extra-large type and had a line all to itself, so it looked like
 this:
 · "Every time you went into the library," said the book, "the Creator of the Universe held
 His breath. With such a higgledy-piggledy cultural smorgasbord before you, what would
 you, with your free will, choose?
 "Your parents were fighting machines and self-pitying machines," said the book.
 "Your mother was programmed to bawl out your father for being a defective moneymaking
 machine, and your father was programmed to bawl her out for being a defective
 housekeeping machine. They were programmed to bawl each other out for being
 defective loving machines.
 "Then your father was programmed to stomp out of the house and slam the door.
 This automatically turned your mother into a weeping machine. And your father would
 go down to a tavern where he would get drunk with some other drinking machines.
 Then all the drinking machines would go to a whorehouse and rent fucking machines.
 And then your father would drag himself home to become an apologizing machine. And
 your mother would become a very slow forgiving machine."
 · Dwayne got to his feet now, having wolfed down tens of thousands of words of such
 solipsistic whimsey in ten minutes or so.
 He walked stiffly over to the piano bar. What made him stiff was his awe of his own
 strength and righteousness. He dared not use his full strength in merely walking, for fear
 of destroying the new Holiday Inn with footfalls. He did not fear for his own Me, Trout's
 book assured him that he had already been killed twenty-three times. On each
 occasion, the Creator of the Universe had patched him up and got him going again.
 Dwayne restrained himself in the name of elegance rather than safety. He was going
 to respond to his new understanding of life with finesse, for an audience of two —
 himself and his Creator.
 He approached his homosexual son.
 Bunny saw the trouble coming, supposed it was death. He might have protected
 himself easily with all the techniques of fighting he had learned in military school. But he
 chose to meditate instead. He closed his eyes, and his awareness sank into the silence
 of the unused lobes of his mind. This phosphorescent scarf floated by:
 · Dwayne shoved Bunny's head from behind. He rolled it like a cantaloupe up and
 down the keys of the piano bar. Dwayne laughed, and he called his son "... a God damn
 cock-sucking machine!"
 Bunny did not resist him, even though Bunny's face was being mangled horribly.
 Dwayne hauled his head from the keys, slammed it down again. There was blood on
 the keys—and spit, and mucus.
 Rabo Karabekian and Beatrice Keedsler and Bonnie MacMahon all grabbed Dwayne
 now, pulled him away from Bunny. This increased Dwayne's glee. "Never hit a woman,
 right?" he said to the Creator of the Universe.
 He then socked Beatrice Keedsler on the jaw. He punched Bonnie MacMahon in the
 belly. He honestly believed that they were unfeeling machines.
 "All you robots want to know why my wife ate Drano?" Dwayne asked his
 thunderstruck audience. "Ill tell you why: She was that kind of machine!"
 · There was a map of Dwayne's rampage in the paper the next morning. The dotted
 line of his route started in the cocktail lounge, crossed the asphalt to Francine Pefko's
 office in his automobile agency, doubled back to the new Holiday Inn again, then
 crossed Sugar Creek and the Westbound lane of the Interstate to the median divider,
 which was grass. Dwayne was subdued on the median divider by two State Policemen
 who happened by.
 Here is what Dwayne said to the policemen as they cuffed his hands behind his back:
 "Thank God you're here!"
 · Dwayne didn't kill anybody on his rampage, but he hurt eleven people so badly they
 had to go to the hospital. And on the map in the newspaper there was a mark indicating
 each place where a person had been injured seriously. This was the mark, greatly
 enlarged:
 · In the newspaper map of Dwayne's rampage, there were three such crosses inside
 the cocktail lounge—for Bunny and Beatrice Keedsler and Bonnie MacMahon.
 Then Dwayne ran out onto the asphalt between the Inn and his used car lot. He yelled
 for Niggers out there, telling them to come at once. "I want to talk to you," he said.
 He was out there all alone. Nobody from the cocktail lounge had followed him yet.
 Mary Alice Miller's father, Don Miller, was in his car near Dwayne, waiting for Mary Alice
 to come back with her crown and scepter, but he never saw anything of the show
 Dwayne put on. His car had seats whose backs could be made to lie flat. They could be
 made into beds. Don was lying on his back, with his head well below window level,
 resting, staring at the ceiling. He was trying to learn French by means of listening to
 lessons recorded on tape.
 "Demain nous aliens passer la soiree au cinema," said the tape, and Don tried to say
 it, too. "Nous esprons que notre grand-pere vivra encore longtemps," said the tape. And
 so on.
 · Dwayne went on calling for Niggers to come talk to him. He smiled. He thought that
 the Creator of the Universe had programmed them all to hide, as a joke.
 Dwayne glanced around craftily. Then he called out a signal he had used as a child
 to indicate that a game of hide-and-seek was over, that it was time for children in hiding
 to go home.
 Here is what he called, and the sun was down when he called it: "Olly-olly-ox-infreeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee.
 The person who answered this incantation was a person who had never played hideand-seek
 in his life. It was Wayne Hoobler, who came out from among the used cars
 quietly. He clasped his hands behind his back and placed his feet apart. He assumed
 the position known as parade rest. This position was taught to soldiers and prisoners
 alike—as a way of demonstrating attentiveness, gullibility, respect, and voluntary
 defenselessness. He was ready for anything, and wouldn't mind death.
 "There you are," said Dwayne, and his eyes crinkled in bittersweet amusement. He
 didn't know who Wayne was. He welcomed him as a typical black robot. Any other black
 robot would have served as well. And Dwayne again carried on a wry talk with the
 Creator of the Universe, using a robot as an unfeeling conversation piece. A lot of
 people in Midland City put useless objects from Hawaii or Mexico or someplace like that
 on their coffee tables or their livingroom end tables or on what-not shelves—and such
 an object was called a conversation piece.
 Wayne remained at parade rest while Dwayne told of his year as a County Executive
 for the Boy Scouts of America, when more black young people were brought into
 scouting than in any previous year. Dwayne told Wayne about his efforts to save the life
 of a young black man named Payton Brown, who, at the age of fifteen and a half,
 became the youngest person ever to die in the electric chair at Shepherdstown. Dwayne
 rambled on about all the black people he had hired when nobody else would hire black
 people, about how they never seemed to be able to get to work on time. He mentioned
 a few, too, who had been energetic and punctual, and he winked at Wayne, and he said
 this: "They were programmed that way."
 He spoke of his wife and son again, acknowledged that white robots were just like
 black robots, essentially, in that they were programmed to be whatever they were, to do
 whatever they did.
 Dwayne was silent for a moment after that.
 Mary Alice Miller's father was meanwhile continuing to learn conversational French
 while lying down in his automobile, only a few yards away.
 And then Dwayne took a swing at Wayne. He meant to slap him hard with his open
 hand, but Wayne was very good at ducking. He dropped to his knees as the hand
 swished through the air where his face had been.
 Dwayne laughed. "African dodger!" he said. This had reference to a sort of carnival
 booth which was popular when Dwayne was a boy. A black man would stick his head
 through a hole in a piece of canvas at the back of a booth, and people would pay money
 for the privilege of throwing hard baseballs at his head. If they hit his head, they won a
 prize.
 · So Dwayne thought that the Creator of the Universe had invited him to play a game of
 African dodger now. He became cunning, concealed his violent intentions with apparent
 boredom. Then he kicked at Wayne very suddenly.
 Wayne dodged again, and had to dodge yet again almost instantly, as Dwayne
 advanced with quick combinations of intended kicks, slaps, and punches. And Wayne
 vaulted onto the bed of a very unusual truck, which had been built on the chassis of a
 1962 Cadillac limousine. It had belonged to the Maritime Brothers Construction
 Company.
 Wayne's new elevation gave him a view past Dwayne of both barrels of the
 Interstate, and of a mile or more of Will Fairchild Memorial Airport, which lay beyond.
 And it is important to understand at this point that Wayne had never seen an airport
 before, was unprepared for what could happen to an airport when a plane came in at
 night.
 "That's all right, that's all right," Dwayne assured Wayne. He was being a very good
 sport. He had no intention of climbing up on the truck for another swing at Wayne. He
 was winded, for one thing. For another, he understood that Wayne was a perfect
 dodging machine. Only a perfect hitting machine could hit him. "You're too good for me,"
 said Dwayne.
 So Dwayne backed away some, contented himself with preaching up at Wayne. He
 spoke about human slavery— not only black slaves, but white slaves, too. Dwayne regarded
 coal miners and workers on assembly lines and so forth as slaves, no matter
 what color they were. "I used to think that was such a shame," he said. "I used to think
 the electric chair was a shame. I used to think war was a shame—and automobile
 accidents and cancer," he said, and so on.
 He didn't think they were shames anymore. "Why should I care what happens to
 machines?" he said.
 Wayne Hoobler's face had been blank so far, but now it began to bloom with
 uncontrollable awe. His mouth fell open.
 The runway lights of Will Fairchild Memorial Airport had just come on. Those lights
 looked like miles and miles of bewilderingly beautiful jewelry to Wayne. He was seeing a
 dream come true on the other side of the Interstate.
 The inside of Wayne's head lit up in recognition of that dream, lit up with an electric
 sign which gave a childish name to the dream—like this:
 Chapter 24
 Listen: Dwayne Hoover hurt so many people seriously that a special ambulance
 known as Martha was called. Martha was a full-sized General Motors transcontinental
 bus, but with the seats removed. There were beds for thirty-six disaster victims in there,
 plus a kitchen and a bathroom and an operating room. It had enough food and medical
 supplies aboard to serve as an independent little hospital for a week without help from
 the outside world.
 Its full name was The Martha Simmons Memorial Mobile Disaster Unit, named in
 honor of the wife of New-bolt Simmons, a County Commissioner of Public Safety. She
 had died of rabies contracted from a sick bat she found clinging to her floor-to-ceiling
 livingroom draperies one morning. She had just been reading a biography of Albert
 Schweitzer, who believed that human beings should treat simpler animals lovingly. The
 bat nipped her ever so slightly as she wrapped it in Kleenex, a face tissue. She carried it
 out onto her patio, where she laid it gently on a form of artificial grass known as Astroturf.
 She had thirty-six-inch hips, a twenty-nine-inch waist, and a thirty-eight-inch bosom at
 the time of her death. Her husband had a penis seven and a half inches long and two
 inches in diameter.
 He and Dwayne were drawn together for a while—because his wife and Dwayne's
 wife had died such strange deaths within a month of each other.
 They bought a gravel pit together, out on Route 23A, but then the Maritime Brothers
 Construction Company offered them twice what they had paid for it. So they accepted
 the offer and divided up the profits, and the friendship petered out somehow. They still
 exchanged Christmas cards.
 Dwayne's most recent Christmas card to Newbolt Simmons looked like this:
 Newbolt Simmons' most recent Christmas card to Dwayne looked like this:
 · My psychiatrist is also named Martha. She gathers Jumpy people together into little
 families which meet once a week. It's a lot of fun. She teaches us how to comfort one
 another intelligently. She is on vacation now. I like her a lot.
 And I think now, as my fiftieth birthday draws near, about the American novelist
 Thomas Wolfe, who was only thirty-eight years old when he died. He got a lot of help in
 organizing his novels from Maxwell Perkins, his editor at Charles Scribner's Sons. I
 have heard that Perkins told him to keep in mind as he wrote, as a unifying idea, a
 hero's search for a father.
 It seems to me that really truthful American novels would have the heroes and
 heroines alike looking for mothers instead. This needn't be embarrassing. It's simply
 true.
 A mother is much more useful.
 I wouldn't feel particularly good if I found another father. Neither would Dwayne
 Hoover. Neither would Kilgore Trout.
 · And just as motherless Dwayne Hoover was berating motherless Wayne Hoobler in
 the used car lot, a man who had actually killed his mother was preparing to land in a
 chartered plane at Will Fairchild Memorial Airport, on the other side of the Interstate.
 This was Eliot Rosewater, Kilgore Trout's patron. He killed his mother accidentally in a
 boating accident, when a youth. She was Women's Chess Champion of the United
 States of America, nineteen hundred and thirty-six years after the Son of God was born,
 supposedly. Rosewater killed her the year after that.
 It was his pilot who caused the airport's runways to become an ex-convict's idea of
 fairyland. Rosewater remembered his mother's jewelry when the lights came on. He
 looked to the west, and he smiled at the rosy loveliness of the Mildred Barry Memorial
 Arts Center, a harvest moon on stilts in a bend of Sugar Creek. It reminded him of how
 his mother had looked when he saw her through the bleary eyes of infancy.
 · I had made him up, of course—and his pilot, too. I put Colonel Looseleaf Harper, the
 man who had dropped an atomic bomb on Nagasaki, Japan, at the controls.
 I made Rosewater an alcoholic in another book. I now had him reasonably well
 sobered up, with the help of Alcoholics Anonymous. I had him use his new-found
 sobriety, to explore, among other things, the supposed spiritual and physical benefits of
 sexual orgies with strangers in New York City. He was only confused so far.
 I could have killed him, and his pilot, too, but I let them live on. So their plane touched
 down uneventfully.
 · The two physicians on the disaster vehicle named Martha were Cyprian Ukwende, of
 Nigeria, and Khash-drahr Miasma, from the infant nation of Bangladesh. Both were
 parts of the world which were famous from time to time for having the food run out. Both
 places were specifically mentioned, in fact, in Now It Can Be Told, by Kilgore Trout.
 Dwayne Hoover read in that book that robots all over the world were constantly running
 out of fuel and dropping dead, while waiting around to test the only free-willed creature
 in the Universe, on the off-chance that he should appear.
 · At the wheel of the ambulance was Eddie Key, a young black man who was a direct
 descendant of Francis Scott Key, the white American patriot who wrote the National
 Anthem. Eddie knew he was descended from Key. He could name more than six
 hundred of his ancestors, and had at least an anecdote about each. They were
 Africans, Indians and white men.
 He knew, for instance, that his mother's side of the family had once owned the farm
 on which Sacred Miracle Cave was discovered, that his ancestors had called it "Bluebird
 Farm."
 · Here was why there were so many young foreign doctors on the hospital staff,
 incidentally: The country didn't produce nearly enough doctors for all the sick people it
 had, but it had an awful lot of money. So it bought doctors from other countries which
 didn't have much money.
 · Eddie Key knew so much about his ancestry because the black part of his family had
 done what so many African families still do in Africa, which was to have one member of
 each generation whose duty it was to memorize the history of the family so far. Eddie
 Key had begun to store in his mind the names and adventures of ancestors on both his
 mother's and father's sides of his family when he was only six years old. As he sat in the
 front of the disaster vehicle, looking out through the windshield, he had the feeling that
 he himself was a vehicle, and that his eyes were windshields through which his
 progenitors could look, if they wished to.
 Francis Scott Key was only one of thousands back there. On the off-chance that Key
 might now be having a look at what had become of the United States of America so far,
 Eddie focussed his eyes on an American flag which was stuck to the windshield. He
 said this very quietly: "Still wavin', man."
 · Eddie Key's familiarity with a teeming past made life much more interesting to him
 than it was to Dwayne, for instance, or to me, or to Kilgore Trout, or to almost any white
 person in Midland City that day. We had no sense of anybody else using our eyes—or
 our hands. We didn't even know who our great-grandfathers and great-grandmothers
 were. Eddie Key was afloat in a river of people who were flowing from here to there in
 time. Dwayne and Trout and I were pebbles at rest.
 And Eddie Key, because he knew so much by heart, was able to have deep,
 nourishing feelings about Dwayne Hoover, for instance, and about Dr. Cyprian
 Ukwende, too. Dwayne was a man whose family had taken over Bluebird Farm.
 Ukwende, an Indaro, was a man whose ancestors had kidnapped an ancestor of Key's
 on the West Coast of Africa, a man named Ojumwa. The Indaros sold him for a musket
 to British slave traders, who took him on a sailing ship named the "Skylark" to
 Charleston, South Carolina, where he was auctioned off as a self-propelled, selfrepairing
 farm machine.
 And so on.
 · Dwayne Hoover was now hustled aboard Martha— through big double doors in her
 rear, just ahead of the engine compartment. Eddie Key was in the driver's seat, and he
 watched the action in his rearview mirror. Dwayne was swaddled so tightly in canvas
 restraining sheets that his reflection looked to Eddie like a bandaged thumb.
 Dwayne didn't notice the restraints. He thought he was on the virgin planet promised
 by the book by Kilgore Trout. Even when he was laid out horizontally by Cyprian
 Ukwende and Khashdrahr Miasma, he thought he was standing up. The book had told
 him that he went swimming in cold water on the virgin planet, that he always yelled
 something surprising when he climbed out of the icy pool. It was a game. The Creator of
 the Universe would try to guess what Dwayne would yell each day. And Dwayne would
 fool him totally.
 Here is what Dwayne yelled in the ambulance: "Goodbye, Blue Monday!" Then it
 seemed to him that another day had passed on the virgin planet, and it was time to yell
 again. "Not a cough in a carload!" he yelled.
 · Kilgore Trout was one of the walking wounded. He was able to climb aboard Martha,
 without assistance, and to choose a place to sit where he would be away from real
 emergencies. He had jumped Dwayne Hoover from behind when Dwayne dragged
 Francine Pefko out of Dwayne's showroom and onto the asphalt. Dwayne wanted to
 give her a beating in public, which his bad chemicals made him think she richly
 deserved.
 Dwayne had already broken her jaw and three ribs in the office. When he trundled
 her outside, there was a fair-size crowd which had drifted out of the cocktail lounge and
 the kitchen of the new Holiday Inn. "Best fucking machine in the State," he told the
 crowd. "Wind her up, and she'll fuck you and say she loves you, and she won't shut up
 till you give her a Colonel Sanders Kentucky Fried Chicken franchise."
 And so on. Trout grabbed him from behind.
 Trout's right ring finger somehow slipped into Dwayne's mouth, and Dwayne bit off
 the topmost joint. Dwayne let go of Francine after that, and she slumped to the asphalt.
 She was unconscious, and the most seriously injured of all. And Dwayne went cantering
 over to the concrete trough by the Interstate, and he spat Kilgore Trout's fingertip into
 Sugar Creek.
 · Kilgore Trout did not choose to lie down in Martha. He settled into a leather bucket
 seat behind Eddie Key. Key asked him what was the matter with him, and Trout held up
 his right hand, partly shrouded in a bloody handkerchief, which looked like this:
 "A slip of the lip can sink a ship!" yelled Dwayne.
 · "Remember Pearl Harbor!" yelled Dwayne. Most of what he had done during the past
 three-quarters of an hour had been hideously unjust. But he had spared Wayne
 Hoobler, at least. Wayne was back among the used cars again, unscathed. He was
 picking up a bracelet which I had pitched back there for him to find.
 As for myself: I kept a respectful distance between myself and all the violence—even
 though I had created Dwayne and his violence and the city, and the sky above and the
 Earth below. Even so, I came out of the riot with a broken watch crystal and what turned
 out later to be a broken toe. Somebody jumped backwards to get out of Dwayne's way.
 He broke my watch crystal, even though I had created him, and he broke my toe.
 · This isn't the kind of book where people get what is coming to them at the end.
 Dwayne hurt only one person who deserved to be hurt for being so wicked: That was
 Don Breedlove. Breedlove was the white gas-conversion unit installer who had raped
 Patty Keene, the waitress in Dwayne's Burger Chef out on Crestview Avenue, in the
 parking lot of George Hickman Bannister Memorial Fieldhouse out at the County
 Fairgrounds after Peanut University beat Innocent Bystander High School in the
 Regional Class High School Basketball Playoffs.
 · Don Breedlove was in the kitchen of the Inn when Dwayne began his rampage. He
 was repairing a defective gas oven in there.
 He stepped outside for some fresh air, and Dwayne came running up to him. Dwayne
 had just spit Kilgore Trout's fingertip into Sugar Creek. Don and Dwayne knew each
 other quite well, since Dwayne had once sold Breedlove a new Pontiac Venture, which
 Don said was a lemon. A lemon was an automobile which didn't run right, and which
 nobody was able to repair.
 Dwayne actually lost money on the transaction, making adjustments and replacing
 parts in an attempt to mollify Breedlove. But Breedlove was inconsolable, and he finally
 painted this sign in bright yellow on his trunk lid and on both doors:
 Here was what was really wrong with the car, incidentally. The child of a neighbor of
 Breedlove had put maple sugar in the gas tank of the Ventura. Maple sugar was a kind
 of candy made from the blood of trees.
 So Dwayne Hoover now extended his right hand to Breedlove, and Breedlove without
 thinking anything about it took that hand in his own. They linked up like this:
 This was a symbol of friendship between men. The feeling was, too, that a lot of
 character could be read into the way a man shook hands. Dwayne and Don Breedlove
 gave each other squeezes which were dry and hard.
 So Dwayne held onto Don Breedlove with his right hand, and he smiled as though
 bygones were bygones. Then he made a cup out of his left hand, and he hit Don on the
 ear with the open end of the cup. This created terrific air pressure in Don's ear. He fell
 down because the pain was so awful. Don would never hear anything with that ear, ever
 again.
 · So Don was in the ambulance, too, now—sitting up like Kilgore Trout. Francine was
 lying down—unconscious, but moaning. Beatrice Keedsler was lying down, although
 she might have sat up. Her jaw was broken. Bunny Hoover was lying down. His
 face was unrecognizable, even as a face—anybody's face. He had been given mor
 phine by Cyprian Ukwende.
 There were five other victims as well—one white female, two white males, two black
 males. The three white people had never been in Midland City before. They were on
 their way together from Erie, Pennsylvania, to the Grand Canyon, which was the
 deepest crack on the planet. They wanted to look down into the crack, but they never
 got to do it. Dwayne Hoover assaulted them as they walked from the car toward the
 lobby of the new Holiday Inn.
 The two black males were both kitchen employees of the Inn.
 · Cyprian Ukwende now tried to remove Dwayne Hoover's shoes—but Dwayne's shoes
 and laces and socks were impregnated with the plastic material, which he had picked
 up while wading across Sugar Creek.
 Ukwende was not mystified by plasticized, unitized shoes and socks. He saw shoes
 and socks like that every day at the hospital, on the feet of children who had played too
 close to Sugar Creek. In fact, he had hung a pair of tinsnips on the wall of the hospital's
 emergency room—for cutting off plasticized, unitized shoes and socks.
 He turned to his Bengali assistant, young Dr. Khash-drahr Miasma. "Get some
 shears," he said.
 Miasma was standing with his back to the door of the ladies' toilet on the emergency
 vehicle. He had done nothing so far to deal with all the emergencies.
 Ukwende and police and a team from Civil Defense had done the work so far. Miasma
 now refused even to find some shears.
 Basically, Miasma probably shouldn't have been in the field of medicine at all, or at
 least not in any area where there was a chance that he might be criticized. He could not
 tolerate criticism. This was a characteristic beyond his control. Any hint that anything
 about him was not absolutely splendid automatically turned him into a useless, sulky
 child who would only say that it wanted to go home.
 That was what he said when Ukwende told him a second time to find shears: "I want
 to go home."
 Here is what he had been criticized for, just before the alarm came in about
 Dwayne's going berserk: He had amputated a black man's foot, whereas the foot could
 probably have been saved.
 And so on.
 · I could go on and on with the intimate details about the various lives of people on the
 super-ambulance, but what good is more information?
 I agree with Kilgore Trout about realistic novels and their accumulations of nit-picking
 details. In Trout's novel, The Pan-Galactic Memory Bank, the hero is on a space ship
 two hundred miles long and sixty-two miles in diameter. He gets a realistic novel out of
 the branch library in his neighborhood. He reads about sixty pages of it, and then he
 takes it back.
 The librarian asks him why he doesn't like it, and he says to her, "I already know
 about human beings."
 And so on.
 · Martha began to move. Kilgore Trout saw a sign he liked a lot. Here is what it said:
 And so on.
 Dwayne Hoover's awareness returned to Earth momentarily. He spoke of opening a
 health club in Midland City, with rowing machines and stationary bicycles and whirlpool
 baths and sunlamps and a swimming pool and so on. He told Cyprian Ukwende that the
 thing to do with a health club was to open it and then sell it as soon as possible for a
 profit. "People get all enthusiastic about getting back in shape or losing some pounds,"
 said Dwayne. "They sign up for the program, but then they lose interest in about a year,
 and they stop coming. That's how people are."
 And so on.
 Dwayne wasn't going to open any health club. He wasn't going to open anything ever
 again. The people he had injured so unjustly would sue him so vengefully that he would
 be rendered destitute. He would become one more withered balloon of an old man on
 Midland City's Skid Row, which was the neighborhood of the once fashionable Fairchild
 Hotel. He would be by no means the only drifter of whom it could be truthfully said, "See
 him? Can you believe it? He doesn't have a doodley-squat now, but he used to be
 fabulously well-to-do."
 And so on.
 Kilgore Trout now peeled strips and patches of plastic from his burning shins and feet
 in the ambulance. He had to use his uninjured left hand.
 
 Epilogue
 The emergency room of the hospital was In the basement. After Kilgore Trout had the
 stump of his ring finger disinfected and trimmed and bandaged, he was told to go
 upstairs to the finance office. There were certain forms he had to fill out, since he was
 from outside Midland County, had no health insurance, and was destitute. He had no
 checkbook. He had no cash.
 He got lost in the basement for a little while, as a lot of people did. He found the
 double doors to the morgue, as a lot of people did. He automatically mooned about his
 own mortality, as a lot of people did. He found an x-ray room, which wasn't in use. It
 made him wonder automatically if anything bad was growing inside himself. Other
 people had wondered exactly the same thing when they passed that room.
 Trout felt nothing now that millions of other people wouldn't have felt—automatically.
 And Trout found stairs, but they were the wrong stairs. They led him not to the lobby
 and the finance office and the gift shop and all that, but into a matrix of rooms where
 persons were recovering or failing to recover from injuries of all kinds. Many of the
 people there had been flung to the earth by the force of gravity, which never relaxed for
 a second.
 Trout passed a very expensive private room now, and there was a young black man
 in there, with a white telephone and a color television set and boxes of candy and
 bouquets of flowers all around. He was Elgin Washington, a pimp who operated out of
 the old Holiday Inn. He was only twenty-six years old, but he was fabulously well-to-do.
 Visiting hours had ended, so all his female sex slaves had departed. But they had left
 clouds of perfume behind. Trout gagged as he passed the door. It was an automatic
 reaction to the fundamentally unfriendly cloud. Elgin Washington had just sniffed
 cocaine into his sinus passages, which amplified tremendously the telepathic messages
 he sent and received. He felt one hundred tunes bigger than life, because the
 messages were so loud and exciting. It was their noise that thrilled him. He didn't care
 what they said.
 And, in the midst of the uproar, Elgin Washington said something wheedlingly to
 Trout. "Hey man, hey man, hey man," he wheedled. He had had his foot amputated
 earlier in the day by Khashdrahr Miasma, but he had forgotten that. "Hey man, hey
 man," he coaxed. He wanted nothing particular from Trout. Some part of his mind was
 idly exercising his skill at making strangers come to him. He was a fisherman for men's
 souls. "Hey man—" he said. He showed a gold tooth. He winked an eye.
 Trout came to the foot of the black man's bed. This wasn't compassion on his part.
 He was being machinery again. Trout was, like so many Earthlings, a fully automatic
 boob when a pathological personality like Elgin Washington told him what to want, what
 to do. Both men, incidentally, were descendants of the Emperor Charlemagne. Anybody
 with any European blood in him was a descendant of the Emperor Charlemagne.
 Elgin Washington perceived that he had caught yet another human being without
 really meaning to. It was not in his nature to let one go without making him feel hi some
 way diminished, in some way a fool. Sometimes he actually killed a man in order to
 diminish him, but he was gentle with Trout. He closed his eyes as though thinking hard,
 then he earnestly said, "I think I may be dying."
 "I'll get a nurse!" said Trout. Any human being would have said exactly the same
 thing.
 "No, no," said Elgin Washington, waving his hands in dreamy protest. "I'm dying slow.
 It's gradual."
 "I see," said Trout.
 "You got to do me a favor," said Washington. He had no idea what favor to ask. It
 would come to him. Ideas for favors always came.
 "What favor?" said Trout uneasily. He stiffened at the mention of an unspecified
 favor. He was that kind of a machine. Washington knew he would stiffen. Every human
 being was that kind of a machine.
 "I want you to listen to me while I whistle the song of the Nightingale," he said. He
 commanded Trout to be silent by giving him the evil eye. "What adds peculiar beauty to
 the call of the Nightingale, much beloved by poets," he said, "is the fact that it will only
 sing by moonlight." Then he did what almost every black person in Midland City would
 do: he imitated a Nightingale.
 · The Midland City Festival of the Arts was postponed because of madness. Fred T.
 Barry, its chairman, came to the hospital in his limousine, dressed like a Chinaman, to
 offer his sympathy to Beatrice Keedsler and Kilgore Trout. Trout could not be found
 anywhere. Beatrice Keedsler had been put to sleep with morphine.
 Kilgore Trout assumed that the Arts Festival would still take place that night. He had
 no money for any form of transportation, so he set out on foot. He began the five mile
 walk down Fairchild Boulevard—toward a tiny amber dot at the other end. The dot was
 the Midland City Center for the Arts. He would make it grow by walking toward it. When
 his walking had made it big enough, it would swallow him up. There would be food
 inside.
 · I was waiting to intercept him, about six blocks away. I sat in a Plymouth Duster I had
 rented from Avis with my Diners' Club card. I had a paper tube in my mouth. It was
 stuffed with leaves. I set it on fire. It was a soigné thing to do.
 My penis was three inches long and five inches in diameter. Its diameter was a
 world's record as far as I knew. It slumbered now in my Jockey Shorts. And I got out of
 the car to stretch my legs, which was another soigné thing to do. I was among factories
 and warehouses. The streetlights were widely-spaced and feeble. Parking lots were
 vacant, except for night watchmen's cars which were here and there. There was no
 traffic on Fairchild Boulevard, which had once been the aorta of the town. The life had
 all been drained out of it by the Interstate and by the Robert F. Kennedy Inner Belt
 Expressway, which was built on the old right-of-way of the Monon Railroad. The Monon
 was defunct.
 · Defunct.
 · Nobody slept in that part of town. Nobody lurked there. It was a system of forts at
 night, with high fences and alarms, and with prowling dogs. They were killing machines.
 When I got out of my Plymouth Duster, I feared nothing. That was foolish of me. A
 writer off-guard, since the materials with which he works are so dangerous, can expect
 agony as quick as a thunderclap.
 I was about to be attacked by a Doberman pinscher. He was a leading character in
 an earlier version of this book.
 · Listen: That Doberman's name was Kazak. He patrolled the supply yard of the
 Maritimo Brothers Construction Company at night. Kazak's trainers, the people who
 explained to him what sort of a planet he was on and what sort of an animal he was,
 taught him that the Creator of the Universe wanted him to kill anything he could catch,
 and to eat it, too.
 In an earlier version of this book, I had Benjamin Davis, the black husband of Lottie
 Davis, Dwayne Hoover's maid, take care of Kazak. He threw raw meat down into the pit
 where Kazak lived in the daytime. He dragged Kazak into the pit at sunrise. He
 screamed at him and threw tennis balls at him at sundown. Then he turned him loose.
 Benjamin Davis was first trumpet with the Midland City Symphony Orchestra, but he
 got no pay for that, so he needed a real job. He wore a thick gown made of war-surplus
 mattresses and chicken wire, so Kazak could not kill him. Kazak tried and tried. There
 were chunks of mat-tress and swatches of chicken wire all over the yard.
 And Kazak did his best to kill anybody who came too close to the fence which
 enclosed his planet. He leaped at people as though the fence weren't there. The fence
 bellied out toward the sidewalk everywhere. It looked as though somebody had been
 shooting cannonballs at it from inside.
 I should have noticed the queer shape of the fence when I got out of my automobile,
 when I did the soigné thing of lighting a cigarette. I should have known that a character
 as ferocious as Kazak was not easily cut out of a novel.
 Kazak was crouching behind a pile of bronze pipe which the Maritime Brothers had
 bought cheap from a hijacker earlier that day. Kazak meant to kill and eat me.
 · I turned my back to the fence, took a deep puff of my cigarette. Pall Malls would kill
 me by and by. And I mooned philosophically at the murky battlements of the old
 Keedsler Mansion, on the other side of Fairchild Boulevard.
 Beatrice Keedsler had been raised in there. The most famous murders in the city's
 history had been committed there. Will Fairchild, the war hero, and the maternal uncle
 of Beatrice Keedsler; appeared one summer night in 1926 with a Springfield rifle. He
 shot and killed five relatives, three servants, two policemen, and all the animals in the
 Keedsler's private zoo. Then he shot himself through his heart.
 When an autopsy was performed on him, a tumor the size of a piece of birdshot was
 found in his brain. This was what caused the murders.
 · After the Keedslers lost the mansion at the start of the Great Depression, Fred T.
 Barry and his parents moved in. The old place was filled with the sounds of British birds.
 It was silent property of the city now, and there was talk of making it into a museum
 where children could learn the history of Midland City—as told by arrowheads and
 stuffed animals and white men's early artifacts.
 Fred T. Barry had offered to donate half a million dollars to the proposed museum, on
 one condition: that the first Robo-Magic and the early posters which advertised it be put
 on display.
 And he wanted the exhibit to show, too, how machines evolved just as animals did,
 but with much greater speed.
 · I gazed at the Keedsler mansion, never dreaming that a volcanic dog was about to
 erupt behind me. Kilgore Trout came nearer. I was almost indifferent to his approach, although
 we had momentous things to say to one another about my having created him.
 I thought instead of my paternal grandfather, who had been the first licensed
 architect in Indiana. He had designed some dream houses for Hoosier millionaires.
 They were mortuaries and guitar schools and cellar holes and parking lots now. I
 thought of my mother, who drove me around Indianapolis one time during the Great
 Depression, to impress me with how rich and powerful my maternal grandfather had
 been. She showed me where his brewery had been, where some of his dream houses
 had been. Every one of the monuments was a cellar hole.
 Kilgore Trout was only half a block from his Creator now, and slowing down. I worried
 him.
 I turned toward him, so that my sinus cavities, where all telepathic messages were
 sent and received, were lined up symmetrically with his. I told him this over and over
 telepathically: "I have good news for you."
 Kazak sprung.
 · I saw Kazak out of the corner of my right eye. His eyes were pinwheels. His teeth
 were white daggers. His slobber was cyanide. His blood was nitroglycerine.
 He was floating toward me like a zeppelin, hanging lazily in air.
 My eyes told my mind about him.
 My mind sent a message to my hypothalamus, told it to release the hormone CRF
 into the short vessels connecting my hypothalamus and my pituitary gland.
 The CRF inspired my pituitary gland to dump the hormone ACTH into my
 bloodstream. My pituitary had been making and storing ACTH for just such an occasion.
 And nearer and nearer the zeppelin came.
 And some of the ACTH in my bloodstream reached the outer shell of my adrenal
 gland, which had been making and storing glucocorticoids for emergencies. My adrenal
 gland added the glucocorticoids to my bloodstream. They went all over my body,
 changing glycogen into glucose. Glucose was muscle food. It would help me fight like a
 wildcat or run like a deer.
 And nearer and nearer the zeppelin came.
 My adrenal gland gave me a shot of adrenaline, too. I turned purple as my blood
 pressure skyrocketed. The adrenaline made my heart go like a burglar alarm. It also
 stood my hair on end. It also caused coagulants to pour into my bloodstream, so, in
 case I was wounded, my vital juices wouldn't drain away.
 Everything my body had done so far fell within normal operating procedures for a
 human machine. But my body took one defensive measure which I am told was without
 precedent in medical history. It may have happened because some wire short-circuited
 or some gasket blew. At any rate, I also retracted my testicles into my abdominal cavity,
 pulled them into my fuselage like the landing gear of an airplane. And now they tell me
 that only surgery will bring them down again.
 Be that as it may, Kilgore Trout watched me from half a block away, not knowing who
 I was, not knowing about Kazak and what my body had done about Kazak so far.
 Trout had had a full day already, but it wasn't over yet. Now he saw his Creator leap
 completely over an automobile.
 · I landed on my hands and knees in the middle of Fair-child Boulevard.
 Kazak was flung back by the fence. Gravity took charge of him as it had taken charge
 of me. Gravity slammed him down on concrete. Kazak was knocked silly.
 Kilgore Trout turned away. He hastened anxiously back toward the hospital. I called
 out to him, but that only made him walk faster.
 So I jumped into my car and chased him. I was still high as a kite on adrenaline and
 coagulants and all that. I did not know yet that I had retracted my testicles in all the
 excitement. I felt only vague discomfort down there.
 Trout was cantering when I came alongside. I clocked him at eleven miles an hour,
 which was excellent for a man his age. He, too, was now full of adrenaline and coagulants
 and glucocorticoids.
 My windows were rolled down, and I called this to him: "Whoa! Whoa! Mr. Trout!
 Whoa! Mr. Trout!"
 It slowed him down to be called by name.
 "Whoa! I'm a friend!" I said. He shuffled to a stop, leaned in panting exhaustion
 against a fence surrounding an appliance warehouse belonging to the General Electric
 Company. The company's monogram and motto hung in the night sky behind Kilgore
 Trout, whose eyes were wild. The motto was this:
 PROGRESS IS OUR MOST IMPORTANT PRODUCT
 · "Mr. Trout," I said from the unlighted interior of the car, "you have nothing to fear. I
 bring you tidings of great joy."
 He was slow to get his breath back, so he wasn't much of a conversationalist at first.
 "Are—are you—from the— the Arts Festival?" he said. His eyes rolled and rolled.
 "I am from the Everything Festival," I replied.
 "The what?" he said.
 I thought it would be a good idea to let him have a good look at me, and so attempted
 to flick on the dome light. I turned on the windshield washers instead. I turned them off
 again. My view of the lights of the County Hospital was garbled by beads of water. I
 pulled at another switch, and it came away in my hand. It was a cigarette lighter. So I
 had no choice but to continue to speak from darkness.
 "Mr. Trout," I said, "I am a novelist, and I created you for use in my books."
 "Pardon me?" he said.
 I'm your Creator," I said. "You're in the middle of a book right now—close to the end
 of it, actually."
 "Urn," he said.
 "Are there any questions you'd like to ask?"
 "Pardon me?" he said.
 "Feel free to ask anything you want—about the past, about the future," I said.
 "There's a Nobel Prize in your future."
 "A what?" he said.
 "A Nobel Prize in medicine."
 "Huh," he said. It was a noncommittal sound.
 "I've also arranged for you to have a reputable publisher from now on. No more
 beaver books for you."
 "Urn," he said.
 "If I were in your spot, I would certainly have lots of questions," I said.
 "Do you have a gun?" he said.
 I laughed there in the dark, tried to turn on the light again, activated the windshield
 washer again. "I don't need a gun to control you, Mr. Trout. All I have to do is write down
 something about you, and that's it."
 · "Are you crazy?" he said.
 "No," I said. And I shattered his power to doubt me. I transported him to the Taj
 Mahal and then to Venice and then to Dar es Salaam and then to the surface of the
 Sun, where the flames could not consume him—and then back to Midland City again.
 The poor old man crashed to his knees. He reminded me of the way my mother and
 Bunny Hoover's mother used to act whenever somebody tried to take their photographs.
 As he cowered there, I transported him to the Bermuda of his childhood, had him
 contemplate the infertile egg of a Bermuda Ern. I took him from there to the Indianapolis
 of my childhood. I put him in a circus crowd there. I had him see a man with locomotor
 ataxia and a woman with a goiter as big as a zucchini.
 · I got out of my rented car. I did it noisily, so his ears would tell him a lot about his
 Creator, even if he was unwilling to use his eyes. I slammed the car door firmly. As I
 approached him from the driver's side of the car, I swiveled my feet some, so that my
 footsteps were not only deliberate but gritty, too.
 I stopped with the tips of my shoes on the rim of the narrow field of his downcast
 eyes. "Mr. Trout, I love you," I said gently. "I have broken your mind to pieces. I want
 to make it whole. I want you to feel a wholeness and inner harmony such as I have
 never allowed you to feel before. I want you to raise your eyes, to look at what I have in
 my hand."
 I had nothing in my hand, but such was my power over Trout that he would see in it
 whatever I wished him to see. I might have shown him a Helen of Troy, for instance,
 only six inches tall.
 "Mr. Trout-Kilgore-" I said, "I hold in my hand a symbol of wholeness and harmony
 and nourishment. It is Oriental in its simplicity, but we are Americans, Kilgore, and not
 Chinamen. We Americans require symbols which are richly colored and threedimensional
 and juicy. Most of all, we hunger for symbols which have not been
 poisoned by great sins our nation has committed, such as slavery and genocide and
 criminal neglect, or by tinhorn commercial greed and cunning.
 "Look up, Mr. Trout," I said, and I waited patiently. "Kilgore-?"
 The old man looked up, and he had my father's wasted face when my father was a
 widower—when my father was an old old man.
 He saw that I held an apple in my hand.
 · "I am approaching my fiftieth birthday, Mr. Trout," I said. "I am cleansing and renewing
 myself for the very different sorts of years to come. Under similar spiritual conditions,
 Count Tolstoi freed his serfs, Thomas Jefferson freed his slaves. I am going to set at
 liberty all the literary characters who have served me so loyally during my writing career.
 "You are the only one I am telling. For the others, tonight will be a night like any other
 night. Arise, Mr. Trout, you are free, you are free."
 He arose shamblingly.
 I might have shaken his hand, but his right hand was injured, so our hands remained
 dangling at our sides.
 "Bon voyage? I said. I disappeared.
 · I somersaulted lazily and pleasantly through the void, which is my hiding place when I
 dematerialize. Trout's cries to me faded as the distance between us increased.
 His voice was my father's voice. I heard my father— and I saw my mother in the void.
 My mother stayed far, far away, because she had left me a legacy of suicide.
 A small hand mirror floated by. It was a leak with a mother-of-pearl handle and frame.
 I captured it easily, held it up to my own right eye, which looked like this:
 Here was what Kilgore Trout cried out to me in my father's voice: "Make me young,
 make me young, make me young!"
 · Kurt Vonnegut, Jr., is the son and grandson of Indianapolis architects. They were
 painters, too. His only living sibling is a distinguished physicist who discovered, among
 other things, that silver iodide can sometimes make it snow or rain. This is Mr.

 
 
 
 Produced by Robert Cicconetti, Geetu Melwani and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
        2_B_R_0_2_B
 
            By
     Kurt Vonnegut, Jr.
 
 
 Transcriber note: This etext was produced from Worlds of If, January 1962.
 Extensive research did not uncover any evidence that the U.S. copyright on
 this publication was renewed.
 
 
 
 
 Got a problem? Just pick up the phone.
 It solved them all--and all the same way!
 
 
      2
      B
      R
      0
      2
      B
 
 
 by KURT VONNEGUT, JR.
 
 
 
 
 Everything was perfectly swell.
 
 There were no prisons, no slums, no insane asylums, no cripples, no
 poverty, no wars.
 
 All diseases were conquered. So was old age.
 
 Death, barring accidents, was an adventure for volunteers.
 
 The population of the United States was stabilized at forty-million
 souls.
 
 One bright morning in the Chicago Lying-in Hospital, a man named Edward
 K. Wehling, Jr., waited for his wife to give birth. He was the only man
 waiting. Not many people were born a day any more.
 
 Wehling was fifty-six, a mere stripling in a population whose average
 age was one hundred and twenty-nine.
 
 X-rays had revealed that his wife was going to have triplets. The
 children would be his first.
 
 Young Wehling was hunched in his chair, his head in his hand. He was so
 rumpled, so still and colorless as to be virtually invisible. His
 camouflage was perfect, since the waiting room had a disorderly and
 demoralized air, too. Chairs and ashtrays had been moved away from the
 walls. The floor was paved with spattered dropcloths.
 
 The room was being redecorated. It was being redecorated as a memorial
 to a man who had volunteered to die.
 
 A sardonic old man, about two hundred years old, sat on a stepladder,
 painting a mural he did not like. Back in the days when people aged
 visibly, his age would have been guessed at thirty-five or so. Aging had
 touched him that much before the cure for aging was found.
 
 The mural he was working on depicted a very neat garden. Men and women
 in white, doctors and nurses, turned the soil, planted seedlings,
 sprayed bugs, spread fertilizer.
 
 Men and women in purple uniforms pulled up weeds, cut down plants that
 were old and sickly, raked leaves, carried refuse to trash-burners.
 
 Never, never, never--not even in medieval Holland nor old Japan--had a
 garden been more formal, been better tended. Every plant had all the
 loam, light, water, air and nourishment it could use.
 
 A hospital orderly came down the corridor, singing under his breath a
 popular song:
 
      If you don't like my kisses, honey,
      Here's what I will do:
      I'll go see a girl in purple,
      Kiss this sad world toodle-oo.
      If you don't want my lovin',
      Why should I take up all this space?
      I'll get off this old planet,
      Let some sweet baby have my place.
 
 The orderly looked in at the mural and the muralist. "Looks so real,"
 he said, "I can practically imagine I'm standing in the middle of it."
 
 "What makes you think you're not in it?" said the painter. He gave a
 satiric smile. "It's called 'The Happy Garden of Life,' you know."
 
 "That's good of Dr. Hitz," said the orderly.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 He was referring to one of the male figures in white, whose head was a
 portrait of Dr. Benjamin Hitz, the hospital's Chief Obstetrician. Hitz
 was a blindingly handsome man.
 
 "Lot of faces still to fill in," said the orderly. He meant that the
 faces of many of the figures in the mural were still blank. All blanks
 were to be filled with portraits of important people on either the
 hospital staff or from the Chicago Office of the Federal Bureau of
 Termination.
 
 "Must be nice to be able to make pictures that look like something,"
 said the orderly.
 
 The painter's face curdled with scorn. "You think I'm proud of this
 daub?" he said. "You think this is my idea of what life really looks
 like?"
 
 "What's your idea of what life looks like?" said the orderly.
 
 The painter gestured at a foul dropcloth. "There's a good picture of
 it," he said. "Frame that, and you'll have a picture a damn sight more
 honest than this one."
 
 "You're a gloomy old duck, aren't you?" said the orderly.
 
 "Is that a crime?" said the painter.
 
 The orderly shrugged. "If you don't like it here, Grandpa--" he said,
 and he finished the thought with the trick telephone number that people
 who didn't want to live any more were supposed to call. The zero in the
 telephone number he pronounced "naught."
 
 The number was: "2 B R 0 2 B."
 
 It was the telephone number of an institution whose fanciful sobriquets
 included: "Automat," "Birdland," "Cannery," "Catbox," "De-louser,"
 "Easy-go," "Good-by, Mother," "Happy Hooligan," "Kiss-me-quick," "Lucky
 Pierre," "Sheepdip," "Waring Blendor," "Weep-no-more" and "Why Worry?"
 
 "To be or not to be" was the telephone number of the municipal gas
 chambers of the Federal Bureau of Termination.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The painter thumbed his nose at the orderly. "When I decide it's time to
 go," he said, "it won't be at the Sheepdip."
 
 "A do-it-yourselfer, eh?" said the orderly. "Messy business, Grandpa.
 Why don't you have a little consideration for the people who have to
 clean up after you?"
 
 The painter expressed with an obscenity his lack of concern for the
 tribulations of his survivors. "The world could do with a good deal more
 mess, if you ask me," he said.
 
 The orderly laughed and moved on.
 
 Wehling, the waiting father, mumbled something without raising his head.
 And then he fell silent again.
 
 A coarse, formidable woman strode into the waiting room on spike heels.
 Her shoes, stockings, trench coat, bag and overseas cap were all purple,
 the purple the painter called "the color of grapes on Judgment Day."
 
 The medallion on her purple musette bag was the seal of the Service
 Division of the Federal Bureau of Termination, an eagle perched on a
 turnstile.
 
 The woman had a lot of facial hair--an unmistakable mustache, in fact. A
 curious thing about gas-chamber hostesses was that, no matter how lovely
 and feminine they were when recruited, they all sprouted mustaches
 within five years or so.
 
 "Is this where I'm supposed to come?" she said to the painter.
 
 "A lot would depend on what your business was," he said. "You aren't
 about to have a baby, are you?"
 
 "They told me I was supposed to pose for some picture," she said. "My
 name's Leora Duncan." She waited.
 
 "And you dunk people," he said.
 
 "What?" she said.
 
 "Skip it," he said.
 
 "That sure is a beautiful picture," she said. "Looks just like heaven or
 something."
 
 "Or something," said the painter. He took a list of names from his smock
 pocket. "Duncan, Duncan, Duncan," he said, scanning the list. "Yes--here
 you are. You're entitled to be immortalized. See any faceless body here
 you'd like me to stick your head on? We've got a few choice ones left."
 
 She studied the mural bleakly. "Gee," she said, "they're all the same to
 me. I don't know anything about art."
 
 "A body's a body, eh?" he said, "All righty. As a master of fine art, I
 recommend this body here." He indicated a faceless figure of a woman who
 was carrying dried stalks to a trash-burner.
 
 "Well," said Leora Duncan, "that's more the disposal people, isn't it? I
 mean, I'm in service. I don't do any disposing."
 
 The painter clapped his hands in mock delight. "You say you don't know
 anything about art, and then you prove in the next breath that you know
 more about it than I do! Of course the sheave-carrier is wrong for a
 hostess! A snipper, a pruner--that's more your line." He pointed to a
 figure in purple who was sawing a dead branch from an apple tree. "How
 about her?" he said. "You like her at all?"
 
 "Gosh--" she said, and she blushed and became humble--"that--that puts
 me right next to Dr. Hitz."
 
 "That upsets you?" he said.
 
 "Good gravy, no!" she said. "It's--it's just such an honor."
 
 "Ah, You admire him, eh?" he said.
 
 "Who doesn't admire him?" she said, worshiping the portrait of Hitz. It
 was the portrait of a tanned, white-haired, omnipotent Zeus, two hundred
 and forty years old. "Who doesn't admire him?" she said again. "He was
 responsible for setting up the very first gas chamber in Chicago."
 
 "Nothing would please me more," said the painter, "than to put you next
 to him for all time. Sawing off a limb--that strikes you as
 appropriate?"
 
 "That is kind of like what I do," she said. She was demure about what
 she did. What she did was make people comfortable while she killed them.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 And, while Leora Duncan was posing for her portrait, into the
 waitingroom bounded Dr. Hitz himself. He was seven feet tall, and he
 boomed with importance, accomplishments, and the joy of living.
 
 "Well, Miss Duncan! Miss Duncan!" he said, and he made a joke. "What
 are you doing here?" he said. "This isn't where the people leave. This
 is where they come in!"
 
 "We're going to be in the same picture together," she said shyly.
 
 "Good!" said Dr. Hitz heartily. "And, say, isn't that some picture?"
 
 "I sure am honored to be in it with you," she said.
 
 "Let me tell you," he said, "I'm honored to be in it with you. Without
 women like you, this wonderful world we've got wouldn't be possible."
 
 He saluted her and moved toward the door that led to the delivery rooms.
 "Guess what was just born," he said.
 
 "I can't," she said.
 
 "Triplets!" he said.
 
 "Triplets!" she said. She was exclaiming over the legal implications of
 triplets.
 
 The law said that no newborn child could survive unless the parents of
 the child could find someone who would volunteer to die. Triplets, if
 they were all to live, called for three volunteers.
 
 "Do the parents have three volunteers?" said Leora Duncan.
 
 "Last I heard," said Dr. Hitz, "they had one, and were trying to scrape
 another two up."
 
 "I don't think they made it," she said. "Nobody made three appointments
 with us. Nothing but singles going through today, unless somebody
 called in after I left. What's the name?"
 
 "Wehling," said the waiting father, sitting up, red-eyed and frowzy.
 "Edward K. Wehling, Jr., is the name of the happy father-to-be."
 
 He raised his right hand, looked at a spot on the wall, gave a hoarsely
 wretched chuckle. "Present," he said.
 
 "Oh, Mr. Wehling," said Dr. Hitz, "I didn't see you."
 
 "The invisible man," said Wehling.
 
 "They just phoned me that your triplets have been born," said Dr. Hitz.
 "They're all fine, and so is the mother. I'm on my way in to see them
 now."
 
 "Hooray," said Wehling emptily.
 
 "You don't sound very happy," said Dr. Hitz.
 
 "What man in my shoes wouldn't be happy?" said Wehling. He gestured with
 his hands to symbolize care-free simplicity. "All I have to do is pick
 out which one of the triplets is going to live, then deliver my maternal
 grandfather to the Happy Hooligan, and come back here with a receipt."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Dr. Hitz became rather severe with Wehling, towered over him. "You don't
 believe in population control, Mr. Wehling?" he said.
 
 "I think it's perfectly keen," said Wehling tautly.
 
 "Would you like to go back to the good old days, when the population of
 the Earth was twenty billion--about to become forty billion, then eighty
 billion, then one hundred and sixty billion? Do you know what a drupelet
 is, Mr. Wehling?" said Hitz.
 
 "Nope," said Wehling sulkily.
 
 "A drupelet, Mr. Wehling, is one of the little knobs, one of the little
 pulpy grains of a blackberry," said Dr. Hitz. "Without population
 control, human beings would now be packed on this surface of this old
 planet like drupelets on a blackberry! Think of it!"
 
 Wehling continued to stare at the same spot on the wall.
 
 "In the year 2000," said Dr. Hitz, "before scientists stepped in and
 laid down the law, there wasn't even enough drinking water to go around,
 and nothing to eat but sea-weed--and still people insisted on their
 right to reproduce like jackrabbits. And their right, if possible, to
 live forever."
 
 "I want those kids," said Wehling quietly. "I want all three of them."
 
 "Of course you do," said Dr. Hitz. "That's only human."
 
 "I don't want my grandfather to die, either," said Wehling.
 
 "Nobody's really happy about taking a close relative to the Catbox,"
 said Dr. Hitz gently, sympathetically.
 
 "I wish people wouldn't call it that," said Leora Duncan.
 
 "What?" said Dr. Hitz.
 
 "I wish people wouldn't call it 'the Catbox,' and things like that," she
 said. "It gives people the wrong impression."
 
 "You're absolutely right," said Dr. Hitz. "Forgive me." He corrected
 himself, gave the municipal gas chambers their official title, a title
 no one ever used in conversation. "I should have said, 'Ethical Suicide
 Studios,'" he said.
 
 "That sounds so much better," said Leora Duncan.
 
 "This child of yours--whichever one you decide to keep, Mr. Wehling,"
 said Dr. Hitz. "He or she is going to live on a happy, roomy, clean,
 rich planet, thanks to population control. In a garden like that mural
 there." He shook his head. "Two centuries ago, when I was a young man,
 it was a hell that nobody thought could last another twenty years. Now
 centuries of peace and plenty stretch before us as far as the
 imagination cares to travel."
 
 He smiled luminously.
 
 The smile faded as he saw that Wehling had just drawn a revolver.
 
 Wehling shot Dr. Hitz dead. "There's room for one--a great big one," he
 said.
 
 And then he shot Leora Duncan. "It's only death," he said to her as she
 fell. "There! Room for two."
 
 And then he shot himself, making room for all three of his children.
 
 Nobody came running. Nobody, seemingly, heard the shots.
 
 The painter sat on the top of his stepladder, looking down reflectively
 on the sorry scene.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The painter pondered the mournful puzzle of life demanding to be born
 and, once born, demanding to be fruitful ... to multiply and to live as
 long as possible--to do all that on a very small planet that would have
 to last forever.
 
 All the answers that the painter could think of were grim. Even grimmer,
 surely, than a Catbox, a Happy Hooligan, an Easy Go. He thought of war.
 He thought of plague. He thought of starvation.
 
 He knew that he would never paint again. He let his paintbrush fall to
 the dropcloths below. And then he decided he had had about enough of
 life in the Happy Garden of Life, too, and he came slowly down from the
 ladder.
 
 He took Wehling's pistol, really intending to shoot himself.
 
 But he didn't have the nerve.
 
 And then he saw the telephone booth in the corner of the room. He went
 to it, dialed the well-remembered number: "2 B R 0 2 B."
 
 "Federal Bureau of Termination," said the very warm voice of a hostess.
 
 "How soon could I get an appointment?" he asked, speaking very
 carefully.
 
 "We could probably fit you in late this afternoon, sir," she said. "It
 might even be earlier, if we get a cancellation."
 
 "All right," said the painter, "fit me in, if you please." And he gave
 her his name, spelling it out.
 
 "Thank you, sir," said the hostess. "Your city thanks you; your country
 thanks you; your planet thanks you. But the deepest thanks of all is
 from future generations."
 
 
 END
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Greg Weeks, Stephen Blundell and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  THE BIG TRIP
        UP YONDER
 
 By KURT VONNEGUT, JR.
 
 Illustrated by KOSSIN
 
 
     _If it was good enough for your grandfather, forget it ... it is
     much too good for anyone else!_
 
 
 Gramps Ford, his chin resting on his hands, his hands on the crook of
 his cane, was staring irascibly at the five-foot television screen that
 dominated the room. On the screen, a news commentator was summarizing
 the day's happenings. Every thirty seconds or so, Gramps would jab the
 floor with his cane-tip and shout, "Hell, we did that a hundred years
 ago!"
 
 Emerald and Lou, coming in from the balcony, where they had been seeking
 that 2185 A.D. rarity--privacy--were obliged to take seats in the back
 row, behind Lou's father and mother, brother and sister-in-law, son and
 daughter-in-law, grandson and wife, granddaughter and husband,
 great-grandson and wife, nephew and wife, grandnephew and wife,
 great-grandniece and husband, great-grandnephew and wife--and, of
 course, Gramps, who was in front of everybody. All save Gramps, who was
 somewhat withered and bent, seemed, by pre-anti-gerasone standards, to
 be about the same age--somewhere in their late twenties or early
 thirties. Gramps looked older because he had already reached 70 when
 anti-gerasone was invented. He had not aged in the 102 years since.
 
 "Meanwhile," the commentator was saying, "Council Bluffs, Iowa, was
 still threatened by stark tragedy. But 200 weary rescue workers have
 refused to give up hope, and continue to dig in an effort to save Elbert
 Haggedorn, 183, who has been wedged for two days in a ..."
 
 "I wish he'd get something more cheerful," Emerald whispered to Lou.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 "Silence!" cried Gramps. "Next one shoots off his big bazoo while the
 TV's on is gonna find hisself cut off without a dollar--" his voice
 suddenly softened and sweetened--"when they wave that checkered flag at
 the Indianapolis Speedway, and old Gramps gets ready for the Big Trip Up
 Yonder."
 
 He sniffed sentimentally, while his heirs concentrated desperately on
 not making the slightest sound. For them, the poignancy of the
 prospective Big Trip had been dulled somewhat, through having been
 mentioned by Gramps about once a day for fifty years.
 
 "Dr. Brainard Keyes Bullard," continued the commentator, "President of
 Wyandotte College, said in an address tonight that most of the world's
 ills can be traced to the fact that Man's knowledge of himself has not
 kept pace with his knowledge of the physical world."
 
 "_Hell!_" snorted Gramps. "We said _that_ a hundred years ago!"
 
 "In Chicago tonight," the commentator went on, "a special celebration is
 taking place in the Chicago Lying-in Hospital. The guest of honor
 is Lowell W. Hitz, age zero. Hitz, born this morning, is the
 twenty-five-millionth child to be born in the hospital." The commentator
 faded, and was replaced on the screen by young Hitz, who squalled
 furiously.
 
 "Hell!" whispered Lou to Emerald. "We said that a hundred years ago."
 
 "I heard that!" shouted Gramps. He snapped off the television set and
 his petrified descendants stared silently at the screen. "You, there,
 boy--"
 
 "I didn't mean anything by it, sir," said Lou, aged 103.
 
 "Get me my will. You know where it is. You kids _all_ know where it is.
 Fetch, boy!" Gramps snapped his gnarled fingers sharply.
 
 Lou nodded dully and found himself going down the hall, picking his way
 over bedding to Gramps' room, the only private room in the Ford
 apartment. The other rooms were the bathroom, the living room and the
 wide windowless hallway, which was originally intended to serve as a
 dining area, and which had a kitchenette in one end. Six mattresses and
 four sleeping bags were dispersed in the hallway and living room, and
 the daybed, in the living room, accommodated the eleventh couple, the
 favorites of the moment.
 
 On Gramps' bureau was his will, smeared, dog-eared, perforated and
 blotched with hundreds of additions, deletions, accusations, conditions,
 warnings, advice and homely philosophy. The document was, Lou reflected,
 a fifty-year diary, all jammed onto two sheets--a garbled, illegible log
 of day after day of strife. This day, Lou would be disinherited for the
 eleventh time, and it would take him perhaps six months of impeccable
 behavior to regain the promise of a share in the estate. To say nothing
 of the daybed in the living room for Em and himself.
 
 "Boy!" called Gramps.
 
 "Coming, sir." Lou hurried back into the living room and handed Gramps
 the will.
 
 "Pen!" said Gramps.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 He was instantly offered eleven pens, one from each couple.
 
 "Not _that_ leaky thing," he said, brushing Lou's pen aside. "Ah,
 _there's_ a nice one. Good boy, Willy." He accepted Willy's pen. That
 was the tip they had all been waiting for. Willy, then--Lou's
 father--was the new favorite.
 
 Willy, who looked almost as young as Lou, though he was 142, did a poor
 job of concealing his pleasure. He glanced shyly at the daybed, which
 would become his, and from which Lou and Emerald would have to move back
 into the hall, back to the worst spot of all by the bathroom door.
 
 Gramps missed none of the high drama he had authored and he gave his own
 familiar role everything he had. Frowning and running his finger along
 each line, as though he were seeing the will for the first time, he read
 aloud in a deep portentous monotone, like a bass note on a cathedral
 organ.
 
 [Illustration]
 
 "I, Harold D. Ford, residing in Building 257 of Alden Village, New York
 City, Connecticut, do hereby make, publish and declare this to be my
 last Will and Testament, revoking any and all former wills and
 codicils by me at any time heretofore made." He blew his nose
 importantly and went on, not missing a word, and repeating many for
 emphasis--repeating in particular his ever-more-elaborate specifications
 for a funeral.
 
 At the end of these specifications, Gramps was so choked with emotion
 that Lou thought he might have forgotten why he'd brought out the will
 in the first place. But Gramps heroically brought his powerful emotions
 under control and, after erasing for a full minute, began to write and
 speak at the same time. Lou could have spoken his lines for him, he had
 heard them so often.
 
 "I have had many heartbreaks ere leaving this vale of tears for a better
 land," Gramps said and wrote. "But the deepest hurt of all has been
 dealt me by--" He looked around the group, trying to remember who the
 malefactor was.
 
 Everyone looked helpfully at Lou, who held up his hand resignedly.
 
 Gramps nodded, remembering, and completed the sentence--"my
 great-grandson, Louis J. Ford."
 
 "Grandson, sir," said Lou.
 
 "Don't quibble. You're in deep enough now, young man," said Gramps, but
 he made the change. And, from there, he went without a misstep through
 the phrasing of the disinheritance, causes for which were
 disrespectfulness and quibbling.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 In the paragraph following, the paragraph that had belonged to everyone
 in the room at one time or another, Lou's name was scratched out and
 Willy's substituted as heir to the apartment and, the biggest plum of
 all, the double bed in the private bedroom.
 
 "So!" said Gramps, beaming. He erased the date at the foot of the will
 and substituted a new one, including the time of day. "Well--time to
 watch the McGarvey Family." The McGarvey Family was a television serial
 that Gramps had been following since he was 60, or for a total of 112
 years. "I can't wait to see what's going to happen next," he said.
 
 Lou detached himself from the group and lay down on his bed of pain by
 the bathroom door. Wishing Em would join him, he wondered where she was.
 
 He dozed for a few moments, until he was disturbed by someone stepping
 over him to get into the bathroom. A moment later, he heard a faint
 gurgling sound, as though something were being poured down the washbasin
 drain. Suddenly, it entered his mind that Em had cracked up, that she
 was in there doing something drastic about Gramps.
 
 "Em?" he whispered through the panel. There was no reply, and Lou
 pressed against the door. The worn lock, whose bolt barely engaged its
 socket, held for a second, then let the door swing inward.
 
 "Morty!" gasped Lou.
 
 Lou's great-grandnephew, Mortimer, who had just married and brought his
 wife home to the Ford menage, looked at Lou with consternation and
 surprise. Morty kicked the door shut, but not before Lou had glimpsed
 what was in his hand--Gramps' enormous economy-size bottle of
 anti-gerasone, which had apparently been half-emptied, and which Morty
 was refilling with tap water.
 
 A moment later, Morty came out, glared defiantly at Lou and brushed past
 him wordlessly to rejoin his pretty bride.
 
 Shocked, Lou didn't know what to do. He couldn't let Gramps take the
 mousetrapped anti-gerasone--but, if he warned Gramps about it, Gramps
 would certainly make life in the apartment, which was merely
 insufferable now, harrowing.
 
 Lou glanced into the living room and saw that the Fords, Emerald among
 them, were momentarily at rest, relishing the botches that the McGarveys
 had made of _their_ lives. Stealthily, he went into the bathroom, locked
 the door as well as he could and began to pour the contents of Gramps'
 bottle down the drain. He was going to refill it with full-strength
 anti-gerasone from the 22 smaller bottles on the shelf.
 
 The bottle contained a half-gallon, and its neck was small, so it seemed
 to Lou that the emptying would take forever. And the almost
 imperceptible smell of anti-gerasone, like Worcestershire sauce, now
 seemed to Lou, in his nervousness, to be pouring out into the rest of
 the apartment, through the keyhole and under the door.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The bottle gurgled monotonously. Suddenly, up came the sound of music
 from the living room and there were murmurs and the scraping of
 chair-legs on the floor. "Thus ends," said the television announcer,
 "the 29,121st chapter in the life of your neighbors and mine, the
 McGarveys." Footsteps were coming down the hall. There was a knock on
 the bathroom door.
 
 "Just a sec," Lou cheerily called out. Desperately, he shook the big
 bottle, trying to speed up the flow. His palms slipped on the wet glass,
 and the heavy bottle smashed on the tile floor.
 
 The door was pushed open, and Gramps, dumbfounded, stared at the
 incriminating mess.
 
 Lou felt a hideous prickling sensation on his scalp and the back of his
 neck. He grinned engagingly through his nausea and, for want of anything
 remotely resembling a thought, waited for Gramps to speak.
 
 "Well, boy," said Gramps at last, "looks like you've got a little
 tidying up to do."
 
 And that was all he said. He turned around, elbowed his way through the
 crowd and locked himself in his bedroom.
 
 The Fords contemplated Lou in incredulous silence a moment longer, and
 then hurried back to the living room, as though some of his horrible
 guilt would taint them, too, if they looked too long. Morty stayed
 behind long enough to give Lou a quizzical, annoyed glance. Then he also
 went into the living room, leaving only Emerald standing in the doorway.
 
 Tears streamed over her cheeks. "Oh, you poor lamb--_please_ don't look
 so awful! It was my fault. I put you up to this with my nagging about
 Gramps."
 
 "No," said Lou, finding his voice, "really you didn't. Honest, Em, I was
 just--"
 
 "You don't have to explain anything to me, hon. I'm on your side, no
 matter what." She kissed him on one cheek and whispered in his ear, "It
 wouldn't have been murder, hon. It wouldn't have killed him. It wasn't
 such a terrible thing to do. It just would have fixed him up so he'd be
 able to go any time God decided He wanted him."
 
 "What's going to happen next, Em?" said Lou hollowly. "What's he going
 to do?"
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Lou and Emerald stayed fearfully awake almost all night, waiting to see
 what Gramps was going to do. But not a sound came from the sacred
 bedroom. Two hours before dawn, they finally dropped off to sleep.
 
 At six o'clock, they arose again, for it was time for their generation
 to eat breakfast in the kitchenette. No one spoke to them. They had
 twenty minutes in which to eat, but their reflexes were so dulled by the
 bad night that they had hardly swallowed two mouthfuls of egg-type
 processed seaweed before it was time to surrender their places to their
 son's generation.
 
 Then, as was the custom for whoever had been most recently disinherited,
 they began preparing Gramps' breakfast, which would presently be served
 to him in bed, on a tray. They tried to be cheerful about it. The
 toughest part of the job was having to handle the honest-to-God eggs and
 bacon and oleomargarine, on which Gramps spent so much of the income
 from his fortune.
 
 "Well," said Emerald, "I'm not going to get all panicky until I'm sure
 there's something to be panicky about."
 
 "Maybe he doesn't know what it was I busted," Lou said hopefully.
 
 "Probably thinks it was your watch crystal," offered Eddie, their son,
 who was toying apathetically with his buckwheat-type processed sawdust
 cakes.
 
 "Don't get sarcastic with your father," said Em, "and don't talk with
 your mouth full, either."
 
 "I'd like to see anybody take a mouthful of this stuff and _not_ say
 something," complained Eddie, who was 73. He glanced at the clock. "It's
 time to take Gramps his breakfast, you know."
 
 "Yeah, it is, isn't it?" said Lou weakly. He shrugged. "Let's have the
 tray, Em."
 
 "We'll both go."
 
 Walking slowly, smiling bravely, they found a large semi-circle of
 long-faced Fords standing around the bedroom door.
 
 Em knocked. "Gramps," she called brightly, "_break_-fast is _rea_-dy."
 
 There was no reply and she knocked again, harder.
 
 The door swung open before her fist. In the middle of the room, the
 soft, deep, wide, canopied bed, the symbol of the sweet by-and-by to
 every Ford, was empty.
 
 A sense of death, as unfamiliar to the Fords as Zoroastrianism or the
 causes of the Sepoy Mutiny, stilled every voice, slowed every heart.
 Awed, the heirs began to search gingerly, under the furniture and behind
 the drapes, for all that was mortal of Gramps, father of the clan.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 But Gramps had left not his Earthly husk but a note, which Lou finally
 found on the dresser, under a paperweight which was a treasured souvenir
 from the World's Fair of 2000. Unsteadily, Lou read it aloud:
 
 "'Somebody who I have sheltered and protected and taught the best I know
 how all these years last night turned on me like a mad dog and diluted
 my anti-gerasone, or tried to. I am no longer a young man. I can no
 longer bear the crushing burden of life as I once could. So, after last
 night's bitter experience, I say good-by. The cares of this world will
 soon drop away like a cloak of thorns and I shall know peace. By the
 time you find this, I will be gone.'"
 
 "Gosh," said Willy brokenly, "he didn't even get to see how the
 5000-mile Speedway Race was going to come out."
 
 "Or the Solar Series," Eddie said, with large mournful eyes.
 
 "Or whether Mrs. McGarvey got her eyesight back," added Morty.
 
 "There's more," said Lou, and he began reading aloud again: "'I, Harold
 D. Ford, etc., do hereby make, publish and declare this to be my last
 Will and Testament, revoking any and all former wills and codicils by me
 at any time heretofore made.'"
 
 "No!" cried Willy. "Not another one!"
 
 "'I do stipulate,'" read Lou, "'that all of my property, of whatsoever
 kind and nature, not be divided, but do devise and bequeath it to be
 held in common by my issue, without regard for generation, equally,
 share and share alike.'"
 
 "Issue?" said Emerald.
 
 Lou included the multitude in a sweep of his hand. "It means we all own
 the whole damn shootin' match."
 
 Each eye turned instantly to the bed.
 
 "Share and share alike?" asked Morty.
 
 "Actually," said Willy, who was the oldest one present, "it's just like
 the old system, where the oldest people head up things with their
 headquarters in here and--"
 
 "I like _that_!" exclaimed Em. "Lou owns as much of it as you do, and I
 say it ought to be for the oldest one who's still working. You can
 snooze around here all day, waiting for your pension check, while poor
 Lou stumbles in here after work, all tuckered out, and--"
 
 "How about letting somebody who's never had _any_ privacy get a little
 crack at it?" Eddie demanded hotly. "Hell, you old people had plenty of
 privacy back when you were kids. I was born and raised in the middle of
 that goddamn barracks in the hall! How about--"
 
 "Yeah?" challenged Morty. "Sure, you've all had it pretty tough, and my
 heart bleeds for you. But try honeymooning in the hall for a real kick."
 
 "_Silence!_" shouted Willy imperiously. "The next person who opens his
 mouth spends the next sixth months by the bathroom. Now clear out of my
 room. I want to think."
 
 A vase shattered against the wall, inches above his head.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 In the next moment, a free-for-all was under way, with each couple
 battling to eject every other couple from the room. Fighting coalitions
 formed and dissolved with the lightning changes of the tactical
 situation. Em and Lou were thrown into the hall, where they organized
 others in the same situation, and stormed back into the room.
 
 After two hours of struggle, with nothing like a decision in sight, the
 cops broke in, followed by television cameramen from mobile units.
 
 For the next half-hour, patrol wagons and ambulances hauled away Fords,
 and then the apartment was still and spacious.
 
 An hour later, films of the last stages of the riot were being televised
 to 500,000,000 delighted viewers on the Eastern Seaboard.
 
 In the stillness of the three-room Ford apartment on the 76th floor of
 Building 257, the television set had been left on. Once more the air was
 filled with the cries and grunts and crashes of the fray, coming
 harmlessly now from the loudspeaker.
 
 The battle also appeared on the screen of the television set in the
 police station, where the Fords and their captors watched with
 professional interest.
 
 Em and Lou, in adjacent four-by-eight cells, were stretched out
 peacefully on their cots.
 
 "Em," called Lou through the partition, "you got a washbasin all your
 own, too?"
 
 "Sure. Washbasin, bed, light--the works. And we thought _Gramps'_ room
 was something. How long has this been going on?" She held out her hand.
 "For the first time in forty years, hon, I haven't got the shakes--look
 at me!"
 
 "Cross your fingers," said Lou. "The lawyer's going to try to get us a
 year."
 
 "Gee!" Em said dreamily. "I wonder what kind of wires you'd have to pull
 to get put away in solitary?"
 
 "All right, pipe down," said the turnkey, "or I'll toss the whole kit
 and caboodle of you right out. And first one who lets on to anybody
 outside how good jail is ain't never getting back in!"
 
 The prisoners instantly fell silent.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The living room of the apartment darkened for a moment as the riot
 scenes faded on the television screen, and then the face of the
 announcer appeared, like the Sun coming from behind a cloud. "And now,
 friends," he said, "I have a special message from the makers of
 anti-gerasone, a message for all you folks over 150. Are you hampered
 socially by wrinkles, by stiffness of joints and discoloration or loss
 of hair, all because these things came upon you before anti-gerasone was
 developed? Well, if you are, you need no longer suffer, need no longer
 feel different and out of things.
 
 "After years of research, medical science has now developed
 _Super_-anti-gerasone! In weeks--yes, weeks--you can look, feel and act
 as young as your great-great-grandchildren! Wouldn't you pay $5,000 to
 be indistinguishable from everybody else? Well, you don't have to. Safe,
 tested _Super_-anti-gerasone costs you only a few dollars a day.
 
 "Write now for your free trial carton. Just put your name and address on
 a dollar postcard, and mail it to '_Super_,' Box 500,000, Schenectady,
 N. Y. Have you got that? I'll repeat it. '_Super_,' Box 500,000 ..."
 
 Underlining the announcer's words was the scratching of Gramps' pen, the
 one Willy had given him the night before. He had come in, a few minutes
 earlier, from the Idle Hour Tavern, which commanded a view of Building
 257 from across the square of asphalt known as the Alden Village Green.
 He had called a cleaning woman to come straighten the place up, then had
 hired the best lawyer in town to get his descendants a conviction, a
 genius who had never gotten a client less than a year and a day. Gramps
 had then moved the daybed before the television screen, so that he could
 watch from a reclining position. It was something he'd dreamed of doing
 for years.
 
 "Schen-_ec_-ta-dy," murmured Gramps. "Got it!" His face had changed
 remarkably. His facial muscles seemed to have relaxed, revealing
 kindness and equanimity under what had been taut lines of bad temper. It
 was almost as though his trial package of _Super_-anti-gerasone had
 already arrived. When something amused him on television, he smiled
 easily, rather than barely managing to lengthen the thin line of his
 mouth a millimeter.
 
 Life was good. He could hardly wait to see what was going to happen
 next.
 
                                                   --KURT VONNEGUT, JR.
 
 
 
 
 Transcriber's Note:
 
     This etext was produced from _Galaxy Science Fiction_ January 1954.
     Extensive research did not uncover any evidence that the U.S.
     copyright on this publication was renewed. Minor spelling and
     typographical errors have been corrected without note.
 
 
 
 
 
